Poll: Would you trust @theresa_may's government to properly respect our human rights?#ECHR #Remain #Brexit 
When it's wrong, it's wrong. No amount of nationalistic rhetoric changes the fact that Brexit damages every European, yes that's us! 
Any honours for the Brexit side of the #euref or is it still only the losing side with gongs? 
Trump, Brexit, Syria…Am planning a revolution for 2017… A bit vague on the details at the moment, but will you join me? #happynewyear 
Mo Farah getting a knighthood is really cool, and will really piss off your uncle, who voted for Brexit. 
In 2017, Britain will have to decide what kind of Brexit it wants: hard, soft or somewhere in-between  
Labour losing out as English politics realigns for and against Brexit: good analysis by Andrew Grice @IndyVoices  
You'd think the way The Sun obsessively attacks the 'metropolitan elites' over Brexit, its editor would hide the fact he's one himself  
Future historians will note that Jack Chambers getting a seat in February started a chain reaction leading to Brexit, Trump, and global war. 
"Brexit, trump and Corbyn in one year. That's my wet dream" - Edward Clynch summoning up 2016 for us all 
Hi @LeaveEUOfficial, your award to @timfarron makes me even more proud to be a LibDem and oppose brexit 
Hundreds of thousands of Leave voters now say Brexit was the worst event of 2016  
UKGov admits that it will vote for #brexit even if clear evidence suggests Scotland will be significantly worse off #brexitshambles @thesnp 
Bruton: Britain should reverse Brexit decision  via @rte 
Jeremy Corbyn sells out the UK by backing Brexit  @jeremycorbyn #RemainINEU #LibDems #Labour 
"Trump and Brexit were a reaction against a corrupt elite," he said, whitely 
Note that Sweden & Denmark are overwhelmingly in favor of staying in the EU. No Brexit contagion at all as many thought.  
Is populism a threat to democracy? Or a democratic response to an increasingly undemocratic liberalism? Brexit, etc.  
The UK rewards its citizens with feudal titles and offices in a dead empire. In this context, Brexit was a foregone conclusion. 
Trump and #Brexit!What'll be the nexshit?#WriteAPoemAbout2016 
If Leave voters now saying Brexit was 2016's worst event voted Remain, Britain would be staying in the EU  
Delighted for Mo Farah, Andy Murray and Jess Ennis on their honours. Sir Mohammed has a particularly nice ring to it in the year of Brexit. 
Britain: Give it to me Brexit: Hard, soft, or in-between? *winks while clicking fuzzy handcuffs around wrists*  
Theresa May wants a red, white and blue Brexit. Jeremy Corbyn wants a people's Brexit. Most of us now want a Brexitless Brexit.  
Labour will not block or delay Brexit says Corbyn  
Phil Taylor bio : darts , brexit , white , loyalist , stoke , grandad , hate the PC brigade . UKIP . manboobs 
Theresa May's monthly average favourability rating, she's being found out. 2017 Brexit & Economy turmoil to come, will only get much worse.  
Brexit: things that should not need to be said - Efta-EEA is still on the agenda ...  #Brexit.  
Just loving the most delicious irony ever. A Muslim immigrant gets a … #Brexit! #AriseSirMo #NewYearsHonours  
Remember if you give a toss about who's got a honour or not or what honour they've got or not, you are well Brexit. 
I have to agree! He is anti Brexit must be Liberal?   
Brexit may turn out to be the single biggest contribution to European cooperation (and hence prosperity) delivered by the UK in decades.  
Reminder: This guy thinks #Putin was behind #Brexit..  
Trump and Brexit were;t the first time the elites took a hammering, explains @profdavidflint  
The world enters an unpredictable New Year after votes for Brexit and for Donald Trump - political cartoon gallery  
New year and new positivity about #Brexit from @jeremycorbyn --- very welcome (from about two mins)  
Ok so in the #USA the pound is worth less than the dollar. Thanks #brexit. Smart. Real smart. 
Most popular questions of 2016What's brexit?What's the mannequin challenge?Who's hosting? 
My most retweeted post of 2016. Why the hell didn't more than 48% listen to such a reasoned argument? We were #StrongerIn #BREXIT  
Last sketch of the year, on my quest to find the meaning of Brexit  
Everyone looking forward to the return of customs controls when you go on holiday to the EU? That's the part of the Brexit effect. #Brexit  
Remember when NYE used to be fun? That's before #EU #Merkel opened the floodgates of hell.#Brexit #AfD #PVV #SVPol 
do you people ACTUALLY want #BREXIT ??> if so we must do a BUY NOTHING for two weeks> this means NOTHING >hit them in the WALLET ??????  
Scotland has a Brexit plan that can keep it in the Single Market and the Union  via @telegraphnews 
Who was that Brexit whining that there aren't any Brexit honours? Cause my MegaBrexit, Homophobic, Manslaughtering MP just got a Knighthood.  
In last few tweets I've upped Brexit, aid budget and Corbyn. My work on here is done for the night  
Way to go @timfarron, you've clearly rattled this lot. I'm grateful to you for speaking out against Brexit.  
Replacement Migration: that is the genocidal plan by #UN #EU #Merkel #Banksters. They want to ruin our civilization#AfD #PVV #Nexit #Brexit  
Remain now have a 2nd challenge to brexit in the high court. If they are looking for civil war they are going in the right direction. 
I say, @jeremycorbyn, how is it that you don't know we don't want #Brexit, you photo-posing wankpuffin? Can't you read? 
SNP's crisis warning to Theresa May amid fears of UK quitting European Convention on Human Rights #indyref2#brexit  
Brexit not only divided a nation it has broken up families and couples too. It wasn't a can of worms worth opening. #Brexit  
Hard Brexit will be 'mission impossible' for Britain, warns German car chief  
A Banker's Brexit...This is why, no matter which way you voted, we need to support Labour scruitiny#BankersBrexit 
Sums up the state of mind that enabled Brexit, Trump…Confusion that prevented these to be countered by a consistent narrative #kompromat 
Anton Muscatelli, Principal @UofGlasgow, on ScotGov's #Brexit plan & importance of Single Market membership  
This is the sort of news we've sadly been dreading. Brexit is fundamentally sinister. These moves will prove it.  
#Brexit and robots mean trouble for UK's future  #robotics 
This is how Wee Krankie listens to, and tries to win over voters...... by laughing and sneering at them.  #SNPGTF #Brexit #SturgeonMustGo 
Post-war fantasies and Brexit: the delusional view of Britain's place in the world  
What does Brexit mean for the future of British fashion?  
LOL someone's upset. Thing is @montie, your Brexit heroes haven't actually delivered anything. Mainly because they're clueless or scarpered  
IDS is the worst of the worst in public office from all points of view. BREXIT has certainly brought the scum to the surface.  
#WriteAPoemAbout2016Stay close by meAnd if I awake this dreamHeed not of what I sayFor #Brexit is NOT'Such stuff dreams are made on' 
When do Wetherspoons serve egg and chips you ask? They serve egg on face and chips on shoulders for Brexit 24/7. 
like you, @Nigel_Farage has my gratitude. #brexit means everything. Thank-you both! 
Great that Prof Spencer has been given CBE. I'd the pleasure of editing this piece he wrote on Brexit & criminal law  
Motor chief warns hard Brexit will be mission impossible as he predicts “massive negative effects”  
State to seek automatic EU entry for NI in event of unification #brexit #indyref2 via @IrishTimes 
We talk Trump, Brexit, Celeb Deaths, Sir @johnhiggs, Kathmandu, Magic,Discordia and other stuff in our 2016 review! 
Carney is a globalist setting himself up to replace Trudeau. He never supported Brexit & does all he can to undermine it at every chance  
The latest The Legal Aware Daily!  Thanks to @pauljebb1 @ladycatlover @HuwMorgan1 #nhs #brexit 
Defining moment of 2016 - well pleased to be reelected as Borough councillor but the sense of relief with #brexit vote I will never forget 
ICYMI: German car industry chief warns that UK car manufacturing will suffer badly from a hard Brexit  
Brexit & Trump have come as a surprise because we have become complacent. 2016 has been the perfect wake up call.   
Unbelievable. BBC totally out of touch on Brexit. Lasted less than 1'30" of Charlie Brooker's 2016 Wipe before switching off. 
NEW legal challenge to Theresa May's Brexit process  
@acgrayling Corbyn Labour don't support a Labour brexit they support a Conservative brexitthe irony of tory-lite Corbyn 
This is a precursor. #Brexit, #Trump.  The PEOPLE are sick and tired of GLOBALISM!  
#WriteAPoemAbout2016Fuck the BrexitThe European exitFuck fascismAnd Tory cashismFuck warFeed the poorFuck hateBefore it's too late 
UK will leave EU Single Market after Brexit, Tory Minister has finally confirmedHOPE 4 ONCE  SUN IS TELLING TRUTH  
London shares hit year's high at end of 2016 trading - Despite Brexit  
Brexit blow: London sinks to lowest position in IPO rankings since 2009  
This letter to Private Eye nails Brexit 
Britain WILL leave the EU’s Single Market after Brexit, Tory minister @WalkerWorcester finally confirms on record:  
Ladies & GentlemenI give you.....'The Voice of Brexit Britain'  
Theresa May must deliver a clean Brexit if she wants to meet the Tory migration target   
Good SENSE frm Ireland"Former Taoiseach John Bruton has said Britain should change its mind on Brexit & stay in EU" 
Hello! Someone kindly recalculated Footsie in dollars#brexit Picture not so rosy  
Think you know Brexit? Try these 15 questions in our quiz of the year  
Dear #Brexit fans. This will cheer you up.....not. #Farage #UKIP 
‘After Brexit, he’s earned it!'  
Labour's lost my vote and no doubt other Remainers until / unless it opposes Brexit. 
Incredible! Farage applied for German citizenship the day after referendum.Brexit for the plebs - EU for them.Brexiters - you've been had.  
Ireland, RED C poll: EU Membership Referendum:Age: Remain18-24: 91%25-34: 87%35-44: 79%45-54: 73%54-65: 76%65+: 79%#Brexit  
#yearender2016: Historic #Brexit brings along game-changing issues that can reshape global politics forever  
May2016 "Brexit would prompt stock market and house price crash, says IMF"  today the stock market hit record high   
IF I'D HAVE WOKEN UP ON 24th JUNE & THERE HAD ONLY BEEN ONE VOTE FOR #BREXIT ... I WOULD HAVE BEEN PROUD THAT IT WOULD HAVE BEEN MINE !  
The silence and acquiescence of  #Remain MPs is shocking. At the very least they should demand a vote on the #Brexit deal.  
Another Legal Roadblock Thrown Before Brexit as Fresh High Court Challenge Launched  
A post-Brexit US-UK trade deal wld almost certainly require allowing US firms to "help" run NHS. May be ready to sell NHS to Trump. Are we? 
#brexit  Literally, the road to nowhere  
London shares hit year's high at end of 2016 trading.But but, it can’t be. We were told #Brexit = apocalypse now!  
Only way Corbyn can meaningfully halt a "bankers' Brexit" is torpedoing entire Art 50 exit deal. Wonder if he would.  
Brexit to send UK tumbling down world economic league table, worrying new analysis shows  
From Brexit, to , to the election, @CoachPeteUW takes pride in discussing social issues with his team #PurpleReign 
#Remainers reveal their legal case against #Brexit  
As Co-Leader of @weareundivided & a #Leave voter, I'm delighted to work with @Open_Britain to get the best possible #Brexit for young people  
British bosses are quickly adapting to life after #Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn talks like a Brexiter. Sounds like a Brexiter. Acts like a Brexiter. He wants hard Brexit.   
£15bn worth of investment in UK since the referendum shows a vote of confidence in a strong post-Brexit economy  
EUROPE 2017: BREXIT, FAR-RIGHT SURGING, RUSSIAN THREAT...  
Corbyn doesn't say "Brexit for the people" anywhere in this video (fortunately for him -it's contradiction in terms)  
Scottish independence is the only hope for young people after Brexit  
A vote for Labour is a vote for Brexit.A vote for Conservative is a vote for Brexit. A vote for UKIP is a vote for Brexit.Me? #nobrexit 
Great Overview:Top Financial Services Issues of 2017@PwC#fintech #Brexit #AI #blockchain #robotics #regulation 
Tory MP calls on Home Office to plan NEW system to deal with EU citizens in UK post Brexit. Current one 'untenable'  
EU citizens such as students and carers could be disqualified from UK residency. Brexit reality by @lisaocarroll 
Boris Johnson on Brexit: “This is like the jailer has accidentally left the door of the jail open and people can see the sunlit land beyond" pic.twitter.com/si6tY6dLQ7 
Scottish Independence Is Now A Necessary Antidote To The Reactionary Beast Of Brexit  via @HuffPostUKPol #Bringiton 
"If the majority in Britain opts for Brexit, that would be a decision against the single market. In is in. Out is out." — Wolfgang Schäuble. pic.twitter.com/zEfCTuu4jF 
Wasn't it Obama who interfered on the BREXIT referendum and Bibi's Israeli elections? 
A SOFT BREXIT could put the nation's health AT RISK, doctors warn 
I'm back after spending Christmas in Berlin with minimal internet. Europeans cannot understand why UK is doing #Brexit Neither can I  
Brexit was a Tory coupI was misled and so were youFake news is on the riseAnd quiet voices delegitimised#WriteAPoemAbout2016 
Brexit to send UK tumbling down world economic league table, worrying new analysis shows, still we have got our country back innit  
Without the EU European countries would be vulnerable to being played against each other by the great powers & multinationals#Brexit 
Forget the class divide, voters now cast their ballots over Brexit – and Labour is the loser - The Independent  
"Brexit sends FTSE 100 into freefall amid recession fears."- June 24FTSE 100 ends the year at a new all-time high.  
Horrific sampling in poll @talkRADIO and @AmySouthall are pushing. Too many kids. Small sample. Too many high earners and uni grads #Brexit  
If it's all the same to you, I'll pass. No #brexit at all, thanks.  
So it's official. Labour "will not block Brexit". Direct from the horse's mouth.  
#Whitehall papers have revealed, the #Brexit vote has helped to attract an extra £16.3 Billion in foreign investment to Britain. #Brexit  
Brexit for bankers 'not good enough' - Corbyn- Brexit for anyone also not good enough-we should be remaining!  
New series: #Brexit Myth Breaker. Number 1: 1975 #referendum was never just about free trade. Share our report:  
NEWSFLASHIt's full steam ahead as Brexit ministers start building Britain's future on the train tracks to Leavesville...  
.@Open_Britain & @weareundivided have teamed up to bring together young people who want the best possible #Brexit  
Theresa May should reconsider Brexit, @adamposen says  
Nigel Farage - "I see it as my job over the next two or three years to help make sure that we get what we voted for." #Brexit 
Funny that. I voted Leave but now realise I was fooled & lied to on an industrial scale -basically sold a pup. I now think Brexit is a farce  
But I thought Brexit was going to be “economic Armageddon”? That’s what all the clever people said.  
Why Britain's consumers are in for a spot of belt-tightening in 2017  
Forget Brexit. Forget Trump. Azealia Banks cleaning out her CHICKEN SACRIFICING CUPBOARD is the wildest thing to happen this year. I'm shook 
In 2017, Britain will have to decide what kind of Brexit it wants: hard, soft or somewhere in-between  
@yogscast Five Go to Brexit Island...one of the greatest read throughs by @lomadia and @RadderssGaming XD 
@UKLabour should be opposing #Brexit but instead is supporting this Tory Government. @jeremycorbyn is nothing less than a Tory enabler. 
Shocking photos reveal true depth of David Camerons regrets over Brexit.  
4 more legal challenges to Brexit from illiberal anti-democrats: the courts & Parliament must respect the electorate  
#REMOANERS WON'T ACCEPT DEFEAT! because they'd have 2 admit they were wrong. #Brexit supporters know that!!  #BBC #UK 
FOR ALL DELUDED #REMOANERS! #Footsie100 HIGHEST POINT EVER! NOW: 7,142.83 THANKS TO #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #ITV #TORY #LABOUR #LIBDEM 
A fifth of relationship counselors say they've dealt with couples arguing about Brexit this year  
Scottish Independence Is Now A Necessary Antidote To The Reactionary Beast Of Brexit  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Remain campaigners call for donors to sponsor youth campaigners for Brexit lobbying  
France named a road 'Brexit Street' but it doesn't actually go anywhere  
Spotted this in a bookshop window. Enid Blyton, Five on #Brexit Island! Child's play or adult fiction?  
Brexit boost: The FTSE 100 has ended 2016 at a new all-time high of 7,142.83.  
Despite Brexit...  
According to Ben Bradshaw MP they also caused Brexit  My washing machine also just broke must blame Russians  #Lies 
My parliamentary speeches have 45 million hits.Took UKIP from nothing in Yorkshire to 400,000 votes in 2014. I was Mr BREXIT in the north.  
Canada's trade minister thinks an EU-wide deal could still work in Britain after Brexit  
#Brexit is a lose/lose. At least German business people have the sense to see and admit that.  
Remainers campaign to give under-30s a voice in Brexit negotiations  
Celebrities dyingBrexit to fix Charter for spyingThese lying pricks#WriteAPoemAbout2016 
The same German car chiefs the Brextremists reckoned would be falling over themselves to make Brexit work   
Hard Brexit will be 'mission impossible' for Britain, warns german car chief  
This letter to Private Eye nails Brexit 
If Corbyn believes Brexit will be anything other than power grab and rights slash by absolute bastards he's stupider than I thought. 
Forecasts for 2017: our writers make predictions from Brexit to Donald Trump's first 100 days in office  
The year of Brexit and Trump, 2016 in charts  
Jeremy Corbyn's new year message: 'let's deliver Brexit for the people' – video  
How about opposing #Brexit?  
This comment from a reader of the FT has gone viral because it nails the remainer/leaver Brexit row 
There isn't the faintest possibility of a People's Brexit, and it's dangerous even to pretend there is.  
Is this a sick joke? Corbyn now rubbing salt in the wounds of the 63% of Labour supporters who voted against #brexit.  
I just joined the real opposition:  - @LibDems #Brexit is the greatest threat to our country in my lifetime (60yrs) 
Just finished reading @IanDunt's  superb book "Brexit: What the hell happens next?" - Must do a new @Scientists4EU video on it. 
Trump, Brexit and this year's other top stories, in graphics  
Undeliverable, that's what you are.Unimaginable, going too far.Unachievable, not thought through.Undesirable, Brexit, that's you. 
Michael Gove takes up Parkour to show the public how beautiful a Brexit leap of faith can look; "let's take back controoolwhoahhHHH...."  
James McClean is a painfully average footballer but his ability to make Brexit/yer da/racist heads fall off is second to none 
Since Brexit, Brits are at risk of becoming mere fluffers on int'l stage. It's "Honey I shrunk the Kids," but they've done it to a nation.  
The year is coming to an end and the British Govt still has no #Brexit plan. It is clear for us: leave means leave with no cherry-picking.  
Yup, they're hoping that Brexit means a quick US FTA where US healthcare companies pay big bucks to get a chunk of a privatised £116bn NHS.  
Scottish independence is the only hope for young people after Brexit  
In 2016,- The Brexit happened- Duterte happened- Trump happened- Too many celebrity deaths happened- So why haven't you and I happened? 
A fake Brexit with single market membership will leave the NHS unable to properly check foreign doctors. Dangerous! 
Scotland's Brexit plan straight from la-la land and devised by Dipsy & Tinky Winky  
Britain secures £16bn of foreign investment since #Brexit yet hapless @DavidLammy STILL wants to 'stop this madness'.The idiotic fascist. 
Corbyn’s NY message: “Brexit for workers, not bankers” From the man who backed the bankers by backing Remain.Superb 
Theresa May most absent PM ever? Downing Street only speaks out 21: Apologise for Boris2: Suck up to Trump3: Confirm Brexit means Brexit 
"The rue du Brexit..is in an ugly industrial zone and goes nowhere as it is circular"  HT @tylercowen 
#UK secured more than £15bn of extra foreign investment since #Brexit vote:  via @Telegraph 
Brexit Britain wins an extra £16.3 billion in foreign investment. So much for that economic apocalypse... 
This nails Brexit. #muppets 
UK exhausted from arguing with Brexit f**kwits - Mash top 20, number 4  
Trump lied. Syria cried.Brexit restores false prideForces of good on wrong sidewe need it most But the music died #WriteAPoemAbout2016 
New: "Playing FTSE"#Brexit is the Keyser Soze of facts. And *poof*, they're gone...FB: 
If Leave voters now saying Brexit was 2016's worst event voted Remain, Britain would be staying in the EU  
This comment from a reader of the FT has gone viral because it nails the remainer/leaver Brexit row 
This is the reason celebrities & telly people are always wrong.Wrong on BREXIT, wrong on climate.Why ? They never ever talk to real people  
Brexit transition deal may avert UK economic ‘catastrophe’  via @FT Sobriety dawns! 
Fury as Scotland handed ENGLAND’S fishing quota in 'Brexit stitch-up'@UKIP need to campaign against this vigorously 
Hard to go back on US election vote. However, #Brexit vote was advisory. An inconvenient truth for #Brexiters but a truth nonetheless. 
Next time somebody says "the markets recovered", tell them what that looks like to investors NOT in the UK.. #Brexit #LeaveLies 
FOUR legal challenges launched against Brexit as Government waits for ruling. Sore losers won't admit defeat   
Labour won’t vote against Brexit but don’t worry they’ll use “moral pressure” to ensure Theresa May gets a good deal  
Hundreds of thousand of Leave voters now say Brexit was the worst event of 2016  
Alarming early sign of 'Trump effect' on fawning Brits desperate to stay 'special' in Brexit era  
Is nobody dignified in defeat these days? First we have the remainiacs over Brexit & now Obama blaming Russian interferencePot kettle black  
So farewell to 2016A hell of a year that has seenTrump's triumph, and Brexit's,And multiple exitsBy stars of the stage and the screen. 
We should all be optimistic about 2017! It's time to come together and make a success of Brexit   
Question: whether you're for or against Brexit what would need to happen by 2020 for you to admit you were wrong? 
2016When 'establishment elite' tried to con Britons into voting #Remain with #ProjectFear lies.We chose #Brexit & rejected the rancid EU.  
America, Canada, Australia, Ghana and New Zealand have all said that they want post-Brexit free trade with the UK. pic.twitter.com/Z1VW5176LG 
Very interesting findings. Only 20% of Irish people want to leave the #EU. Brexit has no impact on Irish attitudes to EU.  
BREXITEERS "Are Neanderthals" claims Sam White @SamWhiteTky #csm #brexit #brexitshambles 
Am teetering on the edge. I can't be in a pro Brexit party. Can you, @Keir_Starmer ?  
Here's a classic bit of Brexit economics reporting, with the upbeat news tailing off as the article proceeds  
Brexit transition deal may avert ‘catastrophe’  
Year ahead Brexit Trump and election shocks in EU with @ayeshahazarika on @GMB 6.30. Sounds like good year to.me 
In 2016 the little man finally stood up to the Establishment, let's make sure we get Brexit in 2017!  
Jeremy Corbyn: Brexit for bankers is 'not good enough'  
Best of 2016: Post-Brexit hate crimes have a context: Europe is more racist than the rest of the world  #Brexit  
A National Front-run council in France has named a street Brexit Road in tribute to the Brits  
dont suppose the man "who saved our Country" will get a mention in this years  #NewYearsHonours ?#NigelFarage #SirNigelFarage #Brexit  
2016 Recap - Brexit, Trump, Demonetization. None expected.2017 Resolution - Do not make forecasts esp about future. #HappyNewYear 
Obama meddled in anti Brexit vote and Hillary tried to subvert Putin election. All financed by Dr Evil Soros  
A SOFT BREXIT could put the nation's health AT RISK, doctors warn  
BOOMING BRITAIN: Brexit helps attract extra £16BILLION in foreign investment figures show  
Mo's a MuslimMurray's a ScotMay's a RemainerBojo is notWatson's a traitorCorbyn's a trotSterling deadBrexit rot#WriteAPoemAbout2016 
June, the link btw Brexit & Russia:  
950 years before Brexit, the Norman invasion brought us Brentry  
I don't want to go to sleep because I'm worried about what news I'm going to wake up to... this feels like Brexit #mediablackout 
Jeremy Corbyn vows in his New Year's message to take on establishment in 2017 and prevent a pro-banker Brexit  
Will Santa still be allowed in the country after Brexit? 
Intellectual kickoff for Brexit and anti-EU nationalism, is German reunification, which is constantly overlooked.   
Sorry remoaners.No doom signs yet...#Brexit helps attract extra £16BILLION in foreign investment figures show. 
#WriteAPoemAbout2016The last Trump sounded Boris shouted comeThe Brexit gates openedAnd in walked Farage with his motley scum! 
@CloughOlive: Let's hope Scotland & Northern Ireland rise to the task  successfully & save England from the economical suicide of Brexit. 
.@michaelgove: what are you claiming is 'right about Brexit'? We don't yet know what Brexit is. @StevePeers @jdportes 
''Putin tried to influence the US election''...said the nearly dead duck who tried to influence the UK brexit referendum.... 
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
Looking at BBC page views, Top 3 stories of 2016. Trump, Brexit and then George Michael. 
May wants to make UK a pariah by taking us out of Convention of Human Rights, after Brexit  
Fresh challenges against Brexit as May awaits Supreme Court ruling. Why does Miller not except Democratic Vote?    
Total hypocrisy from Obama. Let's never forget the way he tried to bully the British people during the Brexit referendum #skypapers 
New Brexit challenge lodged at the High Court 
If you fancy getting a bit angry about Brexit/Brexit/Brexit all over again  stick on the 2016 wipe. Feeling very fucking festive now. 
Can someone please launch a legal campaign to stop this flagrant waste of taxpayers money? #ResignSturgeon#brexit  
Forecasts for 2017: our writers make predictions from Brexit to Donald Trump's first 100 days in office  
Did Home Office Ministers think through what sending "threatening" letters to settled EU cits may do to UK image in EU27 capitals?#Brexit 
Fresh Brexit challenge in high court over leaving single market and EEA  
I don't see why everyone is cheering for the end of 2016. Trump and Brexit haven't even happened yet. 
#Labour and #Corbyn continue to ignore the reality of what #Brexit means and plays games with Britains future. They are a disgrace. 
Jeremy Corbyn says 'Labour will not stand for a Brexit that only protects the City' 
Best line I've heard all year, "The English Civil War was like a tooled up Brexit" on #PhilomenaCunk #CunkonChristmas 
Taxpayer's money being spent on Brexit appeal - but just how much remains a secret  
.@RichardBurgon The Tories need to end this posturing and concentrate on delivering a sensible Brexit deal -  
.Ahem.Jeremy Corbyn is having a 'hurrah' for Brexit tomorrow morning- good day for a lie in#ReverseTheReferendum 
Excellent report from @IPPR detailing #PostBrexitBritain.. 'Brexit is the firing gun on a decade of disruption' #EU  
Britain will demand a leading role in Europol after Brexit #exclusive 
Brexit for bankers and corporate world 'not good enough' - Corbyn  
Phoney Brexit. The main battle still to come. BTW separate Scottish immigration policy. Still backing it?  
ICYMI: May wants to make UK a pariah by taking us out of Convention of Human Rights, after Brexit  
"The public actually did not, does not, and will not want a Brexit in the foreseeable future."  
Despite Brexit  
Labour are rightly walloping May over Brexit, but a really weird thing is  happening: IT'S BEING REPORTED  
"Brexit is the firing gun on a decade of disruption," says the Institute for Public Policy Research. Oops! #brexit  
German neuroscientist also told to leave UK after residency rejection  Welcome to Brexit Britain 
Brexit fires starting gun on decade of disruption, says report  
Goodbye Bowie, Prince, Michael and Fisher,Eternal fame and adoration I wish ya.Trump and Brexit - pah bollocks to ya!#WriteAPoemAbout2016 
If you thought this was even half true it would make pressing ahead with Brexit an act of insanity.  
Brexit is like religion, faith in it does not mean it is correct, more often than not, time proves it is not. 
UK Gov has signed up to advanced EU military& security integration plansWhy do that before Brexit?What's going on? 
More than a THIRD of SNP supporters voted FOR Brexit in Sturgeon shame | UK | News | Daily Express  
Four per cent of Leave voters think Brexit is the worst event of 2016  
Brexit is not the will of the British people - it never has been  
#Scotland has a #Brexit plan that can keep it in the Single Market and the Union:  
Brexit is the 'firing gun on a decade of disruption', report finds  
Man admits Brexit electoral fraud live on radio  
CLAIM: Britain Signs Up to Massive European Military Integration Despite Brexit Vote  
UK mobile users face return of steep roaming bills after Brexit.  
I agree with him in a way. US allies like UK and Israel should slam Obama admin publicly for intervention in elections/Brexit   
May: Brexit lets me ignore parliament for yrs to come because the end justifies the means. No it doesn’t. That’s dictatorship, not democracy 
#NigelFarage making sure #BRITISH #politicians keep their word on #BREXIT!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #TRUMP #TORY #UK #EU #NEWS 
The lesson of Trump and Brexit: a society too complex for its people risks everything | John Harris | Opinion |   
MEMO to CameronDear DaveIf I were you I'd PASS on the NATO gig.You left the UK in a Brexit mess & did a runner !Not a great CV ! 
There's unfinished business #NigelFarage says he would REJECT #peerage until fight is won #Brexit!  #BBC #SKY #UK #EU 
It's not a #Brexit induced recession that we need to watch out for, but rather a #Brexit induced boom. Low interest rate and QE are WRONG. 
I think everyone who voted for Brexit or Trump should go on a big list that will be made available on  in 100 years 
Call me cynical but... 'Major privateer firms are lining up to help the Brexit Department with free advice'.  
#2016Wipe! Tonight! Very soon! 9pm! BBC2! Contains Bowie, Brexit, GBBO, Pokémon Go, Trump, @Cassetteboy, Cunk meets @ProfBrianCox and more. 
Fresh Brexit challenge in high court over leaving single market and EEA  
If you really care about UK parliamentary sovereignty you oppose Brexit. This gov threatens it vastly more than EU membership has ever done. 
Mass EU Migration Will See UK Population Rise by 12 Million with 'Soft Brexit'  
Beggars belief that scrapping human rights is the priority of a government already far out of its depth on Brexit..  
Local By-Election Review 2016: 19 of the 26 LD local post BREXIT gains have been in places which voted LEAVE  
Sad to see London MPs like @HarrietHarman support #Brexit even when their constituents voted #Remain. Do they think Brexit is good for them? 
"The 15-year-old on beach holiday with celebrity mother would be my favourite breast, Beryl. Budding and full of potential, like Brexit."  
Report: Soft Brexit Would See UK Population Rise by 12 Million  
Because, post-Brexit, I won't be able to choose where in the EU to live?  
Katie Hopkins BLASTS Remainer after he brands Brexit voters 'RACISTS and xenophobes'  
Here is my 2nd suggestion for A #NewYearsResolution2. Fight ANY and ALL forms of Brexit#NeverNeverNeverGiveIn 
photo of 'Rue de Brexit' in Beaucaire in France - it's a circular road that starts and ends in rue Robert Schuman  
In order to see how bad ppl can be to each other try either:1. Discussing #brexit on Twitter OR2. Going to #IKEA on a sale dayJeez!!! 
Louise Mensch: Brexit means leaving the EU but not necessarily leaving the EEA - but we mustn't ask whether it means leaving the EEA.  
Respecting the EU ref result would mean accepting it showed a divided country and is no mandate for ploughing ahead with #Brexit.#Remain 
David Cameron likes Brussels, so no surprise over a possible top job at NATO. After #brexit there won't a better job for a Brit in that city 
The majority of the press is not contributing to free speech, but drowning it in a torrent of one-sided propaganda. #Brexit #YesEU #Remain 
Four per cent of Leave voters think Brexit was the worst event of 2016  
F.A.O Gina Miller.It is with regret that we must inform you that the footsie is now at its highest ever level. Brexit is destroying us! 
.@AdamPosen discusses the U.K. economy, Brexit and Bank of England monetary policy @business 
Brexit may finally have turned Britain pro-European.  @POLITICOEurope 
Dennis in Wisconsin gets it. Theresa May is trying to flub #Brexit. Check out my rant on @SiriusXMPatriot... 
Brexit revealed the divide. It didn't cause it  
How to heal a Brexit HeartSo You've Been Trumped (US edition) #2017SelfHelpBooks@LibyaLiberty 
Yes. But equally, Trump may turn out frightening but transient; while Brexit promises Britain a permanent loss of power and wealth.  
Yer pal @AngrySalmond is giving their round-up of year, including thoughts on Brexit, Trump and the Despair Squid. 
Entirely thanks to @David_Cameron #Britain blundered into #Brexit, so let's now see how he can make a balls-up of @NATO, shall we? #facepalm 
Video from Bloomberg Daybreak this morning "Theresa May Should Reconsider Brexit"  @business Best is last 30 seconds 
The difference between Trump and Brexit: Brexit may make us poorer by 2030. Trump may mean we don't see 2030. 
Chinese keep buying London property despite Brexit  
British electricity suppliers launch a new range of post brexit products for the 'taking-back-control' era.  
British F1 teams launch their new post brexit car design.  
British car manufacturers start to bring out their new post brexit models.  
#Brexit people say everyone knew NHS promise was a lie. But my wife (a nurse) says many of her patients voted #Brexit because of the promise 
"Michael Gove defends NHS funding pledge from Brexit campaign"... of course he does Brexiters just lie...  
I'm pretty sure 2017 will get worse ... Trump will actually be President and Brexit is still happening. Brace yourselves for hell. 
If @michaelgove knows best about Brexit. Does that make him an expert and therefore do we ignore him? I think so!  
Britons pick Brexit and Trump’s election as the top two ‘worst’ events of 2016  
The IPPR is simply trying to create anti-Brexit noise, and it has succeeded, says Ross Clark  
You might want to visit Rue du Brexit before celebrating. According to the locals, it is a depressing road to nowhere - sums up #Brexit.  
Private firms are lining up to help the Brexit Department and people are worried  
There are two types of people: those who still believe Brexit will be a success and those with the potential for cognitive thought.  
2016 unexpected things that happened:brexittrump as president2017 unexpected things that happened:sherlock season four 
Denmark, EU membership referendum, DYM poll:Remain: 75% (+14)Leave: 25% (-14)#Brexit #Denmark #poll 
Spain, EU membership referendum, DYM poll:Remain: 80% (+1)Leave: 20% (-1)#Brexit #Spain #poll 
John Kerry winces as US journalists ask Boris about his lying. Shame UK journalist didn't do the same before Brexit 
Leave voters won’t like this…Experts say Brexit has ushered in “a decade of disruption” to UK jobs and economy  
Brexit may finally have turned Britain pro-European  
REVEALED: More than a THIRD of SNP supporters voted FOR Brexit in Sturgeon embarrassment  
This is awful. Fuck everyone who voted Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn has compared Theresa May's handling of negotiating Brexit to Henry VIII  
Concern as private firms line up to give the Tory Brexit Department free advice  
Google investing in Brexit Britain; a "world leader in e-commerce" with "great talent".*Googles 'What happened to the Brexit apocalypse?'*  
The French wine industry won't want post-Brexit trade tariffs. Burgundy exports to the UK increase 17.7%.  pic.twitter.com/5MeQUcq782 
Yes. Exactly this. Our Home Office has a habit of generating horror stories (Google "Miwa Hirono"). Brexit will > double their workload.  
London will remain the world’s leading financial centre in spite of Brexit, according to a senior City figure  
Thanks to Brexit I have a hard time exiting my gmail because I don't want to click the right button  
-For the Tories, weaken the rights of citizens after #Brexit is a priority!!! 
I'm so angry. My Polish mother-in-law has been subjected to a nasty campaign of quiet abuse in her village since the Brexit vote. 
A think tank says Brexit and population changes will make the UK "radically" different by 2030.  
Brexit and population increase 'to change UK radically' by 2030  
Britons pick Brexit and Trump’s election as the top two ‘worst’ events of 2016  
Mentally of Brexiteers- they have never admitted to even one negative about Brexit. Not a singe down side. Not one. That is idiotic.  
Brexit, Trump and 25 spoons of sugar: our top business stories of 2016  
Excellent #News from @cabinetofficeuk today. Abolishing #HumanRightsAct put on hold until after #Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn compares Theresa May to Henry VIII over Brexit  
Brexit will cause social and economic disruption to the country  
May is no Henry VIII – but Brexit has dragged us back to a very Tudor chaos | Rhiannon Lucy Cosslett  
Britons are stashing away more cash as they prepare for the impact of Brexit  
Theresa May lacks courage to admit complexity of Brexit, say civil servants | Politics | The Guardian  
2016: Greatest UK democratic vote ever for Brexit; record high employment; economic growth. Looking forward to global opportunities in 2017.  
We need a mature Brexit debate – we’re not getting it from Michael Gove | Jonathan Portes  
UK: 12 million more migrants will arrive in 25 years without hard Brexit  
Ministers put British bill of rights plan on hold until after Brexit  
UK opposition leader accuses May of acting like Henry VIII over Brexit  
French drug trial accident, Zika virus, CRISPR, Syria, Trump, Brexit... - this year in health and medicine  
Watch Cassetteboy take on Brexit in hilarious 2016 news mash-up  
Chinese keep buying London property despite Brexit  
Trouble really is the sequence: worst effects of Brexit - ie tariffs, non-tariff barriers - not felt until it's too late. 
Making things up, outrageous claims, falsehoods, worked for Trump & #Brexit. Answer? Insist on evidence, reason, clarity: put things right. 
1. Trump2. Brexit3. Harambe4. Arsenal#2016In4Words 
READ | Tories to withdraw from ECHR in 2020; Google & Barclays back Brexit Britain; Think-tank warns on immigration.  
Denis's @FT letter correct that Brexit was a long-running project of a wing of the English establishment.  
.@JohnBickleyUKIP: 12 MILLION more migrants to arrive in UK in 25 years without hard Brexit  
YouGov finds 4% of LEAVE voters saying the BREXIT referendum was the WORST event of 2016 
I have had the dubious pleasure of being laughed at by a taxi driver in Romania and a farmer in Cyprus over BREXIT 
Whereas 23% of Britons said Brexit was the WORST event this year, closely followed by Trump's election win (22%)  
Our look back at 2016 finds that Rio 2016 was Britons' BEST event of the year at 23% (Brexit came second at 18%)  
OMG! I DID NOT BYPASS PARLIAMENT TO DO MY BREXIT! I LET OUT A MASSIVE BELCH, DID JAZZ HANDS, AND PARLIAMENT DID MY BIDDING!  
BBC slammed for 'disgusting anti-Brexit coverage that hijacked Christmas'  #BBC 
My FT letter explaining Brexit was a 20 year project, well-organised, well-led, well-funded,  well backed by press  
Trump/Brexit era's happened because everyone got sick & tired of smart-arse, ineffectual liberal berks like you, Dave. Happy New Year!  
What I call a to May's flip flopping Brexit govt. #LiberalFightback @LibDems @YoungLiberalsUK @Conservatives 
Strange isn't it. The more the Tories implode into Brexit Mayhem the more the press/media attack Corbyn. What don't they want you to see? 
Good piece. What if the UK forces itself to unpopular hard Brexit then reverses its decision to exit the EU?  
Rudimentary arithmetic, derived from polling analysis of the Brexit vote, shows 50% of the leave vote in Scotland came from SNP voters.50%. 
On second thoughts let's not go to Brexit. It is a silly place. 
Brexit is the 'firing gun on a decade of disruption', report finds  
#Remain in EU support now 54% v 46% @Independent . Every EU country incl U.K. has pro-EU majorities. Are MPs aware? Time to stop #Brexit. 
Hate crimes consistently rising after Brexit, new figures show  
Why not just say: "We lied"? Brexit campaigner Michael Gove defends NHS funding pledge  
Hopefully the vote for #Brexit will have wider effects.Maybe it can help to remove the toxicity from politics ?#Article50 #LeaveEU #leave 
Brexit bill to reach £55bn by 2030 a “devastating indictment” of "hard Brexit strategy” say @LibDems  
French mayor "honours" Britain by naming a road Rue Du Brexit - unfortunately it's a semi circular road on an industrial estate 
Don't feel you have to reply to this with your hot pro/anti Brexit take, it's just very interesting about the 21st century condition.  
Brexit will start decade of economic disruption, says major report  
Finance bosses confidence in Brexit.  
After Brexit, UK will have 'a decade if disruption', predicts Institute of Public Policy Research:  
First Brexit, then to take back control of human rights laws that have been abused and misapplied for too long.  
@Law_and_policy @DeborahJaneOrr Good of the Tories to warn the EU to require ECHR membership as part of our Brexit deal 
12M more migrants to arrive in UK in 25 yrs without hard Brexit. Get tough on Borders now, health, crimimnal checks!  
Public's 2016 predictions as of Dec 2015:BrexitLikely 23%Unlikely 57%Cameron resignsLikely 8%Unlikely 82%TrumpLikely 7%Unlikely 84% 
Michael Gove warns MPs they'll LOSE their seats if they don't deliver on Brexit  
2016 > UK in 2030 - 14 years of economic decline due to Brexit. Well done Brexiters. Be careful what you wish for.  
The lesson of Trump and Brexit: a society too complex for its people risks everything | John Harris  
Lawyer behind Article 50 case admits he REALLY wants 2nd referendum to STOP Brexit. Tough. Too late. We're out  
Brexit 6 months on: me on immigration & free movement.  The only certainty is prolonged uncertainty:  #Brexit6mnths 
Theresa May to fight 2020 election on plans to take Britain out of European Convention on Human Rights after Brexit 
Belgium to BLOCK citizenship for UK expats after Brexit. It's on it's way to be part of the Caliphate- who cares?   
While we continue to work against Brexit, whatever happens government should immediately grant all EU citizens unconditional right to stay  
12 million more migrants in 25 years if May opts for a fake Brexit. She must give the people what they voted for! 
#BecauseBrexitJust checked my pension plan.Its value up 7% since June 23rdBrexit is good for you. 
Trump, Brexit and Deutsche: The hedge fund year in review  
Farage said Brexit and Trump would be good for Britain. Trump's trade chief thinks very differently  
Scots urge Theresa May to give EU residents certainty ahead of Brexit talks  
Theresa May’s approach to Brexit slammed by the leader of Britain's civil service union  
I'm honestly glad #Corbyn has finally said it, but why on earth has he taken so long? Will he reconsider his support for #Brexit?  
'fraid not...Henry famously used parliament for his Brexit & so strengthened idea of 'king in Parliament'   
The biggest stories that got us talking in 2016, from Brexit to Wells Fargo to Trump to the Note 7 to Pokemon Go  
Chinese keep buying London property despite Brexit  
How Brexit gave us a different class of snob  
Jeremy Corbyn calls for vote on Brexit terms, defends Freedom of  Movement  Absolutely correct on both counts. 
Dutch woman with two British children told to leave UK after 24 years  #Brexit 
Racist right wing press depicts migrants as of Asian and African origin then calls for Hard Brexit to stop EU migration. #Brexit #Fascist 
Laura Kuenssberg says source told her the Queen backed Brexit Of course Her Majesty backed #Brexit! 
After Brexit U.S. Congressman Promotes #Amexit from the U.N. 
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
Donald Trump’s election, Brexit, and the collapse of Theranos are among the business stories that defined 2016:  
Brexit is unraveling because fascists in power refuse to listen to the voters & follow through with it Europe is becoming a refugee toilet  
So Brexit, US elections, ISIS, Aleppo,+ all our favs died in 2016. So I made a list of the loveliest things to happen to us in 2016! Cheers!  
Scotland's whisky distilleries look to increase sales in Asia as they face Brexit risks  
Got something for Xmas you'd like to return? Maybe something mis-sold? We should all take #Brexit back to the shop: 
Brexit. Clowns. Harambe. Trump. #2016in4words 
Was thinking of staying in the UK after #Brexit, but F it. Let the genius Quitlings sort out their own soiled bed. 
uneducated white males who voted Brexit & Trump are vulnerable ones & they will not will not like what comes next  
TOMORROW'S BREXIT WORLDBlue Flag beaches are a thing of the past but new sports of 'trolley surfing' & 'turd spotting' grip the nation.  
UK in 2030: older, more unequal and blighted by Brexit, report predicts  
Michael Gove warns MPs they'll LOSE their seats if they don't deliver on Brexit. Especially Anna Soubry!  
Mine was the day I woke up & seen England vote for Brexit & every single constituency in Scotland vote remain. Independence!! 
If Brexit is the new religion, denying the ref feels like taking the name of the Lord in vain. I’m happy to blaspheme. 37%/52% is no mandate 
A French town has named an ugly, dead-end road the 'Rue du Brexit'  
Far-right French mayor names road in his town Brexit Street  
Brexit: nailing the lie - the silent majority needs to speak out against Gove and his lies ...  #Brexit.  
My comments in the @Daily_Express on why the Government should resist an interim Brexit deal with Brussels:  
We agree!  #Brexit #JeremyCorbyn #TheresaMay 
The new street named after Brexit is literally a road to nowhere  
.@realDonaldTrump and Brexit have shown that the biased mainstream media can be beaten with a strong social media campaign. #InternetParty 
Brexit is SO stupid.  
'You're not Henry VIII,' Jeremy Corbyn tells Theresa May over refusal to commit to vote for MPs on final Brexit deal  
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: 'You’re not Henry VIII, Corbyn tells May in row over Brexit vote' #skypapers 
Leave's answer to all post Brexit trade deal problems is: "Common sense will prevail".Err ... we are still talking about politicians right? 
Gove: 'Brexit was the English Civil War fought without muskets'  
RT survey please. Do you have a close friend or a family member in UK who is not a British citizen, & may be affected by #Brexit changes 
Europe, 2016:- Brexit- Cameron resigns- Italy referendum fails- Renzi resigns- Hollande approval: 4%- Merkel approval hit 5 year low 
Santa Rally sends FTSE 100 to new record high. #Brexit keeps winning ...  
A Dutch mother with two British children is told to leave UK after 24 years amid Brexit fears  
May to fight 2020 election on plans to take Britain out of European Convention on Human Rights after Brexit 
The worst thing for those of opposing views to Brexit is that for Teresa May it is religious and therefore will happen regardless of logic 
Guardian front page, Thursday 29 December 2016: You’re not Henry VIII, Corbyn tells May in row over Brexit vote  
Oh dear Nicola. Your SNP voters don't seem to have your back. A third of them voted for Brexit.  
Things my mother & the local GP believe a flat 7up can cure: vomiting bug, flu, nerves, a broken leg, river blindness, Brexit, Trump, death. 
Why is May so inept at dealing with the EU ? Is she frightened of them? Send for Farage and let's get the job done. Brexit with patriotism 
Donald's little helper gets his reward"Use Brexit to steal UK jobs"says Trump's Trade Secretary  
Fall in value of £ due to Brexit is leading to foreign buyouts of UK firms meaning, so far, we are 'losing control' not 'taking it back'. 
This is an absolute disgrace, and not what #Brexit was about. She should be given citizenship immediately. 
Love this story: A French town has named an ugly dead-end street "Rue de Brexit."  
NEW VIDEO! "Brexit in 2017"  Give it a view, RT or Fav if you liked it and PLEASE subscribe to my new Youtube channel 
Why do people keep questioning me as if it's weird for a Brexit voter to have maybe not thought things through? 
On C4 now, What Britain Bought In 2016.Nigel Farage's Brexit bullshit must be in the running for No.1. 
Farage said Brexit and Trump would be good for Britain. Trump's trade chief thinks very differently  
Remember when Obama interfered with the Israel election, then campaigned against Brexit and for Merkel? Where was the media? 
REVEALED: More than a THIRD of SNP supporters voted FOR Brexit in Sturgeon embarrassment  
Michael Gove warns MPs they'll LOSE their seats if they don't deliver on Brexit  
Umbridge def voted Brexit. #OrderofthePhoenix 
EU Decision to interfere with operations of British ports vindicates #Brexit Vote 
So angry with the likes of @AndrewMarr9 Brexit has torn the country, families & friends apart & now they expect Unity? F. Off! #NeverBrexit 
Theresa May lacks 'courage' to admit scale of #Brexit, warns senior civil servant 
#Brexit has started a total reevaluation about Ireland's constitutional & political future#IrishUnity 
"Real wages in Northern Ireland will fall by £300 in 2018 (based on an average local wage of £20,000)"#Brexit 
RETWEET if you voted #leave to take back control of our borders, laws, money & trade #ChangeBritain #Brexit #Democracy 
Brexit has zero, absolutely zero, to do with this manipulative little shit of a mayor  
London will remain world’s 'leading financial centre' despite #Brexit, says senior city figure 
The Guardian view on Brexit and the arts: a backlash against the modern | Editorial  
Asking the Brexit voters for the reason of their vote  
An admirable perspective that I'm sure most Brexit-supporters share  
This is what the civil service say about #Brexit. The government is in the hands of zealots whose Brexit dogma cannot be challenged!  
Weak £, as a result of #brexit, now leads to likely further defence cuts.From a paper that backed #brexit.Genius eh.  
It's quiz time: 15 questions to test your knowledge of the year in Brexit  
Theresa May lacks 'courage' to admit scale of Brexit, warns senior civil servant  
In 2017, Britain will have to decide what kind of Brexit it wants: hard, soft or somewhere in-between  
REVEALED: More than a THIRD of SNP supporters voted FOR Brexit in Sturgeon embarrassment  
We need a mature Brexit debate – we’re not getting it from Michael Gove ... cos he knows he'd lose a debate on facts  
Brexit vote was like "English Civil War fought without muskets," says MP @michaelgove #r4today 
Dutch woman with two British children told to leave UKafter 24 years!Bloody disgrace!  #brexit #Humanrights 
Brexit Britain will depend on 'foreign' London and its Muslim mayor in 2017  
Mrs T's "are they one of us" returns in spades. So if all econs think Brexit bad, and vote Remain, their advice automatically ignored. Nice!  
As someone who lived in Holland,this is shameful Dutch woman with 2 British kids told to leave UK after 24yrs#brexit  
Tory former minister seeks to ‘defeat’ #Brexit vote   (via @PoliticsHome) 
I think what we've learned from Brexit so far is: don't jump off a cliff unless someone is actually chasing you. 
I am going to tweet loads of garbage over the next year as if they are real facts, it's a trick I've learnt from Trump and Brexit 
More nonsense stirred up by the murky, opaque Brexit dream. Gilliamesque dystopia piled on standard incompetence.  
London will remain world’s 'leading financial centre' despite Brexit, says senior city figure  
Educated in UK, paid tax here for 24 years, raised two children with British husband but Brexit means she must leave 
Gove says 'Parliament won' in EU Ref, but now #Brexit-ers like Gove want to deny Parl a voice  
Is this the "economic shock" that we were due if we voted #brexit?  
People voted Brexit. But Cameron, Blair and other flawed leaders made it possible | Ros Coward  
Clean Brexit  
French humour#Brexit  
Fuuuuck @NetflixUK removed Twin Peaks from the service. First Brexit and now this. I blame dubstep. 
We need a mature Brexit debate – we’re not getting it from Michael Gove | Jonathan Portes  
Obama/Kerry so out of touch with reality- truly makes case for why world was ready for Trump, Brexit, more changes to come. 
A French town has named an ugly, dead-end road the "Rue de Brexit"  
Don't be a 2016 Remoaner - voting Brexit was our proudest hour. Well said .@allisonpearson 
Another example of Brexit's flaws: so badly thought out on so many levels, lacking detail, causing difficulties - many still unrealised.  
Brexit: Civil service faces 'bumpy ride' says union leader  
Brexit bonanza as FTSE 100 hits all-time HIGH flying in the face of doom-mongers  
Brexit was flawed on so many levels: no consensus, no strategy, no plan, no capacity, no resource, no clear remit, and no hope of success.  
THE SHAMEFUL BIGOTRY OF BRITAIN POST-BREXIT: Dutch woman with two British children told to leave UK after 24 years  
Business optimistic about 2017 in Brexit Britain  
Co-op clearly not buying the Brexit doomsday predictions. 1500 new jobs & 100 new stores. Others will follow. Happy days! 
#BBC sinks to new low as show compares 17.4 million Brexit voters to the mob which called for Christ's crucifixion.  
Through all of the Scottish Nationalist Brexit virtue signalling we should remember in 2014 Sturgeon threatened to send EU nationals home. 
Brexit Britain. Slow hand-clap for the @ukhomeoffice – still not fit for purpose, it would seem. 
Our #democracy needs the law now more than ever, says Article 50 challenger @JolyonMaugham >> #Brexit  
Perhaps if we weren't squandering millions on brexit, we could put that money to better use  
"Scribbled without numeracy by incompetent interns; published without scrutiny by hungover journalists" #brexit  
National Front mayor's plan to create a 'rue du Brexit' backfires after it is pointed out the road leads to nowhere  
The BBC outdid itself in anti-Brexit bias when they compared Leave voters to the mob calling for Jesus' crucifixion! 
 2016 has been a year of Tory broken promises on #Brexit. Here's how.  
BloggedThe Change Britain report on hard Brexit:£24 billion of unicorns:  
Theresa May 'refusing to accept how complicated Brexit is'  
Earlier @andywigmore appeared on @BBCWorldatOne to talk about campaign tactics and why it's wrong to dismiss Brexit and Trump as populism.  
Michael Gove on Brexit believes in the  "Reliable Wisdom of the Crowds"....  
In a world that voted for Trump/Brexit, I think we can count Moleman as a win.  
Someone should tell #TheresaMay that you can't unite the nation around a vision marked by xenophobia, insularity & small-mindedness. #Brexit 
The best Brexit deal for Britain:No Customs UnionNo Common Agricultural PolicyNo Common Fisheries Policy 
Harambe, Brexit, Donald Trump #2016In4Words 
Asking me to support #Brexit is asking me to forsake my children's future, to betray my principles and give up my integrity. So no I won't. 
People voted Brexit. But Cameron, Blair and other flawed leaders made it possible | Ros Coward ? 
Brief reminder that #brexit is a religion. Appealing to reason instead of faith is heretical. 
"Clean Brexit" £350m a week!No, no... £450m a week!Is that enough? £550?Wait! I know!One BILLION pounds a week on hard Brexit for FREE!  
Michael Gove says democracy means we benefit from 'reliable wisdom of crowds'.Not long ago crowds burned witches. Wisdom? #r4today#brexit 
Hard Brexit now labelled "clean" Brexit and a new "£450m" promise to boot. All marketing, no analytical substance. 
When you realise that neither Brexit nor Trump have actually happened yet #2017  
Civil servants are saying May 'doesn't have the courage' to admit Brexit is more complex than 1st thought. Are they implying she's a coward? 
Cassetteboy takes on Brexit via The Fresh Prince Of Bel Air  
Corbyn's private army still haven't got the message on Brexit. They're campaigning to increase freedom of movement?! 
Have been told my 'tone' in Lords on Brexit is 'too aggressive'. Frankly, in face of this incompetent cowardly mess, it's only feasible one  
EU citizens in Britain post Brexit vote: ‘I feel betrayed, not at home, sad’  
What if we reverse the brexit decision? It's more likely thank you think.  
"Something is going to have to give, and it is not going to be Brexit," Whitehall trade union boss tells @syalrajeev 
Nigel Farage is oddly silent about Trump advisor’s plan to ‘steal trade’ from UK after Brexit  
The most interesting factoid I've yet read about Brexit, courtesy of @alexmassie in The Times 
Excellent article on #brexitshambles UK Brexit debate still missing the point  European Council on Foreign Relations  
If Scotland is forced to comply with their hard Brexit the Tories will feel emboldened enough to end the Barnett Formula. #2017prediction 
May lacks courage to admit Brexit complexity & any discussion about problems of implementation seen as criticism >  
This is as damning as it gets. "Theresa May lacks courage to admit complexity of Brexit, say civil servants"  
Sadly the qualifications needed to become PM in the 21st century don't require courage just blind ambition.  #brexit 
ICYMI here's the Cassetteboy vs Brexit rap  
In case anyone doesn't realise how much #Brexit has changed relations across these island and the future of the union. Unthinkable year ago  
#Fixit is an appropriate tag for opposition to #Brexit. The latter - plus our politics in general - sure need fixing. 
Michael Gove warns MPs they'll LOSE their seats if they don't deliver on Brexit  
#TheresaMay lacks courage to admit damaging complexity of #Brexit, say civil servants : 
We were told #Brexit was a simple question of 'In' or 'Out.' The People did not vote for 'Shake It All About.' 
Bloody Dutch software developers, coming over here, contributing to our economy. Go on, clear off!#Brexit #Winning 
Brexit could turn London into a 'freewheeling hub for emerging-market finance – a sort of Singapore on steroids' — The Economist. 
How to get something so important so wrong #Brexit and it sounds very close to home  
Politicians have a democratic mandate to take back control of our borders, laws, money and trade #ChangeBritain #Brexit  
The new street named after Brexit is literally a road to nowhere  
Right-wing mayor names French road 'Rue de Brexit', emerges road is circular thoroughfare leading nowhere  
Sure this will be resolved. But multiply it by tens of thousands post-Brexit to get idea of the mess..   
Brexit is a disaster. Dutch woman with two British children told to leave UK after 24 years  
With nothing to say of any significance, no recognition of the doom-laden #EU, #Remainiacs can only deride #Brexit. They're a pathetic lot!  
Theresa May lacks courage to admit complexity of Brexit, say civil servants  
Advice for Remainers in 2017: use reason, argue for soft Brexit, hope change of mood leads to second referendum, don't rise to bait. 
Found out a Brexit voter I know has had to shelve her plans to retire in France as the exchange rate means it's no longer affordable 
Claiming UK defence assets provide leverage with EU states while cutting the military to the bone. Encapsulates May's Brexit strategy.  
Please Join us 4th march, Newcastle as we march against Brexit. Join with us to say NO TO TRIGGERING ARTICLE 50. 
From The Times today - Peter Jones on Ms Sturgeon's Brexit options - laid bare... 
EU bureaucrats ‘could force closure of all types of UK motorsport’ due to ruling on insurance even after Brexit  
Brexit was a simple IN/OUT decision, right? What could have possibly gone wrong?@charltonbrooker's 2016 Wipe. Tomorrow night, 9pm. 
Stop worrying about Brexit and Donald Trump – the world is actually getting better by the day  
Gove defends the falsehoods & absurdities on which he & the #Brexit cabal relied. Shocking. @DailyMirror 
In case you missed it: the UK is being locked into EU military union and MPs are not even being given the chance to discuss it. #Brexit 
I've called on the UK Govt to take urgent action to support exports following a post-Brexit drop. Full statement at:  
Far-right French mayor names road in his town Brexit Street to 'pay tribute to the sovereign British people'  
The new street named after Brexit is literally a road to nowhere  
Lovely piece on the reaction of EU migrants to Brexit  
Brexit campaigner Michael Gove defends NHS funding pledge  
Town in France set to get a 'Brexit Road' in honour of Britain's decision to leave  
Brexit and the opportunities for the far right  
Brexit: the triumph of the charlatans  
Brexit reinvented more times than a faded pop star. Call it what you like, I call it No Brexit. #dontbrexitfixit 
Prices of foods which are hard to grow in the UK might decrease after Brexit. Great news for avocado enthusiasts! 
Imperial president @AliceGast calls for post-Brexit visa clarity in the @FT  
'Brexit - We're making a mess of it': mashup artists Cassette Boy lampoon Britain's leaders:  
If you think 2016 was bad 2017 is the year we're due to be dragged off the cliff edge of Brexit by Tories we didn't vote for. 
Cassetteboy takes on Brexit via The Fresh Prince Of Bel Air  
New: "Suggestive"If the big old lie worked, just make it bigger and do it again!#Brexit #cleanbrexitFB:  
'It makes no sense' Falklands hero blasts Britain for AGREEING to EU military integration 
Nigel Farage blasts BBC over post-referendum coverage only focusing on Brexit 'terrors'  
If we ask for #BBC apology over #Brexit nasty comments,it will be a full time job.They should really be SCRAPPED ! 
Scotland's 95+% Unionist Media,Masters At #FakeNewsApparently £ crash due to #IndyRef2 not #Brexit@heraldscotland pure  
I'm on the BBC World Service in a few minutes, discussing the unlikely intersection of poetry and Brexit. 
Think-tank seeks BBC apology after Brexit vote 'compared to crucifixion of Jesus' BBC is past the point of no return  
But it's great that Gove has provided yet another excuse to roll out @stephen_collins' wonderful cartoon. #r4today #brexit  
Worth considering the argument that the City of London should survive Brexit broadly unscathed after all  
Michael Gove arguing against experts on #r4today. Why then would anyone bother educating themselves in his mob-rule post-Brexit Britain?? 
Irish state to seek automatic #EU entry for NI in event of reunification - new solutions being sought post #brexit  
Gina Miller... Puppet of the Remain elite...Gina Miller to launch ANOTHER legal attack on Theresa May and Brexit  
Watch out... The long-predicted Brexit slump may be about to arrive  
Brexit means a bureaucratic task of biblical proportions: The registration of 3 million EU citizens living in the UK  
Brexit vote was like "English Civil War fought without muskets," says MP @michaelgove #r4today 
Brexit isn't a pair of shoes Tony. You can't take it back to the shop if it squeaks.  
Co-operative Group didn't get the memo re: Brexit apocalypse.£70m investment in 100 new stores creating 1500 jobs.  
Top Ten of 2016 - #3 - Selective Memory: The Brexit Campaign and Historical Nostalgia…  
New: "Coming clean"If only they would.. .. don't let them rename "disaster".#Brexit #brexitshambles FB:  
#Brexit compared to crucifixion of #Jesus on #BBC, gets French street named after it  
We Don't need to fit into other cultures way of lifeOther cultures need to fit into our way of lifeOther option is to leave 
Immigrants? We sent out search parties to get them to come... and made it hard for Britons to get work, says ...  
In fact I would submit if the BBC didn't normalise Farage's views & give him so much positive airtime, Brexit may never have happened. 
Who cares? He's supporting #brexit which will consume and fritter away the very money we need for social services.  
Exactly. BBC may have jumped the gun embracing far-right and #brexit. The climb-down will be embarrassing and they may never regain trust.  
Tom has suffered a 'Clean Brexit' and despite reassurances of a bright future, he is unsure if there is a leg underneath that plaster cast.  
Think-tank seeks BBC apology after Brexit vote 'compared to crucifixion of Jesus' | The Independent @RedHotSquirrel 
only good thing to come of Brexit was watching you stab Boris in the back and accidentally hit yourself in the face 
I thought Brexit and Trump had divided the people of twitter forever but Nasri cheating on his bird with a prostitute has fixed everything 
Oh dear. Thick Brexiters now claiming the Brexit bus with the infamous NHS lies plastered on the side didn't exist:#BrexiterLaLaLand  
Brexit is about the opportunistic struggle of a Tory factional elite, seeking to grab power from a false plebiscitary mandate. Not democracy 
Do you know James Bond is fiction, just like Star Trek, Braveheart Salmond's Indy White Paper & Sturgeon's Brexit proposals 
Farage is choosing our government.Nigel Farage gives Theresa May ultimatum - give us hard Brexit or we'll OUST you  
How long can the government continue Brexit lying to the people without there being repercussion? 17.4m angry people are a bad crowd! 
Sturgeon ROASTED for ‘IMPOSSIBLE’ Brexit plan as she claims leave voters are XENOPHOBIC. Does she have U.K. Phobia?  
The Brexit pantomime by Morten Morland – political cartoon gallery  
Early Brexit campaigners ask business groups across Europe to back a free trade deal with the UK.  
The most worrying aspect about the decision to tie up with a European Army is the incredible silence from All Pro brexit MPS. . . . . . . ! 
I died when I realized the bottom says Brexit  
The same people who thought they could win the 2015 general election, beat Corbyn, beat Brexit and beat Trump.  
There is no such thing as a "Clean Brexit". Any Brexit will be dirty, painful and very drawn out. Best not to go there #NoBrexit 
BBC slammed for 'anti-Brexit coverage that hijacked Christmas' | UK | News | Daily Express@oflynnmep @jongaunt 
Brexit set to send UK tumbling down world economic league table  
On how mighty, Establishment #brexit zealots police Twitter, to root out and shame the humble for heresy. They can't shout us all down.  
We have to get real tough with the EU. We have £100's of billions in orders to place post #Brexit Take it, do a good deal OR ELSE ---  
Work stupid white slaves, work work work. Tax money must flow to the worthless migrants.Unless we #Nexit #Brexit 
Leaving the #EU is a total nonsense. I have had #Brexit trolls who have been Russian sympathysors praising #Putin actions.Clearly against EU 
Behold the fabled "Rue du #Brexit", a pointless road that leads to nowhere. Those who follow it will only ever end up back where they began!  
We fret about Brexit and Isil. Russia poses the greatest threat to our way of life in 2017. And we haven't even begun to figure it out yet. 
The nobody celebs all ignored over #Brexit. A tad like the ones Clinton wheeled out against #Trump. Ignored !!! 
Yes! Yes They can and will! Liberals worldwide are becoming obsolete Brexit...USA...France soon too...Germany in the fall...Canada 2019!   
By which I mean Brexit, Trump starting, the French, German & Dutch elections and yet more hospital bombings in Syria. 
'Leave voters are HOPEFUL, not hateful' Katie Hopkins hits back at Brexit smear campaigns  
This guy tried to sum up the post-Brexit situation in the UK on Facebook and it was ABSURD 
What happens when you criticise @AndrewMarr9 on #Brexit, and @iainmartin1 & @andrew_lilico intervene - new blog post 
Excellent news!  |Hard Brexit will give UK extra £450million a week, say MPs  
Unless you're a Leicester City & Chicago Cubs fan who backed Brexit, loves Trump & hated Castro.  
Can't scrap data protection law even on hard Brexit: there's a Council of Europe Conv'n.  Wipes out much of the @Change_Britain "saving". 
@BorisJohnson correct. He told firms will queue for business after #Brexit! Forgot to mention in @IRLDeptFinance!! 
I finish All Out War, @ShippersUnbound's gripping account of #Brexit: destined, I am sure, to serve as Holinshed to some future Shakespeare 
2016: tragedy, sadness, tragedy, sadness, Brexit, tragedy, sadness, Trump, tragedy, sadness. 
Brexit prospectors of the 21st century...  
What happens next: An outline of the likely Brexit negotiation process - @RCorbettMEP  
BREXIT BOOST: UK farmers 'absolutely' stand to benefit from EU exit  
More accurate 2016:Death.Death.Brexit.Death.Death.Bernie SandersDeath.President Trump.Death.Holiday brea..death. Death. 
While the tory media tells us how wonderful brexit will be for Scotland. Scots point to be there being no zip up the back of our heads. 
Left-wing voter makes astonishing U-turn AGAINST liberals for 'scuppering' Brexit  
This year’s English words of the year include ‘xenophobia’, ‘Brexit’ and ‘paranoid’  
And when the majority mood turns, like it did over Iraq, the BBC will be hated and despised for pushing #brexit lies.  
Thanks Tories for adding another Orwellian distortion to the list, with 'Clean Brexit' Handy translation:  
French town to get 'Brexit street' to pay 'tribute to the sovereign British people' says Front National mayor  
YOUR COMMENTS: People voted for Trump and Brexit for a number of complex reasons; this was not one of them.  
Me in Guardian on @change_britain 's made-up numbers. Whatever your views on economics of Brexit, this is junk.  
tRuthLess Davidson's Brexit ..... the road to nowhere  
Britain would also face obstacles to trade with the rest of the world if we #Brexit : 
Remainers need to take on board support for #Brexit growing not decreasing!  54% now!  They need to button it and face facts.  @borisjohnson 
Recently disfranchised frm Beeb so asked sb there(upset #brexit too btw)what the stance was: Staff told to embrace the mood of majority.  
They can - and will - lie all they like. But when people see with their own eyes what Brexit means they'll say 'no'.  
Whatever your political affiliation, we hope you enjoy this humourous take on #brexit:  ;) 
Out – and into the world: Why The Spectator backed Brexit 
Ah, now *this* is better! @jdportes & Tom Farron tearing apart @change_britain’s “report”, calling it junk. #Brexit  
Brexit: UK should leave EU because it is unsuccessful, says former Bank of England governor  
First Brexit, now Rexit.  
Watch as @Cassetteboy slams #Brexit  >>  
It's not hard or soft it's a 'confident' outward looking, global trading #Brexit to start in Q1 2017  
How will the govt take the NUS seriously on the challenges & opportunities of Brexit, when they spewed bile like this during the campaign?  
Ha! French FN mayor creates 'rue de Brexit' in his town. BUT, joy of joys, it's a circular road to nowhere  
Just had a brexiteer tell me that #brexit exit costs of £60billion are chicken feed because the UK will save £240million a year. Go figure. 
PM May will face a renewed legal battle should she deny the House of Lords a vote on triggering #Brexit negotiations  
Will the establishment be surprised when Gert Wilders follows BREXIT, Trump, Italy & le Pen ? They just don't get it do they?  
Fresh Brexit court challenge looms if UK Lords don't get a say  
Anyone who has head @IanDunt excellent Brexit  book would have known this one was coming, no doubt many more too   
A reminder who stood up for the good of the country when the opportunity arose. Listen, #Labour: there is no such thing as a good #Brexit.  
French rightwing mayor creates 'rue de Brexit' in honour of British vote  
"Come the day & come that result, the one person who was not upset at all was Jeremy" - Alan Johnson on Corbyn's reaction to Brexit 
National Front mayor creates 'Rue du Brexit' in French town  
Imperial College London's president warns that UK universities need clarity on Brexit so they can focus on research  
Nigel Farage gives Theresa May ultimatum - give us hard Brexit or we'll OUST you 
‘Fantasy figures’: Lib Dems challenge ‘Clean Brexit’ £450m weekly savings claim  
Voting to leave the EU was an act of national self-confidence. Politicians should be more optimistic about Brexit 
Due to public demand, in addition to Jacob Rees-Mogg, the Clean Brexit toilet paper will feature Michael Gove, Nigel Lawson & Farage 
Serious politician, Patrick Harvie, wants a post Brexit immediate Indyref2 with a new currency.This is what passes for strategy at Holyrood 
Clean Brexit Money launderingEthnic CleansingAll these things sound sooooooo comforting if rooted in hygiene. If you are stupid  
'Clean Brexit' could give the UK £24billion each year, pro-Leave group Change Britain claims  
What the fuck is a "clean brexit"? 
Anyone want to help me produce and market some new toilet paper called Clean Brexit? Every sheet will feature Jacob Rees-Mogg 
BOOM! Cassetteboy is back with a masterful summary of 2016... in a way only Cassetteboy can. Cassetteboy vs Brexit:  
The Article 50 case isn't Gina Miller's first fight - and she's not afraid of making enemies  
With nothing to say of any significance, no recognition of the doom-laden EU, Remainiacs can only deride Brexit. They're a pathetic lot. 
Leave-backing Labour MP John Mann shares his vision of Brexit Britain in the Yorkshire Post  
Clean Brexit #brexitshambles 
And also - hard Brexit report gets cost savings from scrapping laws on air pollution, GM food, data protection, chemicals & animal welfare  
Brexit is a pig, and 'Clean Brexit' is lipstick. 
I've always been people watcher love observing/learning...what I'm seeing in London is globalist social experiment that  explains #brexit 
French Mayor Names Street ‘Rue du Brexit’ in Honour of Anti-EU Vote  
Hard Brexit, Soft Brexit, Red White & Blue Brexit, & now Clean Brexit; & next 'insert-new-adjective-here-to-distract-from-shambles' Brexit 
Nigel Farage gives Theresa May ultimatum - give us hard Brexit or we'll OUST you 
French town to get Brexit street in 'tribute to the sovereign British people'.Will we return the gesture? #Frexit 
Given the news of the Queen and Mervin King backing Brexit, are you more confident that Hard Brexit is the only option for the UK?  
Yesterday on @LBC @Nigel_Farage blasted the mainstream media for their endless negativity towards Brexit! 
Our PM Stefan Lofven says in morning paper "EU risks breaking up". Like he missed BREXIT 
Job losses due to Brexit? I better start pretending I voted Remain. #remain #brexit #brexitshambles 
There is only one #Brexit and that is Tory Tax Haven Brexit, and @UKLabour is helping it come about. #Remain #YesEU 
If Britain wants to ensure a constant supply of high quality, cheap cocoa post-Brexit, she could consider a free trade deal with São Tomé. pic.twitter.com/DROiUMmEV8 
The super-rich have discovered the secret of politics, the more they screw the poor, the more they will vote for their politicians#Brexit 
#Brexit talks will trigger further falls in value of pound, says @Telegraph :   via @telebusiness 
Personally I'll only believe a 'clean Brexit' will save us £450bn a week when I see it clearly written on the side of a bus.  
I'm boycotting news for the next 8 years. When I next look I expect Mrs Obama to be president & the Brexit negotiations to be just starting. 
Good grief. Just done a quick Twitter scan. People are still banging on about Trump and Brexit. Turn off the box, I say, & read a good book. 
Why the Tory right are drooling over #Brexit, the prospect of Britain as the world's biggest tax haven.Tory Tax Haven #Brexit#Remain 
Today's hard Brexit report from Change Britain starts by tacitly admitting £350 million/week was a lie. Why believe anything else they say?  
A British Queen married to a Greek and descended from Germans really would be having her cake and eating it if she backs Brexit 
Economics Professor David Blanchflower: 'Mervyn King Is Not A Credible Source' on Brexit  
French town to get 'Brexit street' to pay 'tribute to the sovereign British people' says Front National mayor 
Gary Lineker Brexit joke -"Disgusting! BBC liberal bias!"Richard Hammond homophobic joke - "Only a joke! PC gone mad! Shut up snowflakes!" 
When you go out and vote in any election just remember those parties that tried to stop Brexit Don't let them get away with their treachery 
The Leave campaign has now upped its offer from £350m/week for the NHS to £24b/year for everyone if we Brexit. This time, are they ... 
Pro-Europeans need an authentic and true voice against this Brexit Government. We're up for it! #LibDemFightback 
More evidence Queen backs Brexit. Course she does. Ma  Merkel versus the Queen. No contest. The Monarch wins every time 
Recall "500 questions the White Paper doesn't answer" with gems like "How much will stamps cost?"Why are these not being asked of #brexit? 
A new poll by the IoD shows that almost two thirds of British companies are optimistic about the future post-Brexit! 
Brexit was the right thing for Britain — and the rest of Europe @CNNI  
London-based E.U. Medicines Agency in limbo as hidden costs of Brexit continue to mount - hitting staff and safety  
French Mayor Names Street 'Rue du Brexit' in Honour of Anti-EU Vote  
It is Dec 27th. I refuse to read anything about Brexit at least until tomorrow. I am experiencing an improvement in mood and complexion. 
"Well, Dave's fucked, I'm fucked, the country's fucked" - George Osborne greets the Brexit result 
The Queen DID Back Brexit After All  
French town to get 'Brexit street' to pay 'tribute to the sovereign British people' says Front National mayor  
"Clean Brexit could save £450m a week". It's almost as if we've heard this before. Or seen it on the side of a bus, or something. 
Mervyn King has called for Britain to leave the EU Single Market and be more "self-confident" about Brexit.  
Yes. And as a side note I urge all to use the phrase "Clean Brexit" rather than the Remain induced "Hard Brexit"  
Theresa May is perfectly correct in keeping Sturgeon as far away from the Brexit negotiations as possible.  
Brexit may start a big revival in the British fashion industry! Yet another industry which will benefit from Brexit. 
'Clean Brexit' could save UK £450m a week, says Change Britain 
Former Governor of the Bank of England says Brexit brings 'real opportunities'.Bring him back!!  
EU single market membership may hamper UK trade deals  #EU #Brexit  
#Brexit ‘God-given opportunity’ to steal business away from UK – Trump’s commerce sec  
"Clean Brexit" .... how about one of these? #brexitmeansbrexit #brexitshambles 
YOUR COMMENTS: Mail readers are furious that the BBC exercised proper journalistic standards when reporting Brexit.  
Voting to leave the EU was an act of national self-confidence. Politicians should be more optimistic about Brexit  
A new report claims that a clean Brexit could save Britain £40bn a year! 
Hard BrexitSoft BrexitClean BrexitVegan BrexitBrexit in a bunBrexit with cheeseBrexit, Brexit, baked beans, Brexit and Brexit 
Why does Muslim insist on moving to none Muslim country then complain that they find our way of life offensive 
TODAY: 'The Queen was as clueless, uninformed and manipulated as the rest of us over Brexit' claims source.  
New! Cassetteboy vs Brexit  
Farage said Brexit and Trump would be good for Britain. Trump's trade chief thinks very differently  
Remember how they lied about the 350m for the NHS? They're lying again about "clean" brexit, don't be fooled 
Uncertain fate of European Medicines Authority key drugs regulator whose future in Britain made uncertain by Brexit  
"Soft" & "Hard" Brexit are Remainer jargon that have no useful place in the Brexit debate:  
Good piece. It's time for more positive thinking like this re Brexit.  
Can she do it? Farage voices concerns over Theresa May’s ability to deliver Brexit. Give her 3 months then GE if not! 
Hard Brexit ‘could boost UK economy by £24bn’, claims pro-Leave group. The harder the better then ...  
Scotland: "Independent research estimates cost of leaving the single market at more than £11bn annually! #brexit  
Yet another reason why, on Brexit, Britain must reclaim her Territorial Waters which contain some 60% or so of Europe's fish.  
An optimist's guide to Brexit @AndrewMarr9  Don't agree with everything but a fresh perspective well worth reading 
Keep repeating. "Soft Brexit" = No Brexit. We won't accept anything less than a complete and permanent exit from every aspect of the EU. 
Can anyone remember anything truthful that Nick Clegg said during 2016 ?#Brexit #LeaveEU #Article50 #Frexit #Italexit #Nexit #Grexit 
A place known for conflict is now on the front line of Brexit  
Enjoying these little gems in @IanDunt's book about Brexit  
The Queen 'DID back Brexit - but the BBC didn't report it'  
Another financially secure pensioner calls for hard Brexit.  
BREXIT mathematics  
Brexit is a ‘God-given opportunity’ to steal trade from UK: Wilbur Ross  
BREXIT BOOST: Britain will gain £24BILLION per year after EU exit - says new report  
The world needs less Obama, Merkel, Trudeau, UN, and EUThe world needs more Trump, Farage, Netanyahu, Le Pen, and Brexit  
Okay, Andrew, I'll give it a try. Just remind me again first ... How is Brexit going to improve my daily life?  
The Queen 'DID back Brexit but BBC didn't report because they only had single source' | Daily Mail Online  
Mervyn King: Britain better off going for hard Brexit My advice don't believe a single word he says  
Here is my 1st suggestion for A #NewYearsResolution1.  Stop retweeting ANY content from The BBC      (Brexit Broadcasting Corporation)  
Well, it would be good if there was in fact a negotiating position..so far just a 'Brexit means Brexit void.' Not Remainers' fault, chum.  
Stupid claim of £12bn new Brexit trade, when UK sells more to Belgium than India, & only 1% of UK trade is with Aus!  
Much like Brexit, the people shouldn't be trusted with important decisions, like the best animated show of 2016. 
I don't understand why anyone watches these three immature buffoons. Still when we're in the Trump/Brexit/Farage era why am I surprised?  
I think they can't bear to debate what might happen post-Brexit cos that's conceding it will actually happen. 
Mad pursuit of @AndrewMarr9 by more extremist Remainers over his terrific piece saying must debate what follows Brexit only proved his point 
Another uneducated anti-establishment Brexit backer  
Leave trying to rebrand Hard #Brexit as Clean Brexit, and dreaming up some figures on supposed economic benefit  
'Clean #Brexit' could save UK £450m a week'Same news from the @guardian#MSM Editors must be drunk... 
Hard #Brexit ‘could boost UK economy by £24bn’.Not your typical @Independent headline but.. I'll have it. 
'Clean Brexit' could save UK £450m a week, claims pro-leave group  
Britain should be 'more self-confident' about Brexit, says Lord King  @MailOnline 
Oh by 'public' - you mean the 75% who didnt vote Tory in 2015 before the catastrophe yr party created with Cameron's #brexit hubris?Bring it  
Excellent article highlights Sturgeon's small-minded, stupid opportunism over Brexit - and how this will lead to her own, deserved, demise..  
This is excellent: a summary of psychology papers that help explain Trump, Brexit and resurgent nationalism  
Donald Trump's new trade chief urges Britain's rivals to profit from Brexit & take business away from UK reportedly  
I agree. I predicted the Brexit result and Trump's win. But I don't believe France or Germany will follow due to their electoral systems.  
More accurate 2016:Death.Death.Brexit.Death.Death.Bernie SandersDeath.President Trump.Death.Holiday brea..death. 
Interesting .....'Queen backed Brexit', BBC political editor told - but she decided NOT to report it  
Is it just me or is the news from Laura Kuenssberg in today's newspapers making you feel that those in the BBC have a pro Brexit agenda? 
Brexit opinion surveys show huge swing to Remain in UK regions that voted Leave  
The Queen 'DID back Brexit - but the BBC didn't report it' via @MailOnline 
Dear @BBCYou've spent 6 months whining about #Brexit & trying to derail it. How about you start believing in Britain & get behind it?Brits 
A BBC review of their Brexit coverage lamented that too many of the Leave supporters they interviewed "were a bit shaven-headed, tattooed." 
Doesn't justify it but helps to explain why some used the referendum to protest #Brexit  
.@Nigel_Farage blasts BBC over post-referendum coverage only focusing on Brexit 'terrors'  
"You'd have 10 Nobel Prize-winning economists who were given equal weight to Penny Mordaunt" - No 10 aide on the BBC's Brexit coverage 
The Queen DID Back Brexit After All  
The one thing Brexiteers said would never happen after Brexit is happening  
The town council of Beaucaire in southern France has renamed a street 'Brexit Road" to commemorate the UK''s admirable decision.  
Many leavers have authoritarian personalities & will see the EU in terms of a struggle for dominance rather than cooperation#Brexit #Remain 
Optimism can be helpful. But so much Brexit optimism is lazy or abused to stifle serious debate. This optimism is harmful to UK interests. 
After Brexit, once UK farmers have boosted production, and we've sealed FTAs with Australia, New Zealand and Kenya, food prices will FALL. 
Majority of Scots voters SUPPORT second independence referendum if hard Brexit is pushed through by Tories  
LISTEN: Source Told Laura K Queen DID Back Brexit [AUDIO]  
A line for @UKLabour to follow on #brexit, suggested by @labour4europe : 
Brexiteers should start to panic: Mervyn King who consistently gets his predictions wrong says #Brexit opens great opportunities for U.K. 
Unbelievable & a good reason why the Tories can't be trusted on Brexit ..  
Bowie, Cohen, Prince and now George Michael. Brexit, Trump elected, Syria, Nice, Berlin etc. I really look forward to a Happy New year 2017! 
Discover the top ten developments in international law in 2016  including the #ICC, #Brexit and the South China Sea 
Can she do it? Farage voices concerns over Theresa May’s ability to deliver Brexit  
The Queen 'DID back Brexit - but the BBC didn't report it'  
YOUR COMMENTS: There's no delusion quite like Brexit delusion.  
The BBC’s Laura Kuenssberg has claimed that a source informed her that the Queen backed Brexit.  
Britain Should Be ‘Confident’ and Go for Hard Brexit, Says Former Bank of England Governor  
I don't trust anyone who advocates Brexit. Totally illogical, especially w/ US going 2 steal UK business. Brexit is stark staring bonkers.  
UK #TTIP much worse for Britain after Brexit as Trump's negotiators know UK desperate for any deal   
Britain should be 'more self-confident' about Brexit, says Lord King  via @MailOnline 
'Queen backed Brexit', BBC political editor told - but she decided NOT to report it  
Post-Brexit visas? Don't think so. Number of annual visits by Brits:13.0m to Spain  9.0m to France  3.5m to Italy  3.5m to IrelandONS 
LISTEN: Mervyn King has "no credibility" to advise on Brexit says former colleague @D_Blanchflower @LBC 
Jeremy #Brexlax Corbyn's office actively tried to sabotage the Labour #Remain campaign +Seumas Milne & Putin#Brexit  
All this hand-wringing about 2016 when Brexit/Trump hasn't even happened yet. 2017. Taste it again. For the first time. 
A Mayor in France has named their new road 'Rue du Brexit' to pay tribute to our vote for independence!A fine choice!   
.@MissKTR1 Read my sign: Lies, damned lies and the Brexit campaign's £350m lie  
Faces of Brexit (an occasional series).  
The Queen 'backed Brexit'  
Her Majesty the #Queen backs #Brexit , here's to another 90 years:#GSTQ#Brexit 
Yeah, 2016. Not impressed. #georgemichael #DavidBowie #prince #riseoftherightwing Bloody Brexit, Trump, Farage, Marine Le Pen etc. #crapyear 
Writers, artists, poets, composers, film makers, game designers: Brexit, Trump and austerity are your fuel, not your narcotic.  
Best of 2016: A short history of Britain and the European Union  #Brexit  
100,000 trading jobs are at risk in London. Here's a guide to why "clearing" is important  
Top BBC journalist heard 'Queen Backs Brexit' claim - but didn't run it  
After Brexit and Trump, academia’s bias became crystal clear, writes @jowilliams293  
#UK set for #Brexit boom in 2017 as top #business chiefs restore confidence in #economy.  #BBC #SKY #ITV #NEWS #EU 
#Make2017MadderThan2016Theresa May admits her team doesn't have the intellectual ability to negotiate a Brexit deal so hires some Poles 
My problem with ridiculously privileged people saying we should ride out the storm of Brexit is that they'll barely feel the impact of it. 
"We DON'T want out anymore: Shock poll reveals Express & Star readers have changed minds on #Brexit" 
good there has been a 66% increase in the royal grant since brexit while areas of the country reliant on EU funding will lose it all imo  
A great shame that the projected Brexit pop concert didn't go ahead. It would have featured 3 members of Bucks Fizz & an Elvis impersonator. 
From Brexit and Trump to Aleppo and South Sudan, take a look at the most widely read IRIN stories of the year: 
Brussels won't force Brits to apply for a visa to enter the EU after Brexit. The nationals of sixty other countries already don't need one. 
2017 & 2018 will show to those who were struggling & voted for #Brexit that all they did was make themselves poorer  
An accident of birth made her Queen not sagacity.  #brexit #QueensSpeech 
Good that we are starting to see Brexit optimism getting reported.  
How about introducing a TV #news channel in Britain that would reflect the views of people who voted for #Brexit …   
Indeed, spot on. Is that really what you want, people? If you don't, you must stand up to Brexit.  
BOXING DAY NEWSFarage delivers a personal message to the public during his 'Brexit tour of the UK' before jetting off to the US.  
Laura Kuenssberg says source told her the Queen really does back #Brexit. Nick Clegg wouldn't lie to us, would he?  
- and the immediate relegation to 6th has been attributed to post Brexit vote sterling slide - by the man Ukip used to audit its manifesto 
RT if you agree that the #Brexit dividend should be spent on our priorities like the #NHS 
The WELT says "Brexit currency effects hits U.K. - France overtakes the U.K. to become 5th largest economy in 2016"... then ... 
Most British companies are optimistic about the future post-Brexit 
Queen did back Brexit in run-up to referendum, says Laura Kuenssberg  
Our 6th most popular article of the year - Out – and into the world: Why The Spectator backed Brexit  
Mervyn King: Britain should be upbeat about future outside European Union after Brexit 
The one thing Brexiteers said would never happen after Brexit is happening  
It's crucial that the Govt protects British businesses & jobs in any #Brexit negotiations  
HAPPY NEW YEAR: #UK set for #Brexit boom in 2017 as top business chiefs restore confidence in economy:  via @TheSun 
#Brexit Special Deal for #Gibraltar & #NorthernIrelandMeanwhile UK spits on Scotland 
Theresa 'I watch what I watch, Brexit means Brexit, I gave the answer I gave' May  
As the Great British public mourn their national treasure, maybe it's worth remembering that he was the son of a Greek immigrant. #brexit 
Now we know why Donald Trump loved Brexit so much..  
The Queen DID back Brexit, BBC suggests as it claims she said  she wanted to 'get on with it'  
LISTEN: Source Told @bbclaurak Queen DID Back Brexit at Private Lunch  
THERESA MAY: "I am one with the Brexit, the Brexit is with me. I am one with the Brexit, the Brexit is with me. I am one with the Brexit..." 
A #EURef result based on such ignorance about the EU is a mandate for better education & controls on press lies - not for #Brexit#Remain 
UK set for Brexit boom in 2017 as top business chiefs restore confidence in economy  
Mervyn King advocates Hard Brexit. Treasury says that’ll wipe 9.5% off UK GDP. How’s that a #brexit ‘opportunity’?  
Donald Trump's new trade chief urges Britain's rivals to profit from Brexit & take business away from UK reportedly  
Mark Carney: paid by UK Gov "predicts doom". Mervin King: no longer a stooge is free to tell the truth #brexit  
The Independent: The Queen 'backed Brexit'.  
Spot the tension between (a) us trying to poach other nations' tax base and (b) them delivering a Brexit deal in our national interest? 
'Britain voted to leave the EU' - lazy & incorrect - it was not the island but 26% of the population of the island that voted for #Brexit.  
The German press increasingly recognises our distinctiveness: "Schottland will im EU-Binnenmarkt bleiben" #Brexit  
Brexit to send UK economy plummeting down global scale to 8th place  # via @HuffPostUK 
A hard #Brexit will result in UK being driven by demands of foreign investors ie low taxes, low wages, shrinking state, poor public services 
Business confidence soars after post-Brexit wobble:  
Looks as though 2017 will see some interesting developments in the UK/US "special relationship". This is from The Times. #Brexit is a fiasco  
Brexit set to send UK tumbling down world economic league table  
Donald Trump’s trade chief has urged Britain’s rivals to exploit Brexit and steal business from the UK  
Britain should be 'confident' about Brexit and quit Single Market, former Bank of England governor says  
Congrats to all the #Brexit voters who thought #Trump was going to be our friend and that Nigel would fix it for us  
Brexit a 'God-given opportunity' for City's rivals, says Trump's trade chief. As warned by all those derided experts  
Brexit gives the UK real opportunities outside of Single Market says ex Bank of England Governor Lord King.  
Britain should be 'confident' about Brexit and quit Single Market, former Bank of England governor says  
You think 2016 has been bad, wait until 2017 with Brexit and Trump, disaster is on the horizon 
Lord King: Brexit gives the UK 'real opportunities'  via @PoliticsHome 
There are remarkable numbers of eggs with no followers converted to Brexit & urging others to follow suit. It's almost as if...no surely not  
No. I do not have to accept a vote won on lies & media bias, nor an outcome of such utter stupidity as Brexit. 
William Golding, Trump's Trade Sec, said USA should take advantage of UK post Brexit  (tell me if link not OK) 
Nigel Farage slams Archbishop of Canterbury for 'negative' Xmas Brexit message  
New: "Trumped"Apparently there are TWO TYPES of "Special relationship"...#Brexit #Brexitshambles FB:  
How do you guarantee a Diamond Hard Brexit? Set up a tax haven on the borders of the r27.  
UK set for Brexit boom in 2017 as top business chiefs restore confidence in economy  
1. For record: I am not "pro-Brexit" or think milk& honey tap now on: but refusing to accept Brexit will happen, ignoring political choices 
Six months after the Brexit vote, as Britain changes, she feels her German heritage more than before  
Lord King says Brexit brings 'real opportunities'  
The cold reality of Brexit friend #Trump. No special trade deal just a trade grab! #Brexit  
The EU-a failed pilot for Globalization. Britain was wise to push Brexit. AMERICANS wise to vote for President Trump to STOP GLOBALIZATION!  
Two of the biggest economic countries in the world are getting their independence back.#Brexit#TrumpThe whole world will be the winners. 
Brexit 6 months on. Everything you need to know in 60 seconds.  
Ken Loach’s “I, Daniel Blake” is a must-see in the era of Brexit and Donald Trump  
Here's how Brexit interrupts the comfortable European life of one German-Welsh family living in London: @KBennhold.  
Images from a year coloured by Brexit, Syria and Trump  
2016 :TrumpHarambeKiller clowns Vine shuts downBrock TurnerOrlando shootingAleppoKanyeBrexitPokémon GOHurricane Matthew 
#merryboxingday trumps says he wants will use #brexit to STEAL TRADE FROM UK,well done #nigelfarage still best buds? 
#Brexiters @theresa_may17m of you: 6 months to tell Remainers what 'opportunities' Brexit affords *not available in EU*. Still waiting. 
Ah so Mr Brexit Nigel Farage's new best pal wants to exploit Brexit for the US, with Nigel's backing...Ever feel like uve been a total mug  
You left out:1. Brexit2. Trump  
We're gonna bring down the establishment one by one#TrumpPresident #brexit #swexit #EndEU #LePen 
Special relationship?Just how naive can Theresa "Billy-no-mates" May and her Brexit droogs get?  
Why is it surprising that a nine year old believes in Brexit? Especially at Christmas!  
Nearly two-thirds of British companies optimistic about their post-Brexit future.>Get on with it, Theresa May. 
Most British companies are optimistic about the future post-Brexit   
Are you doing enough NOW to protect your children from this? anti-white sentiment is growing,risks are real #maga #tcot #ccot #trump #brexit  
.@LapGongLeong Brexit will be Canada+. Many Remainer people/areas won't like it but won't be consulted. 
Predictable, predicted. Brexit must not happen. 
HUMBUG! Business leaders dismiss Remoaners and expect growth in 2017 after Brexit  
With #Brexit and #Trump, 2016 turned out to be the best year politically that I can remember. If 2017 is half as good I’ll be happy. 
Still wondering how #Brexit campaign lied to public and got away with it.Then I see #MrsBrownsBoys voted best sitcom of the 21st century. 
Brexit times five.  
I guess nobody ended up calling me Mr. Brexit! Not sure what I even meant that night, sometimes being 70 is like being high! 
Gosh, I hope the Brexit Bunch weren't relying on USA for future trade!They're briefing the EU on the best way to shaft you#BrexitIdiots 
Turns out that in my family there is a correlation between those who can't sit through a film without talking and those who voted Brexit. 
Farage, UKIP and their #Brexit "pal" #Trump. Feel you've been had, yet, Brexiteers? 
Luckily, Brexit wasn't a subject I had to avoid around the Christmas table in Germany this year ... BECAUSE EVERYONE HERE AGREES IT'S CRAZY! 
The Trump administration prepares to exploit BREXIT  for the benefit of the US. Times front page  
Brexit Christmas jokes  
And then the news broke ... Theresa May had hid her Brexit plan inside a rolling piece of English cheese !!!   
How’s that quick trade deal with USA post-Brexit idea looking then, Andrew Marr? #brexit  
The far-right are traitors serving Putin in his attempt to destroy the EU and the Western democratic alliance.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Does this explain why Marr treated my dissection of his #Brexit piece with such contempt?  
The Americans do see strategic advantage in Brexit. For them.  
Reminder: Farage using the threat of violence to intimidate opponents & legitimizing it as a political tool#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
The Times tomorrow. We're an open goal mouth now thanks to Brexit. Courtesy @suttonnick 
Boxing Day's Times front page:Use Brexit to steal UK trade, says Trump aide#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Nigel Farage has a greater faith in Brexit than his own religion. We'll keep you in our prayers, Nige.  
Brexit leads to more than 100 firms looking to move business from UK to Ireland 
Because we need some light relief - much enjoyed my present of Five on Brexit Island by @bruno_vincent #festivecheer 
A lot of things may go wrong in 2017. Here's a Pessimist's Guide to the year ahead 
Brexit is the British word for brunch #Fake2016Facts 
MERRY CHRISTMAS TO MY #BREXIT BESTIESHAVE A GREAT XMAS AND COME OUT FIGHTING FIT FOR 2017TOGETHER WE CAN ACHIEVE ANYTHING !#Article50 
Andrew Marr tells Remain voters to STOP MOANING and start being positive about Brexit  
Grappling With My Family’s Identity in a Post-‘Brexit’ Europe  Some perfect writing for the end of a dismal year. 
Farage, like many fascists, loudly poses as a defender of Christianity while acting as an enemy of the Christian message.#Brexit  
6 months after the Brexit vote, it's looking quite messy. Here's where things stand  
Ken Loach’s “I, Daniel Blake” is a must-see in the era of Brexit and Donald Trump  
Let's hope Angry hitler loving unionists in Glasgow become a thing of the past #Brexit #novoters 
Just realised, Brussels has stiffed us with their sprout output post brexit. 2015 vs. 2016.  #sparse 
how will christmas dinner be different after brexitno brussels 
What's the difference between @theresa_may and @MichaelLCrick? Michael Crick WILL give us a running commentary on #Brexit #NadoligLlawen 
Breaking down #Brexit: Handy one pager on how #Brexit should play out via @GoldmanSachs. #UK #fintech #finserv  
'Democracy is for people, not MPs' - Dorking Brexit campaigner  Sovereignty is not yours to give away 
The fight against a hard 'Brexit' doesn't take a holiday. Merry Christmas to you and your loved ones!   
What a great year 2016 has been! We got Brexit AND Donald Trump! Listen to the first podcast I made this year 
Merry Christmas to all! except Nigel Farage who I hope drowns in mulled wine and Brexit lies 
UK fishing industry set for huge global domination  #Brexit boost for home nations please share far and wide U.K. Won 
.@hasbrouk alright lads, Merry Christmas, have you considered making a Monopoly Brexit edition? You can have that one on me 
'A thoroughly British revolution': unpublished Telegraph readers' letters about Brexit#TelegraphLetters #Premium  
The failures of capitalism have lead to Brexit and a Donald Trump presidency  
Possible delays and no return ticket - join us on a Brexit train ride  
#JacobReesMogg ignites #Twitter after telling #BBC: My son raised a toast to #Brexit  #ITV #SKY #UK #EU #TORY #NEWS 
Everyone on twitter gearing themselves up for the Brexit convo with the fam  
Frexit: Le Pen promises to take France out of EU & NATO  #France #Brexit 
Christmas is a time to celebrate family ties. We should be celebrating our ties with our EU family not cutting them.#Remain #Brexit 
Across Europe the far-right are aiding Putin's hybrid war against our democracy.The far-right are the traitors. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Andrew Marr tells Remain voters to STOP MOANING and start being positive about Brexit  
and a Merry Christmas to you Sir, and thank you for making Brexit happen 
If bankers leave London after Brexit, where will they go? Here are some options  
Merry Christmas everyone. I hope no one got me anything like I asked. I'm a bit late with this but, has anyone named their pet dog Brexit? 
Britain not to sign up to a key plank of the international accord designed to stop multinationals avoiding corporation tax! #brexit #Pariah 
After predicting Brexit, Trump Win, Action against BlackMoney & Tax on LTCG, I assure you none of these are negative for equity investing! 
No Mention of Brexit in Queen's Christmas Message  
Were not arguing 4 recount-were saying Brexit's a bad decision & shd b rectified-Large constitutional change shdnt b brought by such margins  
What I want for Xmas & all Xmases to come: no #Brexit.Happy Xmas - have a peaceful day. 
Merry Christmas! Let's have no politics today. Hope you all get what you want which apparently includes a hard Brexit... Ooops! Sorry! 
Merry Christmas. And enjoy these @TheNewEuropean Xmas cracker jokes. (Some are even quite funny, unlike Brexit)  
Brexit opinion surveys show huge swing to Remain in UK regions that voted Leave  
“Who are you?” She asked, curious how identity applied to a 5-year-old German-Welsh girl in post-Brexit London  
Why Britain voted for #Brexit: a look back 200 years  
The failures of capitalism have lead to Brexit and a Donald Trump presidency  
Remember 950 years before #Brexit, the Norman invasion brought us Brentry via @TheEconomist 
Oh for the love of... I'm being visited by three ghosts. Is this happening to anyone else? Apparently they want me to be "into Brexit". 
Some fabulous five #brexit Christmas reading! Sure you'd enjoy it @Colvinius! 
A brief history of Brexit's rise from obscurity to become the political word of 2016.  
It's Christmas Day.. This means we only have 2 more Christmas Days after this one, until we leave the #EU. #Brexit  
The will of people changed! Stop brexit! Please sign this petition:  
Theresa May's Brexit plan be like  
Britain moved up to number 5 on Forbes list of best places to do business. Tell us again how #Brexit ruined the #UK? 
First they try to block Brexit, now these disgraceful judges prevented a war hero seeing his family at Christmas. Do they hate this country?  
You're confident of that, are you? Most people who voted for Brexit had never even heard of the EEA. I think you know that perfectly well.  
Asking my 5 year old about her identity in a post-Brexit Europe  
Jacob Rees-Mogg ignites Twitter after telling BBC: My son raised a toast to Brexit. JR-M for PM!   
Funniest Brexit campaigning moment of year.Asking Remainer what she liked  about EU. ' The NHS' came the reply. 
Britain is the most centralised country in the Western world And #Brexit will give the govt more power!#Remain 
Evidence that 'Brexit' was a fleeting but monumentally stupid decision: Fuelled at the time by bigotry peddled in newspapers like this one.  
I've no intention of uniting behind @theresa_may. Her #Brexit strategy (if one can call it that) will ruin our country. No thanks #NoBrexit 
This feels like a fitting end to the year of Trump and Brexit. The Muppets were robbed, damnit.  
Brexit would be huge boost for UK crims as they would be free to live on the Costas with fear of European Arrest Warrant  
BREAKING: Santa will NOT visit UK tonight after Brexit vote shows that we do not welcome foreigners “coming over here, giving us presents.” 
The failures of capitalism have lead to Brexit and a Donald Trump presidency  
Merry Christmas to all of you!**Does not include Brexit wankers 
Hopes for 2017:Things get better.Brexit is cancelled.Trump revealed to be a rubbish Auton.Ed Miliband becomes Prime Minister somehow. 
just had the first brexit argument of the season! merry xmas! everything is trash! humour can no longer disguise the horror of being alive! 
The people of Gibraltar bitterly angry at being betrayed by the self-styled patriots of #Brexit Britain #Remain 
MERRY #BREXMAS ALL YOU DECENT PEOPLE!#Brexit  
ICYMI: @acgrayling calls on MPs for another referendum on the terms of any #Brexit deal  
I'll be on @LBC radio at, or soon after,21:10 about #TheresaMay ' s fat chance of uniting the country behind a costly #brexit 
Brexit Song “Something to Say” by Neil Innes (ex Monty Python):  via @YouTube 
Merry Christmas to all of you, especially the dear children who still believe in Brexit. Xx 
Remember to open your doors to a lonely old person on Christmas. Unless they voted Brexit. 
Brexit & the Trump election were campaigns that their leaders didn't expect to win, contributing to their slapdash & likely long aftermath. 
Brexit, Christmas wish: May we never forget those dreams OUR European Union made real: including the bond of friendship & the gift of peace.  
If it wasn't so sad I'd be laughing my heart out at this bizarre poll from the media scions of EUscepticism&Brexit. What a Topsy Turvy world  
Theresa May is increasingly isolated and alienating key colleagues, officials tell Bloomberg  
***********************************Merry Christmas To All Remainers&A Happy No Brexit New Year!#NeverNeverNeverGiveIn 
Six months after the Brexit vote, as Britain changes, she feels her German heritage more than before  
.@jonworth breathtakingly fisks Andrew Marr's piece on #Brexit. Don't bother reading if you're not a details person  
Just as the #Brexit wounds were beginning to heal, @richardosman divides our nation with his World Cup Of Christmas Films 2016 
EU nationals living here pay taxes in Britain, so why doesn't David Davies denounce the fact they were not allowed to vote?#Brexit  
Just watched Home Alone, the level of detail in Kevin's plan should make Theresa May feel ashamed.#Brexit  
At last it's all out in the open. The EU is "UNDEMCRATIC" @willowbrookwolf #Brexit @USAforBrexit #Ukip 
May urging "Unity" post-BrexitIs that Irish Unity?Celtic Unity?Gibraltar-Spain Unity?Falklands-Argentina Unity? 
Torigraph concern about rising cost of Champagne due to Brexit says it all. Rising cost of food???  via @telebusiness 
Brexit facts to get you through that awkward Christmas dinner  
Results of #Brexit: The UK climbed from 10th place to 5th place in the Forbes annual list of the best countries for business. @OpenEurope 
Attacks on EU immigration, Schengen & Britons' freedom to live and work in the EU. What a miserable frightened age we live in.#Brexit 
Not many people predicted Brexit, but Mrs Brown's Boys was the most watched Christmas TV show last year. The writing was on the wall. 
I think the true gift of Brexit has been to discover all the hidden political geniuses that have quietly lived among us all this time.  
Wrong: we voted for change. Good illustration of how EU elite misjudgement of U.K. domestic political mood will bedevil Brexit negotiations.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg ignites Twitter after telling BBC: My son raised a toast to Brexit  
Theresa May will share details of her Brexit plan with the Queen as soon as they are decided  
Will #Brexit give people more control? Not with our authoritarian govt nor with the multinationals we'll beg to invest in Britain.#Remain 
The failures of capitalism have lead to Brexit and a Donald Trump presidency  
Because of the BREXIT vote in June, Christmas dinners will be without Brussels this year. 
Should UKIP with 1 MP be involved in #Brexit - of courseShould Scotland with 54 MP's be involved in Brexit - Definitely not 
"Berlin jihadi was caught by European co-operation"Another desperate, deceitful lie from desperate, deceitful #Remain lunatics.#Brexit 
Ad hominem response by @AndrewMarr9 to fisking by @jonworth of broadcaster's panglossian Brexit essay:+ manifesto 
Testing begins on the UK's post-Brexit emigration process. Broadstairs, 2017.  
Seasons greetings to all, whatever your views. In 2017 lets all condemn the evils of 2016- Racism, Hate, Trump, Farage, Hopkins...& Brexit! 
.@theresa_may Remainers are already in favour of unity. It's why we voted to stay in a united Europe. Brexit is the division, not us. 
Theresa May called for unity over Brexit as part of her Christmas message Yeah, UK, why isn't there more unity?  
Fed up with the UK Government saying Brexit means Brexit Do you want to them to share their plan with the people now? 
Bad boys of Brexit  
We DON'T want out anymore: Shock poll reveals Express & Star readers have changed minds on Brexit « Express & Star  
Queen of Omnishambles Theresa May wants the UK to come together over Brexit.Yeah, let's just ignore reality Tess 
Devastating economic impact of #Brexit vote laid bare.  
Sorry to shock you but the birth of the saviour of the world is way more significant than Brexit  
We look at how and why Express & Star readers have changed their minds on #Brexit after six months here:  
2016's most popular editorial looked at how to do Brexit right  
These Tory MPs have got the #Brexit spirit: Slash taxes (to hell with the NHS) and impose Asian working conditions on lazy British workers  
How others see us: this is a really, really damning piece on May and #Brexit, and huge impact May's incoherence could have on Ireland.  
'Top Brexit players take up jobs advising on post-EU strategy'. A nice little job creation scheme, for a few  
And we'll see a lot more of this in the new year I'm sure, as inflation and other #Brexit downsides start to kick in.  
What Brexit opportunities? Name one  Brexit opportunity that has arisen since June? #brexitshambles 
Brits to ‘unite’ message is fine.Yet when Europeans are attacked from WITHIN, unite with whom?#Brexit first! 
Grandad voted for Brexit cos he said the local area isn't what it used to be and maybe he had a point  
2016 Wipe! Thursday BBC2 9pm! Inc Brexit, Trump, Pokémon Go, Bake Off, Shitpeas - and Cunk meets @ProfBrianCox  
Shocking #Brexit lies of the #Leave campaign, we must never forget the broken promises #EUref #Remain #EU WATCH THIS  
The reason we are still leaving EU is that the @Conservatives would rather rule over a poor country than … #brexit  
Does Theresa May want us to come together for a "red white and blue Brexit" or the "Brexit means Brexit" Brexit? Either way I'm busy. 
Co-authored an essay "NGO Man" 4 yrs ago- will read like the recent headlines and debates on #Brexit #Trump #Climate  
#brexit it is abundantly clear that if EU25 push for hard Brexit, this is not in our national interest. Should we have new treaty with UK? 
The six best reasons for Brexit:  
My open, joyful, optimistic and tolerant Britain. Quite a contrast with the mean spirited, distrustful and xenophobic #brexit Britain.  
Irish Foreign Minister: "my hope would be that they remain in the customs union" re post-Brexit border  
Irish - who it is hoped will be closest allies in EU27 - FM going on record with concerns over Brexit clarity:  
Another Brexit U-turn 'shock poll'. "We DON'T want out anymore" say 9,948 @expressandstar readers 
Don’t mention this around the Christmas table: Brexit, inequality and the demographic divide  via @LSEEuroppblog 
My thoughts exactly: Shut up, May, and leave god out of politics and #BrexitBesides, Jesus wouldn't have voted for isolation & xenophobia.  
#Brexit revisionism. Leaving Single Market and Customs Union is far from a foregone conclusion.  
We are going to see a lot more polls like this as Brexit bites in 2017 and mood of the country changes. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/c9rp5vOU3N 
The failures of capitalism have led to Brexit and a Donald Trump presidency  
'@paulnuttallukip: My top priority will be to make sure that in the New Year much faster progress is made towards implementing Brexit  
A year ago today we got married  Guess 2016 hasn't been too bad of a year (Brexit aside)  
Don't forget kids, if you don't get what you want from Santa, you can blame Putin / Brexit & then demand another Christmas Eve Santa run  
Forget Brexit and the US election, if you really want to see shit kick off on Twitter then tweet thoughts on the best/worst Christmas film. 
Brexit news - Row over fishing quotas amid claims Scotland has been handed England's share. Sick of this appeasement  
@JinkxMonsoon SLAMS #Brexit, says she's immune to vodka and should be President! For now she's QUEEN of #AndyVision! 
The country is officially fed up with being told: “Brexit means Brexit". It's time for May to start delivering.  
Trump as 'man of the people' - the staggering disconnect between reality and assertion characterises both his election & the #Brexit lunacy.  
Brexit is flawed on so many levels: no consensus, no strategy, no plan, no capacity, no resource, no clear remit, and little hope of success  
Our most popular editorial of 2016 was on a tragic split—Brexit  
Thought I heard @prodnose on @bbc5live discussing Brexit.. turned up the radio volume. Ah it's ok, he's talking about BREAD SAUCE. Phew 
Evidence suggests the economy's doing well post voting Leave. @toryboypierce asks: Should Remoaners give up and let May get on with Brexit?  
Its time to end the UN...their agenda is not about free people, rather the enslavement of humanity to globalist ideals. #tcot #maga #brexit  
This is Brexit and Trump all over again. We shouldn't be allowed to vote in 2016. 
Press hate & lies - massive public ignorance favouring the far-right & #Brexit agendas#Remain #YesEU #StopFundingHate 
Theresa May calls on a divided U.K. to unite as the country prepares to leave the EU  
The overseas media have portrayed the Brexit vote as nationalism, but they're wrong, says @DanielJHannan for @CNN 
Oh good. @jonworth has 'fisked' @AndrewMarr9's weirdly positive view of Brexit  
If not for Brexit prism we'd be worried about unsustainable consumer boom + falling savings ratio. FT.   
Brexit means Brexit....................but not yet.Gov is making a Dog's Brexit of our divorce from the EUWe should be out in mths not yrs  
Petition: Debate the possibility that the "Will of the People" has changed since Brexit  
.  @lesbonner  Corbyn's ambivalence on  BREXIT, the biggest issue of all,  has made Tim Farron the de facto opposition leader 
Also he replied to no substantive point I raised. His piece says he wants a good #Brexit debate, then he belittles me. 
If the PM wants the country to come together, don't condemn it to international irrelevance & obscurity by forcing through damaging #Brexit 
This year we have taken a decision that truly merits its own chapter in our evolving and amazing island story - #Brexit 
Stability my arse. @theresa_may #TheresaMay #Brexit  
I will accept #Brexit in the same way Nigel Farage would have accepted Remain, thanks all the same, Theresa May. #r4today 
Actors! Only 1 day until you even try and spark a Brexit debate with your family in an attempt to avoid awkward questions about your career. 
We DON'T want out anymore: Shock poll reveals Express & Star readers have changed their minds on #Brexit 
Brexit facts to get you through that awkward Christmas dinner  
merry christmas eve to everyone except those who voted for brexit and for trump 
We are not interested in your patronising speeches,get on with the job of giving us back our country,stopping halal,closing mosques, #brexit  
Watch the story of how Brexit unfolded behind the scenes  
“May Christmas message urges unity after Brexit vote”And I urge May to shove #Brexit up her arse. 
Part of a thread which reveals @AndrewMarr9 is pro #Brexit. Also his 'disdain' language mirrors those who want to close democratic debate.  
I think there's a real possibility that the May gov will collapse in 2017 when #Brexit negotiations fail. Progressives have to be ready. 
Hilarious. People complaining about Brexit in computer game @FootballManager, but supporting it in real life... pic.twitter.com/nQYDWRIdgm 
"Unite" Mrs May? The only real evidence of what you're planning is your insane attack on student visas. Unite behind that? Feck off. #brexit 
If she wants unity I suggest she and her government start engaging with ALL of the electorate and find out what people want It is not Brexit  
Merkel is insane!Tweet this to show your support for the arrested cop for telling the truth.#AfD #Merkel #Brexit  
Pat Leahy: Brexit is looking worse and worse for Ireland  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
CHRISTMAS MESSAGE TO REMAINERS WHO WANT TO REVERSE THE EU REFERENDUM RESULT ...#Brexit #EUref #Article50 #LeaveEU #VoteLeave #Article50NOW 
With Brexit in motion, the EU wants to create an army to protect its borders.  
Worse. #Brexit ing UK is not invested in the cohesion and security of Europe. Torries are banking on EU fragmentation.  
Brexit was like the passengers in a car voting to drive ff a cliff. Driver: "suppose I gotta, it's what most want" 
May Christmas message urges unity after Brexit voteMy Christmas message.   Fuck off.  
Brexit to blame for over $81 billion worth of missed investment opportunities: Report  
GIVE US BREXIT: Senior Tory MP calls for 'swift, clean' EU exit before end of next year  
.@DArtemison I don't support bring unvetted immigrants here. Brexit & Trump are fed up people rising up against failed liberal policies. 
Surely only a matter of time til Britain turns to Sam Allardyce as prime minister to fix Brexit. He'll have a crack at any relegation scrap. 
Senator Ted Cruz: Eliminate US funding of the UN"Brexit, Trump’s election victory, US withdrawal from the...  
New Statesman @AndrewMarr9 optimist #Brexit piece in @NewStatesman was so inaccurate I’ve comprehensively fisked it: 
Pat Leahy: Brexit is looking worse and worse for Ireland  
Defund? How about pull out of UN altogether (finally) & form an alliance of UK, USA, other #brexit-minded countries...AGAINST UN, EU?   
Scottish Brexit plan a necessary step towards indyref2  
#TheresaMay urges Britons to unite behind the #Brexit vote in her X-mas message, FAT CHANCE! eurosceptic hypocrisy!  
As someone who lives in a town that narrowly voted Leave, increasingly doubtful we'd see riots if Brexit doesn't happen. 
Queen's Christmas broadcast: "My husband I thought you'd like to know Mrs May's plans for #Brexit, so I asked her but she hasn't got a clue" 
Don’t mention this around the Christmas table: Brexit, inequality and the demographic divide  
Theresa May gives her first Christmas message as prime minister, calling for unity after the Brexit vote.  
Cameron telling the UK to get fucked after brexit, and Obama telling Israel to get fucked at the UN are two of my favorite episodes of 2016. 
Scottish Office uses YOUR money to 'mislead' us over Brexit (From The National) 
-Irish have had ENOUGH!Irish Foreign Minister goes ON THE RECORD criticising May & her lack of Brexit plans 
Theresa May (or more likely her £140k Leave advisers) are clearly getting panicked as #Brexit realities kick in. @euromove 
Some accuse UKIP of inciting hate, majority violence comes from Remainers.Only post Brexit fatality was Leave voter at hands of a Remainer. 
Britain should 'celebrate' Brexit opportunities, says Theresa May in Christmas message  
Theresa May wouldn't tell the Queen her Brexit plans. Here's how we imagine that conversation.  
If Brexit doesn't happen there will be riots. If Brexit does happen those same people will riot in 5 years when they are unemployed. 
Hospitality industry demands 100,000 Brexit work permits a year  
A traitor is someone who betrays the best interests of their country. May knows that Brexit is insane, but she's still going ahead with it. 
Loosing EU status on your passport because of brexit is a really big deal28 counties consulates across the worldUK TM / JC helping hands  
By quite a long way, this is the best Brexit piece I've read by a 'mainstream' commentator   
The Queen was left "disappointed" that @theresa_may declined to reveal details about her Brexit plans - reports  
Europe thinks the UK is living on 'fantasy island' over Brexit deal  via @MetroUK 
The Brexit effect: international banks no longer sending many top people to London.  
Theresa May has 'greatest respect' for the Queen and will share her Brexit plans when they are decided 
Pic via @montie The price of BREXIT!  
The great Ponzi scheme of Eurozone banking could crumble under bad debts  #Brexit 
We can't send everyone a card, but Merry Christmas & a Happy Brexit New Year to all 17,410,741 of you. Thank you, the 52%!  
#BestTwitterVideosOf2016 #16 - When Nigel Farage lied about the 350m NHS Brexit pledge the morning after the night before  
Andrew Marr tells Remain voters to STOP MOANING and start being positive about Brexit:  
Marr was so prissy/fastidious about Scots Indy. Now he wants us to embrace the autarchy of Brexit Britain? Puh-lease  
#Brexit is a gross miscarriage of justice for the young generation  
Holyhead: the second busiest port in the UK. A good deal is needed in the Brexit negotiations to ensure that it remains so.  
Brexit: like a fart. Makes a lot of noise, creates an unpleasant stink. Ultimately disperses. #dontbrexitfixit no Brexit. 
Exactly six months since Brexit. We still haven't left. Or figured out how to.  
Made me laugh out loud. Found on facebook. Anyone have a source so I can credit cartoonist? I'm guessing newspaper.#Brexit #brexitshambles 
2016- Trump win- Brexit- Italy referendum fail- Syria- Turkey coup attempt- N Korea nuclear tests- ISIS attacks- Brazil impeachment 
Scottish Brexit plan a necessary step towards indyref2  
The Queen was left "disappointed" that @theresa_may declined to reveal details about her Brexit plans - reports  
Six months on from the Brexit referendum, there is every reason to be optimistic. My piece for @CNNOpinion @CNN.  
Brexit? Matt - political cartoon gallery  
Brilliant open letter from Austin Mitchell to The Guardian about their #brexit stance.  
Paul Nuttall: Now we must fight to make sure the PM delivers Brexit  
Why Britain voted for Brexit: the short and long answers  
Did the deepening income divide fue support for #Trump and #Brexit?  
Ah, now I see why the Brexit trolls are out in force. They know the mood is changing, their lies found out  
A lot more folk out there than what is reported. Yes movement much more multinational than Britnat/brexit/No voting Yoons  
Brexit wins still stacking up  
Great piece by @glynmoody for @arstechnica. We can't bribe our way out of Brexit impact on science -it's not just £: 
Andrew Marr tells Remain voters to STOP MOANING and start being positive about Brexit  
2017: The year we stand together to reassert Parliamentary Sovereignty, defend liberal values and continue to expose the folly of #Brexit. 
Tomorrow's news: Theresa May announces that when we move home, she will respect our will by choosing our new home for us. #Brexit #Remain 
What are the 9 top science stories of the year? According to Wired, one of them is science politics: Brexit & Trump.  
haha u Brexit cunts I bought all my Toblerone in Europe cos I have respect for my family pic.twitter.com/DuzwkUU4n4 
And when we screw up our relations with the EU, the USA and China will have us over a barrel in trade negotiations.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
"It's beginning to look a lot like Brexit"  
Quitters should try to understand: Only 3 trading partners really matter: EU, USA, China. The EU is by far the most important#Brexit #YesEU 
Her Maj is not alone in her frustration about Theresa May's shilly shallying over her Brexit plan. The rest of us are fed up too!  
Brexit is about taking control of one owns country- and saying no to a United states of Europe.  
The Queen was left "disappointed" that @theresa_may declined to reveal details about her Brexit plans - reports  
"Brexit means Brexit", "respect the referendum result"; this is the new political correctness. It must be resisted. 
Just one more toon before I clock off for Xmas.That #Brexit plan in full...Merry #Brexmas, everyone! 
Why #Brexit won? @BBCMarkEaston talks abt "national indignation" without once mentioning Scotland & N Ireland. 
I don't want to get political, but it occurs to me that a hard Brexit would be easier to wrap than a soft Brexit. 
German supermarket Aldi backs Brexit Britain with £300million investment.  
From today's @FinancialTimes #brexit #xmas 
From beavers to Brexit - our most read stories in a momentous year for conservation  
READ: A great piece in the @spectator on why Sturgeon's Brexit dreams are never going to happen. 
Despite Brexit  
Over 10 million more people watched 1977 Morecambe and Wise Xmas Show than voted for Brexit - & you don't hear them whining forever, do you? 
UK workers are 'losing confidence' in the Government's ability to negotiate Brexit  
UK workers are 'losing confidence' in the Government's ability to negotiate Brexit  
Brexit supporters are only allowed gifts that were available in the '50s. 
Time to crack on with Brexit and Get Britain Out of the EU  
Hello #BBC.  #Footsie has just gone over 7000 approaching it's highest point EVER. Just thought you'd like to know. Despite #Brexit that is!  
Dan Hannan: the man who did as much as anyone to give the world Brexit & restore sovereignty to the Brits. Give him a round of applause.  
Even when she’s talking to the Queen, Theresa May keeps ma’am on Brexit | d’Ancona  
UK GDP growth better than expected in Brexit aftermath  
George Galloway:'#Britain should send a note to #Brussels saying they're not getting any more money' #Brexit AMEN! 
I wish all #REMAINERS a very Happy Christmas. #Leavers make the most of it if brexit happens it may be the last happy one due to #poverty 
The iconic advertising still from the Stanley Kubrick classic, "...How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Brexit". UK, 1964.  
The insults & abuse hurled by the far-right are not free speech, they are an attempt to bully their opponents into silence. #Brexit #YesEU 
.@georgegalloway offers his own #Brexit plan: 'Send note to the EU telling them they're not getting any more money'  
Scottish independence is the only hope for young people after Brexit        Westminster is a no hope government! 
Six months on from #EUref, the UK government still has no #Brexit plan. @ScotGov does. Read about it here.  
67% of Europeans say they FEEL they are EU CITIZENS latest Eurobarometer survey shows . #H2020 #investEU #Brexit #JEFspirit 
Today's @BrookesTimes cartoon: May won't share her Brexit strategy with the Queen  
Consumer spending was high in autumn which helped the economy avoid all the Brexit pitfalls remainers had predicted. 
Queen gives Theresa May royal seal of disapproval over Brexit  
What a year! New faces, Wales Bill, #Senedd2016 #EURef & Brexit, #GERW & taxes, electoral systems and justice! Here's to even more in 2017! 
It is silly debating point but used endlessly to excuse Treasury short-term Brexit forecast. And it wasn't gov policy -- there was no policy  
Britain has its worst trade performance in almost 3 years  
I just think it's pretty dumb for Brits to insult/mock/abuse new US President.Post Brexit, we've never needed America more.  
An unexpected Xmas present - Andrew Marr becomes a rational optimist on Brexit  
Plugging Britain into cross-border European security cooperation won't be so simple if we go ahead with #brexit : 
Six things that have happened in the six months since the Brexit vote  
Queen allegedly 'disappointed' after PM Theresa May 'refused to share Brexit strategy'  
Remainers say it's immigration and europhobie, but that belittles Brexit voters who really could see the big picture  
Senior #SNP politicians have been studying their leaders latest proposals for #Brexit.  
ICM poll marking 6 months since the referendum shows 54% of people want Brexit now. Get on with it Theresa! 
Delighted that my articles on Brexit and Trump are amongst @VersoBooks's most read of the year. Despondent that I had to write them. 
Bloomberg predicted Trump and Brexit in 2016. This is their Pessimist’s Guide to 2017, and it's full on   
Switzerland back in Horizon2020, but only after agreeing to extend EU free movement to Croatia. Brexit implications? 
Another poll suggests we get on with Brexit  
UK economy grows faster than expected in third quarter, no sign of #Brexit hit:  
According to this "Why Brexit won" article by BBC Home Editor, UK consists of only Eng & Wales.No Scotland.No NI. 
Express delivery is now the name of the game when it comes to Brexit says UKIP Leader @paulnuttallukip  
Our readers had a lot to say on Brexit this year. Here's a comment that made one of our most popular tweets of 2016:  
Voters identify as Leave or Remain, not with specific parties. Brexit changed politics and politicians must catch up 
Theresa May takes to Rocket League to thrash out complexities of post-Brexit economy  
From the blog - Why politicians must listen to people on low incomes @claire_ainsley  #Brexit #solveukpoverty 
UK had £20.9bn current account deficit with #EU in 2016Q3. Of course trade will continue after #Brexit.  
a negative precedent for Brexit talks - EU and Switzerland agree on free movement  
Why was the #UKIP nativity play cancelled?They couldn’t find three wise men #joke #dadjoke #brexit #brexitjoke 
ISIS supported Brexit because it knows nationalism and xenophobia work in its favour. UKIP is on the ISIS xmas card list 
Voters identify more with their Brexit position than political parties. Might this open up the north for the Tories?  
Our GDP growth during the third quarter has been revised up to 0.6%. So much for that Brexit apocalypse! 
I think this is unfair. Theresa May wasn't being secretive with The Queen about #Brexit plan, she just doesn't have one to share.  
Remoaners better start 2017 by investing in a lot of Kleenex. They are going to need it, as the post-Brexit boom continues.  
This week in #Brexit...  
Theresa May 'kept up her Brexit silence' at a meeting with the Queen   
Merry #Brexmas everyone! What do you want Santa to bring YOU?The PM would like a plan...#brexit  
What happened to the great #Brexit recession??Just askin'!UK third quarter GDP growth confirmed at 0.5% - BBC News  
1940: Fighting fascism 2016: Fighting for fascism Lest we forgot.#Brexit #Farage #Trump #AltRight #LePen 
UK GDP beats forecast in first quarter post-#BrexitGuess the end of UK economy isn't coming.Can we #Brexit now? 
SNP have press release out warning Brexit might put up the cost of Christmas pudding. Imagine reaction if No camp had said same about Indy. 
This is a really good piece from @andrewmarr9 - just the sort of thinking we need. An optimist's guide to Brexit  
@nytimes wrong on brexit, wrong on trump, wrong on Syria, wrong on IS threat. You people are an embarrassment to journalism 
December 23 marks precisely half a year on from our historic EU referendum. Brexit delays are just not good enough  
Still no Brexit slowdown: The ONS has revised up UK third quarter growth to 0.6%.  
UKIP Leader @paulnuttallukip:  Now we must fight to make sure the PM delivers Brexit  
Brexit Britain defies expectations as the economy grows by 0.6% in 3rd quarter, more than previously estimated  
If it's patronizing to show contempt for racists and bigots, then I'll gladly be patronizing!#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
All We Want for Christmas is the release of Sgt Blackman 
The Queen was left “disappointed” with Theresa May after she declined to share her Brexit plans  
BREAKING: Britain's current-account deficit widens, with GDP growth revised higher  
Finally! Theresa May's #Brexit plan!   
Just to be clear, I am only 80% in favour of EU BUT 100% against BREXIT and 120% against the self interest of those driving the BREXIT bus 
Without the votes of racists & bigots #Leave would have lost. The government is now pandering to exactly these people.#Remain #Brexit 
Very helpful - and objective - round-up of where we are with Brexit (including 'known unknowns') from @UKandEU.   
New precedent revealed that could help Brexit referendum be overturned  
Very encouraging to see Labour voices supporting plan by Scottish Government to protect Scotland from hard Tory #Brexit  
Don’t mention this around the Christmas table: Brexit, inequality and the demographic divide  
Visual responses to Brexit, Trump and Bowie feature in Dezeen's guide to 2016 in 10 graphics and illustrations:  
Get on with it! Majority of Britons want Brexit right now  
Recommend CBI report on Brexit - clearly written, based on extensive talks with affected businesses, makes it clear what a nightmare we face 
Nobody likes us and we don't care.Key conclusions from new report that says Britain heading for a 'Hard Brexit':  
Queen “disappointed” with Theresa May after PM 'declined to share' plan for Brexit saysTimes. More a case of 'doesn't have' a plan to share? 
CBI report on 'making a success' of Brexit, based on extensive consultation, just a list of v.significant concerns  
This is the incredibly sad reality of Trump, Tories and Brexit. People who are going to be worse off are convinced they'll be looked after.  
Britain's hospitality industry has asked the Government for more than 100,000 work permits post-Brexit  
.@BorisJohnson: 'I would like to ask Keir Starmer why he is seeking to frustrate the will of the people?' #Brexit  
May fails to reveal #Brexit plan to the Queen. Perhaps because she doesn't have one.  
HMQ "What does one mean by Brexit?" PM "Brexit, Ma'am, means Brexit"  no running commentary by May even for Queen. 
Brexit has left Labour staring into the abyss, argues @GoodwinMJ  
Sturgeon should tell Salmond to shut up and toe the line on Brexit. My column in @thetimes  today. 
Theresa May urged to get transitional Brexit deal for City  
May won't even tell her Brexit plan to the Queen. Her Majesty wouldn't appreciate the inevitable single market con! 
Bank of England holds interest rates and upgrades UK economy forecast. But but -- Brexit=Apocalypse now?   
Leave the EU ASAP: Brexit poll shows Britain wants out now. Politicians want to delay and fudge it.  
"The First Minister’s Brexit speech was not the number one item on that evening’s Reporting Scotland." 
Britain is "living on Fantasy Island" over its EU divorce demands, a group of experts have said #Brexit  
Whilst at university students pay 4.6% interest on their loans. This figure will rise substantially when Brexit pushes inflation up.  
Rootless liberalism will not survive for long. Brexit, Trump victory n the rising demand for protectionism across the world prove the same. 
Not only the Queen! A #Brexit plan which is good for Britain is an impossible task and May must know it.  
Twitter users overwhelmingly favour Brexit #SocialMediaTrends #Twitter #Brexit  
British car exports up by 17 percent. Half the BBC News Room attempt suicide. A spokesman said "since brexit the good news won't stop". 
Member when #brexit happened and we all thought they were the country that was so unbelievably messed up...?  
Brexit And The Jets  #2016ASong 
Funny how the Popular Vote doesnt matter to the Left in the UK #Brexit Vote but it somehow matters in the US Election Vote. Total Hypocrites 
Exactly, Brexit government appears to be slow to accept that Parliament should be fully engaged in scrutiny & debate, why?  
Today - 23rd of December - is exactly 6 months since Britain voted for Brexit. Here's a sneak glimpse of how the planning is coming along.  
The man who blocked Theresa May's Brexit JUST ANOTHER ONE OF THOSE LEFTIE TRAITORS IN BRITAIN TODAY 
Balmoral. Day."Tell me about Brexit""It means Brexit...it's red, white a-""Stop that""Britain's open for business!""You're fired". 
Congrats @BorisJohnson @michaelgove and @Nigel_Farage Your #Brexit has done this in 6 months. Better than Hitler  
I reckon it was shallow and dishonest to have been in favour of single market membership post Brexit, but not now. What changed?  
New post-Brexit landscape could squeeze Labour out, warns new report  
Theresa May, Baldrick of Brexit."I have a plan so cunning that no-one can be told. No, not even you, Your Majesty."  
So, RCN, BMA, STUC, SCVO, RSPB Scotland, Scottish Wildlife, WWF & FoE Scotland all commend ScotGov's Brexit paper.Unionists are in a spin. 
I voted to remain, given the choice again I would vote to remain. #brexit will be a disaster. Brexit must be stopped #dontbrexitfixit 
And another @thetimes #Brexit story with no attributed quotes #fakenews 
In #EUref we were told being in EU made us safer. Bloke in jail for arson in Italy, moves to Germany. Couldn't be deported etc...#Brexit 
Brexit means Brexit your Majesty by Peter Brookes - political cartoon gallery  
Friday's Times:"Queen's frustration with May over Brexit secrecy"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Could we make Brexit work by attracting all the firms that Trump drives away?  
According to the Times front page Theresa isn't giving a running BREXIT commentary to the Queen either  
Who are the most dangerous enemies of the populists? It is the thinkers and questioners who can challenge the facile lies.#Remain #Brexit 
I think its clear now that when the government & the right talk of the 'elite' they mean the educated, the thinkers, the questioners#Brexit 
#brexit was the best thing to happen to the UK in years. Look at Charles the fool. Check out @jihadwatchRS's Tweet: 
Brexit should lay to rest the once dominant idea that European integration is an irreversible process.  
Brexit bashers forced to admit UK economy is ‘on the up’ with fastest growth for a YEAR  
What Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won:  
When a government panders to the most bigoted members of society and insults the most educated something is very wrong.#Brexit #Remain 
Fresh from a not-so-secret lunch with George Osborne, Clegg has again tried to throw a wrench in the works of Brexit 
Visual responses to Brexit, Trump and Bowie feature in Dezeen's guide to 2016 in 10 graphics and illustrations:  
I got locked out on the coldest night of the year and met some Brexit-Trumpers. Here's what happened next:  
FIXIT? Now FINLAND faces calls to stage EU referendum after historic Brexit vote  
'Merry Christmas & happy Brexit'  
And that has now happened - the UK falls behind India & France, to become the 7th largest economy. Before the Brexit vote it was 5.  
Make my wish come true. #Christmas #Brexit #Europe #IWantYouBack 
We cannot control immigration because we are in the EU's Single Market #Brexit  
Theresa May's first 6 months:5+ Prison riotsNHS/social care crisisPoverty upHomelessness upNational debt upStrikesBrexit chaos 
Tomorrow will be six months since #Brexit vote. The UK Govt has done v little since & still has no strategy or plan.  
I strongly recommend you read this excellent post Brexit piece by @AndrewMarr9 
The EU is on the brink of collapse, as the UK holds strong. The #Brexit apocalypse has been deferred – for now  
Social care, public transport, child poverty, worker rights, Brexit. Govt in disarray... Forget all that, go push another anti-JC article  
Brexit = damage to tourismBrexit = damage to scienceBrexit = damage to NHSBrexit = the whole world now thinks we're idiots.  
Brexit Britain gets an end-of-year boost: Borrowing falls to its lowest level since 2008#BrexitBoom 
“The GMB will campaign against any individual or company that tries to use #Brexit as an attack on workers’ rights.”  
Sturgeon issues May with 3month Brexit ultimatum ahead of Article50 negotiations.Sturgeon is not holding full deck!  
The UK results seem to need some explaining. But the overall stats suggest the EU-27 have no need to let #Brexit unpick the four freedoms.  
“Trump… Brexit… 2016 sucks! Can it be 2017 yet?” Mate, 2016 was just the teaser trailer for 2017. 
2016: I fucked ‘em up. Killed off their heroes, let hatred run riot, Brexit, Trump. How you gonna beat that?2017:  
Dozens of companies manufacture cars here. If the EU erects trade barriers against us post-Brexit, we'll all just go out & buy UK-made cars. 
Blaenau Gwent's biggest growth industry since Brexit must be journalists asking locals why they voted Leave. 
Putin backs Assad whose brutality fosters extremism & terrorism which boosts the far right in Europe & so serves Mr Putin well.#Brexit 
Particularly excited at the point @AndrewMarr9 makes, that - if we only fight for it - we can have bespoke policies for wildlife post-Brexit 
#Brexit is happening, so can see no reason why Remain voters shouldn't pile in & think how to make the best of the opportunities it'll bring 
Invigorating piece by @AndrewMarr9 on how much more interesting & proactive British politics will be after #Brexit:  
The UK Government should have a fair immigration system that we control #Brexit  
Europe sees #Brexit is a terrible idea, a lose-lose all round, but mostly as our problem  (& NewYork will benefit!) 
The Kremlin seems to want to reward Farage for helping a Kremlin policy towards fruition.Who are the traitors!#Brexit #YesEU #Remain 
My final Scotland in Europe Update for 2016. The big news is the launch of the Scottish Government’s Brexit plan.  
Brexit Britain has a bright future. It's time for the Remainers to stop talking our economy down.  
Sooooo, @scotgov is getting the rubber ear on its Brexit plan from a Government that gives an honour guard to a cat  
London offices have designs on tech as Brexit puts brake on finance  
feeling brexit - When you make a decision you instantly regret. -  
Poll says that the public will not endorse brexit if it makes them worse off. Which it will.  
PM hiring pro EU,Lib Dem,pro-open border former special adviser to Vince CableIf PM means it when she says Brexit means Brexit,why do that?  
Extraordinary that the Minister for Brexit won his case against the UK Government at the European Court of Justice and is still in his place 
If there's a better #Brexit metaphor than unblocking a bog with a fucking Hoover, I want to hear it. @JamieHolePunch @MickTroy @jayrayner1 
Brexit supporters said we'd succeed as we were the fifth largest economy and could stand alone.We're now seventh. 
This means #Brexit could need to be agreed on by 75 national & region parliaments before it can split from EU  
Please tell me this year doesn't go Bowie Brexit Trump Allardyce 
We need to make this point - #Brexit might actually push up the level of net migration!#Remain #YesEU 
Will #Brexit cut net migration? More people with large families coming from the third world, fewer pensioners retiring to the Costas#Remain 
UK Tesla prices to increase 5 percent following Brexit ‘currency fluctuations’  
Lord knows the EU is a mess, but believing Brexit to be the liberal option requires you to ignore *literally everything*. 
2016 full time score: Newcastle United fans 2 (Pardew, Sissoko) - World 0 (Trump, Brexit).. 
But... Brexit means abandoning trade, treaties and the single market, and concentrating power in Westminster  
A bit 11th hour but delighted that @TheEconomist has (philosophically) embraced #Brexit --- h/t @aRichVision  
UK moves up 'best for business' list despite Brexit fears  
Not only does Elsie want to ignore the result of the Scottish referendum, she wants Theresa May to ignore the Brexit referendum result too.  
Don't tell the BBC or Ch4 they are already traumatised by BREXIT & Trump.They simply couldn't deal with another shock.  
Pleased to welcome @Feorlean to RSPB HQ to discuss #Brexit, rural policy implications & safeguards for  EU nationals  
For the Spanish government Brexit is not really (as many assume) about Gibraltar. Much, much more it's about Catalonia.  
Q1: Oil! Junk bonds!Q2: Deflation!Q3: Brexit!Q4: Election! Rate hike!always gonna be something :) 
Spain rejects Nicola Sturgeon Brexit plan for Scotland in seemingly fatal blow  via @telegraphnews 
Most people won't think 2016 was an awful year. They voted for Brexit and aren't losing sleep over Trump. 
The next 18 months will shape Britain's future - here's how Brexit could play out  
I wonder how many London Labour MPs are nervously looking at their majorities wondering if Corbyn's Brexit approach could wipe them out? 
One of the clearest analyses you'll read on Brexit - and it's by Jacek Rostowski, Poland’s Deputy PM from 2007-2013: 
Over 50% of voters felt Cameron's renegotiation did not go far enough. On that basis why would they be satisfied with soft EEA-style Brexit? 
Brexit Britain  
Good article - including our poll which shows Leave voters don't want to pay an economic price for Brexit  
2016 has been a year of hard populism without consequence. For all the drama, there is not yet a Brexit and not yet a President Trump. 
A typically readable piece in the @TheEconomist on where we stand as a country six months on from Brexit: 
Forget sore losers, one thing Trump and Brexit have done is introduce us to the concept of the sore winner.  
THE judges who have KEPT Al in prison are PART of the Liberal Elite that want to break BREXIT Be clear iis "THEM" against US?  
What a bloody awful stupid woman. Dumb means Dumberer #Brexit = #Brexsh1t =  
FIXIT? Now FINLAND faces calls to stage EU referendum after historic Brexit vote  
We got #Brexit, but at least Britain doesn’t have to put up with this ‘War on Christmas’ nonsense, says @MitchBenn 
Tesla raises U.K. prices after the Brexit vote  
WITHIN HOURS OF LOSING THE INDY REF THEY WERE PLOTTING TO HOLD ANOTHER - THIS HAS NOTHING TO DO WITH BREXIT 
It's nearly Christmas  and Brexit is proving to be the gift that keeps on giving: the gift of uncertainty, intolerance, racism and fear.  
What Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won, which I'm quite happy about. via @voxdotcom 
#TradeUnion Act 16: 40% of those entitled to vote must support #strike if "important public service"#Brexit: supported by 37.4%. #ukemplaw 
Humiliation for Sturgeon as Spain REJECTS 'soft' Brexit plan for Scotland within a DAY  
The British people voted to take back control of our laws, borders, money and trade - that means leaving the EU’s Single Market #Brexit 
Sampling variation means that if you run enough post-Brexit polls one will eventually find a pro-Remain maj even if nothing has changed  
In which I eat sushi with the enemy:  #brexit 
Father #Christmas says at the Brexit Christmas dinner there won't be any Brussels  
Post-Brexit nativity chaos as Joseph and Mary told to ‘fuck off back to Nazareth’  
The UK government is preparing for a Brexit worst-case scenario; so should British business. My latest.  
The EU had a chance to reform and declined to do so. We voted for Brexit to take back control of our laws, money and borders.  
'Shallow', 'dishonest', 'questionable' - Nicola Sturgeon's Brexit Paper dismantled:  
Why is our unelected PM so afraid of giving elected MPs a vote on #Brexit? A possible outbreak of democracy?  
The future of #FinTech: London will remain the capital of the financial services sector in Europe, despite Brexit  
OF COURSE THE REMAIN campaign should have their platform to complain & moan 'ad infinitum' as long as they don't thwart or sabotage BREXIT 
Suck it up snowflake you lost #Brexit #MAGA also Hitler was atheist and they're stealing Christmas 
The UK has moved up the list of the best countries in the world to do business - despite #Brexit. Happy Christmas!  
Spain has rejected Sturgeon's Single Market proposals, insisting that Scotland will not get a separate Brexit deal.  
Britain moved up to number 5 on Forbes list of best places to do business. Tell us again how Brexit ruined the UK? 
SNP lay out a 50-page plan for #brexit and it is attacked mercilessly.Tories HAVE NO PLAN, and the media still quote "Brexit means Brexit" 
New humiliation as Spain rejects Nicola Sturgeon's 'soft' Brexit plan for Scotland within a DAY of her proposal  
Nicola Sturgeon’s plans for a bespoke Scottish Brexit have suffered a setback after they were rejected by the...  
Italy's in a mess with Monte dei Paschi; Deutsche Bank's in trouble in Germany; France is depressed. Thank goodness the UK voted for Brexit! 
Many #Brexit'ers think the EU wants to rule us because being authoritarians they cannot understand cooperation & compromise for mutual gain 
Madness, has Brexit government any real idea what it is unleashing in terms of the unknown implications and true cost to the nation of exit?  
Marvellous by @mrjamesob on defining political disaster of our time - Brexit & a Remain campaign who wanted to lose   
Despite Brexit fears the British economy is ending the year on a high, as official borrowing hits new low. 
Spain rejects Sturgeon's proposals for a separate Scottish Brexit  
I'm tempted to write an article about Brexit and the increasing threat of Russia, if only to use the title "Brexit, pursued by a bear" 
Trying to appeal to both sides of Brexit debate is turning Labour into an irrelevance  
May confirms Brexit is now a religious cult  
As opposed, presumably, to the rich complexity and nuance offered by Theresa May's "let's have a red, white & blue" Brexit analysis.  
If all UK does #Brexit, then there will be no English speaking countries left in EU.Perhaps German will become Europe's language after all. 
Im terms of 2017, I am less worried about "The rise of the robots" and more concerned with the"Triumph of the Tw..ts" #Brexit #Trump #Putin 
There are only two options. Clean Brexit or no Brexit. Soft Brexit is never going to happen.  
Love the optimistic #Brexit reporting, same for UK Irish Border ...but mention independent Scotland oh becomes so difficult  :)) lol  
Brexit: After Sturgeon's first Brexit plans are mocked for being undoable, SNP unveil a new more realistic plan to keep Scotland in EU  
Killer comebacks to win every Christmas family argument – from Brexit to Bowie  
Dishonest. Shallow. @uniofedinburgh's Daniel Kenealy reviews Nicola's #Brexit paper... 
Iain Macwhirter: Dumb Brexit means 2016 will go down as the year the Union died  
This is BIG: CJEU #snooperscharter judgment not stopped by #Brexit—UK-EU tech trade deals must respect rights— #IPAct 
Given your #Brexit and latest leadership track records you are hardly qualified to pass a moral judgement @michaelgove @jayrayner1 #irony 
Sturgeon's soft Brexit plan labelled "complete madness" after 10-year delay emerges  
Steve Bell’s If ... for Brexit turkeys, chickens come home to roost  
Watch out... The long-predicted Brexit slump may be about to arrive  
Brexit is damaging UK science already. Here is a plan to fix it  
Migration fear is being overtaken by concerns over what Brexit means for everyday life. The biggest concern, money.  
The UK is now the 9th largest economy in the world, thanks to #brexit we are now no longer in the G8 ,still we have got our country back  
An uncomfortable reality. The better educated you are, the more likely you are to be against #Brexit. We're being led out by ignorance.  
Brexit bashers forced to admit UK economy is ‘on the up’ with fastest growth for a YEAR  
A cod war has erupted between England and Scotland over shares of fish stocks allocated in the run-up to Brexit.  
Not much different to attitudes seen in UK since Brexit vote made racism somehow more "acceptable"...  
#Brexit: Majority now want to remain in EU, Poll Finds -  
Excellent article on BREXIT by REMAIN acolyte Simon Nixon in Times. He may have underestimated prowess of David Davis & his 300 negotiators 
Mrs May @theresa_may wields the "will of the people" like the Sword of Damocles over the country. We are all at risk, all of us. No #Brexit 
Always remember, the *core* vote for Trump and Brexit wasn't the economic left-behind, but comfortably off old people with stupid beliefs:  
Oh dear, schoolgirl policy forming>>>> Sturgeon Brexit plan labelled "complete madness" after 10-year delay emerges  
The UK government defines itself to the UN as two countries but, when it comes to brexit, Scotland is just a region. #indyref2 #brexit  
It's not that surprising is it. As so far their does not seem to be any sort of economic brexit financial plan worth its name  
Staying in the single market should be at the heart of the Brexit plan, MPs say  
Brexit is going to be a disaster of epic proportions for the UK 
Meet NationBuilder, the mercenary software that powered Trump and Brexit  
Private Eye Reveals Theresa May's 10 point #Brexit plan  
The only way for Britain not to lose is not to Brexit. The Government lacks direction and is likely to split over any deal. #Remain 
This could reach a significant status if the Liberal Democrats join with other pro-EU MPs to form a genuine, credible, anti-Brexit alliance.  
Why technology could be 'the way forward' to control UK borders after #Brexit  
More dreadful Brexit news.  
'#EU project is DEAD' #NigelFarage blasts Eurocrats and predicts 'inevitable' break-up #Brexit  
This British diplomat's Brexit paper three years ago included many insights that are being proved correct  
Farmers on News@10 screaming foul about impact #Brexit will have on them. Is this yet another Leave-voting group seeking special treatment? 
Priceless. The Brexit Secretary just took Theresa May to the EU Court of Justice and won  
Inside Brexit: How Britain lost the European plot  
Government borrowing comes in higher than expected as Brexit 'shadow' looms | The IndependentHow we love Brexit  
.@RosieBarton And electoral reform a bigger blunder than Brexit. Are you guys drinking on air? 
Is Nippy devoid of the ability to recall? Norway buries SNP’s Brexit block bid and urges friendly deal with UK  
To be honest I thought I'd done with that pair when Sarah Vine blocked me over the whole exes scandal. perhaps he's bored post Brexit 
Do NOT read this if your Brexit glass is half emptyUK moves up 'best for business' list despite Brexit fears  
Just back from filming an interview in the Parliament so we can give you the informed view of @scotgov's #brexit strategy. Watch this space. 
After what happened to @DeloitteUK I hope businesses rethink their contacts with @RolandRudd and anti Brexit lobbyists 
Good to see @DeloitteUK pay a very high price for foolish anti Brexit antics. consultancies/lobbyists beware  
Biased @BBCNews always focuses on businesses' worries about #Brexit rather than the huge opportunities from deregulation and freer trade. 
Deloitte is now in the process of accounting for something entirely different: The cost of its leaked Brexit memo.  
Merry Brexit. (Me for @thetimes tomorrow) 
If Brexit happens us remainers won't be happy (obvs.) but neither will a large proportion of leavers when the terms of the deal are settled. 
Imagine after Brexit. Strikes banned, no sick pay, reduced hols, more zero hour contracts, more foodbanks and sanctions, no nhs.  
Graeme Reid: Scientists need to wake up to the opportunities of Brexit  
Britain can Brexit in 2 years if politicians adopt can-do attitudeStop whinging! Let's unite & make this work!  
The UK is going to be moving up 'best for business' list because of #Brexit  
'Grossly inconvenient for the UK' EU nations will have a say in #Brexit trade deals. Simple answer: #Remain 
New independence vote ‘within 2yrs’ if Scots’ #Brexit demands dismissed – Alex Salmond to RT (VIDEO)  
Mayhem’s Brexit Problem seems likely UK will continue to stagger from failure to failure at an accelerating pace 
Euratom -clear example of Brexit realities: not EU treaty, but enforced by Commission, disputes settled by ECJ. Does Brexit mean leaving? 
Theresa May said she'd give careful consideration to #Brexit suggestions but then dismissed Scotland's out of hand within 3 hours. #politics 
Explaining 2016 to kids: Brexit, Trump & etc.  
Brexit has highlighted the fact that the rest of UK is democratically disadvantaged by England's sizeTime to dismantle it  
SHOW this video to anyone in the remain campaign now arguing to stay in the single market #Brexit  
Today's toon: Democracy Since we're renaming things as we see fit, what else can we call "democracy"?#MPsNotVoting #Brexit #Brexitshambles 
Brexit Minister David Davis uses the European Courts to over-rule UK Sovereignty. 2016 people, 2016..... 
Just got my tax statement, look at that tiny EU contribution I could save & we only need to destroy the whole economy to do it #Brexit  
Patrick Minford: Our best Brexit option is free trade around the world  
Can’t Vote:         18,604,470Voted Leave:     17,410,742Voted Remain:  16,141,241Didn’t Vote:       12,949,258NO MANDATE for BREXIT 
Got my first post-truth Brexit Christmas card.  
Germany exports more cars to the UK than it does to any other country. German car manufacturers won't want post-Brexit tariffs! pic.twitter.com/GAwb5J8NiQ 
Mandelson says Europe willing to look at future of free movement and urges UK to revise Brexit negotiating strategy.  
More well-off white people with nostalgia for national greatness voted Brexit or Trump than did the media sterotype of poor "left behinds" 
Best definition of Brexit by a country mile......  
I'm willing to quit the EU without a deal, says defiant May, and she won't promise MPs a vote on exit #Brexit 
FIXIT? Now FINLAND faces calls to stage EU referendum after historic Brexit vote  
If you want to stop a costly #brexit , join the European Movement @euromove : 
Tom Harris in the Telegraph: Nicola Sturgeon thinks Brexit is her big chance for independence. Instead, it may be...  
6 months & Westminster still doesn't have a Brexit plan, yet they mange to reject SNP Brexit plan in 4 hours.Wm not fit to run a bath 
#BREXIT increased support for membership of the #European Union by 5% a new study by @bertelsmann shows (now at 62% across Europe). #tofedeu 
Brexit is so self-evidently ludicrous that it's starting to punctuate my day with short bursts of hilarity  
UK moves up 'best for business' list despite Brexit fears  
Britain will have the STRONGEST hand in Brexit negotiations as EU is 'starting to CRUMBLE'  
The British people voted to take back control of our laws, borders, money and trade - that means leaving the EU’s Single Market #Brexit 
Yesterday the Scottish Government launched it's plan for #Brexit. Here's the reaction.  
Featuring responses to the US election and #Brexit, Dezeen's guide to 2016 in 10 graphics and illustrations:  
Roger Scruton's post-Brexit piece "Who are we?" was one of our most read pieces this year:  
The only thing the Tories are going 'to grant' Scotland is the UKIP designed hard Brexit that is in the post for the whole UK. 
Brexit and Trump mark the end of Anglo-American leadership of the global economy, writes @RobinNiblett  
BloggedEU future trade policy takes shapeMy comments on the EU/Singapore opinion, and its implications for Brexit:  
So Ruth Davidson went from saying Brexit would cause job losses & was based on lies to suddenly saying it's the only sensible thing to do  
Trends in UK #startups in 2017: #AI #Brexit and #bots  #techUK 
I am so disgusted with British judges if they aren't stopping criminals being deported, or trying to wreck Brexit jailing UK soldiers. 
#TheresaMay claims "God & Her Faith Guide Her Brexit Decisions" Would the #Christian Community agree she's right?  
Brexit won't cost London its finance and legal sectors, professionals say  
Sign the petition, let's get to 50K. Don't cut a single workers' right when making new UK laws post #Brexit  
Just spent £120 to get to and from my sister's on Christmas. That's $140. Wait, $120. $100. $75...? DAMNIT, BREXIT, IT'S HAPPENING AGAIN. 
exactly - saying the PM is not very bright has no policies and no Brexit plan & just utters mindless platitudes is entirely gender neutral  
2017 likely to be marked by nationalist #Brextremists apportioning blame for the mess of #Brexit to anyone/thing other than #Brexit itself. 
political correctness gone mad. you can't even commit war crimes these days without getting away with it. #BREXIT 
EU's highest court delivers blow to UK snooper's charter#Brexit means Queen Tess can SNOOP on  you with IMPUNITY  
 The world is watching: here's just some of the international reaction to the @scotgov's #Brexit plan.  
.@NicolaSturgeon on @scotgov proposals to protect Scotland's eu interests: 'Scotland's Place in Europe' #Brexit  
Theresa May delusional on her powers. Parliament will rule on a 2nd Brexit vote, not her. 2nd thoughts always better than first ones 
BREXIT SPIRIT: ‘Six Months On’ Poll Reveals Britain Would STILL Vote To Leave #Brexit #TruePundit 
Britain’s headed for Brexit, but our beer is going continental, say @thinkingdrinks  #12DrinksOfChristmas 
Europe’s highest court declares UK ‘snooper charter’ illegal  #StopBrexit #Brexit #BrexitIsBadForYou 
Theresa May busy finalising Brexit timetable as Winter Solstice gives her longest working day without direct sunlight. 
"SPEAK UP""Quiet, Mum""Well, I can't hear a thing.""What was that?""I think it was 'Brexit means Brexit'"  
Nicola Sturgeon's plan for Brexit was more an exercise in wishful thinking, says @alexmassie 
First time in 150 years, India's economy surpasses that of United Kingdom - Brexit preparation is going so well  
#Norway (outside EU) has just appointed Frank @BakkeJensen (right) as Minister for EU Affairs; many say looks like Brexit's @Nigel_Farage 
In which I say that an ECJ opinion means Wallonia is now a dagger pointed at the heart of Brexit London. (Sort of.)  
In Britain, half of Leave voters are not prepared to be worse off as a result of Brexit  
What Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won  via @voxdotcom 
Government borrowing comes in higher than expected as Brexit 'shadow' looms  
Informative meeting w/ EU Chief Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier in Vilnius: joint forces for common goal. Lithuania trusts his capable team 
We asked our photographers to pick their personal photos of the year. From Brexit to Bonfire Night, here's what they chose and why...  
That's Brexit for you  
 “Monty Python and the Holy Brexit" 
The Tory Brexit Minister beating the Tory Brexit PM in the European Court shows exactly how dysfunctional/fucked this government truly is 
Britain-bound migrants go on HUNGER STRIKE after UK officials reject their asylum claims 
Post-Brexit UK will need to figure out how to maintain or copy the work of 34 European regulators  
Spurred by Brexit, Ireland could issue 10% more passports in 2016 compared to last year  
No they shouldn't.@UKLabour supports Brexit. People of Copeland deserve choice to vote against Brexit  
Perfect opportunity for LibDems to take their anti-Brexit resurgent message nationwide. It's Farron country up there.... 
The terrifying impulse of ordinary people to Get In Line after Trump, Brexit, etc. Fighting that will be our 2017. 
When you realise that the Secretary of State for Brexit just used the European Court of Justice to defeat a decision made by the British PM  
BREAKING: After 'carefully considering' Sturgeon's proposal, Theresa May announces #Brexit will now be "Red, White and definitely no Blue". 
The Brexit Secretary just took Theresa May to the EU Court of Justice and won  CURIOUS IRONY - BREXIT MINISTER & ECJ 
Theresa May "We will have a red white and blue brexit"Nicola Sturgeon "Blue? We will be taking the blue with us"#Brexit = #indyref2 
Traders increasingly believe the pound is going to keep falling  
What are the implications of the Watson judgment for law enforcement, privacy, #IPAct, #Brexit? My reaction:  
I love how Theresa May has lost the #snooperscharter case in the ECJ against her own Brexit minister David Davis. This Govt is a shambles. 
Welcome to the brave new world of Trumpety-Brexit-Fascism, where you can get kicked off a plane if white folks feel "uncomfortable" with you  
Britain isn't a land of tea & crumpets but a penguin & money laundering empire. Brexit makes that clearer than ever.  
In many ways the EU is better at protecting an indivduals freedoms than a tory gov't which sadly #brexit will prove. 
Brilliant column by @MatthewdAncona: Brexit may be difficult but May is strong  
The real story behind Brexit  
If Westminster won't negotiate to find compromise on brexit then how can UK be described as 'partnership of equals’? @NicolaSturgeon 
Brexit politicians keep saying this but UK businesses keep saying better to keep harmonised regulations. What's going on? Political ideology  
TOMORROW'S BREXIT WORLDThe Costa del Thames is an alternative for those not wishing to complete 300 pages of paperwork for 1 week in Corfu.  
Appalling. Many continental EU citizens live & pay taxes in UK, are directly affected by Brexit, but have no vote. 
“Brexit means we can forge a new role for the UK globally”, @DavidJonesMP says during visit to Liverpool’s @PeelPorts 
'The news is not going to get better' -  @D_Blanchflower and @asentance debate Brexit watch data  
Leave voter on #BBCQT: 'Throughout the whole referendum...we were told that leaving the EU means leaving the single market.' #Brexit  
Tories (Jul) Brexit means Brexit.Tories (Dec) Brexit means Brexit.Scotland (Dec) Here's a plan.Tories (Dec) Rubbish. Brexit means Brexit. 
Nice ironic end to 2016. ECJ upholds British civil liberties in case originally brought by David Davis, Brexit sec   
Schrödinger's Brexit is a paradox where the Brexit is both alive and dead in a box once Article 50 is triggered; 'it's dead,' say the 48%.  
Thank God Brexit minister @DavidDavisMP had a European court to fall back on to help him defeat the snoopers charter. #awkward 
When the Sec of State for Brexit uses the European Court of Justice to block the govt & the IPBill, satire may as well just hang itself. 
The strangest thing happened to me last night. I was locked out of the house for three hours and ended up having tea with Trump/Brexit ppl. 
Angela Merkel is taking a tough stance on trade to rule out Brexit "cherry-picking"  
Families divided by Brexit: ‘Part of me just wants to avoid my dad completely now’  
Brexit cost set to dwarf NHS budget  #Brexit #NHS 
Brexit economy: inflation surge shows impact of vote finally beginning to bite  
Scotland Whisky Makers Cheer Brexit Boon  
Where are the loud-mouthed toads who were going to leave Britain if we voted for brexit. The country is longingly waiting for your departure 
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory on why a hard, destructive #Brexit including WTO tariffs would be damaging for UK businesses and British families.  
ECJ slaps down UK surveillance rules after case brought by a certain backbench MP before he became...Brexit Minister  
Very thoughtful meeting with senior members of Scottish Polish community - great concern about impact of #Brexit  
ECJ again protects Britons against their own govt. Same w recent sea-pollution case. Tories hate it, hence Brexit  
How about this for a "transitional" deal: let's ignore Brexit altogether until it makes more sense.  
Outstanding factual take-down of May's non-existent #brexit plan - Jacek Rostowski, Poland ex-Deputy PM  - worth a RT 
#5Things-European bank woes-Blackstone shuts fund-Oil rises-Markets slip-Brexit plans 
Fascinating to read this from Labour's 1983 Manifesto. Labour then had much more of a plan for #brexit than May today  
Theresa May hints there will now be no vote on final Brexit deal, in move designed to restore flagging Alt-right erections. 
Isn't it just plain as day that the entire #Brexit fiasco should stop? What's wrong with May etc that they can't or won't see it? Weird! 
Andrew Tickell: Ruth Davidson’s true colours show with shapeshifting and silence over Brexit  
In January we are holding our 1st evidence session on the impact of Brexit on HE in Oxford. Find out more & sign up:  
Good for you Theresa. She gets it, she might be almost alone in Government in wanting a proper Brexit but she'll get the job done. Imo  
The game's up, Brexiters. You know #brexit would be a disaster for the UK. And we know you know. Time to come clean with the country. 
WELL DONE BREXIT WANKERS  
#SNP the first party in UK with a plan on Brexit! (& the only party likely to have a plan!) @Scotland_future @theSNP 
If UK Gov serious about giving Scot Gov's  Brexit proposals "serious consideration" they might have waited more than 4 hours to diss them. 
Wonderful irony: European Court of Justice rules against government on Snooper's Charter - case brought by Brexit Secretary David Davis. 
UK will be out of the G8 industrialised nations thanks to Brexit 6 months ago, UK was 5th now it's dropped to 7th / 
So the EU has potentially saved us from the  #snooperscharter and the Brexit MP was the one that took it to the EU court. *stifles a laugh* 
Well, this is awkward.The Brexit Secretary just took Theresa May to an EU Court and won. 
Setting a few things right about what we lose, in terms of influence, once/if Brexit happens - recommended read:  
6 months on from #Brexit & Brits would still vote to leave the EU. Would you still vote the same as you did on June 23rd?  
Rumours R that Osborne + Clegg might join forces to prevent a hard #Brexit.Sad to see Yesterday's men trying to claw back their lost power 
An overlooked aspect of the Decision: how much it's based on decisions of Human Rights Court. Decisions that continue to apply post Brexit.  
Theresa May’s answers yesterday made her “Red, White and Blue Brexit” comments look staggeringly informative.  
In today's ironic news... The EU intervenes in British law, at the request of Brexit secretary David Davis... 
Statements like this suggest Brexit has never been about expanding trade, really. After all, if u buck regs for products, you can't sell em  
Remember, Sturgeon's 'Brexit Plan' was brought to you by the same people who thought 'The White Paper' was well written 
#Brexit Sec. #DavidDavis wins at.... #ECJ.The US can be rid of #Trump in 4 yrs#Brexitshambles... will last forever 
With Russia suspected of influencing outcome of EU referendum, is this Theresa May's red, white & blue Brexit?  
Sadly not. EU countries view the UK differently since Brexit. It's now seen as arrogant, xenophobic and stupid. Pretty much like yourself.  
If May's Govt intends Brexit to remove fundamental rights, we are entitled to know now. Govt cannot hide behind "no running commentary".  
Awkward! The minister for Brexit convinces an EU court that his boss's Snoopers Charter is illegal  
Families divided by Brexit: ‘Part of me just wants to avoid my dad completely now’  
It's not just Brexit or Trump, reactionary populism is popping up everywhere, even against an admired & holy pope  
That case where the now Brexit Secretary tried to use EU law to set aside an Act of Parliament introduced by the Home Sec (now his PM)  
What a time to be alive. The Sec of State for Brexit just used the European Court of Justice to bring legal action against the PM.  
The PM's absence of a Brexit plan becomes clearer every day.  
Brexit Secretary wins case against own government thanks to EU's highest court. Hardly raises an eyebrow for 2016.   
2016 for you: David Davis, now the Brexit Secretary of State, wins legal action against PM, using European court.  
So the EU27, half of whom are financial minnows, will play "hard ball" with the UK over #Brexit? Total nonsense. They will beg us for a deal 
#Brexit referendum has boosted EU’s popularity in Europe. Interesting survey, @BertelsmannSt More information here:  
David Davis of course quietly withdrew from this after becoming #Brexit SoS. But love that he was prepared to use the #ECJ to overrule govt 
Andrew Tickell: Ruth Davidson’s true colours show with shapeshifting and silence over Brexit  
Leave say they're gonna riot if Brexit doesn't happen. They're mainly old people & lard arses. Remain are young & super fit professionals. 
Brexit minister David Davis? Using the ECJ? 
High-profile British Europhile who Sturgeon enticed onto her anti-Brexit c'ttee, calls her plans nonsense on stilts. 
If Brexit means liberation, why does it feel so dull and joyless?  
Saddened to read the Daily Mail's annual report showing worries about a drop in profits. They're blaming Brexit. Seriously. 
In Crisis: NHS, Schools, Prisons, Social Care, Brexit 'plans', Homelessness...Not in Crisis: The 1%.  
NEWS! Post-Brexit nativity chaos as Joseph and Mary told to ‘fuck off back to Nazareth’  pic.twitter.com/k2bUvobH7z 
Don’t mention this around the Christmas table: Brexit, inequality and the demographic divide  via @LSEEuroppblog 
#Brexit is based on a fearful, selfish, xenophobic and inward-looking mindsetIt can't ever be other than dismal  
A company dared to say Theresa May has no Brexit plan. Now they're losing out on millions of government contracts.  
Smart piece from Poland’s Deputy Prime Minister on May’s Brexit problem. Predicts May will be out by May.  
That awkward moment when you realise the SNP & the Lib Dems are the only opposition to this Brexit madness #BrexitShambles 
There should be one subject of conversation about #Brexit: stopping it. Not 'hard' or 'soft' or 'single market' etc: just stopping it. 
It's miserable but @rafaelbehr hits the note: The dismal project of Brexit is without art, poetry or cultural depth.  
Exciting opportunity to join @libertyhq - EU specialist to lead our vital Brexit & human rights project. Please RT  
If you think 2016 was bad, see Bloomberg's Pessimists' Guide to 2017. Its 2016 guide predicted Trump's win & Brexit  
UK-5th largest economy pre #Brexit. Now fallen to 7th in 6 Brexit months. Wonder where more important GDP capita is? 
Brexit 6 months on - full contents. You can download from @UKandEU website on Friday. Our Xmas present to you! ;-) 
Jim Mellon talking to Sarah Montague re BREXIT Brilliant! He's right! BREXIT may be be side show in comparison to possible collapse of EU! 
My brother & I have been touring the Brexit towns for last few decades - @PeterKGeoghegan has it exactly right:  
After #Brexit India's economy overtakes its former colonial master Britain's for the first time in 150 years  
So what are you going to do about it @Keir_Starmer? Perhaps it's time to review @UKLabour pro #Brexit strategy?  
U.K. prime minister backs transition period to adjust to Brexit  
Last column of the year. Nationalism, patriotism, Milton, Stilton, Brexit and Wood.  
'A stranger in my home town': why Brexit drove Andy Martin out of Sunderland  
If Brexit means liberation, why does it feel so dull and joyless? | Rafael Behr  
Coverage across Europe for @scotgov #Brexit #singlemarket proposals. 
What exactly is 'Soft Brexit'? Apart from having no MEPs what exactly would we LEAVE? What would change? NOTHING.SOFT BREXIT = REMAIN! 
Excellent to see support from across the political parties for Scottish Government plan to protect Scotland's place in Europe #Brexit  
European media reports Scottish Govt plan to protect Scotland's place in Europe #Brexit @Le_Figaro @DiePressecom @LaVanguardia @IrishTimes 
UK DOWN to 7th economy behind India under this awful BLU-KIP  Brexit regime  
Funny when the ppl who most want me to shut up about #Brexit are friends who voted Leave & are now embarrassed. "There's nothing we can do" 
Leaked Brexit memo: Whitehall struggling to cope and no single plan  
Harris tweed enjoys ‘strong year’ despite #Brexit upheaval 
Extraordinary. Government taking Brexit straight out of Michael Foot's playbook from 1983 election!  
CNN: British voters would repeat their decision to leave the EU if the "Brexit" referendum were held today, according to new CNN/ComRes poll 
Deloitte apologises for Brexit memo in effort to make peace with No 10  
Andrew Tickell: Ruth Davidson’s true colours show with shapeshifting and silence over Brexit  #PoliticsScotland 
Brexit deal should encompass 'whole economy' approach - CBI  
Argument 1: Brexit shows the dangers of direct democracy.Argument 2: Electoral college needs to be abolished in favor of direct democracy. 
The overpriced Daily Express is delighted Parliament will have no say in #Brexit. They also hate the judiciary. British values? #Remain 
If Brexit means liberation, why does it feel so dull and joyless? | Rafael Behr  
Brexit in two words: "It's messy"  
UK Tory PM rejects Scotland's paper on Brexit within three hours - So much for promise careful consideration  
Brexit of Champions  
When Brexit and a Trump presidency happen in the same year  
Japan has emerged as Asia’s most aggressive buyer of British companies since the Brexit vote  
I see there's an apostrophe crime in the @scotgov's Brexit paper...  
Brexit: Leading Banks set to pull out of UK early next year  
SNP Brexit proposals have exposed the unionists in Holyrood/BBC/MSM for the Londoncentric guided shills that they are. 
Brexit deal risks some sectors of economy being left behind, warns CBI  
#BREXIT #EU Dominic Raab:“Anyone who thought we’d be crawling back to Brussels with a begging bowl can think again.” 
BREXIT hit to UK economy clearly evident in reduced electricity demand say researchers at London School of Economics: 
Japan Inc on the hunt for post-Brexit deals  
May rejects Sturgeon's differentiated Brexit option for Scotland within three hours of its publication  
UK companies need to keep "barrier-free" access to European markets after Brexit, the CBI warns.  
#BoomBust: Scotland outlines plan to stay in #EU despite #Brexit [VIDEO]  @AmeeraDavid 
Deloitte agrees not to bid for Government contracts after leaked Brexit memo row   
How ironic: Brexit-fuelled drop in the pound leads to foreign purchase of company that prints five pound notes. Genius.  
What Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won  via @voxdotcom 
-"Brexit vote caused a schism but HERE it laid bare the lingering sectarian divide"#NorthernIreland 
@NicolaSturgeon has a plan, unlike UK government. It is a compromise, of course, but one all should embrace #brexit  
Absolutely brilliant article. Must-read!Theresa May’s Brexit Problem  
Government must be careful to consider all sectors in Brexit talks  
Theresa May refuses to guarantee MPs will get a vote on the final #Brexit deal thrashed out with the 27 EU leaders  
Trump, Brexit and this year's other top stories, in graphics  
Those disaffected people that voted for Brexit because life could not get worse, wait a while.... 
World Order: Brexit, Populism, and my Kissinger biography. A new Conversation with History, just out:  
Czech Republic: Scotland overtakes London with a Brexit plan..... 
Obvious that Brexit terms will be decided by politics of the other EU countriesMay and her ministers have no grasp of this God help us all 
DAILY EXPRESS FRONT PAGE: 'Why MPs won't be able to block Brexit' #skypapers 
#China,#UK reaffirm commitment,confidence in "golden era" for bilateral ties amid #brexit uncertainty  
The US can fix its catastrophe after  4 years.#Brexit  
Bulgarian media covers plan for Scotland to remain in single European market #Brexit #Шотландия #Европа 
Polish TV reports on Scottish Government plan to protect Scotland's place in Europe @TVN24BiS #Brexit #Szkocja #EU 
Half of UK employers think Brexit is going to ruin the economy  
"Tartan Brexit"? Bloody hell, @BBCNews do we really neeed to put a funny old kilt on this story? 
And again: Parliament *will* have a vote on the Brexit deal under the 2010 Constitutional Reform and Governance Act  
Influential EU info site @Euractiv reports on Scottish plans to protect place in Europe #Brexit #Europe 
It's so sad when you get people who are a VERY long way from winning saying "We won Brexit get over it!" EVERYBODY BUT TRUMP & PUTIN LOST 
Seems weird that Deloitte should be punished by Theresa May for writing advice to clients about reality of Brexit.   
#Brexit negotiations haven't even started and already "India Overtakes Britain as the World’s Sixth Largest Economy"  
After a few hours S/BBC replace ScotGov hugely important Brexit proposals with an extradition story. Pathetic but predictable. #BBCbias 
Scotland has a plan and is showing leadership: The challenge now rests with Theresa May and UK Government. #Brexit  
May: I gave the answer I gave. Brexit means Brexit.Will of the people.Meaningless soundbites are not a replacement for accountability. 
Swiss media covers Scottish plan to stay in single market @SRF #Brexit #Schottland #EU #EFTA 
New York Times, RAI, Le Monde, Suddeutsche Zeitung, former Swedish PM Carl Bildt etc approve of SNP Brexit paper.Unionists howl with rage. 
The Union is supposed to be a practical arrangement, allegedly a marriage, not an altar on which #Scotland is sacrificed. #Brexit #History 
Compare Keir Starmer's positive vision for Brexit with the #IndyRef2 threats we get from the SNP. 
I can't find anything in ScotGov Brexit Plan to disagree with and hope all parties will get behind it. Even Ruth Davidson in previous mode ! 
Law Society of Scotland - statement on the Scottish Government paper Scotland's place in Europe#brexit 
Ruth Lea: Under Theresa May, Brexit Britain will clearly be leaving both the Single Market and the Customs Union 
Nicola Sturgeon HUMILIATED after Theresa May dismisses shameless 'Scottish Brexit' plan  
After a burst of post-#Brexit arrogance and euphoria, #May is staggering from failure to failure, says @janrostowski 
Theresa May's Brexit nihilism:I will do such things,What they are, yet I know not: but they shall beThe terrors of the earth.Lear 2,4 
Theresa May indicates MPs will not be given vote on final Brexit deal  You can only call that contempt for democracy 
"They call themselves 'the bad boys of Brexit', Beryl, and that excites men of my age." @HealeyCartoons 
Offshore secrets of Brexit backer Arron Banks revealed in Panama Papers  
Brexit news - fishing boss says Britain does not need to stay in EU single market | UK | News | Daily Express  
As per usual @Channel4News gave a much more balanced report of Nicola Sturgeon's #brexit proposals than @BBCScotlandNews. 
OK men here is the #brexit plan, we leave the EU then we pay them money for access to the single market, while excepting migrants #votetory 
Theresa May says a Brexit deal could be completed as early as September 2018  
Brexit could help us make the NHS safer, because of tighter rules on language tests and medical devices  
Theresa May refuses to guarantee MPs will get a vote on the final #Brexit deal thrashed out with the 27 EU leaders  
It's time to stop being so negative, Brexit offers lots of opportunities for scientists! 
After a period of relative stability, #Brexit is pushing Britain another step down in its long descent from imperial glory.#Remain #YesEU 
When migrants at the coalface of post-Brexit UK tell you we see a huge different in how we're treated, maybe listen rather than dismiss. 
#Brexit is it just me or is #EU membership a no-brainer? Wasting so much time & energy only to go backwards? eh, the bigots will be happy 
That's Brexit!  
Tyrie: “I was surprised Prime Minister was unable to confirm that she would expect Parliament to have a vote on the Brexit agreements" 
interesting: Beijing press claiming that China is "nervous" about what Brexit means for Chinese companies  
6 months ago UK was the world's 5th largest economy. Now it's 7th and shrinking fast. Well done Brexit "patriots"  
David Mundell -"I will look at Scot Gov brexit proposals closely"....................Awwww That's awfy nice of ye we're so grateful????  
Nicola #Sturgeon HUMILIATED after Theresa #May dismisses shameless 'Scottish #Brexit' plan  
Nicola Sturgeon reveals Brexit 'plan'. It's independence. 
#Brexit: The flight of capital has begun.   
Fuck it. No more outrage. No more angry. No more engaging with dog-pumping Brexit/Trump trolls. Just kindness and laughs and decent people  
Interesting initial feedback on 'Scotland's Place in Europe' collated here:  #ScotEU #Brexit  
Left to labour,Tory,lib dem Scotland would have no voice in Brexit negotiations.Just as well we have SNP fighting our corner.#Indyref2 
first Brexit, then the US, then Italy, now France, Germany and The Netherlands 
Sturgeon,thick make up,false eyelashes hiding behind a facade of falseness tells us how we brexit. Her hearts not in it. It's all a ruse.... 
Probably the biggest Brexit change at the Treasury is Xmas cards sent out by Chancellor and Chief Secretary are now the cutest!  
Theresa May: We’re drawing up plans for no Brexit deal  
Scotland's attitude to the UK's Brexit vote.  
In other news, @scotgov published their plans to deal with #Brexit today  "Scotland's Place in Europe" #ScotEU 
NOT OK. RT if you agree (so don't leave me hanging). May indicates MPs will not get vote on final #Brexit deal   
Share with everyone gloating about India surpassing UK'S GDP. Also, that's happened due to BREXIT, not #Demonetisation ! Moron! @Sarjupatra 
May plans to sink the UK"Theresa May REFUSES to guarantee MPs will get a vote on final Brexit plan" 
Theresa May risks Parliament fury after refusing to commit to giving MPs Brexit vote  
Who gets a vote on the final Brexit deal? The British people? No.Parliament? No.One person. One vote. And that person is Theresa May.  
Why should Nigel apologise to Brendon Cox a member of 'Hope not Hate' an organisation that bullied & threatened him during Brexit campaign. 
Nothing like exploiting Brexit to try & justify a 2nd indy ref, a UK market is worth 4x that of an EU's to Scotland & they'd be outside both  
Today @NicolaSturgeon published 'Scotland's Place in Europe' - the first plan anywhere in UK for dealing with #Brexit.  
“I was surprised that the PM was unable to confirm she would expect Parliament to have a vote on the Brexit agreements" - Andrew Tyrie. 
#TheresaMay indicates MPs, unlike MEPs, will not be given vote on final #Brexit deal! However bad, no choice!!  
Scotland wants to remain in the European Union reports Der Spiegel @SPIEGELONLINE #Brexit #Schottland #Europa 
So much for Great British Parliamentary Sovereignty?MEPs will vote on final Brexit deal.But British MPs may not 
NEWS: Flexibility of EU law would allow special deal for Scotland says legal expert#Brexit #Indyref2 
If UK can conclude a post-Brexit trade deal with US next yr, that cld help with EU Brexit negotiations since UK might be entry pt to US mkt. 
If Brexit isn't a problem, answer this: What happens if UK ends EU freedom of movement, and EU takes away UK's financial services passports?  
They have the audacity to share this on the day Scotland has published a plan to deal with the aftermath of the Tory-led #Brexit.  
Who says Labour is irrelevant to Brexit? 1983 Labour is very relevant!  
Polish media: Scotland wants access to the EU market and have more rights @rzeczpospolita #Brexit #Szkotcja #Europa 
Good to see support from across such a broad spectrum for the constructive approach of @scotgov to #Brexit problems 1/2  
"Brexit means Brexit" and "Red, white and Blue Brexit" from Mayhem may be the most fatuous dumb comments of the year 
What Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won  
Leaked email says @Virgin boss is helping to fund Tony Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
Why can't the PM commit to MPs voting on the final Brexit deal when David Davis has said that it would be "inconceivable" for them not to? 
Theresa May refuses to guarantee MPs will get a vote on final Brexit plan  
So much for sovereignty. Ridiculous that MEP's in Brussels will be able to vote on Brexit if our Parliament can not.  
Publication of Scottish Government plan on Europe reported in the Netherlands @telegraaf #Brexit #schotland #Europa 
IMF Chief and leading Brexit doomsayer Christine Lagarde is convicted of negligence. What goes around comes around. 
And he successfully straddled the line between old-style Eurosceptic and cosmopolitan pro-EU strains in the party. Brexit strengthened him. 
Scottish Government initiative to protect Scotland's place in Europe reported widely in France @le_Parisien #Brexit #Ecosse #l'Europe 
Theresa May indicates MPs will not be given vote on final Brexit deal  
So much for sovereignty! PM wants to deny MPs a vote on final Brexit deal while MEPs guaranteed a vote. Not acceptable.  
Protecting Scotland's place in Europe is reported to 1.1m followers of Sueddeutsche Zeitung @SZ #Brexit #Schottland #Europa 
Lots of unanswered questions from PM on Brexit & immigration today- wdnt even commit to spelling out immigration objectives in February plan  
Newsflash for @IanDuncanMEP his PM has just told WM liaison committee that she can't say when she will publish her #Brexit plan!  
.@NicolaSturgeon tackles @RuthDavidsonMSP's duplicity and defeatism on #Brexit. Has the 'roaring lion' become a 'meek mouse'?  
The 201 paras of the Scottish Government's proposals is - by a distance - the most substantial official Brexit related publication to date. 
Nicola sturgeon seeking consensus on brexit by denouncing everyone else for not getting 'behind Scotland 'i.e.' Nicola sturgeon.#ironybypass 
Scotland unveils plan to stay in EU single market after Brexit, but preferred option is independent state within EU  
.@theresa_may continues to be pressed on whether Parliament will vote on final #Brexit deal following negotiations  
Polish members of the European Parliament will get to vote on Brexit. Welsh members of Westminster Parliament will not. #TakingBackControl 
Brexit means Brexit.Negotiations are negotiations.I gave the answer I gave.head desk head desk head desk head desk head desk head desk  
So Sturgeon sets up an independent Brexit panel and then she presents a Christmas wish list that goes against the advice of the panel?  
Biggest Brexit story from PM today. Expecting to succeed, but also preparing to fail; ie, I'm ready for hardball. 
On Parliament voting on Brexit, May basically saying "we're giving MPs level of scrutiny we want to give & are surprised to hear complaints" 
After Nicola Sturgeon publishes detailed, 62-page Brexit proposal on "Scotland's Place in Europe", Theresa May responds with her own plan.  
We welcome efforts by @scotgov to keep Scotland as part of an outward looking & integrated Europe  #ScotEU #Brexit  
"You're asking me to accept that we're going to fail which I don't accept," says Prime Minister @theresa_may #Brexit  
Times of India: India's GDP overtakes Britain's partly due to "Britain's recent woes, particularly with the Brexit"  
Outside Britain's parochial little bubble most of the rest of the world agrees with Remainers that #Brexit is folly#Remain #YesEU 
New Toon: "Deal"She means the BESTER deal. Not the BESTEST deal. Just to clarify.#Brexit #brexitshamblesFB:  
Nigel Farage confronted by the widower of politician Jo Cox, who was murdered this year after speaking out against Brexit.  
.@theresa_may says there's no need/reason for Scottish Government to hold second independence referendum #Brexit  
Agreed, the Scottish govt paper is serious and thoughtful, and more detailed on post-Brexit options than what has come out London so far.  
So, Scotland & EU.SNP: 25k word documentTories: "Brexit means Brexit"Libs: #EUref2 (but not #indyref2)Lab: SNP BADAbout right? 
Dear Brits, if you voted Brexit because of the manipulations of deluded hate-peddling parasite Nigel Farage you have been duped. 
A reminder to the Quitters who admire Churchill. He was an ardent advocate of a US of Europe & backed EEC membership#Brexit #YesEU #Remain 
Remember before Brexit when we were the 5th biggest economy in the world? Now we've dropped to 7th...  
Today's #Brexit Christmas Cracker "Negotiations are negotiations" says #TheresaMay who is #TheresaMay 
Compare & contrast:Nicola Sturgeon: detailed strategy on EU.Theresa May: Brexit means red, white and blue Brexit.  
Truth #brexit  
.@Lawscot says @scotgov #Brexit plan "a thorough set of options which deserves proper consideration and analysis"  
The Report adopts the sensible strategy of asking Parliament to meet its 'tests for a good Brexit'.  
Great piece in the Spectator that absolutely nails the idiocy of Sturgeon's position on Brexit. 
I know Westminster are massively incompetent, but expecting Scotland to sort Brexit out for them is an unreasonable demand. 
Shock as Ruth Davidson prefers to posture over independence than try to get the best Brexit deal for Scotland.  
Just reading through Westminster's Brexit plan...  
Professor Anton Muscatelli, Professor Sir David Edward, Sebastian Remoy and Professor Alan Miller respond to Scotland's Brexit plan.  
The Scot Govt paper is the first Brexit plan published anywhere in these islands but it's a major compromise.  
Quick to criticise Nicola how are remainers Davidson, Dugdale & Rennie planning to protect us from the Brexit disaster they warned us about. 
It builds on the case advanced by the Lord Advocate before the SC that Brexit effects and requires a change to the devolution settlement.  
Sturgeon's nonsensical Brexit plan makes it clear her fanaticism for independence has trumped her common sense. 
Britain's £26bn legal sector at 'risk' if without Brexit guarantees  
Spotted: Coalition reunion as former Chancellor George Osbourne and Nick Clegg having one on one lunch in Victoria. Talking #Brexit?  
The Scottish Govt Brexit plan is about 50 pages over 5 chapters. Thus far the NI Exec plan is the two sides of A4 sent to the PM in August. 
"Keep calm and gag Boris." 5 expert negotiators reveal how Theresa May should handle Brexit  
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
So many people I know, British and foreign, are leaving the UK. Bright people who contribute. Hurt people. The Brexit drain will be immense. 
What you need to know about the first plan anywhere in UK for dealing with #Brexit: 'Scotland's place in Europe'  
We do not need #Brexit. We do need independence from Rupert Murdoch - a man who has far more power over Britain than the EU.#Remain #YesEU 
Brexit vibe is lovely so far. Widower-mocking, judge-threatening, racism-inciting. You all must be so proud. 
British voters would repeat their decision to leave the European Union if the “Brexit” referendum were held today  
Brexit uncertainty 'corrosive' for science  
I heard that ScotLab are offering 1000 more #Brexit plans than the SNP.  
Gorbachev warned the European people about the striking similarities between the #EU and Soviet Union . #Brexit #Nexit #Frexit #Italexit 
Politicians need to get on with Brexit!  
Unbelievable: The SNP Gov has basically ignored the advice of its own experts on Brexit in order to enable #indyref2 
Scottish Government has become the first administration anywhere in UK to publish plan to deal with #Brexit  
Nicola Sturgeon offers #Brexit "compromise" whereby Scotland remains in EU single market even if rest of UK leaves 
MPs who do not commit to voting for Article 50 unconditionally are guilty of delaying and frustrating Brexit  
At 50 pages, I calculate the Scottish government's Brexit plan is about 50 pages more detail than the UK government has produced. 
I will be questioning the Prime Minister on Brexit as part of the Liaison Committee at 2. Certain Scotland's place in Europe will come up. 
At no point since #Brexit has Nicola Sturgeon tried to work positively and productively with the UK Gov. Today's SNP "Plan" is no change. 
"This is the only plan six months on from the EU referendum from anywhere in the UK that's been published." #Brexit  
Nicola Sturgeon's own EU adviser, Charles Grant, has described her Brexit proposals as "extremely difficult".  
JCHR @HumanRightsCtte warned of risk to UK citizens' fundamental rights post-Brexit. I've storified my summary  
I agree with Nic ... Brexit not biggest political event year in Britain, but of century (21st) & all because indulgent Tory self interest  
I didn't think Farage could offend Jo Cox's memory more than when we said he won Brexit without a single bullet being fired. I was wrong.  
Listening to FM deliver Scot Brexit proposals. Not always a huge fan of SNP but Sturgeon is simply a politician without peer in the UK 
Scotland, the country that didn't vote for Brexit, has a Brexit plan.England, the country that did vote for Brexit, has absolutely heehaw.  
FM: Everything about Brexit will be difficult & unprecedented... in that spirit we try to find solutions that respect the voice of Scotland. 
FM: Brexit is a problem not of our making, yet this is the first detailed Brexit plan published by any government in the UK. 
and your legacy will be taking one of the most powerful countries to economic crisis aka brexit. #cunt 
A tale of two governments: six months on from the EU referendum, the Scottish Government is the first to publish a #Brexit plan.  
Which #Brexit plan do you prefer for Scotland ?  
Here's the summary of Sturgeon's brexit proposals.1. UK in the EEA2. Scotland in single market3. EU powers come to Holyrood  
India beating England is a clear sign of #Demonetisation being more powerful than #Brexit. #IndVsEng 
Trump: "Merkel Is DESTROYING Germany" #Berlin #Germany #Brexit #Merkel 
Looking forward to publishing 'Scotland's Place in Europe' - the first plan anywhere in UK for dealing with Brexit.  
BREXIT SPIRIT: ‘Six Months On’ Poll Reveals Britain Would STILL Vote To Leave  
If Berlin is "Merkel legacy", Nigel, post Brexit massive increase in hate crime and Jo Cox murder is yours.  
We’ve published our report on #EU membership and #UKscience after #EUreferendum, read it here  #Brexit  
Warning, venting alert - this JPP response to the JCHR's Brexit report seems to me to completely miss the point. 1/6  
Funny how the working class are celebrated and listened to when it comes to Brexit but they're the militant hard-left when they strike 
Our new Chair Stephen Dorrell urges those who want to stop Brexit to join the European Movement:  
The fantasy of Brexit begins to meet reality  
Brexit part of a perfect storm that could lead to nurse shortages of "catastrophic proportions"  
Next time a UKIP accuses you of 'wanting Brexit to fail' remember this piece of shit gleefully rubbing his hands together this morning.  
Today, the Liaison Committee question @theresa_may on #Brexit and health & social care spending. Watch live from 2pm  
The same newspapers attacking workers for striking now, were the same newspapers that used same workers to justify why people voted Brexit 
Nigel Farage: "Brexit and Trump succeeded because we incentivised the little people"  
Brexit is just the beginning   
Scots Tories now seem to want a hard Brexit forced upon Scotland and then tell us it's good for us because it's 'designed in the UK....' 
Brexit poll: Brits stand by EU referendum decision @CNNI 
A letter in today's Edinburgh Evening News: Nicola's Brexit stance is fooling no one  
Why am I still campaigning against #Brexit?  Because I love this country...it really is quite simple. 
Murdock backed #Brexit.Spreading HATE to swing EU ref.The £ crashed.Then Murdoch gets 2 buy Sky TV 20% cheaper!!! 
#Brexit could make NHS shortage of nurses worse, says report 
How do you negotiate Brexit? We asked a poker player, a divorce lawyer and a hostage expert  @bpolitics 
#Brexit will lead to Design school "brain drain" warns Council for Higher Education in Art & Design:  
TOMORROW'S BREXIT WORLDToday, we look at the UK research lab' of the future; it is highly accurate as there are no scientists in it.  
Farage was shouted down and called a racist 6 months ago when he predicted these events 
Like #Brexit  
no his legacy is being world known and helping to get #Brexit. Americans don't even know who pm is but know Farage 
whereas your legacy is having failed to be elected as a an MP 7 times, isn't that right Nige...?#brexit#UKIP 
Excellent interview with @StephenGethins calmly setting out Scotland's priorities in the face of UK Brexit cluelessness #gms 
So what's the point of #Brexit?  
Japanese banks ‘will begin leaving UK’ in six months over Brexit fears  
Christine Lagarde belongs to an untouchable unaccountable class of global politicians. If you still need #Brexit explaining, this is it. 
'Unless negative effects of Brexit are mitigated, UK will become a less attractive destination  for talented people'  
"Keep calm and gag Boris." 5 expert negotiators reveal how Theresa May should handle Brexit  
David Lammy claims MPs are detached from the general public – but HE voted to BLOCK Brexit. Hypocrite!  
It's an attack on the Christian values of Germany. Has Putin been blamed yet? Or "#brexit uncertainty"?Waiting...  
Scottish government defines Brexit red lines after renewed independence threat  
Brexit weekly briefing: does anyone know what 'Brexit means Brexit' actually means?  
"Meaningless bollocks trumps rational thought"Doesn't it @andrealeadsom ?#Brexit means #Brexit?Meaningless, for the mindless!  
Is there a sector that isn't warning about its future after Brexit?  
We talk of hard & soft Brexit, but what about 'train-crash Brexit'? Strong @gideonrachman column  
Fundamental Rights Are Not A Brexit Bargaining Chip – Human Rights Committee Tells Government  
"Let's leave the EU" they said, "it'll be great" they said? #brexit  
Remainer Theresa May won't rule out sending our money to Brussels after Brexit. Absolute madness! 
Issues suitable for a simple binary referendum do not include #Brexit. Leaving the EU has massive political/economic & social ramifications. 
.@theresa_may Stop wasting our  resources on your Brexit vanity project that is wrecking the UK. Bin Brexit. You have a country to run. 
Well this is embarrassing for the SNP. Today's big Brexit announcement already undermined. Oops.  
BREXIT BOOST: New poll finds Britons would STILL vote to leave bureaucratic Brussels bloc  
Isn't this the same lady who made IMF so anti Brexit? Wasn't that negligent too?  
Off to give evidence to @CommonsJustice this morning on impact of #Brexit on family law with Daniel Eames of @ResFamilyLaw @FamilyLawBar 
A Storm is coming if you deny the 17.4 Million who voted BREXIT  
They are all in it together 
Does the "petulance with which Brexit is occurring" indicate "the final death throes of the British Empire"?  #Brexit 
Reasons why 2016 is unforgettable: Trump, Brexit, Cubs, my beard  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage: US "looks a lot weaker" after Obama  
Brexit: Do I have to move my data?  #cloud 
Brexit uncertainty 'corrosive' for science  
#Brexit: Fresh blow for #May as Supreme Court rules Scotland and Wales can intervene in Article 50 triggering 
Nicola Sturgeon to set out Scottish Brexit proposals  
@TelegraphNews everything Mayhem says on Brexit consistent with having no plan at all & absolutely no idea what she is doing 
Six months after #EUref, we still know NOTHING about what #Brexit means. In a few hours Scot Gov will publish not one, but THREE strategies. 
- "wait what's Brexit? it sounds like a cereal" 
I believe utterly out-of-her depth Mayhem when she claims she cant tell people or MPs what her Brexit strategy is as she doesnt have one LOL 
Brexit and Trump! What a great year! 
The banks will go unless there is a 100% guarantee that the financial passporting will remain.  As brexit means brexit, they'll be off.  
Expect the communists to pull all the same lame stunts in #Frexit they did against Trump and with #Brexit - they just don't get it  
Nicola Sturgeon to detail Scotland's 'soft Brexit' plan  
'THANK GOODNESS we're off the Titanic' #Farage hails #Brexit 'lifeboat' & slams #TheresaMay  
Brexit could make NHS shortage of nurses worse, says report  
Katie Hopkins' lies are not pointless, they are part of the right wing press campaign to undermine basic elements of our democracy#Brexit  
Russia very clearly intervening in European politics on the side of the fascists. So much for the 'Great Patriotic War'#Remain #Brexit  
Sturgeon's Brexit adviser dismisses her single market plans as unworkable before they're unveiled  via @telegraphnews 
This is awkward.Looks like Elsie's big Brexit announcement tomorrow has been trashed by one of her own advisors.  
The rise of the idiots....#Brexit #TrumpTransition #ElectoralCollege #Trump #endoftheworld #completenonce #bojo God help us.. 
Let us work - not merely hope, but work - to ensure that our Parliamentary system functions to protect us from our worst mistake -  #Brexit. 
British dealers and auction houses say they won't follow banks to Europe post-Brexit:  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage: US "looks a lot weaker" after Obama  
Please, Santa, send Brexit back to where it came from: Putin in Russia  
I joined the @LibDems due to Brexit but my ultimate motivation was to help improve people's lives...  
condolences from the UK. Still amazed America has maanged to f*ck itself over more than we have with #Brexit 
Claim that it is 'Highly probable' that Russia interfered in #Brexit referendum: 
The world has much to think about. UK in tricky negotiations re Brexit - NICOLA STURGEON SHUT UP! 
Japanese banks ‘will begin leaving UK’ in six months over Brexit fears  
One of Nicola Sturgeon’s handpicked Brexit advisers has poured cold water on her proposals to keep Scotland in...  
Nicola Sturgeon Brexit adviser pours cold water on her single market plans hours before they are unveiled  
-Merry Christmas & A Happy No Brexit, everyone!#ReverseTheReferendum 
John Major stating that Murdoch told him to change policy on Europe or lose the support of his newspapers #Brexit 
Don't be fooled: India's population is 20×UK. UK Per-capita GDP is 27×India!! We've surpassed ONLY cuz £ lost value due to Brexit. Truth.  
Government delays EU payments to farmers. Imagine what they'll do when there's no EU subsidies payment after brexit  
Good on you. I've joined the LibDems too on their stance against Brexit. Theirs is a winning ticket. 
Lineker: 'Clear that Berlin truck driver was blinded by tears of Brexit grief. Farage /BoJo the real culprits here. Have a crisp' 
Tell me. How many people have to be raped, killed, assaulted before lefties see what islam IS?#IoVotoNo #Brexit #FPÖ #AfD #PVV #Trump 
Nick Clegg: Fasten seatbelts, it’s going to be a bumpy Brexit 2017  
Lidl Won’t Discount Brexit Britain  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage: US "looks a lot weaker" after Obama  
Were we ever a fact based society? 1st of a series of reflections on the crisis of meaning, post Brexit, post Trump  
Young people are more likely to support Remain and say Brexit will hurt them financially, new CNN/ComRes poll finds  
"All right," said Deep Thought. "The Answer to the Great Question of Brexit""Yes""Is""Yes""Brexit," said Deep Thought 
#BBC #fakenews - something bad has happened in #Berlin we are working on the mental illness blame #brexit narrative  
.@iamjohnoliver talks the power of pies, #Liverpool and Brexit on our Winter Wonderland Craptacular at 6pm ET on @NBCSports #PieDontLie 
Tragedy of how TV news failed to challenge Brexit lies and made itself irrelevant.   
People who don't engage as much with the wider world are overwhelmingly more likely to have voted for #Brexit#YesEU 
British voters would vote for Brexit again, even though nearly half think leaving the EU will hurt them financially  
2 English people sittin behind butsay and I today, they had a dug called "Brexit Bruce" and I've never wanted to boot a dug until now 
Theresa May blames EU leaders for a problem made in Britain. #Brexit - Take control - blame foreigners!#Remain #YesEU 
every time the #Brexit-ers open their mouths, you get poorer. A prolonged period of silence from them wd b welcome  
Eric Cantona on Brexit 
BREXIT SPIRIT: 'Six Months On' Poll Reveals Britain Would STILL Vote To Leave  
Yet another expert says Liam Fox is out of touch with reality. Glad we've got our best on board for Brexit.  
Sheen Comes off Guardian’s Brexit Luvvie Scoop  
CBI study shows #brexit is making Britain a less attractive place to invest #LeaveWatch  
Not good for the young people starting work in the years to come. Brexit could be the start of a new lost generation. #Brexit  
Gary Lineker angers Brexit-voters with this joke 
More proof that the "buyer's remorse" argument is a flat out lie. #Brexit  
The secret is out guys, we caused Trump and Brexit. NPOC is the reason why white nationalists exist and we're to blame for racism. 
The debate on #Brexit and science & research is about to start. Watch live  
The Trump Administration WILL prioritise a bilateral post-Brexit US-UK free trade deal. The US economy (our #1 mkt!) is larger than the EU's 
'You aim to STOP it!' Andrew Neil RAGES at Labour MEP for demanding Brexit rethink  
From #Brexit to #Blockchain, the 2016 Top 10 Smarter with Gartner articles covered the leading technology trends:  
Brexit: Sturgeon threatens new independence vote if Scotland forced out of single market. I am sick of this harridan  
#Brextremist celebrating being able to limit the horizons of current and future fellow Britons. What a benighted soul! Dark heart of #Brexit  
One man's "Festive Shopping Bonanza" is another man's "Panic Buying". #Brexit: Where even sad clichés get the post-truth treatment.  
Will be questioning the PM on Brexit as she appears before the Liaison Committee for the 1st time tomorrow.  
Those who claim we regret #Brexit can't even rely on the polling industry to help them now...  
#Brexit has the largest mandate ever in British history. 17,410,742 people voted to LEAVE the EU.  
That was a blatant & widely disproved Brexit lie you rampant fucking idiot. If you're gonna talk shit, at least concoct something passable  
Poll by @ComResPolls for @CNN reveals inter-generational politics of Brexit. Old bullish, young fear economic costs  
Lord Mandelson new Brexit adviser to London Mayor Sadiq Khan. Smacks of desperation as Mandy now a marginal political figure 
.@JonathanPlaid calls on the Prime Minister to recognise the support in Wales for continued economic links with Europe. #brexit  
#Brexit was never about 'taking ownership' or 'taking control'. It's about petulantly blaming foreigners for Britain's self-inflicted ills.  
The poll also shows that only quarter of all adults actually expect to be better off because of Brexit.  
Brexit. Trump. Putin. Aleppo. Turkey. What is going on? We may look back at this time and wonder how we didn't see it all falling apart. 
Daniel Hannan MEP, Leave campaigner, wants to privatise the NHS and Brexit is helping  
Douglas Carswell, UKIP MP, wants to privatise the NHS and Brexit is helping  
Not far now from the conclusion that EU membership is "good value for money". #Brexit. Where reality takes a little time to catch up.  
Brexit leader Farage: It would be "monstrous" if Trump lost electoral college vote  
Five questions that will need to be answered on #Brexit in 2017. My article for today's @standardnews 
Biggest #Brexit challenge facing Northern Ireland is the status of its border with the Republic, say @Open_Britain 
Opinion: Forget hard or soft Brexit, Britain could be heading for 'train-crash Brexit'  
‘Brutal’ Commission Insider Deliberately Derailing Brexit With ‘Ridiculous’ €60 Billion Demand  
Xmas hols reading.From the 2pages Ive read the author has more ofa grasp re Brexit than entire govt depts.Actually make that the entire govt  
The Tories haven't got a clue when it comes to economics or Brexit. May was an awful Home Secretary & equally poor PM  
Tory MP: "Does she agree that Brexit means Brexit..? May: “I’m grateful to my friend for repeating that Brexit means Brexit. It does indeed" 
brexit happened, trump was elected for president, brangelina broke up, camila left fifth harmony. can 2016 get any worse? 
When #Brexit we must ensure that EU citizens in UK no longer have the right to vote in local elections in the UK. 
BREAKING: Theresa May just confirmed in the chamber that Brexit means Brexit 
Theresa May wants a red, white and blue #Brexit. I want a Green one, and here's a plan.  
Gary Lineker told a joke on the BBC and Brexit voters are absolutely furious  
British court system would be “overwhelmed” if government deports 2.9m #EU citizens post-#Brexit via @POLITICOEurope 
Really important that UK Govt respects the clear majority of people in Scotland who want to protect our place in Europe #Brexit  
Corbyn accuses May of 'shambolic' approach to Brexit - Politics live  
.@AngusRobertson calls on Theresa May to commit to incorporating the priorities of the Scottish Government in the #Brexit process.  
Anyone surprised at this still probably thinks BREXIT means BREXIT.You just still don't get it do you ?  
Yesterday's bronze #TopUnusedTitle was BREXIT AT TIFFANY'S, in which a flighty Britain threatens to flee the EU, only to fall madly in love.  
Angus Robertson plugs tomorrow's ScotGov Brexit plans announcement at Westminster; asks Theresa May to commit to meeting & discussing them  
.@jeremycorbyn calls on government to guarantee rights of EU citizens in UK before #Brexit 
Labour both for and against freedom of movement, say Brexit is both positive and negative and won’t say whether MPs should have a vote on it 
PM: #Brexit timetable will be met and rights of EU citizens in UK to be agreed "quickly" 
Prime Minister @theresa_may has been updating MPs about the recent #Brexit talks in Brussels  
Corbyn’s attacks on government “confusion” over Brexit would be more convincing if we had the slightest clue what Labour’s position was. 
Theresa May says government will meet Article 50 timetable, whatever court decides  
I'm coming for you, Theresa. Do you hear me? Any backsliding on #Brexit and I will unleash the fury of my creative rage on you. @theresa_may 
WATCH LIVE: Theresa May updates Parliament about Brexit after EU summit in Brussels  
Liberal losers are all the same...#Farage FIRES BACK at 'miserable excuses' condemning #Brexit & #Trump victories 
16-17 year olds were excluded from the #EURef to appease the Tory right  Gerrymandering!#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Not much crisp or even about Minister Halfon failing to answer my question on Govt guarantees to FE on replacing EU funding after Brexit. 
The ongoing variations on "trade deal" stories in the Brexit press, as reality emerges, is a sign of their increasing desperation. #fakenews 
We called C. Lagarde a criminal when she was releasing biased IMF reports to scare against Brexit. Looks like we were right about her! 
#Brexit: I find the gullibility (being polite) of the British people (17.4m) quite disturbing.  
Hard Brexit? Soft Brexit? There's an alternative: train crash Brexit. @gideonrachman sets out how it could happen: 
According to the @FT, Lloyd's of London has put a timetable on plans to move a part of its operations to the EU in preparation for #Brexit. 
Perhaps Osborne put in a good word for her ... wasn't she expert number one for Remain case on Brexit.  
I just got a complaint over my Brexit-jokes. It included the words, "We must remember that Brexit-voters are people too."  
courtesy of  #TheresaMay #Brexit  
David Cameron has signed up with the Washington Speakers Bureau, ACOBA confirms. His pitch bio effortlessly glides over that Brexit thing.  
After ‘Brexit,’ France is E.U.’s next big test.  
Haha!@Nigel_Farage proves the Left (in both #Brexit & Trump's Election) are UNIVERSALLY RIDICULOUS! #RussianHackers 
#ProjectFear failed #Brexit is a message of hope and prosperity through worldwide trade outside the political union of the EU 
Those attempting to stop Brexit & Trump are using the same miserable list of excuses. They’ve had it all their own way for far too long.  
A reminder that Katie Hopkins used the language of genocide when she described migrants as 'cockroaches' #Brexit 
After 40 yrs of UK demanding special treatment followed by a largely emotional Brexit vote, EU patience wears thin. 
Sadiq Khan appoints Lord Mandelson to new expert Brexit panel  
London's Mayor @SadiqKhan has hired #PeterMandelson as part of his #Brexit team  
Why Britain voted for #Brexit: a look back 200 years  
My press release on GSD's gloating of perceived anti-Gib Brexit comments by UK Brexit Minister when we would be #strongertogether on #Brexit  
Scotland issues a Brexit ultimatum with a threat to leave the U.K.  
Read full statement from our CEO @RJHilsenrath on today's @HumanRightsCtte report into #Brexit & #humanrights:  
How do you get #brexit? This is how you get Brexit.  
Britain will cut taxes and take on the EU if it tries to 'punish' UK for Brexit, suggests David Davis   
President @AliceGast joins @MayorofLondon's #Brexit advisory panel  
Half of UK employers think Brexit is going to ruin the economy  
The UK is likely to crash out of EU without a deal; the worst form of Brexit, as my new column explains  via @FT 
.@Nigel_Farage on Brexit, US election protests: It's the same miserable list of excuses from people who've had it their own way for too long  
#Brexit will lead to cut in disposable incomes in 2017, says thinktank  
Is this part of the #Brexit effect screw the English and impose an extortionate fine #FIFA are a bunch of corrupt, fiddling, fraudsters 
via @JobSearchEU #JobSearchEU #EU#UK #jobs market to defy #Brexit gloom in 2017, says CBI 
UK jobs market to defy Brexit gloom in 2017, says CBI, as “almost every part” of the private sector hires more staff  
Future generations will never forgive UK if Brexit implodes entire EU project & generates wars again on European continent as a consequence!  
Financial Times reports exodus of banks to eurozone. Hands are held firmly over the brexit 'relocation button' Ouch! #brexitshambles #brexit  
Pound is "one of the most undervalued" among the G-10 currencies  
The UK Government should have a fair immigration system that we control #Brexit  
Brexit, Trump, oil: the big events that shook financial markets in 2016   
Big news coming out of the club this morning.. has Christmas come early? To be announced shortly #Brexit 
Central London property deals halve after Brexit, tax hike  
Meet my Brexit Expert Advisory Panel - who will support me as I continue to work to secure the best deal for London.  
I'm coming round to Brexit purely because we clearly have so little understanding of why the EU does the things it does.  
So not only is Peter Mandelson taking money from the EU to speak for the EU, now he is taking our taxes to help Sadiq fight #BRExit. 
The inside story of Brexit referendum and how Cameron screwed it up- George Parker in @FT is excellent 
NHS in crisis, prisons in crisis, railways in crisis, Brexit in crisis, economy in crisis.. the Tories are failing the people of Britain. 
Post-Brexit BILATERAL free trade deals with USA, Australia, Canada, Sth Korea and other rich countries will boost the UK economy massively. 
Brexit British values.  
#EUAdventCalendar Day 1919th reason we are #BetterIn the #EU#Research & #InnovationEU funding is important: what will happen post-Brexit?  
Alex Salmond says he is ready to organise a 2nd Scottish Inde referendum before Brexit. Good, Go now negotiations will be easier without you 
Brexit mustn't endanger the fundamental rights of U.K. citizens, Parliamentary panel warns  
Sadiq Khan has appointed former European Trade Commissioner Lord Mandelson as part of panel to advise on getting best Brexit deal for London 
Delighted to be invited by @MayorofLondon to join his Brexit Expert Advisory Panel  
And the list of #Brexit political backstabbers goes on and on.No respect for the vote.No respect for democracy. 
Americans divide over Trump; UK divides over Brexit - Australians divide over #DieHard & #LoveActually 
Design schools will "hit the wall" due to #Brexit warns Council for Higher Education in Art & Design:  
Vital - must read thread by @WomaninHavana - summarising what happens to UK's human rights during Brexit  
Our report on #EU membership and #UKscience after #EUreferendum to be published tomorrow, find out more  #Brexit 
Sadiq Khan announces panel to advise him on Brexit, including Peter Mandelson.  
LIES LIES LIES! This is a LOCAL country for LOCAL British people.#Brexit #brexitshambles 
Guardian invents #fakenews about Brexit  
As usual the Sun is lying - There is no trade deal with Korea, just a new working group.#Brexit press lies are destroying democracy#Remain 
Sheen Comes off Guardian's Brexit Luvvie Scoop:  
Grayling calls for anti-strike laws>the party 'of the workers' gives us a taste of its post Brexit vision   
Liam Fox:' We can have partial customs union.'UK trade expert: 'We can't.Brexit reality 
Net migration to #Brexit!4% of Remain voters would vote Leave if there were a 2nd Referendum, 3% of Leavers would vote Remain say ComRes. 
Here comes Santa Claus here comes Santa Claus right down Santa Claus wayWith nazis and brexit and fuck we're all fucked 
Tories end 2016 with bumper leads over Labour on the economy, immigration, Brexit...and terrorism  Today's #WaughZone 
The JCHR'S report on human rights after Brexit is published. (My evidence to the Committee receives a few passing references.)  
Or any other advantage to #brexit. To date not one has been proposed by Leavers. Could it be there isn't one?  
Nope. UK has absolutely NO allies on Brexit. Except perhaps Russia.  
Was 'Lear' written 'to illustrate the evils of disunion'? - yes, undoubtedly one of the motivations. Stop #Brexit, says Shakespeare. 
In short, @HumanRightsCtte has taken extensive evidence & considers individual fundamental rights of UK citizens are under threat by Brexit. 
For those who felt comforted by Theresa May's guarantee on workers' rights post-Brexit,don't. See this extract from @HumanRightsCtte report: 
Lidl Won't Discount Brexit Britain #DespiteBrexit  
Please see my 19 point thread for summary of important @HumanRightsCtte report on fundamental rights after Brexit.  
Looks increasingly like "I told you so" - Brexit doesn't mean Brexit, but gobbledygook in the hands of a govt out of ideas or leadership  
Today MPs will be debating Brexit and science & research. Here's our recent report  
Japanese giant Nissan posts UK profits jump after Brexit deal.  
Could the U.K. really walk away from a bad Brexit deal? My latest on Theresa May's lack of leverage.   
Welcome @scotgov being first administration in UK to publish plan on Brexit. UK must protect Scotland's place in Europe.  
WTF is Brexit?  
Brexit and this year's other top stories, summed up in graphics  
Friends!On the 6th day of Christmas,my true love gave to me,6 BBC reporters impartially reporting - literally - disastrous Brexit on TV. 
Today @HumanRightsCtte has published its report into #Brexit and #humanrights. Read it here:  
Rights of EU nationals must not be used as ‘Brexit bargaining chips’  
"Let everyone get the best deal!"That means they'll all get the same deal. Just like they do now. Dan is one of Brexit's best thinkers.  
Positive news for once from the CBI. UK jobs market to defy Brexit gloom in 2017. #DespiteBrexit 
"Scotland has earned the right to be heard in Europe" Juncker tells @AlexSalmond as SNP sets out #Brexit strategy  
Anti-Brexit Europeans trying to scupper any deals. We must be prepared to walk away from the EU to achieve any deal 
Brexit might not quite mean Brexit says one of three Brexiteers in u-turn since July  
Brexit: UK can't deport millions of EU nationals, report warns  
BBC Claims 'Cheapest' Xmas, Later Says Brexit Increases Prices. #fakenews  
Attention turns to Turkey in Christmas week - plus the rest of our Brexit headlines  
Whole process'd be a lot simpler if England just left the UK, and the United Kingdom of Scotland and Northern Ireland stayed in EU 
Trump, Brexit and this year's other top stories, summed up in graphics  
Scotland threatens to leave the United Kingdom if forced out of the single market  
"A Midwinter Moment" Jamie Foster's NEW ARTICLE on Marine A, Brexit & Aleppo @1jamiefoster #csm #MarineA 
And his admirers & allies include: Trump, Le Pen, Wilders, & Brexit spark Farage, among others...  
India did not overtake UK. UK fell below India cause of Brexit.BOTH NOT REMOTELY SAME.NOT EVEN REMOTELY SAME  
Is this FT letter about Brexit "letter of the year" or "a load of old wank"?  
#BritishValues :- Deportation of 2.9 million EU nationals living in UK?Used as #Brexit “bargaining chip” by @theresa_may ?LAUGHING STOCK 
‘I think I’d better leave now’ Theresa May said to EU leaders when they refused to discuss Brexit  
Scottish gov’t to propose country stays in European single market to lessen #Brexit impact  
#ScotlandinEurope independence is the only hope for young people after Brexit  
$FTSE - FTSE 100 into major resistance. Will Brexit bulls be able to take out that wall?  Worth watching...  
Brexit may take 10 years to happen  
U.K. weighs the cost of the Brexit nuclear option 
Citizens of nowhere#Brexit 
Sorry I haven't been tweeting much today guys I've been busy participating in the Arkansas Brexit 
TIME CAME TO QUESTION PORNO-HOLOCAUST #FBI @FBI  #ADL #AIPAC #Sputnik #NYTimes #BREXIT #Veterans #tcot #antiSemitc pic.twitter.com/9Uxhabnq8G 
I don't know why this is so shocking... this is the world that actually chose a person #Trump over Clinton or #Brexit over collaboration.  
Whitehall told not to deport millions of EU nationals as 'bargaining chip' in Brexit talks  
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules 
New brexit car?  
Fantastic analytics - the confluence of factors behind Trump and Brexit and all they entail  via @CapX 
 @SoundofMusic @mitchellvii @Brexit_News @docmurdock "Edelweiss". "Bless My Homeland Forever". #PresidentElectTrump 
Europe knows Brexit was a terrible idea, and New York is the city which will benefit  
 is looking for one unambiguous economic advantage to #brexit. Leavers, give it your best shot. No lies, no fantasies 
Scottish independence is the only hope for young people after Brexit  
History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And Trump  via @HuffPostPol 
10 freedoms that a destructive Brexit will take away from British citizens  
Does this critique of VAR models by Deepak Lal in the Brexit context also apply to demonetised India?  
A coincidence might be that Brexit debate has been cynically used to create a diversion of electorates' attention from these serious issues?  
From Brexit's academic impact to departing space icons, we round up the week in science  
I'd like a scrambled Brexit on toast with a sprinkle of cayenne pepper, thank you very much. 
Sums it up perfectly. From the get-go, what have Brexit & the Referendum been about? The Conservative Party. Absolutely nothing else.  
-"Irish economy will grow steadily for remainder of decade & outperform both NI & British economies"#Brexit 
Brexit: UK can't deport millions of EU nationals, report warns  
Parliament's @HumanRightsCtte has just published a new report on Brexit and Human Rights (1/12)  
Employers turn gloomy over jobs market amid Brexit uncertainty  
Foreign elections Obama's admin interfered with:1. Brexit2. Israel3. RussiaWonder why Russia went after the DNC specifically? 
Someone yelled "Speak English", "Go Home" & "Brexit" during my set last night. I'm Australian;I don't think he understands European borders. 
Are tides turning on Brexit support? There are increasing indicators... 
#FakeNews: BBC Claims 'Cheapest' Xmas, 3 Days Later Says Brexit Increasing 2016 Prices#DishonestMedia 
European Movement & new Chair, Stephen Dorrell, now campaigning to stop Brexit. Join up! -->  
THANKS BREXIT?! House prices in London are set to fall slightly in 2017:  
Brexit: like a public toilet with no toilet paper and no one to clean it. 
This week @scotgov will become the first administration in UK to publish plan on options to deal with Brexit #Europe 
Scotland expected to vote for independence and introduce its own currency after Brexit, JPMorgan says 
Brexit-fanatic Gisela Stuart complaining about Jeremy Corbyn "harking back to a time that once was" on @BBCWestminHour. Give me strength 
In which @TheSun, pursuing Brexit fantasies, simply invents a trade deal that does not exist. (HT @GabrielSilesB) 
'People who engage less with the wider world more likely to have voted for Brexit.'It's bordering on obsession now.  
So happy for this lad @AliBrownleetri I tryed to do some voting from Slovakia but Brexit wall stopped me :D  
Our lying right wing press has left the British public massively misinformed on the EU.No basis for a #Brexit mandate#Remain #YesEU 
Fears Brexit will spur bank exodus to Eurozone. A decision to Remain would end it immediately #BrexitShambles 
How can we trust the Tory right not to wreck negotiations with the EU in order to force Britain into a hard #Brexit?#YesEU #Remain 
Brexit boosts spending: UK set for record-breaking Christmas shopping Bonanza  
Asa Bennett: Sorry Project Fear, the British people want Brexit no matter what  
Back to the FRONT: Trump makes British trade deal ‘top priority’ after Obama's Brexit snub  
None of the absurd suggestions for different kinds of #Brexit are as good as staying in the #EU. We can do that. Who is stopping us? Easy... 
 Absolute Rubbish. He's secured no trade deal. However, we already have one which, through Brexit, we're giving up. 
'Life outside EU will be GOOD' Australia predicts swift trade deal in thriving Brexit era  
The 'shouting at foreigners' approach isn't the way to seal #Brexit trade deals, @fmwales Carwyn Jones warns 'naive' new UK ministers 
Since when did support for #Brexit become Australian policy? Downer has politicized his office. Recall him. #auspol 
METRO: Osborne: Brexit vote has cost us #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
A summary of what today's media fuss (#bbcsp ,Telegraph, Sun, Express) about my views on #brexit was about: 
South Korea becomes the seventh country to agree to strike new trade links with Britain after Brexit  
Former Tory health minister Stephen Dorrell seeks to reverse Brexit vote. Good for him: I'll do all I can to help.  
British Leftists now blaming #Brexit on "Russian Interference".  These people are insufferable.  Always looking for a boogeyman. 
FT BREXIT LEAD: Fears over banks #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Andy Murray winning SPOTY for a third time is worse than Brexit 
FT: Fears EU delays on Brexit talks will spur exodus of banks to Eurozone #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Gary Lineker's 'dead Brexit voters' joke sparks total outrage from Leave camp  
“Man is certainly stark mad;he cannot make a worm, and yet he will be making gods by dozens"-  #Montaigne#Trump#nigelfarage#Brexit#MAGA 
The people have a right to decide if the #Brexit deal that May comes up with is what they want & is good for Britain. It's as simple as that 
Santa Claus lives in Lapland, in Finland, which is in the EU. Try explaining a post-Brexit immigration ban to kids on xmas eve. 
Brexit = budget cuts… #ChinChin 
Politics break. From the forthcoming Brexit Colouring and Activity Book:  
2016 has been summed up in a week by Arsenal.Everton was Brexit.Man City was Trump.Roll on 2017.#YearFromHell 
This time tomorrow I will be arriving in Theresa May's post Brexit Britain for the first time like...  
#BritishValues. Another pointless platitude to add to the 'Red,White & Blue' Bunting of Post-Brexit Britain.The same-old new Blame Game. 
Brexit causes British companies scrap investment plans worth £65.5bn  
John McDonnell says Brexit funds could solve social care crisis  
Guardian exclusive tomorrow now also leads  The tally of business disaster due to Brexit is mind-blowing 
‘I think I’d better leave now’ Theresa May said to EU leaders when they refused to discuss Brexit  
There's plenty of real news out there : on Prisons, NHS, Social Care, Rail & Brexit but Labour instead launching enquiry into "Fake" News.. 
Interesting insight from @WSJ"The costs of a disorderly Brexit would be vastly greater for the UK" 
Europe puzzled by Britain's hysterical xenophobia, but the financial business will move to New York #Remain #Brexit 
Stephen Dorrell & European Movement (@euromove) launch a campaign explicitly rejecting Brexit. The fight is on.  
If Liam Fox is ready to accept membership of the customs union, it may be a big moment on meaning of Brexit  via @FT 
5 ways David Davis just killed London banking jobs post-Brexit  
Why is it the #Brexit has such an attraction for abusive morons? And is it wise to follow a policy that appeals to such people.#Remain 
Just let EU citizens know they can stay after Brexit, House of Lords panel tells Theresa May  
So, we're to believe that Brexit - whatever that is - is boosting festive sales figures.Total claptrap from the Express.  
Reviews of Brexit/UKIP funder @Arron_banks "Go Skippy" Insurance company could just as well apply to @LeaveEUOfficial 
This fake consensus, it's somehow been decreed, we all now accept Brexit, just not 'hard' v 'soft'. Says who? No. 37% electorate: No Mandate 
Simon Heffer: Calm down, Brexit and President Trump will be much better than the liberal elite would have you think  
Labour Accused of Brexit Betrayal as Top MEP Deletes Promise to 'Respect' Vote in Key Document  
In the wake of Brexit, Europe sees its first pro-immigration political party  
MPs who do not commit to voting for Article 50 unconditionally are guilty of delaying and frustrating Brexit  
Cost of Leaving EU wipes out Brexit Bus #NHS Pledge via @euromove#Brexit #UKIP...  by #William_Dunn via @c0nvey 
Fake News: BBC Claims 'Cheapest' Xmas, 3 Days Later Says Brexit Increasing 2016 Prices  
In a startling survey brexit voters are found to be moaning small minded idiots who can't grasp concepts like the EU 
Real classy...  Gary Lineker Jokes about Elderly, Dying Brexit Voters 
WATCH: Leave.EU CEO @LizBilney calls on UK Govt to make "quick decisions" and give the country greater clarity and certainty re: Brexit.  
Scotland ‘expected to vote for independence and introduce its own currency’ after Brexit  
Gary Lineker's 'dead Brexit voters' joke sparks total outrage from Leave camp  
I feel hopeless. between trump & brexit, LGBTQ+ futures & the very few rights we have are in real danger but that's just "normality" for us. 
Secret Labour plot to reverse Brexit is revealedGrow up Remoaners, accept it, we are LeavingEU!  
.@blairmcdougall OK.  So you prefer Brexit to the alternative, and are therefore now supporting it.  We got there at last. 
Brexit leaders fear the demagogic rage & charlatan tricks they used against others will one day be used against them  
Trying to subvert Brexit and the will of the people doesn't sound very Liberal or Democratic to me...  
South Korea becomes the 7th country to agree to strike new trade links with Britain after Brexit. #RemainWatch  
Propensity to travel & breadth of social network better predictors of Brexit views than income (h/t @youngvulgarian)  
This Brexit thing is all going just tickety-boo  
"Disastrous consequences", that's all there is to say. No bloody Brexit #dontbrexitfixit 
British industries may find that much EU regulation remains long after Brexit  
Make your New year's resolution to fight brexit. Join the libdems, Greens, WEP etcSee what the LD's say about brexit  
#TheresaMay's real views on #Brexit revealed in leaked recording  
Comments like this illustrate why #Brexit will backfire spectacularly. Noisy imbeciles with the critical thinking skills of a wet sponge....  
The pound's plunge is boosting British companies' costs and forcing them to respond  
Ministry of Silly Oaths, anyone? #Brexit  
"People are sick of experts" anyway, right? The vision of Trump, Brexit, Le Pen, Wilders & other #xenoPop charlatans undermines experience 
**VOTE & RETWEET POLL FOR A LARGER SAMPLE**If you could change 2016 so that one of these didn't happen, which would it be? #Brexit #Trump 
Brexit will mean budget cuts for the remaining EU countries, Denmark says  
Labour's Brexit betrayal, deputy leader in Brussels deletes lines from key report in attempt to water down EU terms  
Gary Lineker's 'dead Brexit voters' joke sparks total outrage from Leave camp  
The Sun claims that @LiamFoxMP has secured a FTA with South Korea. Well, we already have one via the EU which we'll lose on #brexit. Great!  
New toon: "Shout".How #Brexit happened. The story in full. Apparently.FB: #Brexitshambles 
Superb by @NickCohen4 - I've made a similar argument about what happens when the Brexit magic doesn't happen  
"After Brexit and Trump there's no way politics could end 2016 on a stupider note." Suzanne Evans: "Hold my beer."  
The only way Britain can survive #brexit is for us to become a true federated state like Germany or Canada.  
UK Brexit debate: Magical thinking will be no help at all when gravity finally kicks in - Nick Witney  
I am always baffled by this #brexit argument that suggest do away with migrants & Pound Shop jobs will have the wage value of bank execs.  
The head of the No. 1 investment bank in the world on why Brexit, Trump and the rest have been good for trading  
Regent Street in London!  Christmas shopping on a Sunday.  So much for Brexit recession!  
Scotland to publish #Brexit proposals, Tories to stick fingers in their ears and shout "La la la la la, I'm not listening!". 
Elsie's Brexit meeting was ignored by most of Scotland's industry leaders.No wonder. They must be sick of her ridiculous indy threats.  
Cabinet ministers banned from speaking to Farage. Wouldn't it be better for Brexit + US-ties for the PM to extend an olive branch to Nigel?  
10 year delay for #brexit deal. Shifting opinions/poor economic forecast.  No Single market access . Fisheries no better.  And no plan. RT  
Reading this, I wonder if Brexit will actually happen -- its leaders will need to maintain public support through several arduous years  
South Korea becomes the seventh country to agree to strike new trade links with Britain after Brexit  
Start 2017 with some Brexit Resistance. Come along to our public meeting and discussion with @acgrayling 
It is utterly calamitous that in the UK a devolved parliament (Holyrood) has plans for Brexit before WestminsterAgain Scotland leading 
"Transitional arrangements": the 2017 reload of "Brexit means Brexit". 
The Labour Party has sat on the sidelines of the debate over the terms of Brexit  
Europe knows Brexit was a terrible idea, and New York is the city which will benefit  
RHI will mean a loss of £400m over 20 years to Stormont  budgets. Brexit will mean a loss of £500m A YEAR in EU funds to local budgets!  
Gordon Brewer reckons Theresa May either has a cunning plan for Brexit or else she is clueless. I wonder which is the more likely scenario  
And here's the post-Brexit version of #BritishValues#bbcsp#marr 
So  middle class affluent Eurosceptics scammed the working class twice-through #austerity... and #Brexit :with the slogan: #TakeBackControl 
Got a Brexit relation coming over for Xmas? Set them a table in the garden & let them negotiate a better (same) meal through the patio doors 
It was the middle class affluent Eurosceptics - real #elites-who scammed  older working class and poorer anti-immigrant voters on #Brexit  
Plan A: Soft Brexit for UK + more devolution.Plan B: Soft Brexit for Scotland + more devolution.Plan C: #indyref2 & #ScotlandInEurope. 
6 months after #EUref, @ScotGov announces it has a Plan A, Plan B, & Plan C for Brexit. Tories still don't have any plans at all. 
Sturgeon seeks more powers for Scotland as part of Brexit plan  
MPs with constituencies who voted leave should be not try to delay or frustrate Brexit #RespectTheResult 
The woman who authorised paying £1.60 for every £1 burned wants to be the one to negotiate #Brexit for NI. Think about that... #bbcsp 
Always remember that Brexit makes Nicola Sturgeon's life harder. Much harder. This is why 2017 is bad news for SNP 
Post-Brexit deals 'not at price of EU free trade ties'  
#Brexit  Banks trying to bully Britain into staying in Single Market paying just SIX PER CENT tax  
The British people voted to take back control of our laws, borders, money and trade - that means leaving the EU’s Single Market #Brexit 
All of Europe agrees Brexit was a stupid idea - and the city which will mainly benefit is New York  
SNP are tying themselves in knots over #Brexit. 1st it's #indyref2 to keep Scotland in EU. Now it's #indyref2 if we don't get #Brexit powers  
Someone sent an FOI request to ask about the Brexit guidance Theresa May has received from God   
"Labour's Brexit betrayal as deputy leader in Brussels deletes lines from key report, etc"Labour is kaput  
Gary Lineker Jokes about Elderly, Dying Brexit Voters  
No unionist can fault Nicola, as FM of #all of Scotland's electorate, for trying her best to reach consensus on #Brexit with UK. #indyref2 
Excellent piece and follow up interview. Bring on Brexit!  
#Brexit has distracted Europe from foreign policy crises including the horror of #Aleppo, says @paulknott11 
British Companies Absorb 'Brexit Shock', Get on with Business for 2017  
Sturgeon unveils SNP Brexit plans-1. Say 'dragged out' a lot2. Threaten Indyref2 again3. Pretend no one in Scotland voted for Brexit 
"Scotland has earned the right to be heard in Europe" Juncker tells @AlexSalmond as SNP sets out #Brexit strategy  
Here's a British Value for you: the pound is now worth $1.25, a thirty-year low. Thanks, #Brexit! #BritishValues 
Labour MEP @RCorbettMEP thinks Britain should rethink its position on Brexit as the costs emerges #bbcsp 
Some of the best writing re Brexit by one of the best columnists around @NickCohen4  The victors are angry. Why?... 
Incompetent Ministers in a Incompetent Government Justice, Transport, Health, Education, Housing, Local Government, Social Care, Brexit!  
Javid: “Pay no attention to NHS and social care crisis, prison riots, Brexit chaos, lets swear an oath” #BritishValues (HT @PippaMusgrave1) 
The British people want Brexit no matter what, recent polling shows only 33% would consider a second referendum. 
"The ball is now in their court."  @NicolaSturgeon writes ahead of @scotgov #Brexit plan publication on Tuesday.  
I'll be on #bbcsp at 11h00 on why #Brexit supporting newspapers are in a panic and strangely attacking me.  
Sorry remainers, avalanche of good news continues.British companies absorb Brexit shock, get on with 2017 business  
"We can do a deal where we are financial services centre of Europe" -@George_Osborne on #Brexit negotiations   
A significant moment. Faced with a calamitous Tory-led #Brexit, Scotland will reveal its #Brexit plan on Tuesday:  
The “great opportunities” of Brexit have been championed by Australian High Commissioner to the UK, Alexander Downer  
Typical #Labour, they ignore the will of the people and then use “sneaky wrecking tactics” to undermine #Brexit... 
Osborne. You helped make Brexit by saying "Northern Powerhouse" instead of creating one. By blaming immigrants for your mess. Be quiet #marr 
.@NivenJ1 : How does a Brexit-crazed, anti-immigration maniac explain the plot of Paddington to their 8 year old?  
There is still time for season greeting.Get (or make) "all I want for Xmas is #Brexit" and send to MP.Show love! 
A busy, but positive, week ahead....BBC News - Scottish government Brexit proposals to be published  
"We can't go for a quick result, we have to get the right result" says @LiamFoxMP on trade after Brexit #marr 
Remainers whine about the danger of the EU imposing tariffs on us whilst ignoring the fact we would reciprocate!! All basic stuff #Brexit 
The Government must publish the economic assessments on which they base their Brexit negotiations plan. 
All I can say to #Brexit-ers, still in victim mode, still attacking remainers, still in denial over risks ahead, is: You won. Get over it. 
The lesson of 2016 is that the media elite has NO IDEA what the people want. They called Brexit wrong and they called the US election wrong. 
James Skinner: Canada sees our post-Brexit potential – and so should we  
The BBC colludes with Osborne to push their "soft Brexit" narrative. These people have utter contempt for the will of the people! #marrshow 
Perhaps the SNP have forgotten that Scotland is still part of the UK, stop fighting Brexit and start working with us 
Andrew Marr pointing out to @George_Osborne that most of his predictions during the #EURef turned out not to be true #Marr #Brexit 
George Osborne still not getting it on #Brexit. Plenty of us Brexiteers want to be friends with Europe just don't want to be run by EU #marr 
"Planless in London - Brexit has become a comedy in the UK", one of Germany's biggest newspapers @SZ writes. 
6 months after the Brexit vote, it's looking quite messy. Here's where things stand  
Indeed - after Referendum Farage wanted a harder #Brexit and Tories now dancing to his tune!  
Rupert Murdock backed Brexit. Spreads enough hate to swing the EU ref. The £ crashed. Gets to buy Sky Tv 20% cheaper  
Got no idea why the Tories don't just embrace Farage? It's his Brexit they're implementing and it's his immigration values they're pursuing. 
British companies absorb Brexit shock, get on with business for 2017  
EU not to blame for social inequality in UK but can take credit for peace in Europe for 70+ yrs. Brexit risks one with out curing the other.  
Gotta love @PrivateEyeNews #brexit  
Brexit Minister Fox: Trade WILL suffer in 'Europe-minus' UK  via @MailOnline 
Brexit might cost the economy £220bn over 5 years. Here's what we could spend that on instead  
From the Express's "How Brexit saved Christmas" story: Brexit devalued the pound and turned the UK into the world's discount store.  
Two messages to the anti-Brexit Michael Sheen from someone who, when alive, was rather popular in South Wales.  
BWA ha ha “Anti-Brexit traitors outed on twitter” by @hrtbps 
If the UK doesn't stay in the single market, we will, says Scotland's Brexit minister  
1. Brexit is going to cost HOW MUCH? And what's that? WE get to pay for dumping Regulations that stop Big Businesses from SCREWING us? 
New powers you'll do sweet FA with, or threat of indyref2. Bore off Nicola, this is so not about Brexit but Indy.   
Brexit makes the disadvantages of Scots independence more acute.It makes any split from the other parts of the UK more fundamental &deeper. 
Good Korea Move:  @LiamFoxMP setting up post-Brexit deals with South Korea. Story by @DavidWooding 
Exposed: Labour's Brexit betrayal as deputy leader in Brussels deletes lines from key report in 'sneaky' attempt to…  
2016: The year Brexit invented Christmas. Because in previous years December was always a quiet time for retailers...  
Back to the FRONT: Trump makes British trade deal ‘top priority’ after Obama's Brexit snub  
More Propaganda from Dummy sucking Elite! We are all racist!!Socially isolated voters more likely to favour Brexit  
Is “liberal democracy” dead in the age of Brexit and Donald Trump?  
It's Cocaine's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
#brexit voted for by rebellious plebes ,the only grantee is the establishment will increase its unquenchable GREED /WEALTH  
2016 was the year of disasters: Trump election, Brexit, Joanne... 
A surge in demand for Mediterranean holidays could mean Brits are getting over Brexit  
We've had Brexit, we've had Trump, but the ultimate failure of 2016 was Roxxxy Andrews Read U Wrote U verse. 
Australia to help the UK all it can after Brexit  
Scotland says to unveil single market Brexit plan this week  
#Brexit & Trump wins are part of larger worldwide movement rejecting #NWO One World Government #Globalism. #Nationalism = Self-determination 
Across the pond, different country - same disturbing trends.Brexit & Trump campaigns eerily similar. Masses mislead.  
If the UK doesn't stay in the single market, we will, says Scotland's Brexit minister  
Brexit: the unsheeted dead - Booker comments on ignorant MPs ...  #Brexit.  
LolololololololPutin made UK vote Brexit and then made them trash their healthcare system  
Scottish government Brexit proposals to be published  
Again a #Ukip policy for many years to stop and investigate foreign aid  has materialised now into Tory dogma. #Brexit  
Is “liberal democracy” dead in the age of Brexit and Donald Trump?  
I wish Dolphins-Jets was covered under Brexit. 
Australia to help the UK all it can after Brexit  
Scotland says to unveil single market Brexit plan this week  
Leave voters WON - now let us get on with #Brexit.Acts of backstabbing must be dealt with HARSHLY! 
After ‘Brexit,’ France is E.U.’s next big test  
Isn't it reassuring how nervous #Brexit #Tory govt is? If they were confident, they'd ignore you  @RCorbettMEP @TelegraphNews 
BTW... Lloyd’s has been in London for all its 328 years. Now it’s moving operations to the EU because of Brexit  
SNP Brexit minister says Scotland will stay in single market even if UK doesn't after leaving the EU  
The man behind the Brexit legal case which could open the door to a second referendum  via @BIUK_Politics 
So the US voted Trump, the Brits 4 Brexit, and now us for McGregor.2016 has raised some serious questions about democracy #rtesportawards 
Tommorow's Sunday Herald #indyref2 #brexit  
All those Scottish fishermen who voted Brexit, get ready to be shafted by Westminster yet again. Only ScotGov stands for Scotland #indyref2 
'Becoming an activist' = a rich celebrity lecturing poor people in his home town about how racist they are for voting Brexit. 
The Brexit idiot denies reality with his trust fund buddy.  
Senior Labour MEP, @RCorbettMEP tries to sabotage Brexit by altering EU reports.  
Calm down, Brexit & President Trump will be much better than the liberal elite would have you think  
The Sun & IainDuncanSmith in silly and contrived attack on me for seeking legal accuracy about #brexit in EP report 
Brexit will of majority&totally understandable. Not about that. Talked about general world rise of anti-democratic forces. Must be stopped. 
Lloyd’s has been in London for all its 328 years. Now it’s moving operations to the EU because of Brexit  
If we learned anything from Trump and Brexit, it's that celebrities have been silent about politics for too long.  
Editorial: Complexities of Brexit are beginning to dawn on Ms May’s ministers  
First Brexit, then Trump and now Danny and Oti have been robbed. My faith in voting has truly been tested in 2016 #StrictlyFinal 
It is you who believe Brexit will magically work out who doom it. First step to "taking back control" is acknowledging enormity of the task. 
I suggest if remainers love the EU so much go there before Brexit you won't be missed.The UK will be a free & patriotic nation again  
Ore! The fightback against Trump & Brexit begins HERE!! #strictly 
The last time I was this disappointed in the British public was when Brexit happened. #StrictlyFinal 
Sovereignty . Amazed at how many commentators never mention this as a main reason why people voted for Brexit. 
Allowing foreign vessels to fish in UK waters after Brexit  is not Brexit after all!Who are the lily-livered Lords?  
Labour should not demand a plan from the Government that would weaken the UK’s negotiating position before formal Brexit talks begin. 
Britain will be front of the queue for trade deal with US under Trump's new commerce secretary. But but #Brexit etc!  
A few of the countries that have expressed a willingness to agree a free trade deal with post-Brexit Britain!   
I'm British born with long British heritage & identify as EU citizen, how cld Brexit b in my best interests? My ID & rights have been stolen  
Strange things to happen this year:Brexit.Trump becoming president.West Ham getting 7 points this week. 
We cannot control immigration because we are in the EU's Single Market #Brexit  
May could not put herself in others’ shoes, or accept that an adversary had an interesting point #Remain #Brexit 
#StopFundingHate campaigning to stop the right wing press drowning out free speech with torrents of hate.?#Brexit 
Japanese financial firms have threatened to move operations out of London unless Theresa May reveals Brexit plans.  
matty on brexit and trump's election (intro to 'loving someone') @jamieoborne 
Remainer Lineker's dark dig at Brexit voters who ‘will be dead by the time we leave EU’  
Had Sheen done any research, he might have found out Brexit actually makes it easier both to support Port Talbot & lower its energy costs... 
Dear #Leavers. You won. You're now the elite. Sort it out. Solve all our problems for us. *Still Waiting* #brexit 
Don`t worry. Dyson will blow-dry his hands of #brexit as Tory led Britain gets closer to the cliff edge.  
.@BorisJohnson: 'I would like to ask Keir Starmer why he is seeking to frustrate the will of the people?' #Brexit  
Brexit may take 10 years to happen  
I voted Remain but to compare #brexit to the rise of Hitler is just pathetic. Another tosser establishment celeb.  
Town that voted for Brexit loses 99 biscuit jobs because of Brexit  # via @HuffPostUK 
Evidence, facts & reason are the building blocks of civilisation. Without them we plunge into darkness #Brexit 
You happy now, Brexit? You took Michael Sheen from us!!!  
Sorry Project Fear, the British people want Brexit no matter what #premium 
Europe, 2016:- Brexit- Cameron resigns- Italy referendum fails- Renzi resigns- Hollande approval: 4%- Merkel approval hit 5 year low 
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
@JolyonMaugham I really appreciate all of your legal work around #Brexit - ignore those trolls! And I wish you a very Merry Christmas. 
Stop comparing Italy’s referendum to Brexit and Trump. Here’s what it’s really about @alemannoEU  
Brexit is not “the will of the people”, it's the result of one close vote based on a false prospectus. 
Fishing ports voted Leave:62.0% in Whitby (Yorkshire) voted for Brexit. pic.twitter.com/7bnyPDMRwE 
Fishing ports voted Leave:56.5% in Newlyn (Cornwall) voted for Brexit. pic.twitter.com/CMzNG5c0ag 
Fishing ports voted Leave:62.9% in Lowestoft (Suffolk) voted for Brexit. pic.twitter.com/BsAnQwZ7qK 
The government has to spell out their Brexit plans so it can be debated properly- sign the petition! #WhatsThePlan  
Fishing ports voted Leave:63.7% in Fleetwood (Lancashire) voted for Brexit. pic.twitter.com/1yP3Gs1kIK 
More #Brexit news. Ford considering "Leave" towns #Dagenham & #Bridgend for closure plans. 
Sadly, I think most people instead of fighting against the dying of the light just surrender to the  darkness. #DonaldTrump #brexit  
Pro-EU MPs should challenge the cynical use of the notion of 'the will of the people' to avoid Parliamentary debate, and scrutiny of Brexit.  
'Giving Young People a Voice on Brexit' by Amy Longland. That's why we created this APPG to have a say on Brexit  
Brexiters: you have one job. Plan & deliver a Brexit that is better for UK than EU membership. #BuckPassing  
Things have changed a lot in one year: Trump won Brexit Wikileaks exposed DNC and Hillary Media is considered totally untrustworthy  
New post | Brexit, sovereignty, and the contemporary British constitution: Four perspectives on Miller  
Brexit Britain has the deepest faultlines of any country I have known  
Painful to see how a once highly respected, powerful country voted itself into oblivion. #brexit is the worst idea in living history.  
Thank you to everyone out signing cards to their MPs today! All we want for Christmas is Brexit   
Labour really need to step up and seriously oppose the government on Brexit. Not a soft Brexit. No Brexit.  
#georgeosborne created the economic misery that now blights Britain-he brought Brexit not identity politics. 
(2) An absolute MINORITY of the population voted for #Brexit, many on some permutation of lies, deceit, ignorance & xenophobia. Not 'the UK' 
(1)We need to change the language round #Brexit. It is not 'the will of the people.' It is not the case that 'the UK voted to leave the EU.' 
Because this is Not Brexit or Paris...Aleppo isn't famous like to get the attention of the whole world#SaveAleppo 
Public Brexit preference:Hard Brexit: 35%Soft Brexitt: 41%No preference: 8%(via Opinium / 13 - 16 Dec) 
In Munich for a week to visit my mum. This made me stop in my tracks: "Plan-less in London - the Brexit has become a comedy".  
MORE REASON TO LEAVE: Brexit Britain to take back control of its fishing waters  
Is this what the BBC has come to? Anti-Brexit propaganda programmes and mocking the elderly? Disgraceful, @GaryLineker. 
Alan Greenspan explains why he's concerned about a euro crisis  
There is no way in which a vote based on such gross ignorance can be regarded as a mandate for anything .#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
What happens next?My outline of the likely #Brexit negotiation process once #Article50 is triggered: 
'Planless in London. Brexit has developed into a comedy in Great Britain' reports @SZ #brexitshambles 
So the fishing industry were lied to as well. #Brexit #youyesyet  
A marjority of households say Brexit is not having an effect on their personal finances  
Hahaha hahaha hahaha hahahaWell I suppose that's what happens when you blindly vote Tory & BrexitBye bye fishing rights  
Off to a French cafe. Post Brexit we'll be able to have Indian & Chinese restaurants as well as we open up to the world #BrexitOpportunity 
Theresa May said God's guidance was helping her plan Brexit. So someone FOI'd it  
Audience member on BBCQT tells Tim Farron: 'We have to leave the single market to leave the European Union.' #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
49% of those who voted Leave are unwilling to be financially worse off after Brexit  
Hey @timfarron - more people voted to leave the EU than voted for your political party. Stop trying to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Retweet if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
The real cost of #Brexit becomes more evident everyday! @Number10gov must tell us #WhatsThePlan? #UniteAgainstBrexit  
Brexit Britain has the deepest faultlines of any country I have known- Anna Lehmann, a Berliner in Brexit Britain.   
We're having a Brexit themed Christmas dinner this year...No Brussels. 
Twice as many Brits are applying for Swedish citizenship after Brexit  
Brexit is about how a PM tried to solve a party leadership issue & it all went wrong. Everything else is distraction. Gross abuse of power. 
Tories cut, deny culpability, then threaten when challenged - Brexit, NHS, Probation, Prisons, Transport, Housing, Education. All in chaos 
"There is gathering sense of crisis in Westminster, as it dawns on politicians and civil servants what Brexit actually means for the UK." 
Can you honestly expect us to agree what BREXIT means when we can't even agree on a name for bread rolls?  
Pen pushing, lumps of lard, Lords say Brexit = fishing is unchanged. Fishermen say Brexit = massive opportunity  
Why Britain voted for #Brexit: a look back 200 years  
The British fishing industry is being warned that major compromises will be needed after Brexit  
Yes. We were mad to abandon our commonwealth countries for the EEC. Heath was a disgrace as PM  
WE’RE OUT: Government says NO to taking migrant quota as #EU struggles to cope. #Brexit Means OUT & Border Control  
I think what you are saying here is don't Brexit fix it? #dontbrexitfixit no #Brexit Stay, be tough on Brexit tough on the causes of Brexit  
The stark reality of hard Brexit hence essential for UK to stay in Customs Union  &Singlemarket as Brexit vote no mandate for impoverishment  
#Brexit'ers: Like fish who voted for batter. One THE main arguments for leaving EU. Beyond idiocy.  
Surprise surorise.  It turns out that #brexit won't save the UK fishing industry. That was just another lie.  
Fab article says Brexit is political vandalism. Germany puts common good above shortterm profiteering. Ring a bell? @NHSMillion @tony_nog 
So much for demcracy: Swiss referendum to END mass migration from EU is ignored  #EU #Brexit 
The Brexit-Trump era calls for a fundamental rethink of capitalism @MazzucatoM @michaelujacobs  
I should have listened to the people' Finally George Osborne admits HUGE Brexit error.  
EU MUST BE KIDDING: Theresa May rejects outrageous £50BILLION Brexit ‘divorce settlement’  
Lidl invests in post-Brexit Britain with a £70million headquarters <- three cheers for Lidl!   
Cake #brexit  
Wot? You mean leaving the EU and 'taking back control' doesn't actually result in having control Ouch! #brexit  
A falling pound, an uncertain economy and other lessons for Brexit from the 1976 crisis  
The complexities of Brexit are beginning to dawn on Theresa May’s ministers  
UK fishing industry warned of major post-Brexit compromises  
One of the most enduring, noxious, fact-resistant, tabloid fuelled #Brexit lies: that EU is entirely to blame for UK's fisheries problems.  
What you mean England will trade away Scottish fishing rights for the banking sector, again? Shockerooni! #indyref2 #brexit #SNP 
‘I think I’d better leave now’ Theresa May said to EU leaders when they refused to discuss Brexit  
1) What Lords' Brexit Fisheries report actually concluded. 2) What Express says it concluded. This level of bullshit is surely malicious. pic.twitter.com/gmEXUjyXWU 
Now c'mon guys! Whether some folk voted for it or not the simple fact is WE CANNOT AFFORD BREXIT! So do us a favour...GET REAL! #NoBrexit 
Two years to agree #Brexit deal is "naive", warns Angela Merkel's home affairs man  
Read this and tell me they're not thinking of selling out fishermen as part of a wider #Brexit deal. 
Report concludes Government will be able to control access to fishing in UK waters post-#Brexit:  
Off to @euromove National Council today, choosing new chair to lead fight against costly #brexit  
Post Brexit Britain is open for business and booming.   
Brexit and price hikes push up the cost of Christmas for Britons  
Japanese banks ‘will begin leaving UK’ in six months over Brexit fears  
6 months after the Brexit vote, it's looking quite messy. Here's where things stand  
Remember when they said we had to vote #Brexit to get control of the fish? 
EU MUST BE KIDDING: Theresa May rejects outrageous £50BILLION Brexit ‘divorce settlement’  
'I should have listened to the people' Finally George Osborne admits HUGE Brexit error  
German journalist Anna Lehmann travelling around #Brexit Britain. Lots of this sounds depressingly correct.  
Warned in @YesCymru rallies-#Wales post #Brexit could become 'Annexe' of #England. Subtle change! #Senedd 
Fishing communities' Brexit hopes may be too high, peers say  
It's said ADM and InVivo Tap UK #Wheat for Algeria After Dire French Crop. Thanks to lower $GBPUSD, #Brexit, UK export are surging. 
EU likely to insist continued access to UK fishing waters after Brexit.Good luck with that.#OnYourBike 
‘I think I’d better leave now’ Theresa May said to EU leaders when they refused to discuss Brexit  
Ever wonder what it's like to be Greece in the EU right now. We think of it as an accident. No Way.#Brexit #LeaveEU #VotedLeave #Article50 
UK faces £50bn Brexit settlement bill  
#Brexit surprised many, most people felt that eventually one of world's most matured democracy will not vote the way it did: @arunjaitley 
Labour's endless fixation with itself & its abandonment of ordinary people are major drivers of this #Brexit mess we must now fix, and fast! 
UK fishing industry 'will need access to European markets to thrive after Brexit'  
Ok. Millions. Possibly billions was wasted on the US election. It's done, like Brexit. Those of us with hearts have to use them more now! 
No doubt.#Brexit was a good startDismantle the #EU next 
Why US companies pushed Washington to negotiate TTIP |Pre-#Brexit, London helped set (or veto) Brussels' regulations  
This letter in the FT is perfect re 2016, #Brexit & Trump  
obviously shops selling cheap food will do well after Brexit 
Brexit boom: SURGE for British economy as foreign tourists go on UK spending spree  
'Remain Positive'. Brexit isn't a fait accompli. Leaving EU = serious misjudgement, but June 2016 was simply a moment in journey to a new EU  
The #Remain argument against #Brexit is premised on the huge advantages of EU membership & the huge downside of forfeiting those advantages. 
Two years to agree Brexit deal is "naive", warns Angela Merkel's man 
Probably plenty of Brexiters out there saying this is fine. No problem. It's fine, all good, Brexit is wonderful  
'People need to get behind Trump and Brexit results now', says top psychologist  
Bitter Remainer @GaryLineker 's dark dig at Brexit voters who ‘will be dead by the time we leave EU’  
Brexit Britain has the deepest faultlines of any country I have known  
The £50bn 'Brexit Bill' is merely the futile gambit of a deluded EU elite which is swiftly losing control   
Japanese banks ‘will begin leaving UK’ in six months over Brexit fears  
Even the Daily Mail now worrying about the cost of #brexit :  
Living On A Prayer is pure Brexit 
I have an EU flag and 48% display in my shop and I get very few negative reactions. Most people know Brexit was a mistake. 
Shorter Obama: As the man who tried to influence Israel's election and Brexit, I feel like I can condemn the Russians for doing the same. 
As Brexit gripped the world in 2016, European Union & referendum were searched more than ever before. #YearInSearch  
Japanese banks now line up behind Nissan in demanding their Brexit 'Letter of Comfort'. What a ridiculous mess it all is!  
TOMORROW'S BREXIT WORLDWho needs a 50 inch HDTV when you have a ukulele?  
TOMORROW'S BREXIT WORLDPeter settles down to listen to his Bernard Manning LPs while smoking some Old Holborn. This is England in 2020.  
Brexit can be seen as the final act of a political philosophy which has steadily been destroying the UK since the 1980s.Time to reject it. 
British industry will still be shaped by EU rules after Brexit. It just won't have any say in how they are written. 
.@Telegraph cartoon #EUSummit #brexit #TheresaMay 
BREXIT: MPs push for 'clean break' from European Union amid fears of Remainer sabotage  
Editorial: Complexities of Brexit are beginning to dawn on Ms May’s ministers  
‘I think I’d better leave now’ Theresa May said to EU leaders when they refused to discuss Brexit  
My other question: Mr. President, how did it feel to meddle in Brexit and still lose? 
Linconshire firm moves to Holland over Brexit. On behalf of Dutch people, thank you for the jobs #BrexitOpportunity 
The Government should make their #Brexit plans clear - the public must be included in the process, @jon_bartley tells #bbcaq 
Yet another piece of constructive criticism from UKIP's finest!If these are the brains behind Brexit, no wonder we haven't got a plan  
Wise up, people; like I've always argued, devolution is worthless. And since Brexit it's either independence or assimilation. 
This is literally how Tesco drive a hard bargain with suppliers, and why they cut prices to keep customers. A bad anti-Brexit analogy!  
Brexit means … British workers on £6.95 an hour and living in tents:#brexitopportunity 
"Ben Bradshaw: why don't you call me on 0344 499 1000 to tell us how Russia rigged Brexit? Come and have a go..." LIVE @talkRADIO 
Our ambassador to the EU is unable to see Brexit as anything other than a problem to be managed, writes @asabenn 
#Brexit could undermine London’s status as a highly profitable international legal centre.#Remain #YesEU 
The EU may not be the "be all and end all", but it's still a lot better than the "bugger all" Brexit's going to bring us !!!  
After Brexit, I kept thinking where are the wise grown ups who'll save the UK from that madness. And now the US. WE ARE THE GROWN UPS. 
Leaked email says @Virgin boss is helping to fund Tony Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
Russian hacking caused global warming,Brexit,insanity epidemic in Hollywood, and responsible for Jacksonville  not going to the Super Bowl 
The man behind the Brexit legal case which could open the door to a second referendum  via @BIUK_Politics 
This Brave Soldier Needs to back home for Christmas 
'People need to get behind Trump and Brexit results now', says top psychologist  
Are tides turning on Brexit support? And if so, what does that mean for Article 50? New SfEU video: 
Theresa May is warned that a £50bn 'Brexit bill' will be 'one of the first issues' in the negotiations  
Andrew Neil made to look like an amateur by Scottish finance minister Derek Mackay. #indyref2 #brexit 
Brexit must be stopped - it is the only political task of 2017. 
Looking forward to our #Brexit future and a return the economic prosperity working people enjoyed during Empire. Roll on 2019  
The first populist step: ensure the 'people' are those who support your agenda and label the rest as 'elite', 'liberals' etc.#Brexit #YesEU 
How will literature be affected by Brexit? Four authors discuss.  
British industry will still be shaped by EU rules after Brexit. It just won't have any say in how they are written  
Sums up perfectly the #Brexit dilemna & raison d'etre #RevolutionTHEBEATLES 
Prisons, NHS & social care in meltdown. Economy heading for an iceberg called Brexit. When will people wake up to Tory incompetence?#bbcnews 
UK faces Brexit settlement bill of up to £50bn.... Aren't the Tories doing a great job with #brexit 
WATCH: Nigel Farage Joins Tucker Carlson To Talk About Why The Left Blames Russia #Brexit #Russia 
3 simple principles of bilateral trade negotiations. Far from encouraging for a #Brexit Britain desperate to strike quick deals#Remain 
Our most-read article right now - Japanese banks warn of leaving London without Brexit clarity  
when Theresa May was overheard shouting 'What the fuck does Brexit mean?' 
I personally think it is vital that there is a vote on the terms of Brexit when the negotiations are complete and the consequences are clear  
All 27 EU countries have now seen Brexit folly/farce & know that leaving EU is a really stupid idea. We are the international laughing stock  
'Giving Young People a Voice on Brexit' by our own Amy Longland (@alongland1)  
‘I think I’d better leave now’ Theresa May said to EU leaders when they refused to discuss Brexit  
The #BrexitOpportunity hashtag seems to be really winding some humourless Brexit people up. Please refrain from using it. 
A great Brexitannia tradition is the pantomime, where the cast asks  "Where's a successful country?" and the audience cry "It's behind you!" 
Brexit could be stopped even after Article 50 is triggered, indicates David Davis  
TABLE | Implications of various #Brexit scenarios for the future EU-UK relationship  
When in Western Europe it's easy to see Brexit as ultimate con: Ppl conned to believe EU, not their own gov, is cause of poverty & neglect 
Multinational corporations like @Virgin are funding a campaign to stop Brexit. Sign up to help us stop them:  
.@JamesKanag & I write about similarities between #Brexit and #Trump voters 
Same w Brexit - most of population haven't seen how prosperous rest of Western Europe is - even Spain has vastly superior infrastructure 
Government cabinet is in an ‘alarming’ state of dysfunction over Brexit, insiders say  via @psbook 
Lloyds has been in London for all its 328 years. Now it's moving operations to the EU because of Brexit  
The point is that Brexit is a huge waste of time and money. Imagine if we spent both on fixing our problems instead?  
Just a reminder of the good old days before we joined the EU and the type of country we used to be that kippers loved - in control ..#Brexit  
Swiss climb down on immigration quotas is indicative of the asymmetry in negotiating clout UK will face w #Brexit  
On the Irish border, people fear Brexit will bring back the bad old days  
Switzerland accept reality on #EU free movement principle.↓No way around that for #Brexit Britain too.  
#Brexit is a disaster for the young. It really is. It hinders their opportunities. The young are being sacrificed on the #Brexit burden. 
Brexit vote has had only a limited initial effect on consumers, Bank of England says  
New toon: "Little myth awkward"#PixieDust #Brexit #BrexitShamblesFB post:  
THIS is very important news for the City of London in the run-up to Brexit talks. London can be offered this.  
Christmas is fast approaching  grab a Year of #Brexit annual now and infiltrate the Xmas stocking of a Brexiteer >>  
Brexit Britain has the deepest faultlines of any country I have known  
UK contributions to the EU budget are minuscule compared to total public spending #Remain #YesEU #LeaveLies #Brexit  
Poorer voters' worries on immigration fuelled Brexit vote, @jrf_uk study finds 
Not all MP's who want Brexit are racists, some are paedophiles. 
Please stop telling me to accept the referendum. I believe #Brexit is a disaster for UK and will use every democratic means to oppose it! 
Putin's job is done here: Brexit =Little Britain. 
Here's Why Ireland Could Be Scotland's Secret Weapon In Brexit Negotiations  via @JamieRoss7 
New post | Brexit, sovereignty, and the contemporary British constitution: Four perspectives on Miller  
At least someone has a plan for #Brexit... 
The chief of the manufacturers' organisation says EU member states are treating their citizens like pawns in Brexit  
Remainers leave the sinking Tory Brexit ship and the UKIP supporters depart from a party whose job is done.  
Japanese banks ‘will begin leaving UK’ in six months over Brexit fears  
Amazing that #Brexit supporters maintain they are patriotic when it is us who voted remain that are trying to save our country from disaster 
"Brexit means Brexit"UK PM Theresa May is ignored by EU leaders at a summit in Brussels.#awkward! 
The pound's plunge is boosting British companies' costs and forcing them to respond  
Cringeworthy video at EU summit is the perfect analogy for Brexit  
The £50bn 'Brexit Bill' is a futile gambit by a deluded elite which is swiftly losing control says @DouglasCarswell 
‘We pay more in than we EVER get out’ IDS blasts ‘bonkers’ EU demand for £50bn Brexit fee  
Here is how #Brexit will @Change_Britain for worse. You do not want foreigners? Neither you can have their business. 
Prof. Michael Dougan is always on the money regarding #Brexit.Leavers and Remainers should watch this assessment.  
Nick Clegg: #Brexit is being handled by 'one of the most clueless governments in living memory'. >>  
Currently on #judgerinder we have a woman from Babestation blaming Brexit for less viewers. 
Excl: Govt gathering info on numbers of EU migrants UK need to plug skills gaps after #Brexit. Answer; lots >  
Christmas jumper #christmasjumperday #brexit  
The Brexit legal case which could open the door to a second referendum @JolyonMaugham 
.@The1975's Matty Healy @Truman_Black makes emotional plea for compassion after Brexit & Trump @ epic show at The O2  
There are three classes of people in Brexitannia - first class, standard class and Southern Rail. 
Business leaders want a plan. Brexit Briefing is your daily lunchtime Brexit roundup. Sign up for the email here:  
Post Brexit/Trump we are going to hear this sort of shite all the time.  
Our most commented-on article right now - Japanese banks warn of leaving London without Brexit clarity  
What concerns did the #Brexit trigger in Europeans' mind?  
Pick up your copy of today's @TheNewEuropean to read @joecarberryUK and @JamesMcGrory's piece on Brexit, Ireland and Northern Ireland.  
The Brexit fallout for EU citizens in the UK, and Brits in the EU – Q&A  
Having more than doubled National Debt recklessly since 2010 through 'austerity' Tories now cripple us with #Brexit 
Brexit — @Banxcartoons @FT 
t's becoming clear just how badly Brexit will hit the economy and it's terriyfing  #uk 
An awkward video of Theresa May standing alone at the EU summit sums up Brexit in 10 seconds  
EU Leaders Dismiss EU Parliament’s Request For Role in Brexit Negotiations  
Know what "diagonal cumulation" is? - @SamuelMarcLowe does, - important for Brexit & trade  
Senior Conservatives dismissed Barnier's £50bn 'Brexit bill' as "total rubbish" and a "joke"  
Belgium to BLOCK UK passports after Brexit: Prime Minister won't change rules THEN WE MUST BLOCK BELGIANS  
If we were preparing for the future we would take our lead from our most successful towns and cities, wouldn't we?  But no... #Brexit  
From today's @FinancialTimes #brexit #negotiations 
Twice as many Brits are applying for Swedish citizenship after Brexit  
#Brexit will introduce a whole load of migration red tape & will have almost zero effect on immigration levels.#Brexit - all pain no gain 
"Coase Theorem" (FT comment boards) has this phased approach to Brexit, starts soft, then hardens, with plausible FTA timetable. Discuss:  
ICYMI: Hopes rise for a Scottish #Brexit deal after talks with Juncker.  
Gone within 6 months: Japanese banks warn of relocating functions to Europe unless clarity given on UK post-Brexit  
.@Europarl_EN will have the last word on #Brexit agreement. @EUCouncil must not risk a NO from the EU Parliament. #EUCO 
May pushes for early agreement on status of Britons living on the continent and EU citizens in the UK after Brexit.  
Brexit: Liam Fox 'acting like a husband who wants to divorce his wife but keep all the assets', says Irish minister  
#5Things -Dollar unwind-Year end M&A-Brexit talks about talks-Markets mixed-Trump appointments  
Tax dodge lawyer turns Twitter dodge lawyer. Plz tell the anti Brexit @JolyonMaugham I said he's a snivelling little coward man child. 
It really is long past time for our political class - the majority of them #Remain - to get a grip on this folly & stop #Brexit. 
Big surprise eh? Murdoch is #Brexit's biggest supporter, seeking to refashion the UK in his own image.  
A significant redaction. Those two words place the #Brexit hopefuls on the outside, not 'among us.'  
Banks just gave the government a Brexit ultimatum  
Here’s why Ireland could be Scotland’s secret weapon in Brexit negotiations 
Well appears now that  2 fingered Geldorf has admitted the EU doesn't work so #Brexit was right then Bob??  
Thus shows quite clearly how A50 leads automatically to hard brexit unless ALL the EU 27 want something else. UK is not in control.  
@spikedonline's Brendan O'Neill, totally nailing it on the reasons for the political-class' lack of a Brexit plan.Terrific.  
Britain's post-Brexit space programme doing well I see  
How Brexit has helped ripen Sky News for Murdoch's plucking  
Japanese banks just gave Philip Hammond a Brexit ultimatum 
Post #Brexit this country will have to prostitute itself to get  crap trade deals that leave us worse off than ever. What an absolute mess. 
Slow hand clap. Unite hence fights for a hard #Brexit, taking UK out of Single Market, making many of its members poorer. Well done.  
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
This is the letter I sent on Wednesday to @eucopresident Donald Tusk on the involvement of EP in #Brexit process  
Disappointing EU27 conclusion on #Brexit procedures. Involvement of EP unsatisfactory. Successful negotiation process requires EP ownership 
#Murdoch & #Brexit “When I go into Downing Street, they do what I say; when I go to Brussels, they take no notice.” 
I find this most ridiculous EU proposal yet: that UK citizens can continue to be EU citizens post Brexit  
While May tries to work out her red, white & blue #Brexit, our MEPs are getting on with greening Europe.  
Britain's biggest union, Labour's biggest funder and Corbyn's biggest backer goes all out for hard Brexit. Workers of the World - sod off!  
#BBC #fakenews #VladimirPutin pictured cold calling millions of Brits and Americans to vote #brexit / #Trump 
"Brexit, pursued by a bear". @paulwaugh this delights me.  
Brexit negotiators prepare for disaster - great @tom_nuttall column. Delusions on both sides. 
Tip #Brexit tips. Invoke Article 50 forthwith. Freeze all UK contributions to EU until exit terms satisfactorily concluded. Wave bye bye 
Investors are pulling billions of pounds in the wake of Brexit. Q3 saw net disinvestment  via @BIUK_Finance 
Make sure you get this. We all need to be armed with the facts - especially if US giants come for our NHS in post-Brexit US-UK trade deal.  
Most Leavers are anti-globalization, but most #Leave leaders promise #Brexit will open Britain up to global trade. #Remain #YesEU 
Brexit realityDavis: We'll get trade deal in 2 yearsFox: We must have deal in 2 yearsGermans: you're naive 
#trump Did Russia try and influence @realDonaldTrump election process? Don't know but we are damn sure Obama tried to influence #Brexit  
Bob Geldof's Brexit U-turn 'Hypocritical' leftie admits European Union does NOT work ..forgot to take his meds again  
Good news as the 'running commentary' continues: WTO rules after Brexit is not 'favoured option' says Hammond  
Excellent! @tineurope has made a #Brexit negotiation infographic. The only problem? It assumes everything goes to plan!  
I suspect #Brexit will be the biggest waste of time, money and effort I'll see in my lifetime. 
Failure to plan for Brexit talks collapsing 'gross negligence', Foreign Affairs Committee warns | The Independent  
Theresa May forges ahead with Brexit.  
Pleased to meet key figures inc. Acting President Hwang as well as FM & DPM Yoo. We will make Brexit work for UK & international partners  
Countries in the Americas seeking bilateral post-Brexit free trade deals with the UK:USABrazilCanadaMexicoArgentinaColombiaChile 
The Liberal Democrats are the only proudly pro-European party still fighting against a hard Brexit. 
May is deeply unimpressive She lacks visionShe is a control freak who cannot control She is turning Brexit into the "worst Brexit for UK" 
Obvious that EU will put politics above economics in negotiating Brexit.Politics dictates that UK must suffer - to discourage others. 
May is making no friends and influencing no one in the EU.How can she seriously expect to get "best Brexit deal for Britain"? 
I won't give a running commentary on my strategy, but it involves PirateBay #brexit #nexit #brexflix 
Brexit talks could take 10 years, a British official warned  
Lego prices to rise in the UK because of Brexit  
I have voted to quit "the internet" and now plan to negotiate deals with each individual website for access to their content. #brexit 
Britain's status in the world after Brexit in video of Theresa May looking awkward  
There is something distasteful about Sturgeon's plan to ape Ireland's Brexit border. My column in @thetimes today. 
EU leaders spend '20 minutes' on Brexit, after May returns to UK. Stop our contributions and see how long they take?  
More gains in the South West for the Lib Dems... Tories could pay a very high price long-term for Brexit  
NEW: Britain faces £50bn divorce bill after Brexit, EU chief negotiator reveals  
A transitional Brexit deal is needed but no, an FTA won’t take 10 years to negotiate, not even close -  
‘Brexit’ Talks Could Stretch 10 Years, British Official Warns  
After Lloyds, Japanese banks now also say they will move some functions to EU within months if hard Brexit.  
December #EUCO -  A Summit of Results-- Migration - #EUDefence- #InvestEU- #EUSolidarityCorps- #Brexit 
After Lloyd's of London, Japanese banks now warn of Brexit moves from London  via @FT 
PM did talk about Brexit after all just before she left the summit   
Ignoring the rebate wasn't the most deceitful thing about that claim. It was ignoring overall negative impact of #Brexit on public finances.  
Bob Geldof's Brexit U-turn: Rock star admits European Union does NOT work. Rats to EU we don't want you or need you!  
Brexit bill could cost Britain £50b. Can't we just draw the curtains and pretend we're not in it works with the tv license man. 
ah, Japanese banks see #Brexit world in binaries whereas our enlightened rulers insist we can have everything  
In which Japanese banks in London have a "frank" chat with the Treasury about Brexit  
Brussels summit reveals first glimpse of potential for EU disunity on Brexit  
Nigel moving to Maine!Volunteers to give him a lift to the airport, please form an orderly mob. #Ukip #Brexit  
Brexit is bad for Britain. And the fact we're six months down the road without a clue ain't helping either (). 
UK should instead of leaving EU be at forefront of policy making & effect reform from within. Brexit is gravest error of judgment. Remain.  
Real story here: There are so many veto players on the EU side that Britain will be little more than a bystander at the Brexit negotiations  
Trump and Brexit are pushing the EU to agree on increased defense spending  
#Brexit will probably dominate our lives for at least a decade. What a massive and wasteful distraction.  
Brexit could be stopped even after Article 50 is triggered, indicates David Davis  
Labour MP claims it's 'highly probable' Russia interfered with Brexit referendum   
Geldof's Brexit backtrack:Singer admits EU doesn't work I GUESS LEAVERS WERE RIGHT THEN COS GOBBY BOBBY SAYS SO NOW  
Brexit: Theresa May wants early deal on Britons in EU  
#Brexit means Brexit: UK's departure from EU enters Oxford English Dictionary @OED  
Real-life examples of how non-tariff barriers can become a real issue  #EU #NTMsurvey #Brexit  
KASSAM: The BBC Ignores WHY an EU Trade Deal Might Take 10 Years... Hint: It's the EU, not Brexit  via @BreitbartNews 
Go Sir Nigel! Fingers crossed mr #trump will utilise your great expertise @Nigel_Farage #brexit  
Brexit could leave the UK "less safe" if security co-operation with the EU is weakened, peers warn.  
Bob Geldof's Brexit U-turn: Rock star admits European Union does NOT work  
Brexit Secretary David Davis declares border control a non-negotiable in Brexit talks  via @TheSun 
UK Labour leaders are blaming Russia for Brexit. 
Go for no #Brexit. Simple common sense and the right thing to do. The referendum was advisory and non-binding, an opinion poll.  
'It terrifies me': Britons in Europe on how Brexit is going to affect them  
Barack "Back of the Queue" Obama sure as hell saw no problem interfering in British politics during Brexit though, did he? 
UK's EU workers react to Brexit: 'Britain is a poorer, crueller country'  
Scottish Government will publish its Brexit proposals on Tuesday  
If Theresa May felt ignored at the #EUSummit, she now has some idea of how the 48+% of us feel about her Govt on #Brexit 
Scotland WILL be at Brexit talks: Meddling Juncker reserves negotiation spot for Sturgeon  
Trump and Brexit are pushing the EU to agree on increased defense spending  
There you have it folks You can say the words "Tory. Brexit. Austerity. Westminster" as much as you like but #snp refuse to accept reality: 
Farage calls for 'CLEAR OUT’ at Foreign Office after ambassador’s ‘Brexit obstruction'  
#TheresaMay says that she turns to God re:#BrexitCitizen files an #FOI asking for more informationh/t-@GregLabour 
"if the Lib Dems support Remain, they'll never win areas which voted for Brexit"  
In 1,000 years time, our ancestors won't even believe in Brexit anymore. It'll be a semi-mythical figure like Jesus or Borat  
Brexit: that customs union again - 600 words is a start ...  #Brexit.  
SNP nationalist calling brexit "narrow and parochial"...hahaha. Cough. Irony. #bbctw 
EU27 statement on Brexit negotiation procedure officially agreed. Text here:  
EU leaders discuss UK's exit without Theresa May So why should we reveal our Brexit strategy details? 
If you thought Big Data was the answer look at US & Brexit poll results. Instead @pasi_sahlberg shows us power of prof judgment & small data 
Procedural arrangements for Brexit have been finalised, the EU President said today.  
Apparently PM DID do update on Brexit for the EU27 at end of the summit, acc to Irish PM... asked for early EU mutual migrant recognition 
Statement after the informal meeting of the 27 heads of state or government, 15 Dec. 2016:  #BREXIT #EU27 
My point about education & support for #Brexit is that it is education which offers a real route to taking back control - not Brexit#Remain 
In Theresa May's absence, Enda Kenny briefing EU media on what UK PM told her counterparts about Brexit. 
Mad that Scottish Labour supporters are voting Tory. Most right-wing UK Gov in memory, Brexit, and bonfire of workers rights coming. Crazy. 
BREXIT: MPs push for 'clean break' from European Union amid fears of Remainer sabotage  @BrugesGroup 
The rediculous thing about Brexit is not how long it will take, but that it is happening at all. Teresa talk to your god, you need advice. 
The 1975’s Matt Healy speaks out for ‘young people’ over US Presidential election and Brexit 
EU panicking & in disarray over BREXIT. They need us more than we need them We have the world...  
BREAKING: Taoiseach Enda Kenny rules out a bilateral deal with the UK on post-Brexit arrangements. [more follows] 
The UK will be hit with a £50 billion "Brexit bill" as soon as Article 50 is triggered, Brussels has warned.  
The group most betrayed by London Tory #Brexit are NI and #Scotland Unionists.Which is ironic, that 'loyalism' receives the biggest blows 
This video demonstrating the pettiness & lack of grace by leaders of the failing #EU states, shows why we must have #Brexit  
#bbcnews A good reminder of just some of the many reasons why any #Brexit will be even trickier than we were told: 
Friday's Daily Telegraph front page:EU hands Britain £50bn Brexit bill#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
After 31 minutes, the EU-27 Brexit dinner is over. Belgian fast food is clearly rather rapid.  
That's it. Informal EU27 meeting on procedural arrangements for Brexit talks done. Statement agreed. Next: press conference. 
tbf on PM, she is right that Syria more pressing, and there isn't anything new to say on Brexit. Better this than "blue, white, red" line  
Town that voted for Brexit loses 99 biscuit jobs because of Brexit  
PM says nothing on Brexit as she leaves 
F$*k off Geldof. Bob Geldof's #Brexit U-turn: Rock star admits European Union does NOT work  
Nick Cleggs party had 58 MPs In 2010 When he left   office in 2015 He had 8 MPs And has the cheek to say We made a mistake Voting BREXIT 
Nostalgia-fuelled #brexit? You can keep the past. I'll take bright, tolerant, modern Britain over murky #brexitland any day. 
Brexit means Brexit. And *we* are going to make a success of it. #EU27 
Brendan O'Neill on the lack of a Brexit plan  
December #EUCO finished. Conclusions adopted. Now short informal EU27 mtg on Brexit. 
Very interesting expert Lords report on trade deals, Brexit, customs union, WTO schedules etc...  
Corbyn unavailable his new shadow cabinet 
Was Brexit just the beginning of a broader disintegration of the European project?  
Theresa May returns to UK as EU leaders prepare for Brexit 'battle'  
My view of the UK has dipped after #brexit vote. Totally embarrassed but OUR country right now. What a #brexitshambles 
Powerful speech from @Keir_Starmer at the #Hove Club with @peterkyle packed house enjoying the debate as well #brexit  
Missed this - its important -Very quietly, Liam Fox admits the Brexit lie  via @politics_co_uk 
UK Ambassador to EU says UK/EU free trade deal cld take 10 years. Commission Brexit negotiator: can be done quicker than Canada (<7 years) 
#TheRussiansDidIt - Got #Trump elected, forced #Brexit , caused #GlobalWarming and whatever else you want to add …   
Many non-UK EU university staff haven't lived in the UK long enough to attain permanent residency   #Brexit  
Top Brexit cheerleader Nigel Farage turns up at Trump Tower  
Brexit damages UK's reputation in EU - but wider world admires quitting bloc  via @HuffPostUK 
Enough Shepard Smith with all the outrage over Putin cause U were silent when Obama stuck his nose in the Brexit vote and Israeli Elections.  
Six months after Brexit vote, London is even more of a bargain  
EU official tells me the UK has been unprepared for the scale of work involved in Brexit; "In denial, in fact worse than in denial." #EUCO 
KASSAM: The BBC Ignores WHY an EU Trade Deal Might Take 10 Years… Hint: It’s the EU, not Brexit  
Theresa May is warned a £50bn 'Brexit bill' will be 'one of the first issues' in negotiations  
Brexit could be stopped even after Article 50 is triggered, indicates David Davis  
Wigan voted for Brexit.100 jobs are lost as a Wigan business goes bust due to Brexit.Turkeys voting for Christmas. 
EU leaders meet without May, the risky business of BOE’s Brexit warnings — @WSJCity’s Brexit Briefing:  
Imagine how much better social care would be if it received all the money now being spent just in the process of Brexit 
The Brexit vote will pose challenges for the arts world in 2017, predicts @IsaacHdezF  
Relying on duplicitous conniving politicians to deliver us #Brexit won't end well. At heart, they are self centred Remainers. 
England reaching for that bright, prosperous, post-Brexit future it was promised.  
The UK holds ALL the aces in the #Brexit negotiation. It's time we started acting like this and stopped the supplicating to the EU 
UK faces Brexit settlement bill of £50 billion to include the obligation for Britain to pay into the EU Budget until 2020.#brexitshambles 
2016: We've had the Brexit . Donald Trump has become the American president. And now We've had a pie launched in to space form Wigan  
Open Britain supporter Dominic Grieve on why we should not put up trade and tariff barriers with our biggest trading partner after #Brexit  
Wigan voted for Brexit. Now 100 jobs are being cut as a key employer goes bust because of it  
Poorer voters' worries on immigration fuelled Brexit vote, study finds. Maybe because immigration keeps them poor?  
Brexit means trying to find a friend to talk to   
Brexit Enters Oxford English Dictionary  
10 years, and with no guarantees we will be better off. The cost will be galactic, the damage will be biblical. No Brexit. #dontbrexitfixit 
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory on @BBC3CR today on #Brexit complexities & why Sir Ivan Rogers is right to say it will take a long time to get right  
Whatever U think of @nick_clegg, this sets out starkly the #brexit challenges in area of fighting crime 
The Russians manipulated elections in the Ukraine & Poland as well as the Scottish & Brexit referenda. Now the USA. #EsteemedElectors 
UK faces £50bn Brexit settlement bill  
Chris Grayling, Brexit-supporting Tory Transport Secretary not even competent to get out of a car. That’s this Government in a nutshell.  
UK faces Brexit settlement bill of up to £50bn, Sky sources say  
Government 'grossly negligent' by not planning for Brexit talks failure, Foreign Affairs Committee warns  
.@nick_clegg: #Brexit is being handled by 'one of the most clueless governments in living memory'. >>  
Brexit pushes London out of top 100 most expensive cities  
#Theresa #May at the EU Summit today is much better when set to music...#Brexit #TakeBackControl 
For the umpteenth time since June, but still not sure UK has heard ... #Brexit  
Until #Brexit is consigned to the dustbin of history I will only vote for pro EU candidates. The defining issue of our generation. 
-"The risks to the Northern Ireland economy posed by Brexit probably outweigh the opportunities"#NoBrexit 
Brexit Britain and the Human Rights ActMy comments from the launch of the new book by @conorgearty:  
-Irish Minister slams UK suggestion that Ireland & Britain could cut a separate post-Brexit deal as "nonsensical" 
#TheresaMay Says God And Her Faith Are Guiding #Brexit Decisions #Christianity #Poverty #homelessness @JustinWelby  
Scotland WILL be at Brexit talks:  Juncker reserves negotiation spot for Sturgeon  
Live pictures of Brexit trade deal.  
'Lonely Theresa May' video at EU summit is Brexit in a nutshell  
If Brexit government had carried out due diligence analysis before attempting to move forward this would all have been so clear.  
Brexit and EU regional policy: 28 Feb , 2-5 p.m.  @EU_Regional @EU_CoR @eprc_eu @regstud @CEPS_thinktank 
99 people lose job thanks to #brexit. Well done #quitlings. Pink wafer firm Rivington Biscuits reveals Brexit crunch  
This technicality could hold up a Brexit deal for years. By @RMCunliffe  
Silver Slumps To $15 Handle After Dollar's Biggest Surge Since Brexit  
The British people voted to take back control of our laws, borders, money and trade - that means leaving the EU’s Single Market #Brexit 
Every MP to get Brexit guidebook, paid for by crowdfunding drive - great Guardian article on Just Giving campaign  
Town that voted for Brexit loses 99 biscuit jobs because of Brexit  
No sign of post Brexit vote 'boom' for Express staff who see tenth year without a pay rise  
May is deeply unimpressive She lacks visionShe is a control freak who cannot control She is turning Brexit into the worst Brexit  for UK 
/ @LibDems vote is up from 10 to 14 points in the monthly Ipsos MORI poll - best since August 2011 #Brexit #Remain 
Increasingly clear that what we'll get is a "half-baked" #Brexit that will satisfy precisely no one. Why don't we just stop? #stopbrexit 
First it came for the Marmite, then the Toblerones - now Brexit will cause the price of Lego to rise in the New Year  
There's no extra money for schools, hospitals, care for the elderly, to build council houses,roads or keep libraries open. #Brexit costs. 
There must be career ending consequences for those politicians that peddled this dodgy Brexit like a crappy hairdryer at a carboot sale. 
It is obvious that EU will put politics above economics in negotiating Brexit.Politics dictates that UK suffers - to discourage others. 
'Lonely Theresa May' video at EU summit is Brexit in a nutshell  
Extremely serious...very worried about tariffs on Blue Nun post #Brexit  
May is not making friends and is influencing no one in the EU.How can she seriously expect to get "best Brexit deal for Britain"?  
Every MP to get Brexit guidebook, paid for by crowdfunding drive  
Philip Hammond: Japanese banks are concerned about Brexit  
People trying to claim a trade off between foreign aid & Social Care when the truth is #Brexit is haemorrhaging the UK's fragile finances.  
From Brexit to Donald Trump, how this year has seen a thundering repudiation of the status quo  
@Scientists4EU Do you think #Leavers realise that a hard #brexit will benefit eastern-European investors? Fun facts  
Just arriving in Brighton for Brexit talks; then onto Hove @hovelabour with @peterkyle 
The bottom line and substance of this is pretty clear: the EU27 are in charge of Brexit  
Leaked #Brexit guidelines from #EUCO (via @POLITICOEurope @politicoharry) 
This seems to be the draft of the 27 other countries' approach to Brexit negotiations to be agreed tonight.. HT@politicoharry  
Border Control Is Non-Negotiable, Says Brexit Secretary  
Leaked #Brexit guidelines from #EUCO (via @POLITICOEurope @politicoharry)  
Whatever else #Brexit might change, the good old-fashioned Brussels turf war is here to stay 
"Haunted Ventriloquist Doll Rupert Murdoch confirms £11.7bn Sky bid."He saved $2.5 Billion due to Brexit killing the GBP. 
The first law of #Brexit is nothing is *ever* Britain’s fault. It’s always the fault of those pesky Europeans. 
Ah. Britain pokes EU in the eye by voting for Brexit, but it’s the EU’s fault May has no friends. Interesting. #Brexit  
Why politicians must listen to people on low incomes - new blog by @claire_ainsley  #Brexit #solveukpoverty 
Goodbye to the Pink Panther WaferThe firm says it's having to pay forA post-Brexit crunch& so I've a hunchInvesting in waffles is safer. 
WWE adding a UK Championship before bringing back the European Championship is a scathing commentary on Brexit. 
The Brexit Xmas Crackers I bought are great, each one contains a Union Jack paper hat and a note saying how good next year's toy will be. 
Number of people out of work falls by 16,000 as the jobs market defies dire Project Fear predictions over Brexit  
Some 2016 has been awful. Not if you're Rupert Murdoch. Married a former supermodel and Brexit means his Sky purchase just got £2bn cheaper 
Town that voted for Brexit loses 99 biscuit jobs because of Brexit  
Anyone know what this image is? The BBC used it before a clip about Brexit.  
UK already has close trade ties with the EU, therefore negotiating a new trade deal will be far easier than starting from scratch #Brexit 
Britain’s jezebel Prime Minister betraying her country on lie #brexit in 10 yrs i.e. never Meanwhile UK dismantled & military subsumed by EU  
Brexit is Brexit  
BrexitVerbTo lessen; decreaseE.g. My toblerone/country/future has been brexited 
When you realise what Brexit means.  
Gus O'Donnell! The man who on hearing the referendum result said 'Brexit is not inevitable.' Out of touch  & mired in Whitehall groupthink.  
Brexit could take 10 years to happen  
Look how upset the Express is about Scotland simply being included in Brexit talks.  
Government 'grossly negligent' by not planning for Brexit talks failure, Foreign Affairs Committee warns  
Brexit enables us to re-engage with old friends, forge relationships with new ones and position ourselves at the heart of global free trade!  
What to do if migrant worker numbers are squeezed by Brexit?  Companies are automating and it could be great for the economy @bbcnewsnight 
There’s one word that explains why I got it wrong over Brexit and Trump says Ian Leslie  
Anyone that Doesn't vote Labour is a racist 
Intersting: a British Council survey has found "that #Brexit has hurt the UK's reputation in Europe and enhanced it in the wider world." 
In the spirit of 2016 on Twitter, I'm now officially on holiday until the New Year... DESPITE BREXIT. 
Obstructing #brexit should become a criminal offence (treason?). 
Brexit obstruction from the UK's EU ambassador. Further evidence of why we need a clear out at the Foreign Office.  
Embarrasing. That'll be the UK after Brexit. "Do we invite the UK?" "No she'll just keep talking about the divorce!" "Good point"  
John Mills: Britain can Brexit in two years if politicians adopt the right can-do attitude  
#Brexit ... clocking up colossal cost as it dwarfs NHS budget, HS2, Trident.Not the smartest investment, eh? 
PM arrives @EUCouncil: I welcome the fact that the other leaders will discuss Brexit tonight. We want a smooth and an orderly process. #EUCO 
Yes @WhatsApp let everyone know I've left, and make things awkward. It's a group chat not brexit uno. 
Hard Brexit will mean inexorable decline for Lord Mandelson's generous EU commissioner's pension.  
Lloyd’s of London plans to move part of its insurance market operations to the EU in preparation for Brexit  
Brexit fantasies in which our fit of pique is followed by restoring of imperial glory prove illusory  
Remember when you were warned that Brexit would reduce U.K. Influence, well they were right  
Deliberate delay in getting BREXIT under way now causing rethinks. May could be a better tactician than was realised  
Brexit could be stopped even after Article 50 is triggered  
Former Cabinet Secretary Gus O'Donnell tells @BBCWestminHour "no chance" of Brexit trade deal in 2 yrs - "at least 5 yrs... maybe longer" 
Prime Minister cuts lonely figure as EU leaders prepare for Brexit talks without her, writes @CarlDinnen  
Sad it has come to this. Awkward Footage Shows EU Leaders Shunning Theresa May. @LBC  #EU #Brexit 
Britain's status in the world after Brexit in one 10 second video of Theresa May looking lonely  
Justin Trudeau navigates world of Trump and Brexit | The daily briefing  
Leaders of 27 European Union member states are meeting in Brussels to discuss how to manage Brexit  
Six months after Brexit, London is even more of a bargain for American tourists  pic.twitter.com/o2enLcXesS 
via @StatKommune #Brexit #økonomi #jobb#EU angriper City 
Why is everyone talking about Pink Panther wafers? Let's just say the Brexit vote has resulted in a crunch moment 
Brexit summed up in 11 seconds   #EUSummit 
Reality check: will it take 10 years to do a UK-EU trade deal post Brexit?  
An EU dinner with #Brexit for every course. My thoughts on today's summit:  
The shocking dishonesty of the #Leave campaign must never be forgotten #Brexit #EUref #Remain #EU MUST WATCH THIS  
Brexit transitional deal is an obvious inevitability, says Nick Clegg  
In 2017 painful truths about a hard Brexit will begin to dawn on Britain #TheWorldIn 
WATCH: "Norway, Macedonia & Turkey are all members of Erasmus programme - none of which are in the EU". No reason UK can't be post-Brexit.  
Working on my new book 'It's the labor market, stupid.  An explanation of Trump and Brexit' lots on the economics of walking about! 
Big firms in the City of London beginning to ditch UK, due to #Brexit.  #BrexitandBeyond #BrexitBritain 
Worth reading this as well: My brawl over Brexit with Prime Minister, Theresa May  
READ: @John_Mills_JML for @CityAM 'Britain can #Brexit in two years if politicians adopt the right can-do attitude'.  
A Brexit deal could take TEN years, leaving Theresa May’s plans in tatters  #brexit 
What's at stake in Brexit. £50 billion comes from EU businesses to the city every year.  
Social care funding gap £2.6bn.  Annual Treasury cost of Brexit: £66bn.  If we can afford Brexit, we can afford to look after our elderly. 
Gov must prepare to compromise for unprecedented deal that will maintain successful UK security measures post Brexit  
The C-word, 'Could', strikes again: the UK's EU Ambassador says Brexit 'could' take 10 yrs. We could & should tell the EU where to stick it. 
Peter Mandelson represents everything that is wrong with politics, business and Brexit. UK would do well to get rid of parasites like him. 
Brexit transition period vital to avoid UK fintech exodus, warns Lords report  by @riptari 
Brexit trade deal with EU could take 10 years, UK envoy to EU says: BBC  
Amazon’s AWS data centers in London go live  #fintech #cloud #saas #iaas #paas #baas #brexit  
Great Brexit scoop by the Beeb  
Brexit, Toblerones and Bowie... Google's Year in Search in 2016  
We can wake up 12/20 and be saved from a huge mistake - unlike Brexit!  Letter to Electors |  #EsteemedElectors  ... 
Hopefully we will see the fishing fleet on the north Shields expand when brexit is implemented and our fishing waters are returned #cod 
EU ON BRINK: Brussels SHAMBLES as EU leaders turn on each other in HUGE Brexit split  
Wigan voted for Brexit. Now 100 jobs are being cut as a key employer goes bust because of it  
Those second European Council #EUCO blues for Theresa May @theresa_may #brexit  
It's official - Brexit means Brexit!Now get on with it, @Theresa_May. 
Even after the Brutal murder of Jo Cox the amplification of post #Brexit right wing bigotry continues #HopeNotHate 
This is the kind of life saving hospital-based research we currently do with the EU. Thanks, #Brexit. >:(Article:  
EU leaders to discuss Brexit strategy without Theresa May  
EXC: Barnier: EU could do UK-EU #brexit trade deal "faster" than Canada RE@bbclaurak scoop 
So #Brexit kills off pink panther wafer biscuits. Well done British people. Slow handclap. 
'I'll be frank with you, I think it's chaos in government.' Shadow Chancellor @johnmcdonnellMP on #brexit  
To be clear on this WTO scheduling nightmare - it is necessary no matter what we do. Even soft Brexit requires it  
How the Tories' Brexit deal is actually a threat to British sovereignty - go @misselliemae  
Not pink wafers! You #Brexit bastards!  
Brexit is like Tinkerbell - all those involved desperate to believe in it to keep it alive, convinced it can do magic. 
From @IpsosMORI More people thinking government doing bad job on BREXIT.  
#London from St Paul's Cathedral as it looked in August 1942 by Wolf Suschitzky. Now the threat to the Square Mile is not bombs but Brexit.  
YouTuber, Brexit and "Get your freak on" enter the Oxford Dictionary  
NEW: Lord Mandelson: Hard Brexit will mean 'inexorable' decline for the UK economy 
Brexit: @EP_President warns @DonaldTusk there'll be grave consequences if Parliament is all but excluded from talks  
#Leave was very much a vote of people whose limited education leaves them ill-equipped for a fast changing world#Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
Brexit will make the world a better place. My interview with @PanAmPost. 
Rather blunt letter from Chair of the FA Cttee of House of Commons to the UK Minister of State for Europe:  #Brexit  
"UK plays down report that  #Brexit deal could take 10 years."via-@BloombergTV#brexitshambles 
Brexit is official! In the dictionary at least  
RT Would you accept reduced income for more than 10 years in the hope things might improve when we finally #Brexit ? 
Project Fact. The Brexit exodus begins in earnest. After 328 years Lloyd's of London to establish EU base next year  
The reception here in Leigh is amazing. Though not that surprising, considering 2/3 voted #Brexit  
Fantastic to read that so many booksellers are pegging Five on Brexit Island as a contender for Christmas No.1!  
PLEASE RETWEET: "All I Want for #Christmas is #BREXIT"  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU #NEWS #TORY #LABOUR #TheresaMay #RT 
The owner of Pink Panther wafers blames a #Brexit crunch for company's troubles  
Very bumpy Brexit road ahead of us. Ten wasted years when we should be growing our economy.  
Three reasons why the UK might not be able to 'take back control' after Brexit  
Read my 5th Brexit Challenge paper on the impact of #Brexit on future security relationship between the UK & EU.  
Support for Brexit among different social groups - new @NatCen research. Middle class liberals - take a look! 
#Harvard Prof. #NiallFerguson writes, "I was wrong on #Brexit." WE KNOW!   #BBC #SKY #ITV #EU 
But George, we Leavers always said Brexit would boost previously underperforming parts of the job market.  
Alex Salmond's Brussels speech in full: Europe must see Scotland’s Brexit fate as unacceptable  
Such a brilliant night @TheSun Military Awards #Millies. Here's us heading for the #brEXIT x .. #BigFridayShow @bfbs booked! Lol 
Yet more evidence that #brexit is damaging our economy, despite Vote Leave's promises #LeaveWatch 
Bad news, LEGO prices are going up and people are blaming Brexit  
Here is the link to @IanDunt 's excellent piece on the complexity of trade negotiations after #Brexit.  
The world if... Brexit is contagious  
#brexit We need an enquiry into the legality of the signing of the Lisbon treaty without proper consultation with the people or parliament. 
Wrexiter Dominic Raab looks stressed & unconvincing trying to downplay Sir Ivan Rogers' warnings that Brexit could take 10years & still fail 
Lloyd’s of London, home of many Brexit supporters in the City, to establish EU base in the new year  
Theresa May attends EU summit in Brussels  but @CarolineConnan says she'll be asked to leave: 
"Brexit" becomes an official word in Oxford English Dictionary  
Best person writing and thinking about WTO arrangements by far is @CoppetainPU. Vital follow if you want to get what Brexit really entails. 
"For me and my fellow three million EU citizens it [#Brexit] has cast a shadow over our lives". Read at   
Brexit plan won’t be ready until at least February: Davis  #Brexit  
2016: We must leave the EU2017: Maybe a transition deal?2018: Guys, let's not be too hasty2019: The real Brexit was inside us all along 
.@AlexSalmond talks to #EFATV about #Brexit & potential opportunities it could present for #Scotland #CoppietersAwards #AnotherEurope 
READ: 'Theresa May needs to get on with delivering Brexit.' @Daily_Express 
Failure to plan for Brexit talks collapsing 'gross negligence', Foreign Affairs Committee warns  
Lloyds has been in London for all its 328 years. Now it's moving operations to the EU because of Brexit  
#Brexit might mean your kids end up playing with toys containing lead paint. Great piece by @MissEllieMae  
People laughing at Simon Jenkins piece this morning. Fine, laugh away. But then don't act shocked when things like Trump and Brexit happen. 
The #EUflag is not my #flag, The #EU is not my #country & it will NEVER be! #BREXIT #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #UK #EU #TORY #LABOUR #LIBDEM #UKIP 
The #GreenerUK coalition calls on the PM to strengthen the UK’s environmental protections during Brexit negotiations  
We've hit 100% on the Just Giving campaign. All MPs will now be sent the Brexit book.  
Trivial Pursuit Brexit Edition launched; "there are no answers to most of the questions and ultimately it's a waste of your time & money."  
(1/?) This is not even controversial - it's obvious >> Brexit trade deal could take 10 years, says UK's ambassador  
EU leaders turn on each other over Brexit tactics, as David Davis warns border controls are not up for discussion.  
why do brits/americans get so brave tryna talk about the french gov? Y'all got a lot of work after voting brexit & Trump so mind ya business 
The risky business of the Bank of England’s Brexit warnings. Analysis by @Simon_Nixon  
when people accuse .@stopfundinghate of attacking #freespeech it's worth remembering these headlines #brexit #journalism 
Brussels SHAMBLES as EU leaders turn on each other in HUGE Brexit split over tactics   
We could blame #Brexit or maybe  people have just been gradually buying less of them since the 80's? 
.@MissEllieMae is one of the few people who has spotted the Brexit threat to British sovereignty  
That's not right! What about the economy? If u voted brexit get back into work for the full Xmas period  
This is a tragedy for humanity. Instead we report Kanye West meeting Trump. Why is it only after brexit and election that we start talking? 
Wouldn't it be great if Brexit just disappeared for Christmas. We could all get back to living our lives and caring about those in need  
Sorry, I'm sick of hearing about Brexit @BBCRadio4. Climate change and biodiversity loss are the biggest challenges needing attention NOW. 
If post #Brexit UK-EU trade deal takes 10 years (& "still may fail"), #EU partners will lose trade & jobs. 
Brexit has entered the @OED:  
I know the OED isn't in business of trolling. But it would be so wonderful if their entry just ran "Brexit, n. Pron. ˈbrɛksɪt: Brexit".  
Great news - the Brexit vote has boosted the image of Britain in the wider world where economies are growing  
Alex Salmond's Brussels speech in full: Europe must see Scotland’s Brexit fate as unacceptable  
Here's my full interview with @nick_clegg where he talks Brexit, Cameron, "mop-haired buffoon" BoJo & the Lib Dems  
What they mean is after Brexit, British sugar beet farmers can go to the wall while Tate and Lyle scoop up their market with imported sugar.  
Just read in the trade press that we can expect large cost increases on all food items in January due to pound being in the toilet #brexit 
"Britain can Brexit in two years if politicians adopt a can-do attitude" - my latest article for @CityAM:  
PM doesn't invite EU to her #Brexit strategy discussions. #EU doesn't invite her to theirs. That's why Theresa May not at EU dinner tonight 
'Brexit' enters Oxford English Dictionary  
#Brexit damage is glacial but profound. Definitely the wrong people will suffer. It has got to be stopped. 
One of the great travesties of Brexit is just how much of my lifetime is going to be wasted talking about it.  
Each day the May government sends the signal that #Brexit is to be delayed & watered down. She was a Remainer as are most of her colleagues 
EU leaders discuss Brexit without May! Ministers suggest a Brexit trade deal “could take 10 years” Suggest they try harder! Ridiculous! 
Latest Brexit setback underlines why it's important to protect Scotland's place in Europe #brexitshambles  
Today's instalment of Tory Brexit cluelessness suggests a trade deal could take 10 years and might never be ratified  
Brexit: one of the most anticipated definitions in recent dictionary history.  
So Brexit will mean loss of NI, Falklands, Gibraltar is this what rightwingers really want?  
Post-Brexit UK-EU trade deal: 10 yrs to finalise & may still fail, Britain's EU Ambassador tells gov. Don't remember Brexiteers saying this. 
'It terrifies me': Britons in Europe on how Brexit is going to affect them  
Farage tells PM to 'stop DITHERING' and deliver Brexit NOW - and predicts MORE shocks  
Half the people who voted for Brexit might not even be alive in ten years.  
A Brexit trade deal could take 10 years to finalise, UK's ambassador to EU says  
The Brexit vote will pose challenges for the arts world in 2017, predicts @IsaacHdezF  
The maker of 'Pink Panther' wafers is going into administration and will blame #Brexit, says @MarkKleinmanSky 
Govt will publish plan as late as possible as they know when they do Brexit will lose support rapidly.  
What happened to that 'Hard Brexit' the Brexiteers extolled? 6 months on, its 'Transition' they talk about. Once it was 2 years now it's 10 
Good tale from @bbclaurak - a reminder there are two sides to Brexit negotiations (& I don't mean PM & Boris)  
Labour knows Brexit will be a disaster for the poorest. Every morning I wake up outraged afresh that it won't stand up for them. 
Scaremongers say Brexit may take 10 yrs. EU was quickly sneaked in through our back door. Suggest we march out through the front door ASAP 
Bank of England announces interest rate decision later, while Mark Carney heads to Frankfurt  
Simple Brexit choice is now nightmare: 10 year delay, £350mn weekly rebate=£48bn bill,, an army of new UK bureaucrats leading us to chaos 
#brexit We got our country back innit, Politicians being led by morons  
YouTuber, Bama and Brexit among new words in Oxford English Dictionary  
#brexit deal could take a decade and still fail, says UK ambassador  
Story about boy dying in Santa's arms fact checked more rigorously than anything in Brexit or the US election  
David Davis says he's open to a Brexit transition deal if a final goal is set  
It’s official. "Brexit" is in the Oxford English Dictionary 
Health Care costs for Brits in Spain €285 mn. Health care costs for Spanish in UK €150,000. Never mind Costa Brits soon home post Brexit 
'It terrifies me': Britons in Europe on how Brexit is going to affect them  
Our EU Ambassador's 10 yr timescale for deal suggests a Hotel California #brexit @BBCPolitics 
Sick. To. Death...of @BBC 'news' wilfully & gleefully peddling anti-British, pro-EU scaremongering over #Brexit.#ProjectFear continues. 
The European Union’s 27 other leaders will meet without Theresa May in Brussels today to discuss Brexit negotiations  
I used to be against Scottish independence – but after Brexit, I think it's the only hope for young people in the UK  
Brexit trade deal could take 10 years  
‘People want this done properly and SOON’ David Davis says Brexit CAN be done in two years  
6 months after the Brexit vote, it's looking quite messy. Here's where things stand  
Well, that's encouraging.  What an absolute disaster #Brexit is, and yet @theresa_may and co. are still determined to go ahead with it. 
#Climate deniers are still some of the worst people, but #Brexit omni-optimists are now giving them a run for their money. 
Brexit trade deal could take 10 years, says UK's ambassador  
A post-Brexit UK-EU trade deal might take 10 years and still ultimately fail, ministers are warned.  
I think the pie should be shared more fairly between us all. But I also think Brexit shrinks the pie and that won't help struggling families 
What will it take to end our apathy? #Aleppo #climate #catastrophe #corruption #Trump #Brexit #auspol #wapol #refugee 
EU leaders turn on each other over Brexit negotiation tactics  Enough waffle just leave stop paying & WTO rules. 
YouTuber, Brexit and 'Get your freak on' enter the Oxford Dictionary  
#Brexit, the biggest constitutional change in a generation. But no public debate, no effort to listen to the millions who don't want it. 
#May will have taken 9 months to work out her #Brexit strategy when Art 50 is triggered. But no great national debate, just secret scheming. 
Brexit: EU leaders to discuss UK's exit without Theresa May  
What I learnt in 2016 - Every client somehow called market better than me, including foreseeing Brexit, Trump and stronger rand. Love 'em 
#Brexit: This year's key political term for the UK enters Oxford Dictionary  
Russia and Brexit loom over 'minefield' EU summit  
Lying awake at 5am imagining a Fawlty Towers-style sitcom set in Dover and called Bed & Brexit. 
Britain can Brexit in two years if politicians adopt a can-do attitude  
#Brexit & #Trump have not changed EU’s defence policy, only its importance.  @Ce_Moll @DijkstraHylke @keohanedan 
The liberals are losing the plot! Saying Russia was involved in Brexit is LUDICROUS! Pod Two with @CharlieSeaWolf 
Alex Salmond's Brussels speech in full: Europe must see Scotland’s Brexit fate as unacceptable  
#Brexit is complete and utter insanity. The country has gone crackers and the EU27 needs to realise it's dealing with a sick patient. 
It’s official. "Brexit" is in the Oxford English Dictionary  
The cat is sound asleep. He doesn't know about Brexit. 
WAKE UP!! Brexit: 40% of US firms with British offices are considering relocating to the EU  
After Brexit & Trump we must examine cyberlibertarian conventional wisdom & decolonize the world from Silicon Valley universalism logic.  
Storm about the EU #Brexit negotiating team/decisions being made by CouncilNo big surprise, just read the treatyCouncil, Council, Council  
Of course she's furious. If Brexit goes ahead, UK steel industry will be in serious trouble. Obvs thing 2 do is #StopBrexit 
Do wish the HOL had more people like @lordstoddart: "My fellow peers must not defy the electorate + obstruct Brexit"  
The EU's other 27 leaders are to meet later without Theresa May to discuss Brexit negotiations.  
Financial services firms could quit the City unless a transitional Brexit deal is secured, peers warn.  
Scottish independence is the only hope for young people after Brexit  
It wasn't the Russians. It was 40 years of tabloid lies, a half-baked Remain campaign, and torrential rain that gave us Brexit.  
Brexit: Warning firms could leave City over uncertainty  
Those who constantly remind us of how close the brexit vote was seem to be quite happy to accept a general election won by a single vote! 
Brexit: EU leaders to discuss UK's exit without Theresa May  
I am getting so sick of reading about the soft brexit Britain is heading for. The majority voted to leave the EU and the single Market. 
What irritates me now:1. Trump2. Brexit3. Being coldFast forward to Summer...What will irritate me:1: Trump2: Brexit3. Being hot 
  by @SamCoatesTimes is the funniest but most depressing article I have read on government's Brexit meetings 
New @LordsEUCom report on Brexit & financial servicesKey findings: transitional period vital to avoid 'cliff edge'try to keep passporting  
The UK is excluded from the #Brexit dinner after this week’s EU summit, and that’s just the start. 
Brexiters must be so proud of their handiwork!"Brexit Makes a Case for a United Ireland"#Remain 
Gather tound the no#Brexit camp fire - miles better.  
The maker of 'Pink Panther' wafers is going into administration and will blame #Brexit, says @MarkKleinmanSky 
#mostexpensivechristmas? Yes it is. Yes it is. #Brexit. 
Thursday's Guardian"Davis sets Brexit timetable & draws red line on immigration"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
2/3 of US firms (>500 polled) say Brexit already impacting investment choices in UK. Half may bypass UK to deal EU.  
#Brexit in a nutshell #pie #humblepie #desastre 
Philip Hammond calls for delay to completing Brexit because of 'risks to financial stability'  
EU leaders turn on each other over Brexit negotiation tactics  
Sugar industry was a big factor in Brexit. Links to Davis but much more significantly Arron Banks  
Tate and Lyle former employer of David Davis and keen supporter of @neilukip are delighted about Brexit because they'll be richer.  
Clegg to launch Brexit security paper  
Yes there will. If @VauxhallLabour don't move to get rid of her one of our members will stand as an anti-Brexit independent candidate.  
A Tory government, risking HM's displeasure by dismantling the UK. Who'd have thought it?#Brexit. Where the unthinkable comes to life.  
The tedium of listening to the govt's daily head in the sand stupidity on Brexit and deferential reporting on BBC is starting to get to me. 
Post hard Brexit, the UK government will be completely free to turn Britain into a Thatcherite bubble without any interference from outside. 
Brexit. Highlight w/ @squizxy @Lord_Bung @ImAllexx and @AKindAleWar Date of stream: 13/12/2016 
When you voted leave, did you vote for the same reasons as the 1%?  Here's their vision ... do you fit? #brexit #2ndreferendum 
Unemployment Falls Again Despite Brexit  
This will be a first for me. Giving evidence to @CommonsJustice about Brexit. Do tune in !   
I'll get you Brexit..On the (NHS) buses  
Ah. That blank piece of paper is still being perused closely. They may just turn it over for inspiration.#Brexit 
This will be Britain unless @theresa_may gets a Brexit move on! Rome on verge of WAR between migrants and poor  
Brexit could be stopped - even after Article 50 is triggered  
Soft Brexit = payments + FoM + following all rules - influence = loss of control. Hard Brexit = economic ruin. Best solution = #remain. 
Tim Farron accuses Labour of having 'waved the white flag' over Brexit  
#Brexit be damned, London Mayor @SadiqKhan is urging his city to embrace foreign workers. #GlobalThinkers  
Revealed: Post-Brexit currency crunch hits Pink Panther wafer-maker Rivington, administrators cull 80% of staff.  
Tories are utterly clueless and deeply split over Brexit MSM please do your job and report this 
A deal that is not as good as what we have already got is not a deal at all. No bloody Brexit  
The UK Government should have a fair immigration system that we control #Brexit  
UK is 54th in the world for 4G & has hopelessly inadequate broadband. Let's devote next 10 yrs to investment in tech & skills, not #Brexit 
I'm with #nigelfarage on this. The thing is I do not believe the Govt WANTS to deliver a meaningful #Brexit  
Retweet if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Lots of #Remoaners saying voters have "come to their senses" over #Brexit. I ask all for evidence. You can guess the response. #tumbleweed 
Ten reasons why Brexit is bound to be costly for ordinary people #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
My top 10 political moments of 20169.David Cameron predicts WWIII if UK votes for #brexitOh dear.  
May, Johnson, Davis, Hammond all think Brexit will harm UK but none will lead by saying country must rethink! 
'We're being led into the night without a torch', @CPJElmore on UK government's #Brexit approach 
We don’t have to abide by the #referendum result if we believe #Brexit will be a disaster, says @christianwolmar : 
No wonder the PM can't sleep at night re Brexit & is seeking advice from God. She'll be hoping something blocks it. 
Crikey Mavis -- looks like I'm part of a trend - peeps leaving Labour for the LibDems! This is where foggy policy on Brexit  gets you JC. 
No #brexit plan before February. Because govt still has no sodding clue what to put in it.  
"Where's our £350m, you liars?""We want a soft Brexit!"Pick one, Remainers. 
"Faint hearts never won fair lady" they used to say. Tim Farron will be vindicated on #Brexit as Charles Kennedy was before him on #Iraq 
The first order of post-Brexit business must be a new constitution to prevent MPs ever doing this to us again.#HarrogateAgenda 
David Davis promising a Brexit plan by February, thinking:"That'll give us enough time to come up with one, right? Right!? RIGHT!?" 
What President-Elect Trump potentially means for #Brexit Britain explained in 75 seconds. #USElection2016 
David Davis: "Brexit plan won't be published until February at earliest." I guess that keeps the incompetent fool in a job for a bit longer. 
A few people say high but stable inequality drove the Brexit vote. My reply is "what about London?" Highest inequality, lowest leave vote. 
Alan Greenspan explains why he's concerned about a euro crisis  
Good phone call ahead of tomorrow's #EUCO with PM @theresa_may who will update EUCO on UK Brexit preparations 
Audience member on BBCQT tells Tim Farron: 'We have to leave the single market to leave the European Union.' #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
The Squeezed Upper Classes:  #Brexit #ReesMoggChristmasSpecial 
Everyone stop comparing Love Actually with Brexit. 
So you have to be a totally sad Brexit obsessive (a big hello to me) to want to read this  
6 months after the Brexit vote, it's looking quite messy. Here's where things stand  
Now MSM blames Russian hackers for #Brexit - This is not a joke, Liberal media have lost their minds. @MailOnline 
Flemish govt wants EU to close “free trade plus deal” with UK, to secure a “friendly Brexit” free trade deal + coop. 
Good to see the interest in Scotland from President @JunckerEU and the @EU_Commission, as we try to protect our place in Europe #Brexit  
So I was in Brussels today, and left a message for the EU Brexit negotiators in the EU parliament's contact space   
Have yourself a merry Brexit Christmas...  
EU budget payments continue until #Brexit happens. Nobody knows if there’ll be a transitional deal or its cost:  
Former Finnish PM & Anglophile (& LSE alum) @alexstubb explains why he (sadly) thinks a hard Brexit is most likely  
Maybe a few politicians Should be jailed for War Crimes Not those who are doing their duty for Queen and country 
@Nigel_Farage has admitted he fears the government was preparing to backslide of the referendum vote, with a transitional #Brexit path.  
Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows Vs. Harry Potter and the Brexit Vs. Harry Potter and the Trump Presidency 
Those who said Stay would win the Brexit referendum were not wrong, they just underestimated how much support Leave would get  
#farage doesn't like #brexit Britain being dictated to by courts. He's just terrified of being hauled in front of one over his expenses.  
The head of the JPMorgan explains why #Brexit, #Trump, and everything else have been great for trading 
So much for unity! EU in disarray as MEPs threaten to start their OWN Brexit talks with UK  
Great to be @SharonHodgsonMP session on Brexit & impact on art,craft &design education. Worrying future for arts education @marcusfairs 
Remoaners are backstabbing #UK with continued lies and fear-mongering.RESPECT OUR VOTE LOOSERS.let #Brexit Begin! 
London has really changed since Brexit. All the buses are giant snakes. People speak only Latin. The moon has been replaced with a skull 
Now they're blaming the Russians for the Brexit vote!Can The Onion stay ahead of the elite's self-parody? 
It seems #EUCO plans to sideline @Europarl_EN in Brexit negotiations. If they want us to talk straight to British authorities they've got it  
EU Divided as MEPs Threaten to Begin Separate Brexit Talks with Britain  
"The Great BreXmas Rake Off" #badchristmastv @ThePoke #brexit #Brexmas 
Oh! It's almost as if Brexit might be a bad idea. 
Blimey. @DavidDavisMP leaves open possibility Article 50 notification may not be irrevocable Brexit moment - says "I don't know" 
Access, not membership, is what matters on the single market after Brexit, David Davis says  
A German perspective on UK government's trial-and-error approach to #Brexit. You can almost see the writer shaking head in disbelief.  
Brexit Sec, David Davis tells SelCom negotiations with the EU shouldn’t take longer than two years.  
If it's hard Brexit, which is probably will be, Labour will be as responsible as the Conservatives. 
May I wish everyone a very Merry Christmas...even the @LibDems and a prosperous post brexit New Year! #Brexittheboxer 
Good 1st meeting with Estonia PM @ratasjuri to discuss #EUCO agenda incl. Syria, BratislavaRoadmap, Russia, Ukraine, Brexit & #EU2017EE 
#lovemail for #EU and our brave 89 MPs who dared to vote to show they are worried what damaging Brexit deal we'll rush into. @TheNewEuropean 
#Brexit brain drain: Many non-UK EU university staff don't earn enough to apply for 'skilled worker' visa  
IN THE FUTURE ... THE EU MIGHT BE A BIT OF A SMALLER TRADING BLOC !#Brexit #LeaveEU #Article50 
Brexit plan will not be published before February, says Davis  
Tory defence of Brexit silence: can't give away negotiating position. But it'll be headline news in the EU on April Fools Day! 
David Mundell at @CommonsScotAffs actually just compared a separate Scottish deal on #Brexit to a separate deal for Cumbria.  
That's #DavidDavis-Sec. of State for...#LegalAdvice@DavidDavisMP#Brexit  
New report to be published next week on #EU membership and #UKscience after #EUreferendum, find out more  #Brexit 
Interesting that @DavidDavisMP says would like to trigger Article 50 earlier than March 31 deadline "if we can" - he wants speedy Brexit 
May's Brexit plan - secret strategy or muddle?  
Structure and sequencing of our Brexit talks has not even been discussed yet! says @DavidDavisMP 
.@DavidDavisMP says EU Commission more intent on punishing UK for Brexit than the 27 member states 
UK must start Brexit talks as soon as possible 
UK's #Brexit plan "still being worked on" - @DavidDavisMP 
A hard Brexit won't help people on estates like the Rockingham where I grew up.  
Ghosts of Soviet #propaganda: MPs sneer at claim of Russian hand in #Brexit  #Putin 
At the Brexit talks, David Davis (playing in Black) considers his next move.  
Ha ha makes a refreshing change from blaming Brexit voters !!  
Brexit talks "much more complicated than a chess game", says @DavidDavisMP - & he won't tell us his end game 
"We definitely have a Brexit plan. A really good one. It lives in another town though, you probably don't know it"  
#Brexit minister David Davis answers questions from Exiting the European Union Committee  
David Davis admits "we haven't done enough" to analyse impact of #brexit on regions of England 
.@DavidDavisMP says his department "will only exist for about two and a half years" - i.e. no long Brexit transition! 
Brexit plans 'will be kept secret until February'  
#Brexit: for my British friends who voted #Remain: "The 12 easiest countries for gaining European Union residency". 
Government Brexit plan will not be published until February at the earliest, says Brexit sec, David Davis.  
May's Brexit plan -- secret strategy or muddle?  
WOW Super #Putin Is Everywhere These Days   – Putin Now Blamed For Brexit…  via @realalexjones 
Civil servants are complaining they are being asked to draw up budget plans before Britain agrees a Brexit deal  
Fucking Brexit.  
Brexit, Trump and now Gary Rowett's been sacked. Fuck 2016 
Government cabinet is in an ‘alarming’ state of dysfunction over Brexit, insiders say  via @psbook 
Given it is the most important issue facing our country for the next generation, looks like Govnt's Brexit meetings could be going better  
Carswell Lauds Gina Miller's Pro-EU Efforts, Says Britain Doesn't Need 'Nigel Farage's Brexit'  
This makes me feel much more alienated from my country than Brexit did. Love Actually isn't just bad, it's HITLER.  
My comments about the idea of associate EU citizenship for UK citizens after Brexit here. Sadly Verhofstadt looks like a Pied Piper on this.  
From the #SocialCareCrisis to #brexit #TheresaMay's gov't can't cope and their ineptitude will ruin Britain for ordinary people #PMQs 
People you need to follow if you are against brexit @nickreeves9876 @EUflagmafia @IanDunt @Scientists4EU @dontbrexitfixit @BrexitBin 
.@BenPBradshaw: Brexit was manipulated by the Russians.Looking at the latest polls, maybe Labour should give the Kremlin a call?  
Missed this and of course it's a scandalSky will cost Rupert Murdoch $2.5bn less after Brexit vote  
No @Keir_Starmer, there is only one Brexit - Tory #Brexit for the rich, and you are helping it along. #Remain #YesEU. 
Don't vote #Brexit, it'll immediately cause mass unemployment & lead to total economic apocalypse, maybe even World War....oh wait...  
@EtonOldBoysTHE TORIES HAVE F*****NHS and health careTrainsSchoolsImmigrationRoyal MailHomelessDisabled  Brexit and more.....WHY 
Will these malign consequences of Brexit never end?  
Unemployment has fallen to its lowest level since 2005. Where are the doomsayers now on Brexit? 
What do you want?- We don't know!When do you want it?- Now!#Brexit  
Brexit and Trump only happened because 'moderate and sane' people fell asleep, former Cabinet Minister claims  
Just a reminder of the torrent of hate against migrants & refugees whipped up by the #Brexit press#Remain #YesEU #StopFundingHate 
From today's @FinancialTimes #brexit #transitional 
The European Commission will act as the chief negotiator with the UK over Brexit, once Article 50 is triggered. 
Labour should not demand a plan from the Government that would weaken the UK’s negotiating position before formal Brexit talks begin. 
Brexitannians enjoy many extreme sports, such as hang gliding, dogging and searching for a decent 4G signal. 
So true and likewise Suzanne Evans -this is why I'm no longer a Ukip member.Traitors to Farage and party on brexit! 
Thread. There are many stories like this. Brexit is devastating and gov't so far has done absolutely 0 to improve processes/clarify etc.  
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Full 7 point draft Brexit conclusion - attempt by Commission to prevent UK exploiting differences between EU-27  
A joke about Boris Johnson gets #PMQs started - watch live  
PMQs now - just ahead I've obtained EU 27 draft Brexit conclusions - Commission power grab to avoid UK trying to win over member states  
SHOW this video to anyone in the remain campaign now arguing to stay in the single market #Brexit  
COMMERCE: Brexit voters horrified to learn their actions have consequences.  
How can Binary betting firms in Israel passport to trade across the EU but legitimate regulated UK firms will not be able to after #Brexit? 
If you haven't finished your Christmas shopping yet then 'The Game of Brexit' is this year's must-have toy...  
You are wholly negligent. You pursue a wreckless Brexit to the cost of our economy and constitutional arrangement.  Shame on you.  
LOVE @Nigel_Farage!  2016 yr of Brexit deliverance, Trump triumph, & the Italian rebellion. Nation state reborn  
It's becoming clear just how badly Brexit will hit the economy and it's terriyfing  
British government refused to co-operate with an inquiry into people's EU-derived rights after Brexit, say unimpressed peers  
#5Things -It's Fed day-Bond bears-Brexit uncertainty-Markets slip-trump's transition 
6 months after the Brexit vote, it's looking quite messy. Here's where things stand: 
I blame Brexit.  
WATCH: Leave.EU on @RTUKNews: Elite frustrating #Brexit will only reaffirm in the minds of the voters that they were right to vote leave.  
MPs to be sent Brexit book after crowdfunding campaign  
As Brexit approaches, signs of a gathering economic storm for Britain  
No @Keir_Starmer there will be no consensus on a #Brexit based on lies, hate campaigns and an advisory ref sold as mandatory#Remain 
The problems pile up for PM May, social care costs, housing, BREXIT dither,NHS underfunding & falling living standards #Torysfailing 
'#Brexit could cost 200,000 City jobs without transitional deal!'Project Fear fake stories again?Oh, poor bankers! 
Confused about #Brexit? @JonathanPieNews explains the whole thing in just two minutes!Catch all of #TheYearly on @abciview 
NEWS! Brexit Bus receives Golden Globe nomination for ‘Best Special Effect’  
There should be no debate on hard or soft Brexit. This is just a delaying tactic.  
U.K. job numbers fall in sign of softening post-Brexit labor market  
Remainers trying to prevent #Brexit by making Britain’s negotiating position as weak as possible   
#Brexit does not mean the end to all migration just that we control it. #SNP needs to understand the distinction #Holyrood 
The arrogance of Brits, live in Spain under EU treaty rights, vote for Brexit, act surprised at consequences  
Unemployment at 10-year record low with wage growth rising.Where's this "immediate and profound shock"? #Brexit  
Britons in Spain fret over health care, may come home after Brexit  
Labour will guarantee pensioner incomes beyond Brexit.  
Labour MP claims Russian president interfered in Brexit referendum  #Russia #Brexit  
2016: First we had Brexit, then Trump triumph, then Italian rebellion. Democracy & the rebirth of the nation state!  
BREAKING NEWS: EU in disarray as MEPs threaten to start their OWN Brexit talks with UK  
Theresa May needs to stop dithering on Brexit. It's been six months since we voted for our liberation and we're being dictated to.  
Number of people in work in Britain drops by 6,000 as jobs market shows signs of weakness  
BREAKING: Britain's employment falls for first time in more than a year  
2016: First we had the Brexit deliverance, then the Trump triumph, then the Italian rebellion. Democracy & the rebirth of the nation state!  
Madrid becomes the latest city to roll out the red carpet for London-based institutions seeking a post-Brexit home  
Farage: "Theresa May should stop dithering on Brexit. It's been six months since we voted for our liberation"  
Few survived Brexit unscathed, save @NicolaSturgeon—a paradigm of political strength amid chaos.  #GlobalThinkers 
Must-read on #Brexit: A bit pessimistic yet totally realistic take by @alexstubb on what lies ahead for Britain & EU  
Deranged. Unhinged Labour MP claims it's 'highly probable' Russia interfered with Brexit referendum |  Independent  
EU Cmttee says all EU citizenship rights need to be protected after #Brexit:  
My FT column on #Brexit. Which is the best Brexit option: soft, hard or cliff edge?  via FT 
"We can fall back on WTO rules if we leave the European customs union" (hard #brexit). Turns out it ain't so simple: 
My new toon: "Cakexit".  Thanks to all who RT! :) My cockles suitably warmed by each click.  #Brexit #BrexitMeansBrexit #Brexitshambles pic.twitter.com/2dP14FQ78k 
Great read. What happens when your MP is Theresa May and you get to discuss Brexit in an MP surgery with her.  
The cabinet’s Brexit planning meetings are going well then.  
This is for real: An MP is so unconvinced the British people actually wanted to leave the EU, he's blaming Brexit on Russian cyberwarfare  
talking to Whitehall contacts view is a) weakest Cabinet for years; b) most have no idea about Brexit; c) Davis... 
"Urgent Brexit transition deal needed to avert banking job losses, peers warn." The EU really won't be in a hurry.  
Jo Maugham hits the nail squarely on the head: if the #Brexit hammer falls, gov will respond to suffering with "too late to turn back now "  
Life inside the Brexit committee, by @SamCoatesTimes. Fascinating and kind of alarming  (£) 
. @RCorbettMEP Thank you Richard for your continued fight against Brexit.  
Damn you, Brexit! *shakes fist*  
Parliament reverses referendum vote - EU immigration deal to keep market access - Switzerland - #Brexit UK next?   
Never mind Brexit. Britons are outraged over Prime Minister Theresa May's $1,250 leather pants.  
British Member Of Parliament Accuses Russia Of Manipulating Brexit Vote  
"Brexit Uncertainties Threaten Brain Drain for UK Science" (but it's not just talent leaving - big prob recruiting)  
Just let EU citizens know they can stay after Brexit, House of Lords panel tells Theresa May  
.@BorisJohnson: 'I would like to ask Keir Starmer why he is seeking to frustrate the will of the people?' #Brexit  
Like Brexit & Trump the brutal fall of Aleppo is another humiliating  milestone in the retreat of Western (especially European) power. 
Five Civil Service departments most affected by Brexit already under pressure by 20% headcount reduction since 2010  
Andrea complains if tone is too negative. Liam speaks "expansively" about world affairs. Inside Brexit committee 
As @DexEUgov ask Civil Service for post-Brexit budgets, left hand doesn't have a clue about what the right hand is planning to do..via @FT 
- @FT letter writer on Brexit and the difference between cake and pie   
Here is the recording of my evidence on Gibraltar/Brexit before @LordsEUCom 
6 months after the Brexit vote, it's looking quite messy. Here's where things stand  
Russian hackers 'probably influenced Brexit vote',  Labour MP says   
More good #Brexit news. Still, Leavers’ aspirations appear to be a race to the bottom, so it’s all going to plan. 
EU leaders want to start Brexit talks as Remainers drag their feet. Mrs May, don't delay! Pull us out right away! 
Call for 'unilateral' Brexit guarantee for EU citizens  
Recession BrexitTrump MMM An actual National Team carrying placards. 2016, you win!  
New Lords report warns urgent Brexit deal needed to avert 10s of 1000s of banking job losses to Europe next year.  
If any policy illustrates the stupidity of Brexit it's the idiotic treatment of international students.  
Let's not forget that Tony Blair said that he would be working, behind the scenes, to stop #Brexit & @jeremycorbyn#Article50NOW #Article50 
UK lawmaker @BenPBradshaw says Russia's interference in #Brexit referendum 'highly probable'  
By its tactless & inept approach the #May government is making a hard #Brexit more likely. Particularly its failure to protect EU nationals. 
in support of #Brexit our cousins across the pond, we stand with you!! #Trump #ThankYouTour2016  
They have everything to lose. Austerity has been imposed by Tories not EU & cost of Brexit will add years more. Inflation is on the up too.  
Post-Brexit, @ASOS Is Hiring 1,500 Employees:  
Russian Conspiracy Theory Spreads To U.K Parliament – Putin Now Blamed For Brexit…  
Stop comparing Italy’s referendum to Brexit and Trump. Here’s what it’s really about @alemannoEU  
Brexit: a broken system - for those in search of solutions, Parliament is not the place to look ...  #Brexit.  
Brexit goes global:  How @DanielJHannan is creating a movement to win the argument for free markets across the world: 
Reindeer names for 2016:  Dabber, Tinder, Hunter, Brexit, Headdesk, Uber, Basic,  Staywoke the No Chill Reindeer 
25) Ironically, Russia’s pro-Assad bombing drives more refugees to EU which helps Russia destabilize EU further, esp. given Brexit 
Hammond admits Brexit will take too long - and be too expensive - for Britain to stick to the Article 50 timeline 
Secrecy is damaging PM Theresa May's Brexit preparations, say Whitehall experts  
It's a shame to hear that PBP have fallen outta love with Arlene so soon after campaigning together for Brexit. 
We're sending the Browns, Rams, and Jags to London next year. England expects this will cause a second Brexit. 
Remoaner SAVAGED by Brexit backers for 'CRAZY' claims Russian hackers SWAYED EU referendum  
As Brexit approaches, signs of a gathering economic storm for Britain  
My Solidarity with #Brexit #Britain #UK#London @Nigel_Farage #Trump #ThankYouTour2016 #GrandRapids #Michigan 
Just published: @LordsEUCom report on EU citizens in UK after Brexit. Many excellent suggestions including this one:  
Self destruction: Biggest #Brexit vote where British business declined most. Now set to decline even more rapidly  
-Two out of five US firms consider leaving UK in Brexit aftermathThat's 40%.... Well done Brexiters!#BrExodus 
Russian hackers 'probably swayed Brexit vote'  why didn't we think of this earlier #NewWorldNextWeek 
May really must now tell the British people what the Head of MI6 has told her about Russian interference in brexit 
So now mass murder in Syria is all Brexit's fault too! Who'd have guessed that one?  
Or - what? Is this 'do what I want or I'll hold my breath'? Nothing less than rejection of #Brexit will do.  
Remember when the UK public got so paranoid they might have to help Syrians they freaked out and voted for Brexit to close the borders? 
 We kept saying it. An English nationalist inspired Brexit will send Northern Ireland into abyss. #blame 
Brexit means, apparently, we ignore everything else in the world that might be of any importance because of our own insecurity and arrogance  
Labour must fight the battle of our times over hard Brexit: our values must prevail, not a race to the bottom.   
#Newsnight Russia blamed for everything frm Brexit 2 US election? Wake up #bbc and look at history ur arrogance and ignorance is astounding 
Russian hackers 'probably swayed Brexit vote', says Ben Bradshaw MP.Next photoshop better have Putin jumping sharks 
Veteran eurosceptic launches astonishing tirade against EU WARMONGERING over Brexit  
With his 'Breaking Point' poster Farage ruthlessly exploited the suffering of Syria's people caused by his ally Putin.#Remain #Brexit  
Looking forward to hearing from the Secretary of State tomorrow about his views on Scotland and Brexit.  
Does Brexit mean we dare not levy stringent sanctions against Russia for her war crimes in Syria? Watch this space! 
Russian hackers 'probably swayed Brexit vote', says Ben Bradshaw MP  our red white and blue #Brexit Mrs May?    
hard brexit will destroy economy. No brexit will anger kippers. Any brexit will anger UK majority who didn't vote for it. 
RALLYING CALL: Scathing letter calls for clean Brexit break to save households £500 a year  
ALL WE WANT FOR CHRISTMAS IS JUSTICE FOR MARINE A 
He wants you to remain in the single market and the EU 
Watching the nodding anti-Corbyn MPs faces turn ashen when Ben Bradshaw blamed Russia for Brexit was quite amusing though. Isolated. Good. 
#Brexit be damned, London Mayor @SadiqKhan is urging his city to embrace foreign workers. #GlobalThinkers  
This is Brexit: tens of thousands banking jobs lost if no quick deal.Tomorrow's Guardian  
SaudiArabia is financing the spread of Islam, to destroy Europe from within. The #EU has betrayed us all.#Brexit  
#Labour #Starmer have ratted on EU free Movement on top of backing Tories on #Brexit . How low will they sink chasing the UKIP bandwagon?  
Exactly, Remain Positive. Brexit really isn't a fait accompli; it's a serious misjudgement which will be corrected => brighter future ahead.  
Watching Love Actually now. Feels very strange post-Brexit. The crumbled ruins of Curtis's cosy, millennial Britain playing out on ITV2. 
I've said it before & I'll say it again: @theresa_may CANNOT deliver a #Brexit that won't displease majority of #Tory party & the country 
Just 5 per cent of people think they will be financially better off after Brexit  
The EU is a hard negotiator - the Swiss cannot have their cake & eat itNext in line: #Brexit Britain  
Christian Wolmar: We don’t have to abide by referendum result if we believe Brexit will be a disaster for country.  
Russian hackers "probably" swayed EU referendum vote in favour of Brexit, former Labour minister claims in Commons  
BREAKING NEWS: US Election and Brexit hacker identified. Known simple as "Edward". More as the story develops!  
86% there! Pls chip in! Make sure every MP gets @IanDunt's important Brexit book for Xmas (many clearly need it)  
Furious Farage accuses Government of 'backsliding' Brexit by considering transitional deal  
Parliament is being overruled by an “advisory” popular plebiscite. Let’s not allow this to happen.Stop “#Brexit” for good! #Remain 
Journalists write I've changed mind on Brexit (voted Remain). Untrue. I simply say, country voted Leave, so MPs must respect result & Brexit 
Labour claims the Russians were behind Brexit. Next week they'll reveal China is digging its way to the earth's core to switch off gravity.  
MSM continue to try to:1 Derail #Brexit for Brits2 Derail #Trump for Americans3 Assist #Soros on global migrant crisisStooges of Elite. 
If Brexit goes ahead Theresa May, who couldn't be arsed to be in the #AleppoDebate, will drag us into bed with #PutinGimp Trump. Hideous 
When you voted to #Brexit on June 23rd, did you mean that the UK should; 
.DUTCH PEOPLE You have 3 mths to get organized on Social Media to win back your world. We did for Brexit & for Trump. HOLLAND IS next. DM me  
.@Marine2017_Off @MLP_officielRT #Marine2017  & show support!#MAGA #Trump#DrainTheSwamp#France #MarineLePen#FREXIT #BREXIT #MFGA#MEGA 
Sums up what UK science stands to lose from Brexit: this ERC round alone €120million for cutting edge science @Scientists4EU 
Russian hackers 'probably' swayed the EU referendum vote for Brexit, says Remoaner MP  
The Russians did it.   #Brexit  
Banking jobs in London generate significant amount of tax, paying for public services. Brexit puts this at risk. 
.@BenPBradshaw: "Highly probable" the Russians were behind Brexit.If you weren't yet convinced, here's Labour officially losing the plot.  
How ridiculous! Only a Labour MP could blame #Brexit on Russia. Labour have seriously lost the plot... 
No Brexit, no racism, no facism, no uncertainty, no free falling pound, no exodus. No bloody Brexit.  
Wales told not to expect same level of funding as it got from the EU after voting Brexit  
I think the rest of EU really has more important things to discuss than Brexit. Their position is clear. It's the UK who doesn't have a plan  
Most Brexiters are not racist, but without the votes of racists #Leave would almost certainly have lost. #Brexit tarred with racism#Remain 
If Brexit had been voted for on basis of 6+ careful, considered, forensic cost-benefit studies, based on truth, I'd accept it #Butitwasnt 
LISTEN: 'We're seeing backsliding on Brexit', says @Nigel_Farage, speaking to @BBCWorldatOne. 
Give me a break! What about the Brexit Fairies that came out on full moon in June?  Ruskies in the voting cubicles? It's pathetic. 
Taking a bit of a break from this account (Brexit book etc), now A50 appeal over.  For links to my own posts, follow @DavidAllenGreen. 
Russian hackers 'probably swayed Brexit vote', says Ben Bradshaw MP  
Fast coming to the conclusion that the PM should have a reshuffle. Mischief going on. Hammond first for the exit door. Brexit means Brexit 
Great pleasure to be with our Irish Labour colleagues in Dublin tonight discussing Brexit and looking forward to hearing @BrendanHowlin 
Sharpest of sharp-eyed observers of Euro politics @cjbickerton explains why Brexit is only the tip of the iceberg  
Urgent Brexit deal needed to avert banking job losses, peers to warn | Politics | The Guardian  
Brexit reality:Tens of thousands of banking jobs lost if UK can't get transitional deal - scathing Lords report 
Nigel Farage has warned of "backsliding" on Brexit amid talk of transitional arrangements with the EU.  
Farage is no patriot. He is the supporter of a foreign power, Russia, which is trying to destroy our democracy.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Tonight we have a bad Brexit tat & the WORST celeb portrait we’ve ever seen. See you at 9 #TattooFixers #TattooTuesday 
So @Nick_Clegg now says he wants a Norway  model for post-Brexit Britain... but would that mean that the UK takes back control?  
The British Army working together with British Muslims and Mosques. Respect. THIS is our Britain, not the Britain of hate and Brexit.  
Brexit: UK food prices will rise unless Government can keep 'essential' EU workers...  
Ben Bradshaw a Labour MP has just said in parliament that the Russians manipulated the Brexit referendum. I really don't know what to say 
.@Charli_XCX Reviews 2016. We asked the pop star about Brexit, @TheChainsmokers, Pokémon GO, @Rihanna's ANTI, & more  
'Highly probable' that Russia interfered in Brexit referendum, Labour MP says  
Interesting argument. Contrary French won't go populist now that Brexit, Trump make it look like anglo-saxon trend  
Tate and Lyle Sugars: Brexit is a "golden opportunity" for growth and investment.  
Five on Brexit Island secures second place in this week's chart:  (£) 
"The Death of British Business" – NY Review of Books not pulling many punches re Brexit, then  via @Dr_Aust_PhD 
Migration the problem for Wales, not immigration, says @LeanneWoodWe can't ignore an issue which loomed large in #Brexit, @fmwales replies 
Hard or soft? Fast or slow? We're coming at Brexit from the wrong end argues David Runciman  
The head of MI6 says Russia's meddling is a threat to our sovereignty. Farage is an ally of Russia.Who are the traitors?#Remain #Brexit 
Now LEGO confirms it is also raising prices thanks to Brexit. The good news keeps coming!  
Jeremy Hunt: "It was Brexit that prompted me to look at the number of doctors we are training"Really Jeremy? Anything else? 
Only official discussion of Brexit at EU Council will be at dinner after the summit, when PM won't be in the room 
So it seems Russia was behind globalisation, austerity and the right wing media's vilification of migrants-not the tories Diabolical #brexit  
British MP: Russian intel may have also heavily influenced Brexit.  <- Nigel Farage got a show on RT right after. 
The bogey man really is getting about. #Russia interfered in the EU referendum campaign, claims #Labour MP . #Brexit  
Brexit is as bad for the U.K. as Trumpelthinskin is to the US..#decline 
Brexit could enrich Britain - and the world  via @CapX 
Migration, defence policy, Ukraine AA/DCFTA and economy to be discussed at #EUCO. #Brexit during EU27 dinner:  
We're seeing backsliding on Brexit.  
There's a current of belligerent English nationalism in Brexit that has to be out flanked by civic empowerment 
.@JimDeMint on what the rise of Trump and Brexit have in common: "People wanted their country back."  
Labour must fight Brexit. Full stop.  
PM says there  will be no 'cliff edge' as Labour warns on hard Brexit  
John McDonnell just gave a stark warning about the government’s latest Brexit brainwave [VIDEO]  #brexit 
Remainer @RupertMyers is "embarrassed" by @JolyonMaugham's "grubby plan" to take Brexit legal battle to the CJEU.  
As we rightly condemn the vacuum of Western leadership in #Syria we should also acknowledge how Brexit emboldened Russia. 
Few survived #Brexit unscathed, save @NicolaSturgeon — an island of political strength amid chaos. #GlobalThinkers  
So actually Mr Starmer, Labour IS fighting against Brexit. However you dress it up you're lying through your teeth as usual. We'll remember.  
We don't know what Tillerson thinks about Putin, Rouhani, Assad, US-China, ISIS fight, Brexit, America's role in the world--nothing, zip. 
The same logic was employed to campaign for Brexit: NHS benefits will improve if we can kick all those immigrants out of the system. 
Don't give up hope of defeating #Brexit. In addition to our challenging it, Brexit is busy defeating itself too.  
Over 60 MPs step up demands for 'hard Brexit' and savage EU for adding £500 to household bills  
British voters should have a say on whether any rights they now have are not protected in the final Brexit deal says Bns @SarahLudford 
If Labour were a real opposition fighting in the UK's real interests, it would oppose #Brexit.  
'Democracy is for people, not MPs' - Dorking Brexit campaigner  100%AGREE IT ISN'T 
"Unions have had their day, Beryl, we're all on team Brexit now. Strikes are treason, the 52% have spoken!" @HealeyCartoons 
My piece for @LabourList . Don't lead us to disastrous Brexit  
The #EU has the potential to be the most powerful area of the world, good job we are leaving, who wants to be powerful and safe. Doh #Brexit 
So how exactly does triggering #Article50 & leaving the #EU work? RT:  #Brexit #PoliticsExplained 
Labour must fight 'battle of our times' over hard Brexit, says Keir Starmer  
honesty is a one shot deal -when intelligence lied to us to start a war, it destroyed our confidence in them. Bit like experts & Brexit  
Bought with Amazon vouchers provided by my Brexit voting Dad for my birthday. I think he'd approve. @IanDunt 
Fair play #NicolaSturgeon. This time last year I couldn't stand her. Now she's a hero of mine. 2016 eh?#Brexit #SNP 
In the age of Brexit and Trump we need to sharpen and weaponise our approach to consuming culture:  
I remember various dodgy stories about EU putting up cost of Sunday lunch..seems Brexit might do it for real.  
Pressure on Government to deliver hard-Brexit we voted for 
EU nationals and Brexit: securing your future in the UK    Public Meeting, Cambridge, 11 Jan @Scientists4EU please RT 
As 2016 comes to an end three dates to remember1. Feb 12 (Nifty made bottom)2. June 24 (Brexit)3. Nov 08 (Demonetization + Trump Victory) 
Let me tell how you this completely unrelated game is analogous to Donald Trump and Brexit.Fuck off. 
Why is @Nigel_Farage on #WATO ? Who is he to speak about #Brexit? He has no mandate he is a failed politician @BBCNews giving oxygen to him 
Agree but just watch the measures that will be brought into play to stop her. BrExit scare tactics will seem insignificant.  
A voice missing from the Brexit debate is the one that says that freedom of movement is a good thing, not just economically. And it is! 
Dear Prime Minister,Please put Chris Grayling in charge of making Brexit happen.Yours,Remainers. 
"All I want for Xmas is mass youth unemployment & an undemocratic superstate" wouldn't fit on the T shirt #brexit  
London should Brexit these matchups.  
.@TimFarron responds to Keir Starmer speech. Labour and the Tories are holding hands on path to Brexit  
Another #Brexit-eer getting worried that dire reality of #Brexit is swinging things #Hammond's way in government. Really encouraging. 
Why a slow Brexit would be a political headache for Theresa May. By @georgeeaton  
The EU Parliament's Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt discusses the timetable for UK's exit.  
Keir Starmer wrong to say UK more divided since Brexit vote. It always was divided.Referendum just revealed the views of the usually ignored 
Because of the poorly run campaigns, the lies and the hate, I think the rip in the fabric of society will take decades to repair. #Brexit  
Brexit: An unorthodox view – a Guardian Live event, 27th January 2017  
This is the battle of our times: Labour will fight against a Hard Brexit – Keir Starmer  
More people worried about low interest rates than Brexit. Quite right too.  
Here are Starmer's Five tests for the Brexit Plan:  
We discussed Turkish UK relations in the aftermath of Brexit in the House of Commons #Turkey #UK 
Labour will make jobs, the economy & living standards the priority for Brexit negotiations. Watch @Keir_Starmer now:  
Keir Starmer attacks Cameron, says he oversaw "one of the greatest derelictions of duty of a British government in modern times" #Brexit 
Catching up with my 2 favourite MPs @telliott_UUP @DdeBK @ Westminster during @CPA_UK Discussion Series - Women & Brexit #London 
Theresa May’s Brexit confusion reaches fever pitch as her party descends into chaos  #Brexit 
"Conservative Party failed to act in national interest by not planning for Brexit...& again by serving interests of just one side of divide" 
What is the point in Keir Starmer? Basically a Gov spokesman now; Labour back Gov on Brexit & have given them a blank cheque on the details 
WATCH: @JohnRedwood blasts those slowing down Brexit and urges them to stop moaning about the perceived problems and start being optimistic.  
From Trump to Brexit, power has leaked from cities to the countryside | Andy Beckett  
Excellent lecture on "The Democratic Duty to Oppose Brexit", by Albert Weale, Emeritus Professor of Political Theory  
I’ll be speaking on Facebook Live today at 12:30, about how Brexit is the battle of our time – set a reminder now:  
Brexit boost: Britain’s largest online-only fashion retailer plans to double its UK manufacturing, hiring an additional 1,500 employees  
2 year old granddaughter has just calmly removed reindeer costume & walked out of nursery Nativity. Future #brexit negotiator? 
If Labour were serious about opposing a hard Brexit it would not have voted to trigger Article 50 by March  
EU chief Brexit negotiator says return to hard border between NI and the Republic would be big problem politically & a disaster economically  
Brexit - let's take back controooolwhoahHHH....  
Leaked email says @Virgin boss is helping to fund Tony Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
Turns out #Leave voters don't want to pay, they just want #Brexit like a spoilt child who wants a pony for Christmas  
"#Brexit is short term pain long term gain" says @UKIP leader @paulnuttallukip & urges @theresa_may to use @Nigel_Farage in UK-US relations 
Powerful @chakrabortty on #Brexit fraud of 'take back control' when rigged capitalism continues unabated.  
The Lords' latest report politely and thoughtfully demolishes the case for #brexit and proposes many sensible ways of limiting the damage.  
Ex-Remain #EdVaizey doesn't call leaving the #SingleMarket and the #CustomsUnion a 'Hard' Brexit, it's just #Brexit.  
This plan to block Brexit using European law is dangerous nonsense – and I voted Remain  
It's true! This is me hacking Brexit  
£650 million is lost in tax avoidance and evasion every week. Let's fund our NHS instead.Let's put that message on a bus.#Brexit 
@IanDunt is right, we should and they can. V hard to construct any credible Brexit scenario not leading to national impoverishment.  
From Nature piece on threat of Brexit brain drain:  
March of the free trade frauds #Brexit  
Madrid becomes the latest city to roll out the red carpet for London-based institutions seeking a post-Brexit home  
.@anna_soubry on the #Today programme: to avoid falling off the #Brexit cliff-edge, our economy needs a transitional deal  
EU Wants Brexit Talks ‘As Quickly As Possible’  
Petition: Do Not Grant An Amnesty To allow illegal immigrants to remain after Brexit  
EVERY VIDEOGAME WRITER WHO BRINGS UP TRUMP OR BREXIT NEEDS TO BE LOCKED IN A DUNGEON AND FORCED TO PLAY OMIKRON  
"How will Christmas dinner be different after Brexit?""No Brussels" 
Brexit must mean end to free movement as we voted for in the Referendum 
A compassionate #brexiter taking responsibility for the #brexit lies that convinced the decent and the kind to vote for £350M for the NHS.  
So I finally joined the Lib Dems today. tl:dr: Labour didn't want me, I can't believe in fighting Brexit, for Syria, in politics and not. 
Inflation continues to rise - we'll be paying more in the shops thanks to Brexit #LeaveWatch 
#Brexiters on social media mock the ordinary and the decent for believing the £350M lies.Tells you what kind of world #brexit would be.  
Brexit: An unorthodox view by three DiEM25rs - Srecko Horvat, Elif Shafak & Yanis Varoufakis, 27/1/2017  
Brexit means - 'Slow Brexit'. We've gone from Instant to Slow Brexit. How about No Brexit!  #brexitshambles #brexit  
When May took office she firmly believed there would be a brexit. Then she met the real people who run the country and they put her right. 
#Labour,If you think you represent the liberal elites, by all means, block #Brexit!Just.. Kiss you seats goodbye! 
REVEALED: Latest Brexit Challenge Launched by Tax Dodge, Pro-EU, Celeb Lawyer  
UK inflation hits a two-year high as Brexit price rises start to bite pic.twitter.com/q7HBPBHfRx 
Here's our favourite festive design projects, including Christmas tree installations and Brexit-themed crackers: 
#Brexit'ers react to news that inflation has jumped, following their daft decision to leave the #EU#Inflation #LaLaLa #ImNotListening 
And on other side, Keir Starmer has also emerged as a voice of reason in the Brexit debate: 
Hammond has really emerged as a sensible voice in the Brexit debate: 
Veteran eurosceptic launches astonishing tirade against EU WARMONGERING over Brexit  
The relative media/political indifference to Aleppo all of a piece with Brexit, Trump, nationalism - turn back on the world, let Putin play 
Another LSE colleague just told me he's leaving UK, worried about Brexit & higher ed future. Where are "Liberal leavers", eg. @toadmeister? 
Remember when those incredibly passionate Welsh sports fans who loathe England rugby voted to become part of Little England?Lols#Brexit 
WATCH: Ex-Remain campaigner, @EdVaizey doesn't call leaving the Single Market and the Customs Union a 'Hard' Brexit, it's just Brexit.  
Treasury attempting to hijack Brexit policy making? Note Treasury official Tom Scholar is an uber Europhile   
Hammond: Delay Brexit for risks to financial stability  #Brexit  
2016 has been a bad year for the EU: migration crisis, rising nationalism and #brexit. Let’s change this in 2017. #iameuropean 
Hammond favours Brexit transition. Inch by inch the reality based community prevails over fantasy  
This is worth reposting now: most of Leave's leading lights said we'd remain in the Single Market after Brexit.  
Ooh,  inflation up, rail strikes, post office strikes, £1.7tn debt, Brexit shambles. Welcome to @RuthDavidsonMSP Tory party @ScotTories 
Before we're all bombarded by the Remoaning MSM meltdown over inflation, here's a helpful 10-year chart. #Brexit  
Hammond seems to be the only person in May's cabinet who has an inkling of the mess UK will be in post-#Brexit  
The indecision from Downing Street combined with the "transition" messaging from her praetorian guard suggests #Brexit is being downgraded 
Jump in inflation to 1.2% was more than economists had forecast  
If Brexit vote were subject to the same 40% rule imposed during the 1979 Devolution Referendum; they would have lost. Brexit vote was 37%  ! 
BREAKING: Britain's inflation accelerates to highest in more than 2 years  
#Immigration is a smoke screen while #Brexit govt sells off assets to international corporations,says @chakrabortty 
READ: Brexit can enrich not just Britain, but the world. | @ShankerASingham @CapX 
All you Brexit folk shouting "No Brussels" because you think it's undemocratic and un-elected: Your voting produces all the key positions  
Labour will fight to stop a 'hard' Brexit, says Starmer - Politics live  
New #Brexit cartoon: "350".Thanks to @HealthierIn for the inspiration!#BrexitShambles #NHS 
LI's @ShankerASingham outlines the opportunities that #Brexit can bring whilst recognising the concerns via @CapX  
yes, actually, Sharon, they did vote to be poorer. there is no plausible brexit scenario that does not hurt them.  
Brexit campaigner Boris Johnson tells us what Brexit really means  
For anyone looking for a more thorough introduction to the various post-#Brexit trade options - here's the @LordsEUCom report 
Man who invented term "Brexit" brings Brexit case against government Brexit department. 'Coz, y'know... it's 2016  
Brexit = catastrophic error of judgement, a sentence to decades of uncertainty, fear & hatred; retaining EU citizenship gives a ray of hope.  
I know little in life. But I do know small/med business. I'd go as far as to say I'm an expert with 30 years experience. Hard Brexit insane.  
"Have you been a victim of Brexit mis-selling? We're here to help with your claim. Call 0845 ..."  
Farage: “If Govt. Don’t Deliver Brexit, I’ll Be Back In Politics” @LBC 
This is actually the first formal meeting of countries wanting to trade with post Brexit Britain...even Liam Fox failed to turn up  
Dont ease Brexit, cease Brexit @PHammondMP  
Just 5 per cent of people think they will be financially better off after Brexit  
London has already lost its leadership in at least one important area  
Phew! Just finished @IanDunt's dystopian novel "Brexit: What the hell happens now?". Worse than "A clockwork orange"  
I think of Brexit as the biggest con ever perpetrated on the British people. Leave campaign outright lies 
After Brexit, we should a) "remove all tariffs on food" & b) "protect strategic industries, including agriculture"   
Dear @Theresa_may, you need to have a word with #PhilipHammond, he is a Remainer and it shows. We voted Brexit now! 
What did May discuss with Murdoch in New York? Why did she meet him? Did she do a deal over Sky? Over Leveson? Over Brexit?Over tax? 
May's government think they can negotiate Brexit when they can't even get a train to travel between Brighton & London #southernstrike 
Art 50 author confirms that #Brexit is not inevitable, a re-think is possible even after negotiations of terms :  
2 years may not be enough to seal the deal - plus the rest of Tuesday's Brexit headlines  
Most political statements about Brexit presuppose that the UK will get things just because we want them.  
Britain faces block from world trade after Brexit  
Alastair Campbell says the public should have a choice on “this ridiculous ideological hard Brexit”  
what they are saying, ever-so politely, is that the UK gov is utterly clueless, has no plan, and is leading the country over a cliff #brexit  
The mad EU plot to give citizenship to Brits after Brexit has already been rubbished. They need to get serious. 
I am an EU citizen and want to stay that way, with all the attendant rights. That's why I fight the lunacy of  #Brexit.  
Shameless Ken Clarke warns MAY PM will be OUSTED if she pushes HARD BREXIT CRAP, VOTERS WILL GET RID IF SHE DOESNT  
Brexit could enrich Britain - and the world, writes @ShankerASingham  
Won't get over itWon't accept itYou won an undeliverable ideaBrexit can't and won't workYou will be worse offForget it  
Brexit: negotiating out of EU is unprecedented task and govt isn't up to it - scathing Lords report  
We're a country that can't even decide who closes train doors.We're gonna smash that Brexit negotiation.  
EU wants Brexit talks to "proceed swiftly" after Article 50 triggered, draft statement says  
Immigration WAS the key issue for Brexit voters in EU referendum, analysis shows  
'Oh dear oh dear!' – @Nigel_Farage left raging after @PHammondMP hints at 'transitional' Brexit deal  
Scathing Lords report accuses naive Govt of misunderstanding nature of free trade, questions Govt's Brexit ability.  
No one, not even the government, is talking about an economic bonanza post #Brexit only about limiting the damage. Time to think again. 
What Brexit? UK hiring is about to increase to its highest in three years  
A Brexit betrayal is coming – but who will get the blame? | Aditya Chakrabortty  
The Great British Benefits Balls Ups: EU tightening welfare rules - and would have done so before without Brexit  
In our post Brexit insularity we forget that Israel is yet another state where the lunatics are gaining upper hand  
Christmas cracker gag winner: "How will Christmas dinner be different after Brexit? No Brussels"  
Obama tried to tamper w Israel's election - FAILED!Tried to tamper w Brexit - FAILED!Now he tampers w/ big league US election & will FAIL! 
Bigger than Brexit? The @westernbulldogs proved to be popular off field this season. 
UK naive to expect easy ride in Brexit trade talks, says Lords report  
Keir Starmer warns against a hard Brexit. He seems to be trying to fight the Brexit referendum all over again. 
Philip Hammond says the UK's future relationship with the EU may not be fully determined by the deadline for Brexit  
Big year for Russia: Brexit + Trump 
Joke about post-Brexit Christmas dinners lacking Brussels sprouts is chosen as best modern festive cracker gag  
The dramatic unseating of Zac Goldsmith owed much to the politics of Brexit  
The @BBC has long been the antithesis of balance & truth, & we took refuge in @SkyNews' coverage. But Sky's Brexit bias is now CNN-esque... 
London's music venues are disappearing faster than Brexit supporters  via @WritersofColour 
International #Banks Threatening #Britain to Slow Down #Brexit  @CryptoCoinsNews 
Will naming my paper on Brexit "Should I stay or should I go? The Clash over the European Union" get me in trouble? 
Harvard Prof. Niall Ferguson writes, "I was wrong on Brexit."  
EU nationals living in the UK before Brexit should be allowed to stay, expert panel says  
Nigel Farage due to 'travel to US where he is likely to meet Donald Trump' again  via @trump_woman #Brexit #Trump 
Cost of Christmas rises with Brexit expected to hit inflation  
Brexit growth warning for UK as lobby group says 'business as usual' approach can't last  
DMGT (Daily Mail) reporting 7% fall in profits: "further profit risk from Brexit" That's what happens when you shoot yourself in the foot. 
UK naive to expect easy ride in Brexit trade talks, says Lords report  
Brexit: 'Clear plan' for interim deal needed, say peers  
Doesn't have to be England's loss. UK can still reverse #Brexit with another ref in 2 yrs time on the final deal. It's ok to change ur mind  
#Brexit be damned, London Mayor @SadiqKhan is urging his city to embrace foreign workers. #GlobalThinkers  
how many levels of brexit are you onmaybe 5 or 6 my friendyou are a baby. watch this***continental shelf shatters* 
Immigration WAS the key issue for Brexit supporters in EU referendum, analysis shows  
Yes let's get #Brexit it done before the punters realize they've been conned into voting for a tax haven. #Remain #YesEU 
EXCLUSIVE: ATIP docs reveal Trudeau govt interfered in #Brexit, reports @VanCity_Chris:  | #UK #cdnpoli 
The elitists attempting to obstruct brexit in the UK need to be dealt with. We have had years of their b******* and we're not needing more. 
Jammeh rejects poll result, Clinton won't accept US results, UK MPs deny Brexit etc. Fela Kuti calls it Democrazy  
I don't remember the media being this upset when Obama tried to interfere with Israel and Brexit elections. #Weird h/t @QCExaminer 
Just 5 per cent of people think they will be financially better off after Brexit  
From Brexit to brand rehab to virtual reality, all the big developments in 2016 offer us lessons for 2017.  
We don't want to be citizens of a bureaucratic federalist state- that's exactly why we are leaving. #brexit  
To those looking in from outside the UK - yes, thanks to Brexit we are going quite mad in this country  
Brexit Metaphor  
House of Lords report on Ireland urges #brexit bilateral agreement on movement of people, goods & services. Eh, also known as EU membership! 
I suspect Brexit only works if it is the catalyst to destroy the EU. But that benefits no one. Except China. Reform from within is better. 
The number of people who regret voting for #brexit is greater than the margin of victory for Leave  via @bi_politics 
What on earth prompted me to take the side of Remain in the UK referendum on EU membership? My Brexit confession.  
#Brexit be damned, London Mayor @SadiqKhan is urging his city to embrace foreign workers. #GlobalThinkers  
I know we're supposed to ignore 'experts' but when there isn't any professional body which is in favour of #Brexit shouldn't we take notice? 
Brexitannia is one of the safest holiday destinations in the world - unless you're lard intolerant or foreign. 
Tory division grows as Chancellor backs plan to ease Brexit  
No Brexit is a good Brexit, a good Brexit is no Brexit.  
#BrexitPapers: Chair of @thebarcouncil says Brexit most "profound legal & constitutional challenge in living memory"  
Brexit was about decades of inequality, not immigration. See the stats  
European citizens living in UK should remain under jurisdiction of EU law after Brexit. WHAT??? More betrayal   
If Putin wanted to influence the election, all he had to do was go on TV & tell Americans not to vote for Hillary; like Obama did in #Brexit 
Brexit: Majority now want to remain in EU, Poll Finds -  
It is difficult to call this anything else than the conscious destruction of a world-class university system.#Brexit  
-Ireland is NOT going to clean up May & Corbyn's Brexit mess#Remain 
People in Sleaford voted for more of this, on a Brexit ticket. Tory mind bending  
Why on earth did people listen to politicians on this, instead of health experts who were all saying £350m was lie & Brexit is bad for NHS?!  
What proportion of them now appreciate that the £350m has already been swallowed easily by the costs of Brexit borrowing. Are they angry?  
The people who voted for Brexit carry ID cards around with them at all times. They don't have to but it helps them remember their own names. 
Crikey- there was a lot of naive trust in the £350m-for-NHS lie. Politicians must be held to account. If backlash stops Brexit... good.  
How about all those who voted Brexit based on the £350m NHS bus lie put their hands up. Then we can count again. 52:48 still? I think not.  
#brexit is going to sink all the research in UK -> uncertainties and brain drain for university staff @NatureNews  
Brexit won't happen for another two years? Well, that's plenty of time for a second referendum on Scottish independence. 
THIS is unacceptable. The British govt is perfectly capable of ensuring FULL Brexit within 2 years.  
Barnier Brexit plan leaked: UK should be subject to ECJ post-Brexit.Unprecedented and unnecessaryWith some running commentary from me  
I don't believe #TheresaMay has any intention of delivering us the #Brexit we voted for. It's all about ameliorating our demand by the day. 
Updated reindeer names for 2016:DabberTinderHuntyBrexitHeaddeskUberDonaldBasicStaywoke the No Chill Reindeer 
Forget #Brexit, @politicana and @OwenJones84 are having 2016's most divisive debate 
So turns out Theresa May is a thin-skinned, sleep-deprived, dead-eyed megalomaniac:   #Brexit 
The party leaders most opposed to BREXIT appear to be the most secure in their positions  
.@nicolasturgeon named on list of 2016's 'Global Thinkers' for 'weathering Brexit'  
Mandleson works 2 yrs in #EU & gets £50k pa for life. British citizens work for 45yrs and get pensions cut. #brexit #gravytrain  
VIDEO: Nigel Farage tells @IainDale he'll be back on the "frontline" of UK politics if govt. try to fudge Brexit  
Of course people who live in the UK should be allowed to stay. It’s a no-brainer. Using them as #Brexit bargaining chips is obscene. #C4News 
Most Brexiters are not racist, but without the votes of racists #Leave would almost certainly have lost. #Brexit tarred with racism#Remain 
I'd like to thank Brexit for making my Christmas shopping a lot cheaper. Might as well spread some joy before the Old Gods swallow us all. 
Brexit will undermine London's legal standing, barristers warn  
International students bring in more than £10bn to UK economy.  More #brexit madness  
Brexit is going to dominate the news for years to come, isn't it? How dull. So, in the words of Mariah... All I Want For Christmas Is EU 
All this "Brexit racists" name-calling is harming our global reputation. My @IBTimesUK column.  
From Trump to Brexit, power has leaked from cities to the countryside | Andy Beckett  
The OBR say Brexit will harm UK trade, so we need a plan now to boost exports. Here's my article on @HuffPostUK 
What's really been achieved in 6 months since Brexit vote? UK has lost sense of: identity, common-purpose, belonging, humanity, community..  
I'm so old I can remember when everything was blamed on Brexit. 
Brexit by the numbers: the fear of brain-drain  
UK fisheries minister George Eustice tells fishing reception at Brussels that sustainable fishing will be at the heart of brexit  
#foresthill stabbing was an islamic hate crime when are we going to accept the fact that right wing tabloids are radicalising people #brexit 
It getting to the stage where you have to ask what recourse we have if democracy fails us. #Brexit  
Darling of Remainers Backs Brexit:  
The evidence, much of which I have tweeted shows, # Brexit will not work and cannot work. Leavers have chosen to be deaf, dumb and blind.  
Britons could remain 'associate EU citizens' after Brexit, Number 10 signals  
Who do you blame if can't keep blaming The Tories, Labour, Westminster, Brexit, or even the ex-wife?Well there's a new kid in town to blame  
Thoughtful politicians surely recognise a flawed & divisive project? EU's faults minor compared to Brexit: + prejudice, racism & uncertainty  
Philip Hammond transitional deal to ease Brexit pain- yes it's called # Remain. Brexit=catastrophic upheaval to make us poorer and isolated. 
How can Brexit-government ignore such damage; after all that has been achieved & at an indefinably great human cost?  
#Brexit Means Brexit? UK is facing another legal challenge over single market access  
Philip Hammond calls for post-Brexit transitional deal  
Actually there is a logic to it. Government hopes it will win more votes from thick Brexit voters happy about a fall in immigration figures.  
Nigel Farage "If the govt. don't deliver on Brexit then I'll don my khaki and be back on the frontline of politics"  
Ian Brady has gained media space for his views on Brexit..At times like these I wonder what Harold Shipman would've made of the living wage 
Philip Hammond signals backing for transition period to ease UK's Brexit pain  
Nothing awkward about doing the 'right thing'UK agrees to EU air pollution laws, raising 'awkward' Brexit questions  
Sterling pre Brexit: $1.48Murdoch backs BrexitSterling post Brexit: $1.26Murdoch saves $2.5bn on Sky 
#Brexit, explained in words of few syllables.  
.@timfarron responds to Philip Hammond’s remarks supporting a transitional deal after Brexit  
Netflix getting involved in Brexit negotiations I see  
Let's be clear #brexit won't usher in a new age of socialism but instead a dark age of extreme poverty and the politics of right wing hate.  
#Brexit threat to universities: 43% of prospective students said Brexit had affected their decision to study in UK 
Sky will cost Rupert Murdoch $2.5bn less after Brexit vote  
Politicians have yet to grasp that post June 23 we finally have a large growing vociferous & determined pro-EU movement.#Remain #Brexit 
A watering down of #Brexit was never on the ballot, only LEAVE & it produced a 72% turnout. A straight forward In or OUT. WE voted OUT.  
I wrote for @ModelViewMedia about data literacy problems (eg. during #brexit)+ potential #responsibledata solutions:  
"Smooth" transitional arrangementsEU budget contributionsContinue with EU tariffs at WTOIt's beginning to look not like Brexit... 
The real face of nationalist populism: Government of the rich, by the rich, for the rich. #Brexit #Remain 
This is at the heart of so much of what is going on in Europe with Brexit, etc. and now in America. 5/ 
Britons could remain 'associate EU citizens' after Brexit, Number 10 signals  
Ian Brady on Brexit.  Jesus.Can somebody ask Peter Sutcliffe his thoughts on The Champions League draw? 
"Transitional" arrangements make BEANO a possibility.  That is why hard Brexiteers are wary of them.(Brexit Existing As Name Only)  
Would remove uncertainty for politics & businesses & leverage from Brussels. But hard Brexit lobby made it politically unsayable. 
Whatever economists think, the economy itself doesn’t believe Brexit will make us worse off in the long-term: @CapX 
Boris Johnson: We're going to make a TITANIC success out of BrexitSomeone in the crowd: IT SANK!Absolutely priceless 
Labour falling apart - now top Brexit MP Gisela Stuart steps up to blast Diane Abbott over EU & immigration  
1. Gove and Johnson led the campaign2.  Anti-EU Tories forced the referendum & made Brexit happen3. He was rejected by voters 7 times  
The pound accelerates its gains after Philip Hammond repeats backing for transitional Brexit deal  
Ed do you honestly think any #Brexit deal will be better than staying in the EU?  
Economy grows at best rate all year: Households and businesses defy warnings of a Brexit vote slowdown  
Retweet if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Well done @timfarron for standing up to the hate and lies peddled by the #Brexit billionaire press & their pet politicians.#Remain #YesEU 
Hammond making clear that Vote Leave promises - on timing of #brexit, on customs union - are a fantasy #LeaveWatch 
This week: Ian Brady talks about BrexitNext week: Rose West on the economic implications of quantitative easing 
‘Morally wrong’ not to let EU citizens stay after #Brexit, MPs from all sides tell govt  
All those Express columnists worrying who gets sack 2 make way for BRADY on BREXIT? Or will the Mail get him for a FRIEND OF THE PEOPLE slot 
Brexit trigger reversible? Court case planned...  
#Brexit is a suicide note of enormous dimensions  
Remember when Project Fear told us Britain’s digital economy would pack up after Brexit and move to techno-chic European cities like Paris?  
2016 ME: Brian, I’m from the future. Trump and Brexit win!2015 ME: Oh God! What can we do?2016 ME:2015 ME:2016 ME: Drink bleach 
Did growing income inequality lead to Trump & Brexit? A skeptical view.  
Really encouraging to see another Remainer like @edvaizey making clear that #Brexit must mean leaving the single market and customs union  
Trump stealing an election with the help of Russian spies & Ian Brady interviewed about Brexit. 2016 must be a collective hallucination 
Wouldn't it have been lovely to have lots of legal challenges like we have with Brexit when Blair & Bush were leading us into an illegal war 
Brexit is reducing EU students coming to UK unis. Expected cost to economy of £390 million. Unis facing cliff edge.  
Remain campaigner @edvaizey: Leaving the single market and customs union isn't hard Brexit – it's Brexit  
Want to know why superior types in US and UK are having collective nervous breakdown over Trump/Brexit? Watch this  
#Brexit be damned, London Mayor @SadiqKhan is urging his city to embrace foreign workers. #GlobalThinkers  
My response to @LeanneWood's remarks about immigration in Wales post-Brexit  
Before #Britain enacts #Article50 the gov't should be required to provide a waver to each citizen stating #brexit can diminish their income. 
Johnson: UK in line for lucrative Brexit boost as Gulf nations queue up for trade deals  
Any politician or pundit  who advocates a Hard #Brexit displays an irresponsibility that boarders on criminal b/c it will impoverish Britain 
Obama had the audacity 2 interfere in Brexit election when he traveled 2 Great Britain, now he throws innuendos about Russia "hacking" us? 
Majority across Europe say their country is on the wrong track.Brexit can spark the change Europe needs! #Brevolution 
The Brexit Case: Prerogative or Parliament? Professor Alison Young @HertfordCollege, explores  @OxfordLawFac 
Watch: what Ruth Davidson really said on the single market and #Brexit after the EU referendum - and what she says now.  
More importantly though: the fact @IanDunt was for Leave but switched to Remain after looking into it is not a *great* argument for Brexit. 
Would this be the same consensus of economists which got Brexit short-term forecasts so spectacularly wrong?  
Whether the subject is #brexitTrumpWeapons of Mass Destruction (Yes, Trident is a Crime against Mankind)Or KKKippersT H I N K, please..  
We've been fighting for this since the day after #Brexit vote! #NotBargainingChips  
Britons could remain 'associate EU citizens' after Brexit, Number 10 signals  
Social Care CRISISEducation CRISISHealth Care CRISISHousing CRISISPension CRISISTransport CRISISBrexit CRISISFailure of Tory Britain 
But but... Brexit = apocalypse, right?   
My Column discussing brexit,skills, manufacturing etc @ColeshillPost @BeverleyNielsen @madeinthemids @salopdesign @BCCCmembers @ninderjohal pic.twitter.com/z3zaQbQHn3 
Sign the petition and email your MP about the importance of access to EU research funding post-Brexit!   
Mandy was wrong on the Euro& wrong on Brexit self harm costs so how come he's right on the single market?  
In 2016, there were only votes for Brexit and for Trump.2017 will be when those votes take effect. 
.@Nigel_Farage labelled by new Trump administration as "an essential part" in agreeing post-Brexit UK/US trade deal.  
Great question: How do we engage political diversity in the arts, post Brexit. Not just the (pro-EU) liberal left. #creativecase 
"POSTURING" version 2By popular demand.My audience have no taste, and I denounce you all.#Brexit #Blackadder 
Forget Brexit, this is easily the biggest crisis we face in this country and nobody wants to talk about it. We're so screwed.  
@IanDunt's book is excellent: a must-read. But it leaves out one option: #Remain. Stopping #Brexit can be done: target MPs & keep at it. 
A Silent Chain for Europe, London, UK, London, UK. 10.12.2016. Campaigners say Brexit threatens our human rights  
A falling pound, an uncertain economy and other lessons for Brexit from the 1976 crisis  
Anti-democracy campaigner @eurorealist mounting legal challenge to trap UK in single market and stop Brexit. This is what he really thinks.  
Ian Brady gives his views on Brexit.Next up, Peter Sutcliffe shares his thoughts on Trump and Dennis Nielsen his opinion on gay marriage. 
Brexit is divisive & unplanned; effectively: majority of people disregarded/excluded; constitutionally challenged and increased uncertainty.  
Guarantee #EUnationals living in the UK can stay after #Brexit, says cross-party @britishfuture inquiry  
You didn't win the debate.You can't do #brexit on your own because you failed to get buy-in.Time to take responsibility for that.  
Sadistic psychopath Ian Brady, who let parents die without saying where their child was buried, wants to comment on Brexit. Piss off 
Tomorrow midday (GMT) EU Cmttee discusses #Brexit with Chief Minister of #Gibraltar @FabianPicardo: 
Multinational corporations like @Virgin are funding a campaign to stop Brexit. Sign up to help us stop them:  
.@DavidDavisMP meets leaders of the UK automotive sector to listen to their views on Brexit negotiations. Read more:  
Biggest threat to Brexit is DANGEROUS House of Lords who don't listen to voters, warns MP  
Darling of Remainers @IanDunt Backs Brexit  
Genuinely trying to imagine the editorial decision that led to us hearing Ian Brady's view on Brexit. Let alone his being called 'celebrity' 
Labour rift on immigration deepens as @hilarybennmp calls for controls on free movement after Brexit.@HackneyAbbott will not be pleased 
The high #costofbrexit becoming a key issue. Poll suggests public won't accept a #Brexit that leaves them worse off: 
We missed this amidst the Brexit noise. But the Autumn Statement showed a *staggering* £90bn fall in employment income taxes receipts.  
Britain gets a festive Brexit boost as weak pound attracts record number of visitors to the UK this Christmas  
Err... Is this The Express using Ian Brady to support Brexit?If it is, it means that below the bottom of the barrel was another barrel  
We'd all find it terribly sad as also ironic if a #Brexit negotiation gone sour resulted in @GiselaStuart being deported back to EU #BBCdp 
Brexit looks like racism to the outside world - they need to be shown the truth, says @DanielJHannan  via @IBTimesUK 
David Bowie trends: deadPrince trends: dead.Leonard Cohen trends: deadIan Brady trends: has strong opinions about #Brexit.Fuck you 2016! 
It is just a coincidence that globalists are trying to overturn both Brexit and the US election. 
We cannot control immigration because we are in the EU's Single Market #Brexit  
I support the right of @The3Million #EU citizens living in the UK to remain in the UK after #Brexit.  
John McDonnell warns that a post-Brexit deal prioritising banking above other sectors will cause uproar. 
The British people voted to take back control of our laws, borders, money and trade - that means leaving the EU’s Single Market #Brexit 
.@ASOS plans to double its UK manufacturing as domestic production becomes more affordable post-Brexit.  
Mandelson backing THIRD bid to thwart Brexit in the courts LET'S NOT FORGET MANDELSON IS CORRUPT & RESIGNED TWICE 
More will go on sale this week on  (or  for fans of brexit)   
David Cameron’s former tutor blasts Remoaners and orders them to ‘ACCEPT the Brexit vote'  
Mass murderers for Brexit. Sums up the situation we now find ourselves in. #brexitshambles 
Brexit as we know it is in the balance. Join Leave.EU today and help us fight the anti-democratic Remoaning elite!  
TODAY: 'Moors murderer Ian Brady slams Supreme Court judges blocking Brexit.'TOMORROW: 'How a liberal elite conspiracy jailed Ian Brady.' 
#timfarron - far more people voted to leave the #EU than voted for your political party. Stop trying to block #Brexit #RespectTheResult! #UK 
Humans grow more bizarre by the day. I am utterly perplexed that pro-Brexit newspapers are so keen to highlight pro brexit child murderers 
'He's making a list, he's checking it twice, gonna find out who's naughty or...'#RHI #CharterNI #Boat #brexit #thepast #economy #santa 
SERIAL KILLERS FOR BREXIT!!! … Yeah, it all makes sense now.  
See @Channel4News on #GreenerUK launch: UK’s major green orgs say restore our environment post-Brexit!  at 23:20 
Brexit book club creeping up to 60%. Make sure MPs have accurate info on EU negotiations & the dangers of WTO rules  
NEWS! Brexit to make everyone poorer except lawyers, confirm lawyers  
Must read from @GKBhambra on Brexit, citizenship and imperial melancholy  
Asos is also hiring another 1,500 employees in London  
3 million Brexit tweets reveal leave voters talked about immigration more than anything else (via @jamesrbuk) 
This was warned about during the referendum campaign, and dismissed by the Leave side. Brexit just ain't going to work. #brexitshambles 
LISTEN: "What part of Leave do these people not understand?"@TiceRichard on the latest legal challenge frustrating #Brexit. @BBC5Live 
What could be making news - May v Boris rift, social care crisis & Brexit confusion. What is - leather trousersFI Hill deserves a pay rise 
Alex Salmond: 'Give Scotland a good Brexit deal or face indyref2'  Get lost, Mr Toad. The UK has spoken deal with it  
Just a thought, if Brexit is going to cost the economy £200b might be an opportune time to cancel completely useless £200b Trident renewal. 
Aaaand after the break, what do the Yorkshire Ripper and Hannibal Lecter think of Brexit?  
C.I.A. Judgment? Haha. Obama tried to influence Brexit. Obama tried to influence Israeli vote. He just keeps losing. #fedup 
#BBC #fakenews - #SaudiArabia is our ally, minorities are being persecuted by #DonaldTrump, #Russia is the enemy & #Brexit is the devil! #UK 
Oh the delicious irony of the Daily Mail now worrying about Brexit because they get their newsprint from the EU. 
Without comment: Moors murderer Ian Brady backs Brexit  via @MetroUK 
Brexit means cheaper food for Britons, writes John Longworth for Red Box  
UK to benefit from £billions in trade from Gulf states ready and willing to do free trade deals with post-Brexit UK. 
Britain's policy of hate-based global self-harm is going awfully well. Thanks, Brexit and May.  
Brexit still has all the top names on its side then   
Who currently leads Labour drive against a hard #Brexit or stands up for Scotland's place in Europe?   
Brexit: ' an unforgiveably hostile gesture to UK's most intimate and immediate neighbours, the Irish republic and its people' #StrongerIn 
The ECJ compelled us to pay that compensation, the court Remoaners want to decide on Brexit. Remoaners are traitors  
Anyone who thinks that #trousergate is a manufactured "dead cat" to cover up Brexit/Saudi/austerity is overestimating the wit of government 
Britain can never be 'great again' until it can run a shitting decent rail service. Sod Brexit. We can't even leave East Croydon. #RailFail 
Stock market listings are down 60% because of Brexit 
How Brexit is putting the squeeze on newspaper finances  
Not just Brexit. Every election and referendum ever held is invalid, according to this logic.    
Gisela Stuart is such a hypocrite. Major contribution to causing fear and worry for Eu nationals. Wouldn't trust her with anything. #brexit 
"For me and my fellow three million EU citizens it [#Brexit] has cast a shadow over our lives" -  
Special Brexit Issue of the King's Law Journal with 17 brief, punchy articles and an editorial on the Miller case from Prof Keith Ewing  
It's amazing how many people think remain voters should try to 'make Brexit work'. You wanted it, you make it work. I'll bring popcorn. 
The economy has been calm after the Brexit vote. That won't last 
Fight against  #Brexit. We have facts and evidence, they have lies and fantasy. The Leavers hark to the past whereas we look to the future. 
You couldn't make it up: Daily Mail's publisher raises concerns about Brexit as "the majority of our newsprint is sourced from the EU"  
Brexit Secretary David Davis threatens to take billions in business from EU if it refuses Britain good exit deal  
Department behind 'Brexit means Brexit' advertises six-figure job as Head of Communications 
David Cameron’s former tutor savages Remoaners and orders them to 'ACCEPT the Brexit vote'  
An important piece by my @BrexitCentral colleague @HughRBennett this morning on how the UK should approach #Brexit negotiations  
Great @BBCRadio4 special about why some #UK citizens are becoming #eresidents of #Estonia after the #Brexit.  
#Brexit people say everyone knew NHS promise was a lie. But my wife (a nurse) says many of her patients voted #Brexit because of the promise 
Important report from HoL EU Cttee: Northern Ireland must not be 'collateral damage' of Brexit.   
Moors murderer Ian Brady says Brexit judges ‘must not block the people’s vote’  
We must leave the EU's Customs Union & Single Market. Anything less would not be Brexit at all. 
Mandelson backing THIRD bid to thwart Brexit in the courtsThe scale of #Remainer duplicity is vast 
Brexit Britain is growing faster than it has all year. So much for that recession the "experts" were predicting, 
Interesting new website charting the costs of #brexit :  
Listening to Gisela Stuart on #r4today not the best start to the week, spinning her distorted view of the #brexit mess she helped create 
Tim Farron is spot on about Gisela Stuart: she was more then happy to campaign with the brexit lies and now pretend to care about immigrants 
My guess is that enough have realised they were lied to on NHS, access to EU market etc to have erased #Brexit lead  
David Cameron’s former tutor savages Remoaners and orders them to 'ACCEPT the Brexit vote'  
It seems you can't even say you are worried about #Brexit without #Brexit people telling you to keep quiet. Makes me not want to keep quiet. 
London's home prices are having their worst December in 6 years  
#BBC 'news' today.1 FA too 'old & white'2 All immigration to UK is 'good'3 #Brexit is still 'bad'...'news' formulated by Leftists. 
UK economy set for sluggish growth, warns business group, yeah but at least we got our country back Innit #brexit  
Do you agree with @BritishFuture that EU migrants living in the UK should be given a guarantee that they can stay here after Brexit?  
Now Peter Mandelson backs a third court case against Brexit! When will these people learn the meaning of DEMOCRACY? 
Bureaucracy is perhaps the area that people will feel most lied to over Brexit. Paperwork and officialdom will soar 
Report recommends EU nationals in the UK before the formal Brexit process is triggered should be allowed to remain  
Brexit: Northern Ireland Assembly should have power over freedom of movement, say lords 
Brexit 'a huge challenge' for Ireland  
How To Build A Post-Brexit Business Strategy  #startup #entrepreneur 
House of Lords warn Good Fri Agreement @ stake with Brexit & NI runs risk of becoming '"collateral damage"  via 
How Brexit might look is mapped out in six reports by House Of Lords committee frustrated with Government  
Just 5 per cent of people think they will be financially better off after Brexit  
CIA probe into Russian meddling in US vote raises doubts over Brexit ref & fears for elections in France & Germany  
YAWN ! Ken Clarke spitting feathers again. Is it alcohol fuelled egotism or does he have a point?#Brexit #Article50 
David Cameron’s former tutor savages Remoaners and orders them to ‘ACCEPT the Brexit vote'  
£70,000 vs #Brexit: Fresh legal bid initiated by British barrister is to be taken to an Irish court  
Mandelson backing THIRD bid to thwart Brexit in the courts  via @MailOnline 
#Brexit pullback? European #fintech deal activity drop to a 5-quarter low  
Europe will push for a soft Brexit – because Britain holds all the aces  
Six months on, Brexit rift among Britons remains wide  
Obama tried to interfere with BREXIT telling the UK that they will have to go to the back of the bus/line. 
#IsraeltheRegion #JewishTimes #Britain #antiSemitism #Brexit Britain to adopt broader definition of anti-Semitism…  
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
With each passing day the sheer complexity & destructiveness of #Brexit becomes even more apparent. But there is a simple solution: Stay 
EU nationals 'should be allowed to remain in UK permanently after Brexit'  
The biggest economic event 2016: It wasn't Brexit or Trump  @MylesUdland 
Erm...... Missing the key point - It is May & Corbyn's Brexit 'Pact' that is putting the peace at risk in N Ireland 
The Lib Dems appear to be in the odd position where they are fighting to stop Brexit in England and Wales, but to ensure it in Scotland.  
Report on EU citizens in UK post-Brexit by @britishfuture now publishedFull text: See also: 
Secret Tory team planning General Election for FEBRUARY to save Brexit  
Read @britishfuture's report on the status of EU citizens after Brexit. This is our futureWe are #NoBargainingChips 
Northern Ireland 'must not be collateral damage' of Brexit, report says  
EU Cmttee report on #Brexit: UK-Irish relations now out:   
The Guardian view on Brexit and Ireland: special relationship, special solution | Editorial  
Brexit irresponsibilities-"the failure to consider the Irish dimension is one of the most shameful & consequential" 
Theresa May is probably reading her Brexit navigation manual off the pages of the Sun and the Daily Mail  
Please just skim-read this factsheet on why Brexit is dangerous for our NHS. It's information you need to know. RT  
Dear US citizens, we feel your pain about Trump, with the help of Russia, stealing the election. The Brexit vote was driven by massive lies 
Foreign aid bill to be cut by nearly £300 million over next two years SHOULD BE CUT BY BILLIONS NOT MILLIONS 
New calls to protect EU workplace rights as Gove & Whittingdale hint at cutting employment regulations post #Brexit.  
Boris: For the first time in 43 years the UK can decided on free trade deals with nations around the world. #Brexit 
Why does @UKLabour not have the cojones to admit that #Brexit is going to be a huge disaster and it should be halted? 
And yet another legal challenge to our democratic vote for #amreading #Brexit The third now I do believe?  
It's almost like people don't understand that this was the whole point of Brexit in the first place.#BrexitBritain 
Arron Banks & Farage both admire Putin. Here's what Putin does to those who seek independence from his union - Grozny in Chechnya#Brexit  
"Of all Brexit-related issues,  uncertainty around the status of existing EU workers in the UK is pressing" #premium 
The #Brexit vote wins again. Meh. Love you @saaraaalto! #xfactorfinal #xfactor 
BREXIT BOOST: Relief as desperate remoaners fail to hijack voting for #XFactorFinal and fix EU migrant as winner. 
The real spirit of #Brexit - total irresponsibility and not an ounce of care for the people of Britain. #Remain #YesEU  
Brexit. Donald Trump. Matt Terry.Well, they do say bad things happen in threes.#XFactor #xfactorfinal 
Brexit Britain strikes again. #XFactor 
Caller tells Katie that Brexit voters are 'uneducated and ill informed.' She doesn't hold back with her response.   
If ITV drag this out any longer, Article 50 will be triggered and Saara will have to go home. #XFactor #brexit 
Cant believe it but i totally agree with Liz Kendall. Brexit dominating the debate is a big problem as other concerns are being ignored!  
AA Gill on "getting our country back" and Brexit  
A Finnish lesbian winning the #XFactor really would be the biggest two fingers up to Brexit, wouldn't it? #xfactorfinal 
It would be such a poetic ending to 2016 if an immigrant lesbian won a show that Sun readers/Brexit voters absolutely live for #xfactorfinal 
In a post Brexit world it would be amazing to have someone from Finland win the X Factor. Could prove we're not all ignorant. #xfactorfinal 
Brexit backlash: Labour faces UKIP wipe out in snap election next year – senior MP warns  
#Brexit court challenger Gina Miller blasts Commons vote as "irrelevant" - very contradictory to her own case?  
First Brexit, then Trump now this  worlds gone mad!  
We are Anti Democratic But we are called the Liberal Democrats 
LIBDEMS Who are trying to Stop BREXIT Will pay the price at the Ballot Box in 2020 We will Not forgive or forget  
And this piece by @LiamHalligan on Clean Brexit is worth a read    
Britain, do not vote another Brexit tonight. Vote #saaraaalto in #XFactor 
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: UK's post Brexit trading plans could be scuppered #tomorrowspaperstoday 
#bbcqt's audience producer has been sharing and liking posts by far right groups #Remain #StopFundingHate #Brexit 
Gibraltar's Chief Minister has called for a special Brexit deal to secure free movement & Single Market access.  
Don't forget that many in the Tory cabinet are more in tune with Remain than Leave.#UKIP is the guard-dog of Brexit. 
Final #Brexit deal needs MPs' backing, says senior Tory Dominic Grieve  
This past week has seen the Supreme Court meeting to decide on Brexit-related issues.  Here's our explanation of what the Supreme Court is.  
2016- Trump win- Brexit- Italy referendum fail- Syria- Turkey coup attempt- N Korea nuclear tests- ISIS attacks- Brazil impeachment 
Sir Venki Ramakrishnan's anniversary day address on Brexit, the global nature of science & investing in UK research  
Westminster should warn Salmond:"Respect the UK vote *for* Brexit or get #IndyRef2 with the rest of the UK voting in it too, not just you" 
Woohoo - we did it!! £70K in 48h: "New Brexit court challenge to go ahead after thousands back legal bid"  
Trump was a brexit style event about the corruption of neoliberalism - @eligit:  Bernie was on the right track with free college. 
The prospect of an Italian euro exit is now much closer. As is the Euro's collapse #italexit #frexit #brexit #nexit 
Honey G is so fucking Trump-Brexit it's not even funny. 2016 is such a wank. 
Congratulations to @JolyonMaugham who has dared to find a way to seek certainty on crucial q of consequences of #Art50 notification. #Brexit  
.@LouiseMensch I'm British. And you're lazy for not checking. Trump & Brexit campaigned on the same platform of anti-immigrant ugliness. 
So many legal holes in #Brexit-could be in court for years. Could have been covered, but Cam didn't think he'd lose- and #Leave don't care. 
WATCH: @PeterBoneMP & @JolyonMaugham clash over the latest legal challenge to Brexit.  
Everyone, but especially those who think Brexit will save us money, should read this from  @RichardJMurphy  via 
Hard Brexit is a myth made up by those unable to accept the referendum result  
... there were 17.4million of us who campaigned for and won our country's freedom on 23 June: all should be congratulated. Roll on Brexit! 
Not too late to stop it keeping on getting worse: stop #Brexit.  
Not going too well for the Brexiters, is it? Very quietly, Liam Fox admits the Brexit lie  via @politics_co_uk 
#BBC #fakenews - Saudi Arabia is our ally, religious minorities are being exterminated by Donald Trump and #brexit  
The idea of President Trump and hard-Brexit are just castles in the sand. Neither has any substances and will be washed away by reality 
Watching Paddington with the kids - the very opposite of Brexit Britain. And really rather lovely. 
Europe, 2016:- Brexit- Cameron resigns- Italy referendum fails- Renzi resigns- Hollande approval: 4%- Merkel approval hit 5 year low 
Millions more customs forms to fill. The "bureaucratic" EU streamlines systems. Brexit means back to good ol' days.  
Other than meaning Brexit, what does Brexit mean?By me tomorrow, at @FT.My attempt to define the problematic term. 
Who wears the trousers? #brexit #negotiations 
I've said before everyone should read @IanDunt book abt Brexit. Both #Remainers and #Leavers need to understand what the UK is trying to do. 
Audience member on BBCQT tells Tim Farron: 'We have to leave the single market to leave the European Union.' #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Change of heart on #brexit ? Front page of Sunderland Echo:in their poll there,  61% would now vote to remain : 
How does the Article 50 process work? A @commonslibrary research briefing  #Brexit  
White nationalism taking hold in post-Brexit Britain - #RupertMurdoch gearing up to turn @SkyNews into UK's Fox Noise 
A vast number who voted for Brexit are highly educated. All you voted Leave knowledgeable about the issues. The BBC is a national disgrace.  
Brits knew exactly what they voted for with Brexit. Remainers just can't accept Brits rejected their world view & chose Britain over the EU  
POPULISM: It's the BBC's new buzzword, being used to sneer at the 'uneducated' 17 million who voted Brexit  
50% of UK households worried about Brexit food pricesThe other half know it's EU tariffs making prices higher 
FYI Tony Blair - we had a referendum on June 23rd. #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
What European economists think about Brexit:  
"The new ba***rds”: May goes to war with Soft Brexit rebels!  
Definitely worth remembering. You took your anger out on the WRONG PEOPLE! #Brexit#ToriesMustGo 
Just 5 per cent of people think they will be financially better off after Brexit  
Wow. A very competent piece on science & Brexit by the @DailyMailUK. Well worth a read. Respect. 
A wide-ranging interview on Trump, Brexit and deglobalization with NZ's Andrew Patterson, at 24:50: 
Young people's voices should help to shape the UK after Brexit. Make your demand with @weareundivided #WeDemand #ad 
Brexit will not dictate how the world will look in our future, we decide that. Make sure your voice is heard #WeDemand @weareundivided #Ad 
It’s our generation that Brexit will affect the longest. Share what matters to you & make your voice heard! #WeDemand @weareundivided #ad pic.twitter.com/bPKmE7CfWT 
We're the generation that has to deal with Britain after Brexit! Check the campaign by @weareundivided and let me know your views! #WeDemand 
Caller tells Katie that Brexit voters are 'uneducated and ill informed' - but she's having none of it.  
It's a weaker position. When Brexit does implode, there'll be a far bigger political reward for those who can say "We tried to stop it".  
Ken Clarke suggests Theresa May might not "survive" as PM if she sides with "hard Brexit" MPs.  
Desperate Remainers now take to overseas courts in desperate attempt to derail Brexit. #RespectTheResult 
For financial markets, the biggest event of 2016 wasn't Brexit or Trump  
Ed Miliband has been getting the tone and detail of hard Brexit opposition spot on since the referendum  
EU SUPERSTATE: Brussels unveils YOUTH CORPS to halt Eurosceptic tide after Brexit  
A small child just pointed to a newspaper on train and asked his dad "What does Brexit mean?".You and us all, babe 
Latest BREXIT mug  
Weekinreview @SkyNews  3.30 with me  @Kevin_Maguire  who has become a fan of unelected  judges who he hopes are going to thwart Brexit 
Vote of confidence in post-Brexit Britain.The new 50,000 sq metre, £126m factory being built in Staffs for Spanish car parts giant Gestamp pic.twitter.com/GylB8FiOPe 
Strange times, strange bedfellows. Good on @KTHopkins for her sound defence of #Brexit voters. Justifiable exasperation at this tired insult  
Uh oh. Tony's chums are giving the wrong answer to his very unbiassed #brexit poll.Can you help?  
Eating crow & humble pie over Brexit. When you get something wrong, it's the only thing to do.  
#exitbrexit New Brexit court challenge to go ahead after thousands back legal bid  allows for #2ndthoughts 
Christmas shopping in Brexitannia is both quick and inexpensive as there's only shop left on the high street. 
BrexitNo money to EUControl territorial watersMake all our lawsControl our bordersSeal our own FTAsSo, we're outside the Single Mkt! 
We cannot control immigration because we are in the EU's Single Market #Brexit  
Britain's "first lost decade since the 1860s" is causing some concern  
Superb piece. 10 reasons why Brexit bound to be costly for ordinary people. Read & share.  
We need stronger laws on the environment when we leave the EU. RT if you agree #Brexit  
For anybody interested in how #brexit might impact Ireland, 330 page report launched tomorrow morning. Thank you @LordsEUCom for hard work. 
The Great Tory Brexit Sell-out: from principled post-referendum position to support for a hard #Brexit.  
Perhaps the FBI and CIA should investigate Obama's interference in the Israeli and Brexit elections? I guess it's ok when Dems do it, right? 
Caller tries to tell Katie Hopkins that Brexit voters are 'uneducated and ill informed.' Watch her response.  
Final Brexit deal needs MPs' backing, says senior Tory Dominic Grieve  
This week’s Daily Mail Cancer List:Mo) WotsitsTu) Soft BrexitWe) GinTh) ITV2+1Fr) RussiaSa) ParanoiaSu) Non-missionary position sex 
All the money in her Globalist backers' pockets will NOT overturn Brexit! Get over it Gina YOU ARE IRRELEVANT to the British People  
Politicians have yet to grasp that post June 23 we finally have a large growing vociferous & determined pro-EU movement.#Remain #Brexit 
"The idea that people voted who voted for Brexit, were either old cretins or thick individuals, I find absolutely outrageous." 
#Brexit & #Parliament. Problems are complex. Solution is simple. Proportional Representation. Pls sign the petition:  
WATCH: This is what the likely-to-be new Italian prime minister had to say about #Brexit back in July.A true democrat then.  
Evidence is tht Brexit is not wanted by majority. Also economic travesty. Perhaps we should act like adults and reconsider.  Who agrees? RT 
Caller tries to tell @KTHopkins that Brexit voters are 'uneducated and ill informed' - and she's having none of it.  
We’ll get a Brexit that suits Europe, not one that suits us  
160 non EU countries have access to EU Single MarketTo suggest that UK won't have access to EU Single Market after Brexit is barmy nonsense  
So another BREXIT court case passes first hurdle - raising the money to pursue it  
Sunday Reading: 'Act of Union could be Brexit's first casualty' by @iainmacwhirter via @newsundayherald #Scotland #EU #Brexit  
#bbcsp The government's plan for #brexit must spell out the choices facing Britain - and their costs: … 
Vote of confidence in post-Brexit Britain.US tech giant Google plans a campus for 7,000 employees between St Pancras and King’s Cross. pic.twitter.com/tuz7IiwCkP 
Dominic Grieve is absolutely right to say that the referendum result does not close down any debate over #Brexit  
First Brexit then Trump now this?  
Tory majority, Brexit, Trump, almost not worth poking fun at the Left anymore. No point kicking a corpse. 
Multinational corporations like @Virgin are funding a campaign to stop Brexit. Sign up to help us stop them:  
Murdoch Pounces on Sky After Falling Pound Makes Takeover Cheaper #Brexit windfall  
I'm not going to be bullied into silence by a mere quarter of the country. Three quarters of us don't want any kind of #Brexit at all.  
Wake up & smell coffee all who support Brexit. If you can't afford 2 pay for health care now you'll be in trouble as NHS will die w/ Brex  
Brexit is bad news for the NHS.All the experts warned about it before - and it's starting...See the factsheet:  
#Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP awarded 5 stars for double standards. Please share our report:  
Brexit uncertainties threaten brain drain for UK science.  
"If people in Wales will be worse off as a result of the kind of Brexit Westminster chooses, then we cannot endorse that plan" @LeanneWood 
Vote of confidence in post-Brexit Britain.American plane and satellite manufacturer Boeing decides to site its European HQ in London. pic.twitter.com/u0tjnobLsV 
Brexit is a catastrophe! I applaud the brave MPs who voted NO to the government's ridiculous 7 Dec vote. #chaotictorylabourbrexit 
We need a Brexit audit in every constituency. Detail, detail, detail on damage done to SME, all FDI, universities, right to retire in Europe  
Remainers should look carefully at these poll results. This debate can be won and Brexit can be stopped.  
when the realities of Brexit spin apart Feel sorry for your country your neighbours and in all likelihood, yourself  
READ: - Split decision expected in Brexit bout- Festive tourism boom, thanks to Brexit- Mr Brexit: "You're hired" 
Anna Soubry said she believes the people made a mistake (in voting for Brexit). Voters in Broxtowe made a mistake in electing her.#bbcsp 
Breaking news: another challenge to Brexit. The ballot paper did not ask if we wanted to leave the single market. 
Daniel Hannan thinks it's in Europe's interests to make Brexit pleasant. It's nonsense, says @JonnElledge  
Problem with this poll: Brexit will leave most people *worse off than they otherwise would be* not than they are now  
People attempting to obstruct brexit should be declared enemies of the people This is what they are and should be dealt with as such. 
Vote of confidence in post-Brexit Britain.Beauty giant Avon is setting up its global (non-US) HQ in Northampton. pic.twitter.com/vfM8dwEvSp 
.@KTHopkins hammers the MPs on her 'wall of shame' - who defied their constituents and voted against a fast Brexit.  
This is why we're fighting to keep the *option* of rejecting Brexit, in case *the people* want that option in 4 months. Tide is turning.  
#Brexit is a major threat to one of our most successful export businesses - our universities.#Remain #YesEU 
DEMOCRACY: Treason, traitors, hangings, martial law, civil war, regime change… Mail readers discuss enforcing Brexit  
This reveals the true thinking of this subversive. Brexit now, Brexit Hard & ignore A50 as it's irrelevant.  
Please, please read this. AA Gill has died. RIP. We have lost one of the all-time greatest columnists just read this one paragraph on Brexit  
.@FabianPicardo outlines how #Gibraltar will be part of the 'one United Kingdom' approach to #Brexit  
Retweet if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Vote of confidence in post-Brexit Britain.US food giant Kraft Heinz is poised to site its European HQ in London, reports the Standard. pic.twitter.com/N0NQ1R4yca 
#Marr A Closed Brexit Hand? It's not as if the EU haven't already worked out every negotiating position UK can adopt; they're not stupid RT  
Brexit latest - Gina Miller brands Article 50 Commons vote irrelevant. Her contempt for democracy   
There is no #Brexit that does but leave the UK worse placed than being in the EU. Any Brexit is destructive & must be stopped. 
Abbot says "Tories are mishandling #Brexit - all Theresa May can say is Brexit means Brexit" #Marr 
Abbot says it would be "very damaging for democracy" to dismiss #Brexit voters in the way Lib Dems are #Marr 
"The Tories are totally mishandling #Brexit" - Labour MP Diane Abbott #marr  
Nick Robinson mischievously badgering #Labour over 'frustrating' #Brexit dealRather than laying into #Tories over what the deal is!#Marr 
I have a unifying #Brexit plan - any costs to the UK economy or its citizens should be paid for by a #BrexitTax paid by Leave voters only 
Brexit balls from Rod Liddle in Sunday Times. Not a "tiny tranche" but 65% of Labour voters backed Remain  
#marr The government's plan for #brexit must spell out the choices facing Britain - and their costs:  
.@HackneyAbbott floundering under questioning from Nick Robinson - once again it is clear Labour are hopelessly split on Brexit. #marr 
.@Ed_Miliband: New poll shows Government faces almighty backlash from Leave voters if #Brexit leaves them poorer  
NHS is on verge of collapse. Public services being stripped of funding. Govt have NO idea on #Brexit.Etc.But #Corbyn had a bad day? #marr 
Gibraltar chief minister @FabianPicardo sounding much like @scotgov on @MarrShow. Wants option of different Brexit arrangements in U.K. deal 
Vote Leave Watch calls on May to reject the #brexit plan to slash workers' rights #LeaveWatch 
The real surprise is that any 'organization' continues to imagine that there is some sort of 'better' #Brexit out there:There is not.#Remain 
British public will not accept #Brexit deal that leaves them worse off financially, says new poll for @Open_Britain 
(2) - so if the 'will of the people' is now anti-#Brexit, how about respecting that? 
Brexit vs Remain; Hard Brexit vs Soft Brexit - these are all codes for 'how best can we keep workers' wages down?' 
A "Brexit that leaves us worse off" or, as it's better known, a "Brexit".  
There's a new reason to be optimistic about life after Brexit  
Poll: public reject Brexit that leaves them worse off: paralysis continues as #Brexit lies unravel #brexitshambles 
Donald Trump and Brexit are just two of the traps awaiting investors in 2017  
Polls suggest public will not accept a #Brexit that leaves them worse off. MPs take note inmediately. 
We’ll get a Brexit that suits Europe, not one that suits us  
Lawyers set to launch fresh legal challenge to Brexit in Irish courts  
#IndyGrievanceAdventCalendar 11th December - behind the door today is..the fact no one who voted No realised there'd be a Brexit referendum  
So Brexit is a mere revolt is it DC ? I'd watch this space ..... 
But any #Brexit is worse than #EU membership. So - 
UK government facing new Brexit court case - Sunday Times  
Iain Macwhirter: Brexit's first casualty could be the Act of Union  
Brits busy Googling "Brexit" while working-class American whites busy Googling "fascism". 
The British economy will not crumble in 2017, but that does not mean Brexit was a good idea  
Why Britain voted for #Brexit: a look back 200 years  
2016: Brexit. Cubs. @realDonaldTrump. Now, Army! 
New Brexit Poll by @SunderlandEcho reverses pre-referendum poll that correctly predicted city leave result. 
Are you really blind to fact that Brexit is orchestrated by & solely in interests of billionaire press barons & millionaire Tories?  
.@morganstar32401 Stop embarrassing yourself.  Everybody knows why #Trump won.  Same reason #Brexit won.  Your argument is empty.#MAGA 
Brexit: eleven judges getting it wrong - ignoring a crucial point of law ...  #Brexit.  
Cities can provide a sanctuary against Trump – and Brexit | Tristram Hunt  
Perhaps #ThePeople are not as stupid as the Kippers thought? "will not accept a Brexit that leaves them worse off  
Brexit.  Trump.  Army.   What a year! 
Having a delightful time blocking the rude Brexit brigade 
At that point, instead of waving 'Chamberlain' papers, Cameron could & should have remained steadfast as a patriot & led UK to Brexit 100%  
Well that's it then. No bloody Brexit. 
This is so, so deeply wrong - and we're paying £59bn to borrow for Brexit? #NHSinstead 
labour didn't pick a side after #indyref and it's making the same mistake over brexit. my @scotonsunday column: 
We shouldn't have a prime minister who was opposed to Brexit says @Nigel_Farage - Listen to the full interview here:  
My piece for the Observer: We are leaving the EU. We need a plan for a Brexit that is fair and protects our economy.  
Nigel Farage's vow to UK: I'll stand as MP for EIGHTH time if Brexit DOESN'T mean Brexit  
Brexit will create "an opportunity to reduce the complexity of the EU"  
About 20 responses from #Brexit supporters today, roughly 3/4 just mindless abuse and insults. #Remain #YesEU 
Be nothing better than devious Remoaners spending £ millions trying to stop Brexit, only for EU to disintegrate, leaving no EU to exit from. 
Merry Christmas all Britons both #Brexit ers & all remainers and have a great new year @willowbrookwolf 
Time to get going everybody. If we have to Brexit let's make sure it's smart not stupid. Save the single market at  
From a predictive standpoint, Lamar Jackson should win the Heisman. Just like the Warriors, Indians, Brexit "remain", and Hillary. #2016 
I posted this 3 days after the EU referendumNearly 6 months on... is the UK any better off?#brexit #StopFundingHate 
Brexit could harm fight against modern slavery  
Wow. @JolyonMaugham's #crowdfund for #Brexit legal challenge is over 80% already  I plan to pledge once I get home 
Brexit was not a game to me. It was the last chance to save the country from a liberal elite that really hate their own country.  
SUNDAY TIMES FRONT PAGE 'New court case threatens to derail Brexit' #skypapers 
It's been a tough few years for #Snowflakes. The UK elects a majority Conservative Govt then votes for #Brexit. Then the US elects #Trump!  
Just watched a young white couple intentionally walk into an Indian man's car, bang his window & scream Brexit time. Get out. #WorldGoneMad 
Amber Rudd says EU migrants need to carry ID in post-brexit Britain - only works if UK citizens have ID cards too  
A second legal bid could soon be launched in a bid to derail Brexit, this time in the Irish courts  
'39% of UKIP voters do not want to incur a financial loss because of Brexit'. Words. Fail.  
● AA Gill, giant of journalism, dies aged 62● New court case may derail Brexit● UK's child refugees vanish #TomorrowsPapersToday 
Poll suggests public will not accept a #Brexit that leaves them worse off 
S Times front page lead on new legal bid to impede BREXIT  
SUNDAY TIMES POLITICS LEAD: Another Brexit Court Case, by @ShippersUnbound 
YouGov finds that only 5% believe they will be better off from Brexit while 28% expect to lose money and 45% don't know 
Sorry comrades but @bbclaurak is a good public service journalist, nothing to do with alt-right, Brexit, Trump or post-truth.  
Time to cancel 2016. Donald Trump, Brexit, Honey G dropping an album. One to many steps too far now. #xfactorfinal 
Economy: Scotch whisky exports alone prop up UK trade balance by 11% during Brexit downturn. 
68% think the Government should respect the will of the people and get on with Brexit - even if they voted remain  
Andy Burnham is wrong. Badly so.The problem is not the immigrants but the natives to whom Brexit has handed Rights to be Racist on a plate.  
A fantastic letter from a British Pensioner to .@GuyVerhofstadt  on Europe and the EU. #brexit .@bbcnews .@itvnews .@skynews .@Channel4News 
How about we #Remain and give #Brexit supporters who don't want free movement the opportunity to opt out of being European? 
-Brexodus...."Financial activities clustered in London will migrate to other European countries post-Brexit" 
BREXIT: We know it’s not really about blocking Article 50 but we’re going to keep saying it is because that’s easier  
You see? Not all who voted Brexit were xenophobes. Some were straight-up idiots.  
SCOTLAND INDEPENDANCE :  Poll over 20,000 people in Borders finds 82% want #Scotland #indyref2 in wake of #Brexit.  OUR TIME IS COMING. 
/ @ChangeBritain peddling the lie that the British people want #Brexit. No! 37% of a rigged electorate voted for Brexit. That is all#YesEU 
Cambridge University has stated it faces significant risks from #brexit  
From the #archive: AA Gill argues for staying in the EU & said Brexit was an 'expression of a sentimental nostalgia'  
By the way... THAT touch from Mahrez for 3-0!!!! #Wand #Pillow #Brexit #RoyalBaby #LCFCvMCFC 
In 2016 Russia "blamed" for Brexit Trump Fillon destroying ISIS &Al Qaeda saving Syrian Regime...blimey who's running that joint? Superman? 
Robbie Savage hammering Pep Guardiola, while bigging up plucky brit Tony Pulis. He's gonna shout 'Brexit means Brexit!' any minute now. 
Dear #brexiters, if you are so sure #brexit will make Britain great again, why do you spend your time attacking those with another opinion? 
RTÉ London Correspondent Fiona Mitchell speaks to UK lawyer Jolyon Maugham about why he wants to launch Brexit challenge in Irish courts  
All that's available is Hard Brexit. But MPs won't accept it - as Barnier, Tusk, Verhofstadt know. Buckle up for one hell of a year, folks 
Poll suggests public will not accept a Brexit that leaves them worse off  
Democracy is about taking responsibility. #Brexit is about petulantly blaming foreigners #Remain #YesEU 
You do not take back control by petulantly blaming the EU for Britain's own self-inflicted ills. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Roger Daltry @TheWho "Get on my knees and pray... we don't get fooled again."Yeah... #Brexit  
So the town that led the Brexit charge has changed its minds#. Like in cartoons when they run off a cliff and hang there, legs whirling...  
Just exported the left hand Tup to Belgium. They have named him 'BREXIT' Glad our European friends have a sense of humour.  
Tonight please make the right decision and don't do another brexit or Trump. VOTE FOR SAARA!!  #teamsaara #xfactorfinal 
Second poll in the space of about a fortnight with very similar results. Looks like for Sunderland, #Brexit meant £350m per week for the NHS  
Brexiteers want to deny the potential right of keeping EU citizenship post #Brexit. Reasons vary.Some don't understand the question.  
The British people want politicians to get on with the job of leaving the EU. Those MPs trying to frustrate Brexit should #RespectTheResult 
Brexit (& its worst effects) some way off still. But Brexit is no longer an abstract lark - it is real and enthusiasm for it is waning.  
Trade deficit increases; Banks go for French licenses; universities expect £350m loss. #Brexit shambles found here  
Democrats, Trump, And The Ongoing, Dangerous Refusal To Learn The Lesson Of Brexit  
Trump and Brexit I can just about forgive, but I don't think I'll ever get over the fact we voted Mrs Brown's Boys as sitcom of the century. 
True #brexit ers are bilingual in English and Rubbish. 
Lawyers seek to launch fresh Brexit challenge in Irish courts  
#Brexit #Secretary #DavidDavis threatens to take billions in business from #EU if it refuses #Britain good exit deal 
.@d0ugalmcfrugal I'm just surprised there's no shouting about KGB disinformation feeding into the Brexit referendum outcome. 
The Bad Boys of Brexit @Arron_banks just finished this fascinating insider's account of the Brexit campaign.   
AA Gill on Brexit (beforehand)  
Challenge is not #brexit distracting from #austerity but Brexit & austerity distracting from the underlying issue of Structural Inequality 
RIP AA Gill. A writer with a supreme turn of phrase. Utilised to full effect in a masterpiece article on Brexit.  
Imagine, you voted for #Brexit and you're constantly told that you are a racist and a bigot. By the biggest racists and bigots in the world. 
Public opinion u-turn in Sunderland but the 3 Labour MPs (all were Remain) say their duty is to implement Brexit! 
Off to London for @MarrShow tomorrow with @bbcnickrobinson & to give evidence to House of Lords SC on Brexit #GibExit 
RIP #AAGill-whose death has been announced- on the #Leave campaign & #Brexit in general #writerh/t-@Julian5News 
On #HumanRightsDay be ashamed if you're a Tory or a member of #UKIP b/c  you have enabled hate, war crimes & bigotry. #brexit 
AA Gill on Brexit.  
Brexit, Trump, Italy: how markets shrug off shocks  
"We want our country back".But instead, we have given our country away.#Brexit  
Brexit is bad news for the NHS & health professional bodies repeatedly said so. See referenced Fact Sheet here:   
I'll be signing up for this: will you? EU negotiators offer every Brit chance to remain an EU citizen after Brexit  
It's wet, muddy and dim but @Bristol4Europe volunteers are stoical in our campaign against Brexit. Lots of new sign ups today.  
'It's a safety valve in case people think they made the wrong decision'- @JolyonMaugham on taking #Brexit to Dublin:  
Going on right now in Central London yet more EU flags. No counter demo even though this event was publicised. Brexit support waining....  
A second legal bid could soon be launched in a bid to derail Brexit, this time in the Irish courts  
"We voted for Brexit because the EU is hopeless. Why is that so hard for pundits to grasp?"  
Britain will cut taxes and take on the EU if it tries to 'punish' UK for Brexit. Bring it on...#brexit  
An exc summary of the flawed #brexit referendum here by @labourlewis on @BBCAnyQuestions (listen from 32min 44sec) 
The Brexit Nativity.(Done with @CartoonRalph) 
MP says Labour risks becoming 'party of 0%' over EU. Should have backed Brexit like Corbyn/McDonnell always wanted! 
Gove, the man who said the breakup of the UK would strengthen Putin but had no such qualms over the risk to Europe from Brexit  
Labour voters acknowledge the problems facing working class are real, but maintain that Brexit is a fake cure. Corbyn lacks this clarity 
It's in the EU's gift, nothing to do with #Brexit UK government.  
Will Britain opt for a "hard" or a "soft" Brexit? A Brexit barometer #TheWorldIn  
Russia - a brutal and utterly corrupt crony-capitalist mock-democracy preferred to the EU by both Farage and Corbyn#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
You might be able to remain an EU citizen, even after Brexit. Here's how  
The EU confirms that there will be no separate Brexit talks with Scotland. Can Sturgeon stop her posturing now? 
Brexit Secretary David Davis threatens to take billions in business from EU if it refuses Britain good exit deal  
Funds sought for Brexit court case in Ireland. Wtf?  
Most immigrants are coming from outside the EU so has nothing at all to do with EU. Another piece of Brexit logic. #bbcaq 
Now Labour have said they won't block Brexit would they agree to Scotland having a bespoke relationship with the EU if they were the Gov't? 
A small margin in favour of Miller will make it harder for Parlt to block Brexit. Complete and utter gibberish.   
Yer man @IanDunt encapsulates #Brexit campainers' outrage over the plan to allow individual Brits to opt-in to keep their EU citizenship:  
The moment when the penny should drop for #ukip members that they were burgled by their leader #nigelfarage  #brexit 
Social media has officially dumbed down the world. First Brexit, then Trump and now people seem to think today is the 10th day of Christmas! 
Supreme Court outcome: menu6/5 Brexit tartare7/4 rare8/3 medium9/2 well done11/0 Brexit burnt to crisp  
You can crowd fund a court action by @JolyonMaugham which could make Brexit legally reversible in the future  
This is why the Tories won't reveal a Brexit plan. Whatever they come out with will lose them support. 
I agree. SNP has opened up a Pandoras Box by insisting on bespoke 'Scottish' solution for Brexit after UK wide vote. Bespokery is catching!  
Learning a second language still matters Speaking a foreign language remains vitally important in the Brexit era, says Wendy Ayres-Bennett  
Lawyers set to launch fresh legal challenge to Brexit in Irish courts  @JolyonMaugham 
In economics we tend to assume that if someone is offered ten or minus ten they chose ten the old chose minus ten in Brexit vote 
May's Red, White & Blue (Brexit)  
#AngelaMerkel is a total disgrace to all #European Nation States! she needs to be booted OUT! #Brexit   #EU #BBC 
Dear Labour - there is NO such thing as a 'People's Brexit' or a 'Workers Brexit'. Brexit will lead to austerity max for a generation. 
Sunderland Echo poll shows a u-turn on Brexit. Now most people want to Remain in the EU  
Brexit a flawed & decisive 'project'. EU has faults which don't compare to the abhorrent xenophobia & uncertainty now being faced & realised  
Labour has, quite literally, screwed itself over it's approach to Brexit. Trusted by neither side. This is Corbyn's legacy. Irrelevance 
first brexit, then trump and now elf isnt even being shown on tv this year, im fucking done with 2016 
Leaked email says @Virgin boss is helping to fund Tony Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
very hard as an economist to work out why the old voted against their best interests their vote for brexit will lower their living standards 
#BREXITWe voted on a pig in a poke full of liesOnce the #brexit deal is sortedShould we also vote on the reality too?RT if you agree 
Love the irony of a government adviser briefing press that 7:4 majority will only provide limited legitimacy, when Brexit vote was 52:48. 
.@BorisJohnson: 'I would like to ask Keir Starmer why he is seeking to frustrate the will of the people?' #Brexit  
The government cynically duped people into believing the #EURef was mandatory, even though in law it was advisory.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
So, are the few remaining #Brexit fanatics still going to insist we leave because less than a quarter of the country wants to do it?  
UK enjoys record exports in October, narrowing our trade deficit. "Experts" said Brexit would wreck the economy... 
Seizing the Brexit-Trump moment, the Murdochs bid for Sky. Are we entering a new age of digital robber barons?  
It's about time we grow some backbone!"#UK will cut taxes and take on the #EU if it tries to 'punish' for #Brexit" 
#61% please get RT, we don't want your destructive secretive Brexit Mrs May.  
.@paulnuttallukip for Labour to admit it - BREXIT would benefit the working class,   
Brexit bookshelf  
Newcastle Chronicle result similar 74% now want to stay now they understand the crap they were fed over Brexit 
Ah well, time for Brexit - oops, breakfast:  
Boosting staff numbers in post-Brexit UK:AdobeAlnylamAmazonAppleAvonBoeingFacebookGoogleIBMIHTMallinckrodtMcDonaldsMicrosoft 
A second challenge to Brexit (revocation). Great piece with superb video interviews of @JolyonMaugham & Gina Miller. 
Brexit is breaking the Labour coalition   
Here we go - another Brexit legal development.  
Tories to pay an untold fortune of our money to foreign companies not to pull out of the UK after #Brexit People must have final say on deal  
Red, white and blue Brexit - @cairnstoon's take hits the nail squarely on the head today. Human rights concerns trounced by trade. 
Brexit? It might never make it...  
Was there a vote on taking away the right to live and work in the EU? No!#Brexit is Theft!#Remain #YesEU 
Today's @SunderlandEcho - the people speak and the people rethink. Brexit is both crass and unpopular. Only SNP/Lib Dems seem to get it!  
#Putin aims to destroy Western democracy & he sees the EU as a major threat.#Brexit helps Putin.Who are the traitors!#Remain #YesEU 
Supreme Court Brexit appeal: Judges 'heading for split 7-4 decision' in narrow win for Remain campaigners  
New toon: how those trade negotiations are going to look... #brexit #brexitshambles 
Top Brexit negotiator @GuyVerhofstadt plans to fast-track proposal to offer UK nationals "associate EU citizenship" 
Keep hearing Labour's Brexit attitude isn't clear. 90% of their MPs just voted for Article 50. Where's the non-manufactured confusion? 
Excuse me while I stick 2 fingers down my throat, gag, & thank heavens we voted for #Brexit!  
"Making an (economic) success of Brexit will mean making openness – to migration as much as trade –a priority".   
New annual Brexit Award announced; "the Darwin Awards are no longer valid as a higher level of stupidity has been discovered in 2016."  
Jolyon Maugham QC wants case to go to European Court of Justice to establish if UK MPs could reject a Brexit deal  
Never give up: #Brexit must be stopped. 
There are many of us in all political parties with EU experience who won't simply put up and shut up and support a destructive hard Brexit!  
If individual UK nationals are permitted to keep a form of EU citizenship after Brexit, would you apply?Pls RT for broadest sample. Thanks 
It's an authoritarian thing. Brexit zealots are exactly the same. They live in a state of permafear & anger  
There are good reasons to feel optimistic about life after Brexit  
Our soldiers facing a witch hunt Whist this government sells Billions of pounds of weapons to middle east that's responsible for mass murder 
He's right. If you think it'd be better to Remain, say so. There's no need to accept Brexit.  
ALL WE WANT FOR CHRISTMAS 
Another day, another hysterical story about Brexit from @SkyNews - which is now worse than the BBC. 
I'm batting for the other side in #brexit negotiations. I want to be an EU citizen living in UK.  
David Cameron accused of patronising Brexit voters after attributing referendum result to the 'rise of populism'  
We could revoke Article 50 if the UK changes mind over Brexit - The New European  
Lawyers set to launch new legal challenge to Brexit in Irish courts  
Lego prices in the UK going up by 5% as of January.Thanks Brexit.  
Disappointing @UKLabour given up on EU. They offer no route back. Need a Brexit Deal Referendum so people can have say on detail #ukineu 
Australia, the world #13 economy, with 25 million people, wants a post-Brexit bilateral free trade agreement with the UK. pic.twitter.com/sPsaWHkCNP 
My cartoon - where does Britain draw the line with Saudi Arabia & China?#Brexit#r4Today 
Second legal bid to derail Brexit could soon be launched in Ireland. Really? It's like fighting a bully who won't accept he lost at conkers 
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
.@SuellaFernandes: To get the most out of #Brexit we need to leave the protectionist Customs Union - EU not signing the trade deals we need  
So @washingtonpost journalist just told @BBCr4today that @CIA have evidence Russian intel influenced #brexit ref and THAT'S not the story? 
Those bringing legal challenges to Brexit know they've lostThey do it to wreck the economy so they can later claim to have been right 
First they went to the courts to block Brexit. Now they want the courts to let them reverse it after it's started! 
This week in #Brexit   
Brexiters who say "Brexit has had no effect on the economy" are inadvertently endorsing the EU. Britain is still a tariff-free EU member. 
Brexit: Middle class liberals were only social group to emphatically back Remain, analysis shows.  
You might be able to remain an EU citizen, even after Brexit. Here's how  
Brexit could harm fight against modern slavery  
Person of the year should be Putin: Trump, Brexit, Syria, post-truth all wins for him, @freedland rightly points out 
For some Remainers, the prospect of a slump in property prices was one of Brexit’s few silver linings. No such luck  
The Brexit-Trump era calls for a fundamental rethink of capitalism @MazzucatoM @michaelujacobs 
The mask slips as Jean-Claude Juncker looks forward to the end of the nation state and threatens Brexit Britain. 
UK will cut taxes & take on tEU if it tries 2’punish' UK for Brexit, suggests David Davis GOOD,TIME 2FIGHT EU BACK  
A second legal bid could soon be launched in a bid to derail Brexit, this time in the Irish courts  
Brexit Secretary David Davis threatens to take billions in business from EU if it refuses Britain good exit deal  
EU negotiators to offer individual Brits the chance to remain EU citizens after Brexit  
On @LBC, a UKIP voter said he voted #Brexit because there were no fish+chip shops in Ealing 'due to immigrants'. Yes - that's the calibre. 
Russia also caused Brexit, coerced Hollande into not running again, and made Italians vote against the referendum.#Russia #SecretCIA 
Wearing the Union Jack in honor of @Brexit @Nigel_Farage inspiration for Trump movement! #Michigan @realDonaldTrump  
BBC News - Funds sought for Brexit court case in Ireland  
Can we be clear? UK trading figures for 3 months after #EURef: WORST EVER.We were already in deep trouble. Don't believe lies. #brexit 
Funds sought for Brexit court case in Ireland  
Meddling in foreign elections is wrong: e.g. Obama campaigning against Brexit/diverting State Dept. funds to try and beat Bibi. #ohfortwo 
Welcome to the Fight: Niall Ferguson Reverses His Course on Brexit - The New York Sun  
Breaking: EU members decide Brexit was positive after all..  
A British QC is launching a campaign to raise funds to bring a case on Brexit in the Irish courts.  
Trump, Brexit, fascism, you need to oppose that stuff for yourself, not so that you can tell your grandkids. 
Brexit antidote: new pro-EU alliance of Liberal Democrats, Scottish Nationalists, Green Party, Plaid Cymru, SDLP and pro-EU Labour + Tories. 
pretty sure everyone who voted for #Brexit didn't see PADDINGTON  
Won't give up: #Brexit will be stopped.  
LISTEN: Think Tank Boss Says Political Tide Turning Against Establishment After Brexit, Trump -   
》》2 put aside their political differences and prejudices and unite behind NoBrexit.  Otherwise there is no effective opposition to Brexit.  
I propose NoBrexit McNoBrexitFace should be our mascot and rally point for all No Brexit campaigners. All campaigners should 》》2 
The UK was made great with Brexit, and now the US will be great with Trump! Losers at the EU think they have it all figured out. Sad! #Trump 
Celebrating with @kylieminogue whose happy, hedonistic Xmas concert provided a cure for Brexit & Trump irritations  
A warning to our politicians. We will never forget or forgive the liars, charlatans fanatics and cowards forcing #Brexit on Britain.#Remain 
In the Sleaford ‘Brexit by-election’, Brexit won hands-down | Conservative Home  
Gov has only one Brexit plan: low wages & cuts in public services. They're gearing up to falsely blame that on EU.  
Actually, your missing a lot:1. Ref. was not legally binding.2. Many British citizens denied a vote.3. Tories split on hard/soft Brexit.  
British lawyer @JolyonMaugham to mount #Brexit challenge in Irish High Court  (via @thejournal_ie) 
I WILL NOT BE BUYING ANY VIRGIN PRODUCTS 
BBC News - Birmingham couple buys house for asylum seekers  SHOULD HAVE BROUGHT HOUSE FOR OUR HOMELESS EX SERVICEMAN 
'EU immigration has Britain at breaking point and Brexit needs to sort it out' | UK | News | Daily Express  
EXPOSED! The seven MPs who voted against BREXIT and their constituents  
#legendoftheyear has to be courageous Jo Cox. #loseroftheyear is Nigel Farage for leading us to Brexit & then deserting a sinking ship. 
UK banks want any Brexit plan to give them access to the EU for several years after the UK’s departure  
Irish courts to be asked to intervene in Brexit legal process  
Lawyers aim for fresh legal challenge to Brexit process in Dublin  
Yup - and Cambridge report 17% drop now & expect >60% drop on Brexit. UCAS reported 16% drop for medical student places from EU citizens...  
Brexit:  Irish High Court action to clarify  article 50  via @IrishTimes 
Now lawyers want to challenge Brexit in Dublin courts  
Brexit-weakened pound helps to strengthen Murdoch's empire...and we wondered why much of the media wanted out of EU  
Indeed. While the Richmond by-election was given blanket coverage for its supposed Brexit implications.  
Even by @BBCNews standards it beggars belief that there was no mention of the Conservative Brexit victory (Labour in 4th) on the 10pm News! 
Breaking News from @JolyonMaugham. Brexit litigation isn't going away & may reach Luxembourg on q of #Art50 revocability after all. 
Theresa May faces new legal challenge to block her Brexit plan  
New Brexit Challenge in the Irish High Court  via @JolyonMaugham 
I'm in! ... EU negotiators to offer every Brit the chance to remain an EU citizen after Brexit  
Brexit will steal the birthright of the freedom to live and work across the EU from young people.#Brexit is Theft. #Remain #YesEU 
his media pushed for brexit, now the pound has devalued hes bidding again at a bargain price ! planned ????  
EU negotiators to offer individual Brits the chance to remain EU citizens after Brexit  
There's no need to panic until the people that wrote bearish thesis on Brexit and Trump turn bullish. 
And #Brexit'ers call us Remoaners. Jacob Rees Mogg won't even wear a woman's wig 'for a laugh'. Bloody Brexiters - no sense of fun.#HIGNFY 
There is therefore good reason to believe that the Tory Right might seek to wreck negotiations with the EU#Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
The Tory right know that the worse the #Brexit deal the more Britain will have to slash taxes on business & wealth to attract investment. 
You might be able to remain an EU citizen, even after Brexit. Here's how  
Astute move by the European Parliament, choosing Mark E Smith to lead its Brexit negotiations-ah  
A recruiter says London's investment banking jobs market has been ‘annihilated’ by Brexit  
This, on Ms May & Brexit seen from the constituency ground, is well worth reading.  
Of all the #brexit tragedies the impact on young people is the worst. Brexit to the young more than anyone.  
Thanks again for offer of EU citizenship for Brits if we should Brexit. Loads of applications will come. We love EU 
Why do the rich want Brexit? So they can dump rights, safeguards, checks and controls and make more profit from you & I. #Brexit #Brokeit 
Amazing news! - EU negotiators will offer Brits an individual opt-in to remain #EUcitizens! #brexit  
Perhaps surprisingly, the Diplomatic Service hasn't called up Alfred to get his help with the Brexit negotiations.  
Stop comparing Italy’s referendum to Brexit and Trump. Here’s what it’s really about @alemannoEU  
Contrary to the prevailing view, #Trump and #Brexit are not simply a backlash against economic inequality  
Indicates the #EU is happy to look outwards with idealism & decency while #Brexit UK looks inwards without either.@GuyVerhofstadt 
Expect Brexit leaders to fight to hard against this.  Young people in particular should be lobbying their MPs now if they want this!  
European negotiators to offer Brits option to retain EU status after Brexit  
EU negotiators will offer UK citizens the chance to stay EU citizens as a proposal in #Brexit negotiations #UKtoStay 
"It's just a gigantic con, they've dressed themselves up as the voice of common man and woman" @campbellclaret on #brexit and #trump #c4news 
‘Brexit is a TRAVESTY!’ Gerry Adams bleats. As if anyone cares what this terrorist godfather thinks anymore?  
LISTEN: Award Winning Think Tank Boss Says Political Tide Turning Against Establishment After Brexit, Trump  
Oct 12: David Davis's advisor says #Brexit is a 'dead weight' that carries a 'permanent cost' of 1.2% UK GDP #Remain 
Excellent as always on #Brexit: @DavidAllenGreen 'Five things we learnt from the Supreme Court Article 50 hearing'  
Tory voting constituent secures meeting with her MP @theresa_may to discuss Brexit only for the PM to lose her rag 
BRANSON BEWARE: Top business group vows to rival Europhiles and make a 'SUCCESS' of Brexit  
Britain will cut taxes and take on the EU if it tries to 'punish' UK for Brexit, suggests David Davis  
Ukip is targeting the MPs who defied their constituents over Brexit  
No. 1 lesson of #Brexit? If you fail to prepare, prepare to fail. 
Veiled threats over judges’ #Brexit ruling show why movements claiming to speak for ‘the people’ are so dangerous  
Download @iaindale brexit briefing to hear Helena Kennedy take IDS to task about an independent judiciary  " 
Me & Dean of Malta Medical School - about to talk about implications of Brexit in relationships between Malta & UK  
EU has the power to make  #OptIn one of the conditions of The Deal.Remember-#Talleyrand was a European.They're very good at that.#Brexit  
Brexiteers rejoice as Government rejects ‘transitional deal’ that would delay leaving #EU | #Brexit  
#Brexit, Jobcentre closures and ratifying the #IstanbulConvention: The SNP's Week In Westminster.  
The UK has 78 of the top universities in the world. Brexit could change all that  
In Guardian @helenpidd seeks to explain Brexit - but this isn't a reason to leave the EU, it's an argument for English regional devolution  
Banking jobs market ‘annihilated’ by Brexit, says recruiter  
Canada, the world #10 economy, the UK's #3 Commonwealth export market,  with 36 million people, wants a post-Brexit free trade deal with us. pic.twitter.com/fttSDGRE0c 
"EU negotiators will offer chance to individually opt-in/ remain #EU citizens"So we #The48Percent-can stay#Brexit 
There is, by definition, no "Brexit that works for everyone". If you take my EU citizenship there is no way Brexit "works" for me. Fuckers.  
1 Sign me up (obvs)2 EU caring more for 48% than UK3 Post-Brexit brain drain will be even greater4 True-colours challenge to Brexiters  
Leave voter on #BBCQT: 'Throughout the whole referendum...we were told that leaving the EU means leaving the single market.' #Brexit  
These MP's going to face to really rough ride, they voted against #Brexit + #Article50  despite their constituencies all voted #Leave 
I'm no expert (and we hate them now anyway) but post-Brexit £ gives Murdoch a massive discount on this deal, right?  
#Brexit negotiators want to offer Brits EU citizenship as individuals  
Brexit talks to include plan for UK nationals to keep EU citizenship  
Shouting into the void: of 3 million tweets on Brexit, only 8% were replies – "an echo chamber, not a debate" 
SHOW this video to anyone in the remain campaign now arguing to stay in the single market #Brexit  
Daniel Hannan thinks it's in Europe's interests to make Brexit pleasant. He's wrong, obviously, says @JonnElledge 
Great, but this won't appease me. So much more is at stake from #Brexit than just personal benefits of EU membership  
Thank goodness Guy Verhofstadt is doing his best for the 74% of UK citizens who did not vote for brexit. It's time UK MPs did the same.  
Pithiest and best description of Brexit I've read.  
Prediction. Cowardly, two faced Leave #Brexit voters will nearly all choose to keep EU citizenship.  
Will the brexiteers try to oppose personal choice?EU to offer every Brit chance to remain EU citizen after Brexit  
Labour must become the party of Remain & explain why Brexit is bad for Britain. The polls show that trying to please both sides doesn't work 
EU negotiators to offer British people the chance to "opt in" and remain EU citizens after Brexit; very nice idea   
You might be able to remain an EU citizen, even after Brexit. Here's how  
Strategic madness. We are losing the friends we will need in the future. Our soft power base is being eroded because of #Brexit  
There's something Brexit about people who think they deserve a Punk Medal for The Pogues being their fave Xmas song. (And I love "FONY".)  
Brexit means removing people's rights & calling it "taking back control". Individual EU citizenship is a stunt, but it exposes that lie. 
That's real price of Brexit. The price we can't measure. How many future relationships, friendships, yrs sent abroad, will no longer happen. 
The bullying #brexit @Conservatives have really become the Nasty Party.Seeking to encourage further extremist attacks on MPs? 
I just heard children in the supermarket openly declaring their hatred of brussels sprouts. I don't remember such vitriol before #brexit. 
Theresa May won't be getting a 'red, white and blue Brexit'  
How Project Fear works. #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Anger highlights how Brexit politics isn't about sovereignty. It is about telling other people how to live their lives. 
Labour says its byelection msgs got lost "in the swirl around Brexit.” No good, that.  
Brexit requires an Irish solution to a British problem - @GerryAdamsSF  
Actual footage of a red, white and blue Brexit.  
Top business group vows to rival Europhiles & make Brexit a SUCCESS  
Terrific stuff by @helenpidd having a pop at southerners sneering at northerners who voted Brexit.  
When Britain's SC is deciding if #brexit referendum needs parliamentary nod surely #demonetisation can be reviewed. said @salman7khurshid 
EU negotiators offer every British person the chance to stay an EU citizen after Brexit.  
I'm interested to know what exactly it is that Brexit voters think they've won , being poorer & less secure ? 
#Merkel's deputy says #EU must keep #UK close.e.g. need our money to keep EU from drowning.No, Thanks! #Brexit 
I'm actually looking forward to the fury of Brexit zealots if individuals really are offered a chance to maintain European citizenship. 
I haven't yet had a chance to grapple with "associate EU citizenship" for UK nationals post-Brexit, but someone has  
Architect based in UK? Please help inform our ongoing #Brexit work - take our survey and share your experiences now  
Brexit could see EU student numbers nose dive (drop by 2/3 - it's already down 17%), Cambridge warns  
David Cameron has used his first major speech since resigning in June to explain why he felt people voted for #Brexit  
Brexit - are we there yet?  
Now on 44% of funding for the Brexit book initiative, after 24 hours  
EU negotiators to offer every Brit the chance to remain an EU citizen after Brexit  
#Ireland REFUSE to speak to #NicolaSturgeon over her plans to thwart #Brexit. Is she a Vexatious Loser?  #BBC #SKY 
Brilliant idea from chief EU Brexit negotiator @GuyVerhofstadt.Brexit doesn't necessarily mean Brexit. 
Just bought @IanDunt's Brexit book, or as it's also known: "Preparation material for the inevitable rows during Christmas dinner" 
3 Million Brexit Tweets Reveal Leave Voters Talked About Immigration More Than Anything Else  via @jamesrbuk 
You Won't Believe Who is Outraged Over @Telegraph's Brexit Listicle  
Establishment figures should stop sneering at northern England for backing Brexit - there were sound reasons. 
@GuyVerhofstadt Post Brexit EU citizenship for individual  Brits who want it? Count me in! 
My Scotland in Europe update is available. The big news has been the Brexit Case taking place in the Supreme Court. 
Excellent idea from @GuyVerhofstadt  #Brexit 
Brexit so far, in five charts. Read more:  
House of Lords publishing six Brexit inquiry reports next week.But first, @britishfuture report on EU citizens in UK coming Monday morning. 
Speaking @ Institute of International & European Affairs on Brexit. I presented An Irish Solution  2 an English Problem.  
Brexit breakdown: 3M tweets over 6 months show immigration dominated Leave supporters' online campaign  
You don't want to miss #Moats tonight at 7pm @talkRADIO #France #LePen #italyreferendum #Brexit #by-election #UKIP #Corbyn 
Massive analysis of 3 million tweets shows what really dominated the Brexit conversation:  Amazing work @jamesrbuk 
3 Million Brexit Tweets Reveal Leave Voters Talked About Immigration More Than Anything Else  via @jamesrbuk 
Brexit to cause 2/3 drop in EU students say Cambridge Uni. Has already caused 17% drop in undergrad applications.  
Brexit: what are our demands? The People's Question Time book your tickets today:  19 Jan, St Pancras Church London. 
Gibraltar, Catalonia, Brexit are among the highlights from an interview with Spanish Prime Minister Mariano Rajoy  
David Davis #brexit logic: "France can't compete with Anglo-Saxons", why then is its economy bigger than the UK's?  
Don’t sneer at northerners for voting for Brexit – there are sound reasons | Helen Pidd  
"...to discuss opportunities as a result of Brexit..". Seriously. A government minister has uttered those words at a UK university.#Brexit  
In which I argue you shouldn't sneer at northerners for voting for Brexit  
This manages to miss the fact that plenty of southern places voted for Brexit. And Liverpool didn't.  
How do #Remain MPs representing solidly #Remain constituencies (London etc) find they can in conscience vote for #Art50 #Brexit timetable? 
Britain will cut taxes and take on the EU if it tries to 'punish' UK for Brexit, suggests Davis Davis   
Revealed: Ukip vows to target the six MPs who defied their constituents and voted against triggering Article 50  
37% of UK electorate voted for #brexit in an advisory ref. Corporate elite are insisting 'will of people' must stand. The 63% must stand up 
If you hoped Sleaford was a Brexit blip for Labour, you're in for a whole lot worse says @MrTCHarris 
People queuing to buy £5 Bratwursts from a Xmas market stall staffed by PolesI presume it's some sort of Brexit-inspired performance art 
POPULISM: It's the BBC's new buzzword, being used to sneer at the 'uneducated' 17 million who voted Brexit  
EU negotiators to offer individual Brits the chance to remain EU citizens after Brexit  
The Tories slump to another 17 point lead as the popular backlash against Theresa May's Brexit strategy continues... 
And so begins a #UKIP Yuletide tradition that extends the year round of extending the hand of intolerance rather than kindness. #brexit  
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Theresa May has already revealed her Brexit strategy, and it's quite simple  
French philosopher #BrunoLatour on Trump, Brexit and the decline of "gloabalization":  
Food companies just warned prices will rise after Brexit without EU migrant workers 
NATIONAL CENTRE For Social Research Reports That 70% Of UK Council Tenants Voted For Brexit - Labour's EUrophilia Pushing Them To Vote UKIP  
2016.. I wrote this for @HuffPostUKPol - #Trump, #Brexit And Beyond: Switching Negative To Positive in 2017  #IoT #VR 
Some good, combative thoughts on Brexit, Trump and post-truth here from @campbellclaret  
'Brexit will affect the young more than anyone' by @cllrjoeporter from @UKYouth @ukyv @weareundivided  
“It is absolutely suicidalI am concerned about the long-term future of the plant - we don’t know what Brexit means” 
Yesterday’s by-election result shows support for Brexit is rising. People want the Govt. to get on with the job. 
it will be VERY interesting to see an independent documentary about how BBC covered brexit 
Britain will cut taxes and take on the EU if it tries to 'punish' UK for Brexit, suggests Davis Davis.  
British public saved the British banks after their fiasco.It's time they support the British public and #Brexit ! 
Ed Miliband tells Owen Jones: 'The Tories don't know what they want from Brexit' – video interview  
UK trade gap narrows despite fears of Brexit slowdown  
RT if you agree with Beefy that politicians should stop trying to block Brexit! #RespectTheResult 
Britain will cut taxes and take on the EU if it tries to 'punish' UK for Brexit, suggests Davis Davis   
If you genuinely voted brexit to teach Cameron a lesson, face it: you did something stupid. He isn't going to suffer. The poorest will. 
17.4 million people voted for Brexit and to leave the single market. There must be no backsliding.  
Brexit Secretary David Davis says UK position on immigration means UK will not gain access to European Single Market 
No Brexit. 48%+ & 16/17yr olds deserve inspirational, ambitious, pro-EU alliance; shake off old dogma & differences: unite for an EU with UK  
37% of @TimFarron's MPs won't follow him in trying to block Brexit. If they get that up to 48% he'll acknowledge they've won. 
Here's my interview with @Ed_Miliband on Brexit, Trump, immigration, and Taylor Swift:  
Buck up UK News you forgot 'in spite of brexit'  
For financial markets, the biggest event of 2016 wasn't Brexit or Trump  
UK's food & drink industry fires warning shot over Brexit, arguing prices will rise without access to EU workers  
Ed Miliband tells Owen Jones: 'The Tories don't know what they want from Brexit' – video interview  
I feel Germany, with nearly a quarter of all EU trade with UK & huge deficit with us, will be v pragmatic on Brexit  
She won't derail Brexit, but she will cost the taxpayer millions of pounds & waste vast amounts of government time.  
ACRE Secretary-General @DanielJHannan speaking at The @Heritage Foundation about the tremendous opportunity of #Brexit  
READ: Matthew Parris, former Tory MP, columnist for @thetimes and @spectator shamelessly declares all 17.4m #Brexit voters racist.  
Gina Miller should know there r thousands of us out here who stand with her&against the abuse&threats she has received #SupremeCourt #brexit 
By supporting Brexit in principle but opposing it in detail, Labour has contrived the worst of all worlds. Finis.  
Liberals smearing all Brexit/Trump voters as 'alt-right' are doing white supremacists' work for them. My JPost col  
Vote Leave promised that #brexit would mean lower food prices #LeaveWatch 
A clear policy would be a start. I'm a Labour member and I have no idea where we stand on Brexit. 
Labour are being squeezed by the Brexit divide but - whatever you think about the leadership - what's the real solution to that? 
Funny how BBC have 3 hour "ELECTION SPECIAL"for Richmond byelection but barely cover v strong result for Brexit in #sleafordandnorthhykeham 
Britain is split on Brexit and Labour currently has nothing to offer either side #Sleaford 
Virgin Atlantic say @scottories APD plan "would provide a huge boost for Scottish economy just in time for Brexit." 
You know those parents who won't hear a bad word against their child despite them being a useless horror? That's who's handling #brexit 
Blame Brexit? Cambridge says applications from students in EU states are down 14%  
Sleaford by-election: Labour is haemorrhaging voters to both sides of the Brexit divide.  
Trashing your own supporters. Chasing the UKIP vote.How's that working out for you, Labour?#brexit #remain 
Hard Brexit is two men in a room, one pointing the gun at his foot, the other at his head. Both lose, but one worse than the other. 
"I will be kind." This is exactly the kind of foolish, arrogant, blinded nonsense which encourages hard Brexit approach from Europe.  
David Cameron: Brexit vote part of 'movement of unhappiness'  
Delusional Cameron.Brexit vote has instead spattered the country with poison,deepened divisions and unmasked hatred.  
READ: Everything is still all to play for, #Brexit remains in the balance. Now is not the time to be complacent.  
'No tolerance to be permitted for climate-change deniers or Trump, Brexit voters': how the left now menaces freedom  
People who voted Brexit, Trump are 'really really stupid' says pop icon Moby. Echoes of left-wing eugenics movement?  
As of today, December 9th, 2016, Boris Johnson owes our NHS £8.165 billion. Put that on a bus.#Brexit  
Warning! Don't holiday in Europe. #Merkel migrants are randomly attacking people.#Deport #CloseBorders#Brexit #FraukePetry #MarineLePen 
BRANSON BEWARE: Top business group vows to rival Europhiles and make a 'SUCCESS' of Brexit  
Pls RT. Peter Lilley voted for Brexit timetable. Yet his constituency voted overwhelmingly to Remain. Precedent set. @Anna_Soubry @MikeH_PR 
Exclusive: Banks want to be subject to EU laws for five years in post-Brexit deal  
.@David_Cameron is back, on a mega-bucks speaking tour. Talking the euro, populism, Brexit. But my favourite remark, via @timesredbox 
Brexit will affect the young more than anyone. Heed our voices | Joe Porter  
80% of people think we need the same or stronger levels of environmental protection after we leave the EU  #Brexit  
ONS on Brexit: "only limited evidence so far that the depreciation of sterling has led to a marked increase in UK exports"  
Richmond Park:Remainers scrape home 50:45. Media: 'Remainers Triumph! Brexit is dead!Sleaford Brexiteers win 67:11Media: Silence 
Presumably under Farron By-Election Logic the Sleaford result means we're now Hard Brexit ? 
Who would have though adopting Tory policy on Brexit & failing to hold the gov to account would have led to Labour being irrelevant eh. 
The SNP are not just failing to listen but are trying to airbrush Scottish leave voters from history #Brexit  
Keir Starmer genius idea for Lab to face both ways at the same time on Brexit not going down too well with the voters, I see... 
The Tories are the party of not entirely enthusiastic Brexit, Lib Dems the party of Remain, Ukip the party of loon Brexit. 
There will be a @HouseofCommons debate on #Brexit and science & research on Mon 19 Dec. Read our recent report (pdf)  
Supreme Court of UK deciding role of Parliament in Brexit. Shoukd Our Supreme Court similarly decide role of Parliament in demot policy? 
Sleaford by-election shows what will happen to Labour if it doesn't get its act together on Brexit: a slow and quiet drift into irrelevance 
Nigel Farage predicts "Norwegian-style" deal for post-Brexit Britain  
I did not vote for the PM's Brexit timetable, but I am not an 'enemy of the people'. Hateful rhetoric must stop now.  
If Richmond Park was body blow to #Brexit, Sleaford&NK is a massive boost. Reality is that Remain voters voted Remain and Leave voters...  
40 Polish community leaders call on MPs to guarantee EU citizens their acquired rights after Brexit in a self-funded ad in in @theHouse_mag 
Cameron "Populism cost me my job"For once you're right Dave-you weren't popular as you thought you knew it all so no plan B for Brexit 
"£100 more on my car insurance, which salesman blamed on Brexit", Helen tells me here -   Has this happened to you? 
Has Tim Farron bn on yet to declare the Sleaford result an endorsement of Brexit, Trump and the last General Election? 
Jess Phillips on R4: "If this was another election about Brexit, I think the cut through of the Labour Party is shown in the result." 
I find myself searching for words from T Farron on why Richmond was a vote against Brexit & Sleaford was just a By-Election! 
This is excellent. MPs whose constituencies voted Remain but who voted for this week's #brexit motion.  
Full press release about the #PolesinUK letter calling on all MPs to guarantee acquired rights of EU citizens after Brexit in @theHouse_mag 
Brexit debate feels like a couple arguing about how much to bid for a house they've just viewed. And not considering the vendor's response. 
EXPOSED! The seven MP’s who voted against BREXIT and their constituents  
With Brexit the biggest challenge we've had for decades it's vital that we now unite to get the Corbyn Christmas single to number one. 
No #Bregrets in SleafordProBrexit: 67.5% Anti Brexit (Libdum) 11%Who knows (Lab) 10%Overwhelming Brexit win by 6:1 
Some choice cuts from that David Davis Brexit meeting memo. Full City note here:  
We've posted leaked #Brexit memo where @DavidDavisMP lays out views against transition deal: "Not really interested” 
Exclusive: Banks want to be subject to EU laws for five years in post-Brexit deal  
So the 7 December #Brexit vote was a continuation of the 'buy a pig in a poke' strategy: trigger come what May ...  
David Cameron: Brexit vote part of 'movement of unhappiness'  
Labour Collapse in Sleaford | Falls From Second to Fourth | Party Blaming Brexit | See Results in Full:  
Real possibility that UK Labour is strategically snookered by Brexit, the way Scottish Labour is by Indy.  
David Davis rebuffed City hopes for Brexit transition deal  
Poland will be a key ally for the UK both during and after Brexit, writes @KawczynskiMP today  
Oh my stars ... there really are no words   #brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn's total silence in the face of Brexit and election defeats speaks volumes about the integrity and dignity of the man. 
Trump/ Brexit seemed a propaganda win for the Communist Party but China's problems are similar, by me @TheEconomist 
That red, white and blue Brexit in full:  
So with 53% share of vote to a #Brexit Conservative in #Sleaford,on @timfarron #byelection logic that's the end of his calls for a 2nd ref.. 
This what happened when Mr. Brexit went to Washington  
#NorthernPowerhouse: We need a post #Brexit settlement for northern towns that have been left behind  #SOTN16 
Pleased to get cross-party support for EDM on importance of EU #science collaboration and funding.#brexit  
UKIP is said to be 'holding the Government's feet to the fire' over Brexit. Is that what Farage used to do to his fag at Dulwich College? 
Labour says Sleaford by election - in which it fell to fourth - proved difficult due to voters focus on Brexit.  Pesky voters. 
The More Remainers Push, the Harder Brexit becomes. Superb from Sam White @SamWhiteTky #csm #brexit #remoaners 
How fortunate for Cameron that Brexit was the fault of "populism" and had nothing to do with his own bungling. 
This South African billionaire made a costly Brexit bet - but he has no regrets  
EU sees limits to ‘bespoke’ post-Brexit deal with U.K. 
After #Brexit and #Trump the Kremlin is starting the next political PR project in #France 
So, Cons win Sleaford & N Hykeham. Ukip 2nd. 67% of the vote for Brexit. Do we have any comments from Tiny Tim and Calamity Clegg?  
Listened carefully to Cameron's remarks as reported on Radio 4. He doesn't take a shred of responsibility for the mess we're in now #Brexit 
It's Mad Max: Fury Road's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
Don't give up: #Brexit must be stopped. 
Major setback for PM May as UK Supreme Court rules Scotland and Wales can intervene in Article 50 triggering  #Brexit 
Referencing U.S. election and Brexit, Joe Biden calls for Trudeau to be world leader in time of uncertainty  
Last night Lab allowed Tories to hijack their #Brexit motionTonight Lab have dropped from 2nd place to fourth in SleafordLab are finished. 
The nation has changed its mind since last Thursday. Clearly, the nation wants a hard Brexit now @britainelects 
New Conservative MP for Sleaford & North Hykeham Dr Caroline Johnson says her victory means Theresa May can get on with delivering Brexit.  
French philosopher #BrunoLatour on Trump, Brexit and the decline of "gloabalization":  
The Brexit case: four days in 400 words.  
You can find my latest Brexit interview with ITV here: 
EU sees limits to ‘bespoke’ post-Brexit deal with U.K.  
Brexit: Tim Farron faces Liberal Democrat revolt over Commons vote  
Brexit boost: McDonald’s has announced plans to move its non-US tax base from Luxembourg to the United Kingdom.  
Folk keep bringing up the internet, but Brexit's roots are in decades of dogmatic anti EU propaganda from gutter press & crushing austerity  
#RICHMONDPARK by-election: wall-to-wall Brexit-vs-remaim coverage by BBC but Remain vote STILL dropped by 35%.#SLEAFORD by-election: zero. 
@johnsut2712488t7 @WeAreOneEU Truth's not nice: they should be afraid. Pensioners who voted for #brexit were foolish and have harmed others. 
Blame Brexit? Cambridge says applications from students in EU states are down 14%  
Parliament backs Brexit, votes to trigger Article 50 by March 31, 2017 #Trump2016 #2A #MAGA  
Proven!“No doubt that Good Friday Agrmt takes precedence in international law over opinion that is Brexit decision" 
Data miner Cambridge Analytica won #Brexit & Trump campaigns. Now getting White House contract. #PROPAGANDAMACHINE  
And people wonder why UK voted #brexit .free press should be unbiased press. What chance ?  
UK food prices 'will rise after Brexit unless Government can keep EU workers' 
What?Señora Clegg is out to lunch.UK Brexit / anti-Establishment “populism” is “driven by the elites”?All 17.4 million of them?#bbctw 
If Brexit means Brexit, then leave means leave. Independent. Not semi-detached.  
Miriam Gonzalez Durantez @bbcthisweek not listening to what anyone says+ won't answer questions just wants to push her anti Brexit agenda 
Lawyer urges supreme court to throw out Brexit case after article 50 vote  
We rarely mention #Brexit on #bbctw so @afneil has an update on THAT court case. 
While we wait for Sleaford, @paulnuttallukip tells Labour MPs defying Brexit to start "looking for another job"  
Tory MP asks how much EU countries should be charged to access OUR market after Brexit  
#UKIP leader Paul Nuttall vows to boot out the five Labour MPs who voted against Brexit despite serving Leave areas  
The next series of House of Cards is going to seem tame and compassionate compared to real politics in 2016.#Trump #Brexit #Farage #bbcqt 
This Week coming up on BBC1 very shortly. We're starting on Brexit for a change. Ho Hum @bbcthisweek 
Brexit-voting Louise Mensch says don't throw money at NHS. Makes no mention of that £350m. Then she'll fly back to her Manhattan life #bbcqt 
Get ready for Post Brexit fashion with these handy 1970's hand knitted fashion images.  
Jesus Nigel Farage is still claiming Brexit would let us to build a hospital each week. Hard Brexit would cause massive recession. #bbcqt 
This #bbcqt a useful reminder of how Brexit is crowding out what would otherwise be huge existential issues for govt (e.g. Nhs/social care) 
Whereas in the real world, Brexit will work for no one except millionaires & press barons. Labour has lost my vote over this  
You can't say BOTH that what happens post Brexit was crystal clear before the referendum AND that the gov't can't reveal its hand. #bbcqt 
If the British people don't realise how stupid Brexit is then frankly they deserve these inane fools like Farage and Mensch  #bbcqt 
Yes, who is going to wipe your backside, Britain? #bbcqt #brexit  
"We hold all the cards," @LouiseMensch declares about #UK's #Brexit negotiations with the #EU. How out of touch can one be? #bbcqt 
Half an hour into @bbcquestiontime #bbcqt and it's all Trump & Brexit. NHS on its knees. Street sleeping increasing. Disability benefits cut 
Following #Labour's abandonment of 38m people in UK who didn't vote #Brexit, I'm officially done.My card in same state as party.#bbcqt 
In a world where hate and misinformation gave us #brexit and #DonaldTrump to delete my account would be irresponsible & craven.  
The European Commission’s point man on Brexit said a deal for Britain would not be as good as membership  
Over 100k of leave voters in Britain have died since the decision. Astounding how things would have changed #Brexit  
Brexit is not the start of the fall of the European empire; it is the last death throes of the British empire 
Ed Miliband found an old paper by Theresa May which skewers her Brexit strategy  
One Health and Safety regulation he wants to get rid of is the Working Time Directive. So much for protecting workers rights. #Brexit  
Brexit battle: The main arguments from the Supreme Court  
McDonald's to move international tax base to UK More great news showing how #Brexit makes us more OPEN to investment  
Woman behind #Brexit court case, Gina Miller, speaks out on abuse she's had on social media #BBCNewsTen 
My cartoon - the #Brexit fairy tale unfolds#Davis#Fox#Johnson#BBC1news 
As I keep telling #brexiters:Pensioners '£105 worse off within five years' as Brexit leaves £1.3 billion bill  
Now this is a Brexit that I am fully supportive of …..  
Self-evident that Brexit is a coup d’état by an executive cabal. Biggest disgrace is that parliament simply bends over & lets it happen.  
My cartoon - where does Britain draw the line with Saudi Arabia & China?#Brexit#BBC1news 
#brexit select committee visit to Sunderland met with warm welcome but more questions than answers & no one knew details of #Nissan deal 
McDonald's moving its European base to the UK in a dramatic vote of confidence in Brexit  
Tim Farron faces Liberal Democrat revolt for 'failing to accept the result of the referendum'  #Brexit 
In generations to come, Brexit will be seen as both the apotheosis & downfall of populism. For it can, of course, only go one way from here 
Donald Trump is clearly not mentally stable, a clear case of democracy not working. Reminds me of Brexit. We live in dangerous times! 
President Le Pen? Unthinkable! Like Brexit and Trump..  I write from Paris:  #MarineLePen #brexit #Trump 
"It's easier to fool people than convince them they've been fooled". Mark Twain clearly foresaw Brexit 
Colony Gin??? Oh my days!!! What next??? Brexit Bacardi??! #TheApprentice 
Share if you agree All Foreign criminals should be deported 
After 4 days of debate, Britain's Supreme Court weighs Brexit verdict  
I WILL NEVER PURCHASE THIS PERSONS PRODUCTS 
Watch: Bill Cash teaches Ken Clarke a lesson at Brexit debate  
Blame Brexit? Cambridge says applications from students in EU states are down 14%  
Stolen from Facebook #Brexit #Cake 
If you voted #Brexit and feel betrayed by this traitor, then RT and Boycott Branson and Virgin. Bye Bye Branson.  
From today's @FinancialTimes #brexit #SupremeCourt 
Liberal Democrats' leader wants his party to be the only one opposing Brexit, not all his MPs agree.  
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
I've #justdonated to send a copy of "Brexit: What the Hell Happens Now?" by Ian Dunt to every MP. Donate on @justgiving and help raise £3959 
Tim Farron, MP for Westmorland & Lonsdale, voted against Article 50 last night.His area of Cumbria was 56% pro-#Brexit (5/6 council areas).  
Despite the #Brexit vote in the Commons on 7 December, the fight for #Remain is not over. Brexit must be stopped. Stay determined. 
Growth best in G7.Unemployment down Jobs up. Investment continues. Inflation <1%Brexit is already a a fantastic successVive le Brexit!  
The more I read tweets by Trump cultists & hard-Brexit seekers the more I wonder if the education system is adequate for workable democracy 
'Dramatic vote of confidence in Brexit'...  
"I object to your idea about Remoaners," Greg says as #ThePledge panel debate whether Brexit is over for Remain  
The Liberal Democrats' leader wants his party to be the only one opposing Brexit - not all his MPs agree  
.@grantshapps wants post-Brexit Britain to become 'the world's greatest trading nation' ) 
The 89 MPs who voted to block Brexit are nothing more than TRAITORS! Pod One with @smashmorePH #FreeSpeech 
'Child could see flaws in Government Brexit case'  
Oliver Letwin Clearly Explains What Brexit Means“We’re leavingWe’re leaving the single market & the customs union" 
Lord Snooty Rees-Mogg thinks a post-Brexit UK should write its own rules on the environment & employment law- hello again smog & workhouses. 
So 48% of people in the UK who voted Remain need to be listened to. Yet 38% of people who voted for Brexit in Scotland have no voice at all? 
McDonald's to move its entire European base to UK.It follows July's announcement to create 5,000 UK jobs. #Brexit  
Court in an existential nightmare over Brexit | John Crace  
SNP MP LOSES IT during interview after Sturgeon's Brexit double standards are exposed  
Ed Miliband discovered a 'deleted' paper by Theresa May which skewers her own Brexit strategy - Mirror Online  
We expect judgment in the Article 50 #Brexit appeal to be delivered by the end of January. Here's some more info on the process...  
Theresa May has just been called ‘petulant, defensive, tired and rattled’ – and not by who you’d expect  #brexit 
Ukip targets seven MPs who voted against Brexit in historic vote [in defiance of their constituents]  
Cambridge university is worried that Brexit will cause a two-third drop in EU students  
Brexit challenger Gina Miller tells Leave voters: 'Go knock on No 10'  
President @LawSocPresident speaks for profession in condemning recent media attacks on judiciary following #Brexit case #ruleoflaw 
Here are the final day's transcripts  and video files  in the Article 50 #Brexit appeal 
Brexit will go down as the most unnecessary act of self harm ever undertaken by a sovereign nation:  
"I did not vote for the PM's Brexit timetable, but I am not an enemy of the people. This rhetoric must stop now." 
interesting: MEP who dreamt up "Associate EU membership" for individual Brits, says will form part of @EUparliament Brexit negotiation:  
What is the best kind of Brexit?#ChooseYourBrexitWisely #ThereIsNoPlan #PMHT 
Brexit could create chaos in Ireland. They didn't put that on the side of the bus. Let's stop Brexit now.  
Ken Clarke. That rare beast. A half decent Tory.#Brexit  
Today, Brexit means.... signing up to new EU law on limiting emissions, coming into force on December 31st:   
A child of six could see the flaws in the Government's legal argument in the Brexit case, the Supreme Court has been told. #votetory 
UK agrees new air pollution law, raising awkward Brexit questions – as new coalition is launched  
The UK is being asset stripped while we're all distracted by Brexit 
Love the way @BBCNews manage to ferret out the anti Boris anti #Brexit MPs for running commentary on Boris. #BBCBias 
Matthew Parris vs Matt Ridley on Brexit  pic.twitter.com/9PoXWtvfrN 
The judges now decide if Parlt should have a say in Brexit. Note: A SAY. That's not  just hear the Govt's plan, its debate it & vote on it. 
MPs have now been given a democratic mandate from the British people in their entirety, personal opinions redundant.#Brexit  
Government Asserts Right to Trigger Article 50 as Supreme Court Considers Brexit  
MPs' vote to back Theresa May's Brexit plans 'was not legally binding'  
The govt is working very hard to make the 'ordinary working people' hate the 'metropolitan liberal elite'. Tory #Brexit dividing Britain 
Forget the 52/48 talk, most people have moved on. We're now 68/32 for #Brexit via @YouGov 
This what happened when Mr. Brexit went to Washington  
Many thank to those who’ve included me in the Brexit case tweeters they’ve liked. Glad to have spread the word. Final @SkyNews show at 2130. 
The most popular religion in  Brexitannia is paganism. Many regularly offer sacrifices to the ancient god of fertility, Mick Jagger. 
80% want to maintain or raise envt'l standards after #Brexit . @JacobReesMoggMP, will you respect will of the people? 
Gina Miller, the woman behind the Brexit legal challenge, has told the BBC she has employed security to protect...  
#Brexit is looking so good nowUK highest growth economy in G7Huge investment coming into UKCountries queuing up for FTAsEU collapsing 
Tips for surviving Christmas with your Brexit-voting relatives  
Supreme court Brexit hearing: 10 things we learned  
'We’ll thrive after #Brexit', university chiefs tell MPs. 
<very American & Brexit voice> Those mooslims!  
Brexit does not have to be bad for UK exporters, north-east firm tells MPs  
I didn’t endorse May’s Brexit timetable – but I’m no ‘enemy of the people’ | David Lammy  
July 2009 (after an 8% drop) + July 2016 (after 6% Brexit drop) are the only other times in 10 yrs that RSI has stayed >95 this many hours  
Despite Brexit  
Supreme Court told a child of six could see the flaws in the Government's legal argument in the Brexit case  
Anyone in Sleaford wanting us to Leave the EU MUST vote UKIP and not the brexit lite CONS 
RT if you agree with @EmilyThornberry - the Tories have no plan for #BrexitLabour will keep holding them to account  
Another vote of confidence in #Brexit Britain. McDonald's is to move its non-US tax base from Luxembourg to UK.  
.@BarrySheerman, @JonathanPlaid, @GrahamAllenMPYour constituents voted for Brexit. Have you forgotten who you work for? #RespectTheResult 
Since June, #Brexit has already cost £12 billion to the UK, more than EU contributions #LSEBrexit 
Tusk, Barnier, Merkel, Junker all say, unwaveringly, it's Hard Brexit or No Brexit. So shouldn't Theresa May address the nation about this? 
Act of Union ‘forbids UK Government from starting Brexit’  
Key #Brexit battle is in its final stretch:  via @ReutersTV 
So no one is more pleased than @George_Osborne that his warning of financial catastrophe from Brexit vote turned out to be wrong  
The ONE statement from the #SupremeCourt #Brexit case to remember: "We are NOT being asked to overturn the result of the EU referendum"  
We've taken back so much control, we're now able to sell some of it off to the Chinese. #Brexit 
145 MPs pledge to make UK greenest country in world after Brexit  
I didn’t endorse May’s Brexit timetable – but I’m no ‘enemy of the people’ | David Lammy  
The government's Brexit strategy is like watching blindfolded chimps throwing poo at a wall and hoping that some of it might just stick. 
Manor-born Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg wants the UK to adopt the same safety standards as India  #brexit 
Absolutely, if you voted for #Brexit and meant it, then @VAylingukip1 is the only candidate to vote for.  
If this is true it would be great news on #HumanRightsDay as the way things are looking #Brexit could take a long time! #HumanRightsMatter 
And so. Farewell. Supreme Court Brexit hearing.Into royal prerogatives re-peeringYour many geezersHad their De KeysersAnd De Keysers. 
The slim #Leave majority & demographic change make it all but certain the govt is or will soon be forcing #Brexit against majority opinion. 
BREAKING: Looks like plans for a Bill of Rights could be delayed until after Brexit  
"We were so shocked about #Brexit because we hang out with her, not him - we failed the first lesson of marketing, marketing orientation"  
There was no good reason for Theresa May to have appealed high Court decision. High-risk. She should have just got on with a Brexit Bill.  
Last shot for part 2 of my short quest from east coast to west coast to unfathom the true meaning of Brexit. The answer, as you know, is 42  
DISGRACE: Fury as Supreme Court judges DON'T sing the national anthem, salute the Queen or obey the will of the people as Brexit case ends. 
#Brexit already damaging UK: Cambridge “currently modelling a two-third reduction in admissions from the non-UK EU”  
Don't know what's taking these judges so long, they need to hurry up and find Brexit guilty and send it to prison 
"It bears repeating, we are not being asked to overturn the result of the EU referendum"So, #Brexit'ers, can you stop saying they are!  
McDonald's follows Facebook, Google, Nissan, Boeing... moving functions to UK after #Brexit Why?  My Economics Blog 
A shopkeeper has been branded racist for opening a shop called 'really British' - has Brexit made it harder to celebrate being British?  
Brexit: Child of six could see flaws in Government's case, Supreme Court told  
On train beardie type tears out page from notebook and writes "YOU BREXIT WANKER FUCKED OUR COUNTRY". All capitals. Am I hate crime victim? 
There really needs to be more discussion around how education was a key factor in Trump & Brexit and how that could be solved 
Here are four constituencies ripe to fall to UKIP with the right candidates. #brexit  
Great responses in #Sleaford! Vote @VAylingukip1 #Ukip for a genuine #Brexit.  
Supreme Court Brexit challenger is a convicted BENEFITS FRAUDSTER  
Some thoughts to the younger generation on Brexit.  
Ireland struggling to cope with #brexit boom as UK companies move headquarters from London to Dublin  
A good thorough debate on "Effect of #Brexit on Insurance" but do we have answers? Thanks @techUK @NTTDATAInc #insurtech #whatnext? 
Banks are preparing to move to Paris because of #brexit, meaning good jobs in London will be lost #LeaveWatch  
If you live in #sleafordandnorthhykeham & want a hard-working MP who'll fight for you to have your say on #Brexit deal, vote @RossDPepper 
Biggest joke of 2016?-Trump?-Bake Off?-Brexit?-Jo's Wig. 
WATCH: Bawdy Brexit Judges' Supreme Court Smut [VIDEO]  pic.twitter.com/BUV0LIDV6q 
Really good discussion between northern MLAs at #Oireachtas #Jobs Committee on #brexit with  @conormurphysf & @paul_gavan 
Who said #Brexit was a disaster? McDonald’s Moves Non-US Tax Base to UK  
For financial markets, the biggest event of 2016 wasn't Brexit or Trump  
A strong result here tonight will show the government the people are serious about #Brexit. #Sleaford, please vote #UKIP this evening! 
Voted against triggering Article 50 by March. Impact of Brexit on Liverpool is too great to give the Tories a blank cheque w/o full details. 
Update on the Associate EU Citizenship #Brexit  
#Brexit must be stopped. To let it go through would be to reward systematic attacks on the democratic right to oppose.#Remain #YesEU 
We're proud to be part of #GreenerUK - calling on Govt to make sure our environment is protected after Brexit: 
A review of Lord Sumption's Brexit hearing ties  
If you're struggling to follow the Brexit Supreme Court case on @skynews, the case on Judge Rinder over on @ITV is even more confusing. 
#Brexit supporters don't seem to have noticed that after general elections the losers don't disband their parties & unite behind the govt. 
Isn't Brexit fascinating? 
Lewis Carroll is alive and well at the heart of Brexit.  
Brexit terms will ultimately be decided by the other 27 member states—not on behalf of UK's interests but Europe's 
So, McDonald's, Google, Facebook, Apple, Nissan all commit to UK post #Brexit Broad belief tax/investment environment will be better in UK? 
@natalieben may we ask for a RT for our December shows? Boris - the Musical! is back. Now with added Brexit!  
Vote of confidence in #Brexit Britain as McDonald's ditches heavy handed EU regulators in Luxembourg for the UK:  
Ahoy Brits abroad. RT if you think the Govt shouldn't be allowed to rob you of your #EU #citizenship without a vote in Parliament #brexit  
Festive Tip No. 3.Don't discuss Brexit with elderly relatives. Unless you're numb with alcohol or staying elsewhere. 
Transcript from Thurs AM of Article 50 #Brexit case now online  
It's a catastrophe for Britain that #TheresaMay  spent more time approving Christmas card designs than making a workable #brexit plan.  
6yrs ago, @David_Cameron took @Conservatives out of @EPP. Now, UK govt quietly lobbying EPP for #Brexit help.  
Are magazines that blame #Brexit on Russia legitimate? (Op-Edge by @27khv) 
Looks like our banks are already lining up to desert the sinking ship #Brexit  
Young people who voted to Remain may be a little pissed off with this latest Brexit data  
The anti-Brexit mob is the most elitist British movement in memory.  
Post Jo Cox, CCHQ naming and shaming Lab MPs who voted against Brexit and branding them enemies is reckless, dangerous and shameful. 
McDonald's moving its European base to the UK in a dramatic vote of confidence in Brexit  
The terms of Brexit will ultimately be decided by the other 27 member states   
Brexit boost: McDonald's will move its non-U.S. tax base from Luxembourg to Britain  
Number of people in Great Britain applying for Irish Passports rose  119%  last month. It's the biggest monthly jump since Brexit vote.  
After visiting Adur flood work took @andrealeadsom to Coombes for really good discussion with local farmers and fishermen on DEFRA & Brexit  
Go, @thehistoryguy, Dan Snow! It's clear that most of the current MPs aren't going to help 'us'#MoreUnited #Brexit 
Quite an interesting diagram of impact of potential Brexit pitfalls for universities, from one of their insurers:  
Former Attorney General condemns 'vitriolic' attacks on Brexit judges  
The UK has 78 of the top universities in the world. Brexit could change all that   
It was ALWAYS the case that Brexit happening would need an act of parliament. Supreme Court is just upholding law. Theresa May got it wrong 
Hooray! Oh...via @TheCanaryOTPThe government FINALLY releases its 3-point Brexit plan 
Boris Johnson is rewarded for telling lies (Brexit) and admonished for telling the truth (Saudi Arabia). That's the morally bankrupt Tories. 
The anti-#Brexit mob is the most elitist British movement in memory. Read Brendan O'Neill on the myth of the 48%:  
UK universities now saying that they will thrive post #Brexit.  Well I never!  
.@DavidDavisMP is at Cancer Research UK in Cambridge to discuss opportunities as a result of Brexit  
Universities UK (UUK), have told MPs that they would continue to succeed after Brexit  
To be clear: this is the route which leads to Brexit being blocked by Sinn Fein: the funniest of all possible paths.  
Nothing toughens attitudes in Britain more than a sense that we are being bullied #brexit 
I had a few things to say to Ian Duncan Smith who wrote in the Daily Mail on the Art50 Supreme Court case. #Brexit  
“The old world is over,” says @paulmasonnews in his Q&A with @Ang_Bok  #postcapitalism #Brexit  
Yesterday Labour walked into a Tory trap & gave the Government a blank cheque for hard #Brexit. @CarolineLucas didn't - here's why. 
Rather than attack judges and concerned MPs for Brexit vulnerabilities, the hard-right must look closer to home.  
We're now part of the #GreenerUK coalition  launched today to ensure the environment isn't forgotten after #Brexit  
MPs with constituencies who voted leave should be not try to delay or frustrate Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Confirmation of what everybody knew.The SNP's stance on Brexit is nothing but a ploy to try and get independence.  
Manjit Gill QC really bringing home in #UKSupremeCourt the human cost of uncertainty over who has the power to trigger #Article50 & #Brexit  
Manjit Gill QC says his clients face the risk of being deported when Brexit takes effect. Says children are entitled to know their future. 
Richard Gordon QC for Welsh govt on Brexit: "You cannot revive a corpse by tearing up the death certificate" <<obviously not a Rangers fan  
Theresa May wants a 'red, white and blue' Brexit. Europe just wants details  
Manjit Gill QC deals boldly with the point that others avoided: Referendum Act is silent about consequences because nobody expected Brexit. 
Cambridge expects EU student numbers will drop by TWO-THIRDS due to Brexit. "Significant risk" to higher education. . 
The @Cambridge_Uni full submission to @CommonsEd on the "significant risk.. Brexit poses" and risk of visa changes:   
We're not allowed to tell you anything about Brexit... so here's some jam  
The "will of the people" is a bogus democratic concept that serves those wishing to delegitimize and suppress dissent.#Remain #Brexit 
#BREXIT: We Won, you Lost, get over it! I SUFFERED THREE TERMS OF #TONYBLAIR AS #PM BASED ON A MAJORITY RESULT. NOW IT IS MY TURN! #BBC #UK 
Politicians need to get on with Brexit!  
BREAKING: Surprise witness appears at UK Supreme Court Brexit hearing.  
#TelegraphLetters: MPs who plot against Brexit must think of the voters first  #premium 
The Polish Christmas advert that trumped John Lewis, melting hearts in regretful Brexit Britain  
Brexit voter demographic breakdown: "Those who see themselves as English rather than British (74%)". Riiiight. And Scotland voted "remain". 
It's ludicrous for @RuthDavidsonMSP to suggest @theSNP is creating a 'constitutional crisis' after the Tory #Brexit. #FMQs 
Watch how this distinction between 'workers' rights' (approved by the PM!) and 'red tape' (Euro-nonsense!) plays out as Brexit unfolds.  
.@BorisJohnson: 'I would like to ask Keir Starmer why he is seeking to frustrate the will of the people?' #Brexit  
My advice to @theresa_may on getting best possible #Brexit deal: she needs to generate goodwill from 27.  @CER_London 
Re MPs ask ppl of Sunderland what they want from Brexit, here are answers: 350m NHS, mines re-opened, end to poverty  
Those women wanting to be barristers&disheartened by all-male #Brexit case: watch Helen Mountfield QC speaking now. Take heart&be inspired 
Leave voter on #BBCQT: 'Throughout the whole referendum...we were told that leaving the EU means leaving the single market.' #Brexit  
So Jeremy Corbyn voted with the Tories yesterday to support Tory 'hard Brexit' without knowing what Brexit involves. #LabourBrexitShambles 
Days after pro-Brexit Thomas Mair was jailed for killing Remain MP Jo Cox, @CCHQPress is listing MPs who oppose May's Brexit timetable 
My speech from yesterday's #Brexit debate explaining why I could not vote to invoke #Article50 by March deadline  
With hapless Labour facilitating #Brexit, the political home for serious Remainers has to be the #LibDems. 
145 MPs sign up to pledge to make UK greenest country in the world after Brexit  #GreenerUK 
Nottingham MPs Graham Allen &Chris Leslie voted against Article 50 last night.The area under their constituency voted for #Brexit by 51%.  
We're proud to be part of #GreenerUK - calling on Govt to make sure our environment is protected after Brexit:  
Glad to be part of #GreenerUK. Govt must protect & restore nature whatever #brexit looks like  
Parliamentary debate on #ivory trade today. Interesting article here  With/without Brexit we can do it anyway 
"I don't understand how you could vote for Brexit!"  
"I wish to register a complaint about this Brexit model what I purchased not six months ago from this very referendum" 
Populism: BBC's new buzzword, being used to sneer at the 'uneducated' 17 million who voted for Brexit  
Post-Brexit, we can retake global lead to close ivory markets and save elephants. My @Telegraph piece today:  
Funny how 40 years moaning about the EU and agitating to leave was ok but 6 months querying Brexit's merits is undemocratic 
Maybe don't focus on economic causes for Brexit or Trump in a way that makes you excuse racism? My piece here:  
Brexit vote split UK 4 parts. The most divisive political event in several decades. Who will judge what happens next in law? Must be Plmnt. 
Well done Nicola! They must think we button up the back!Sturgeon snubs May's offer of a post-Brexit indyref2  
145 MPs signing #EnvironmentPledge highlights that #Brexit is a pivotal moment in achieving a thriving natural world. #GreenerUK 
My interview with @labourlewis on Brexit, immigration and how Labour can win back the working class. 
Boom - @george_osborne took£187,630 from speeches in November. On top of £320,000 he made in Oct that's now half a mill since Brexit result.  
.@stroud_neil is right: the Govt should produce a White Paper outlining the core strategic objectives it's aiming for from #Brexit  
Theresa May on decision-making, Brexit and doing the job her way  #FTWomen2016 
There are no such things as "hard Brexit" or "soft Brexit" there is only Brexit or no Brexit  
If the best #Brexit deal is #NoBrexit our MPs would be betraying the British people by pretending that option does not exist.#Remain #YesEU 
2016: A post-truth year - Highlights:1. Brexit means a windfall of money2. Trump will reduce corruption3. UK judges are blocking Brexit 
 Hansard record of my first vote - a 'No' to the amended motion of the Govt plan for Brexit. 
LISTEN AGAIN @jamescleverly to @juliaHB1: 'Labour tried to split Tories on #Brexit but plan backfired spectacularly'  
We're pleased to be part of #GreenerUK coalition calling for environmental protection and enhancement after #Brexit.  
Paul Farrelly MP (Lab, Newcastle-u-Lyme), voted against his constituents on #Brexit. He can expect a strong #UKIP challenge at next election 
Another Article 50-opposing Brexit-blocker was @BarrySheerman. Kirklees voted 55% to Leave. 
Brexit-blocker @ChrisEvansMP voted against Article 50. Caerphilly voted 57.6% to Leave.  
Thread in which @Greg_Callus sets out technical critique of yesterday's submission about NI, Good Friday Agreement and Brexit.  
Almost half of the British public want #Brexit without MPs getting a vote. Do you agree?  
"Is the EU prepared to self-harm in order to make Brexit difficult?" Unusual #QTWTAIY asked by @DanielJHannan 
Hi @Telegraph I'm not a "childish vandal" I voted according to the mandate of my constituents & Scotland #brexit  
Private Eye on the Whitehall mandarin turned Nissan lobbyist. The car firm's deal to stay in U.K. post Brexit gets curiouser and curiouser.  
Brexit: London banks 'in advanced stages' of shifting operations out of U.K.; very bad news for British jobs  
You say De Keyser, I say De Keyser, let's call the whole Brexit thing offTranscript via @DBanksy 
The Supreme Court resumes hearing the Brexit appeal with no mention of yesterday’s Commons vote. The Lord Advocate is speaking until 1045. 
British manufacturing has slumped since #brexit. We need to stay in the Single Market to protect jobs   
Congrats to  #GreenerUK #EnvironmentPledge – "Our environment must not be harmed by #Brexit"Government must not dilute EU protections  
Brexit will surely go down in history as greatest con-trick ever played on working people - unless enough MPs do their duty 
Banks are already preparing to open up in Paris post-Brexit  
Sailing a ship through post-Brexit waters, here's the best new jazz of 2016 and what it gave us:  
After the Fiasco with brexit by the House of Lords & Supreme Court, I believe the time has come to disband one an overhaul the other. 
A lesson from the Supreme Court and Commons motion debacles: we need more clarity on Brexit - today's @FT view  
Our CEO @stephhilborne blogs about wildlife protection and recovery after #Brexit  #GreenerUK 
Did @theresa_may or Labour and Starmer win in yesterday's Brexit vote?  
145 MPs signing #EnvironmentPledge - #Brexit needs to work for the environment  #GreenerUK 
My (very long) speech on what Trump, Brexit and rise of populism say about politics and media now and in the future  
We're part of the #GreenerUK coalition calling for environmental protection and enhancement after #Brexit  
The Brexit vote wasn’t fate. Here are the key things that could have gone differently  
Thrilled to be part of #GreenerUK movement to make #Brexit work for our #environment. Has your MP signed the pledge?  
Disappointing to see Labour campaigning for #Brexit in #sleafordandnorthhykeham; last week in #RichmondPark they said they were against! #fb 
There are so many problems with this speech - not least the implication that racism and xenophobia played no part at all in the Brexit vote  
'Brexit means Brexit' 'Hard Brexit' 'Soft Brexit' 'Red White and Blue Brexit'...load of nonsense just get on with it! 
How "Project Fear" really actually works. #brexit #banks #lalaland 
Written evidence submitted to our inquiry into the impact of Brexit on higher education is now available to view:  
Forcing the government to spell out its #brexit plan is a start, but it must spell out the options and their costs 
Hear, hear. Well said. | @PeterBoneMP asks how much EU countries should be charged to access OUR market after Brexit  
No Tim, what you actually want is to stomp all over democracy & stop Brexit. You don't understand the meaning of the word 'democracy'.  
Only 1 of Scotland's 59 MPs voted for #Brexit yet England going to rip Scotland out of EU anyway  #IndyRef2 
The pound will fall about 4% to $1.21 by June, economists say  
The most effective, articulate and passionate anti hard Brexit MPs are Grieve and @Anna_Soubry. Courageous too. 
“@Plaid_Cymru is adamant that we won’t give the UK government a blank cheque when it comes to Brexit” @steffanlewis 
Brexit Fantasy Island (cont): Mail loses plot again. Constitutionally illiterate, politically dishonest.  
#OnThisDay in 1955 The Flag of Europe was adopted by the Council of Europe #MuseumFacts #Brexit  
Brexit supporter Jacob Rees-Mogg thinks the UK should dramatically lower safety and environmental standards to those of India.We disagree.  
Brexit liePublic services are under strain because of ideologically imposed austerity, not immigration No Tory admitted this BBC silent 
IDS on Tuesday showing the now standard Tory contempt for the idea that the rule of Law should apply to government#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Gove & other Brexit-politicians licking their lips & salivating over Bonfire of employment rights soon to be set alight. Must be called out  
Brexit, expressed in the style of #GBBO"What are you making?""Cake""Yes, what sort?""Don't know yet""Why not?""Cake means cake" 
Was feeling abit low this morning, so I wrote "Brexit isn't happening" on one of the Daily Mail message boards and watched it blow up. #win 
Theresa May secures Article 50 victory in the Commons as Parliament passes amended Brexit motion by 448 to 75  
.@LeaveEUOfficial being repulsive. Note its choice of symbol for Brexit UK: a balloon has no control where it goes, and is full of hot air.  
One man is primarily to blame for the UK's utter confusion and damaging mess over BrexitHe is the arrogant, insouciant, entitled D Cameron 
British PM May says wants orderly Brexit but admits it will be complex: FT  
#Labour can wave goodbye to its London seats if it does anything to facilitate #Brexit. Starmer included ... 
Brexit is total shit. Not even the slightest glimmer of anything that could improve people's lives exists on the political horizons. 
I am delighted that, post-Brexit, lorry drivers will do as much overtime as they fancy. What could possibly go wrong? 
Hello?We voted for Brexit back in June.Now stop poncing about and get on with the bugger!  
One woman's face to face with her MP at her constituency surgery;brawl over Brexit with Prime Minister, Theresa May  
#GreenerUK Coalition launches today with a pledge by 145 MPs to enhance the environment as we #Brexit:  
Proud to be one of the MPs who voted against 'triggering Brexit'. I will not defy the will of the (Scottish) people.  
"We have blundered into a Tory trap" says #Labour #MP as they troop dazed with Conservatives into lobby to vote for #Brexit. 1st time 
Anyone have a list of anti-Brexit voting MPs from last night who sit for seats that voted Leave? 
Incredible that Labour have signed up to this Brexit 'blank cheque'. We won't.  
So much for Labour's insistence that SNP wanted Brexit. Lab have bolstered the clueless Tories whilst SNP stood up for Remainers. 
Ken Clarke, unreconciled to Brexit, from yesterday's debate  
Repulsive MP @Anna_Soubry moans about being called a Remoaner while moaning about Brexit. She needs to seek help. 
Tory press office spent last night individually criticising all the Labour MPs who opposed Brexit measure for "not respecting" referendum.  
All traditional Labour voters should vote UKIP as Labour will not push May for a Clean Brexit but continue to betray them with Single Market 
We need to be concerned about Brexit negotiations involving "Coitus interruptus". It involves withdrawal or pull-out at the last minute.  
From @DanielJHannan: We'll get a good Brexit deal – because rational self-interest will overcome the Eurocrats’ fury  
"Blub, blub, Waaaahh, blub, blub, IT'S NOT FAIR, blubber, blubber, blubber, #Brexit, I DIDN'T GET MY WAY, blub, Waaaaahhhh..." @timfarron 
Keir Starmer presses for 'detailed' Brexit plan as MPs vote to trigger article 50  
#UK is heading for the hardest form of hard #Brexit, but it needn't nor shouldn't. Excellent piece by @CER_Grant  #EU 
Tories prepare post Brexit bonfire of EU  laws including pregnant worker proposals & working time directive 
‘IT’S NOT FAIR’ Remoaner Tim Farron throws tantrum about DEMOCRACY as he loses Brexit vote  
Mustn't forget brexit's foreign fans including: Trump, Wilders, Putin, Le Pen and, very likely, Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi. True deplorables.  
As MP's vote for Brexit, the damage to the UK silently gathers pace. France works hard to lure London banks to Paris  
27 countries are relying on "the most dangerous man in Europe"  
And for all their crowing today, a warning:Brexit remains 'a v high risk adventure on which we may pay a heavy economic & security price'  
Major new #GreenerUK coalition launched to ensure #environment enhanced & restored as we #Brexit. 13 chief execs write letter to @thetimes 
Paul Farrelly, MP for Newcastle-under-Lyme, voted against Article 50 last night.His constituency voted by an overwhelming 63% to #Brexit  
If you want to know what REAL opposition to Brexit looks like, look at @theSNP. You know, the party that totally annihilated Scottish Labour 
Brexit: London banks 'in advanced stages' of shifting operations to Paris  via @IBTimesUK 
Theresa May wins MPs' backing to trigger Brexit process by end of March  
I am one of the 48%, a Labour voter. Throughly let down by the Labour Party allowing themselves to be railroaded into hard #Brexit. 
Blow to Sturgeon as Brexit is now 'more popular' among Scots, Michael Gove claims  
No Brexit deal possible without consent of Holyrood, says Scotland's Lord Advocate  
More unexpected Brexit news....  
Is war over Brexit over before it really begun? Anti EU papers say MPs vote last night gave PM blank cheque. Discuss. We will on @BBCr4today 
Judges rule MPs should have say on Brexit & get called enemies of people. MPs have say on Brexit & are hailed for speaking up for Britain 
You say I'm wrong and that Labour "is not supporting Brexit". Well it sure as heck isn't fighting Brexit either! No wonder voters reject you  
Ken Clarke MP is my Person of the Year 2016. He isn't afraid of the pro-#Brexit media. #Brexit vote; he stood up for country not his career. 
BREXIT 1975: PETER SHORE - THIS Is What REAL Labour Should Sound Like - FOR The BRITISH People & AGAINST EU Tyranny 
Typical of Little Timmy's mob & SNP not to back overwhelming view of MPS to publish BREXIT plans but not to block Implementing Article 50! 
Can of worms opened on day three of Brexit case  
Major cut in EU migrants risks long-term damage to UK economy – report | UK news  #projectremain #brexit #europe #uk 
Theresa May on decision-making, Brexit and doing the job her way  
European Financials ETF1) Up YTD for first time in 20162) Last 2 days: 2nd, 3rd highest volume in history3) +37% since Brexit lows$EUFN 
Sturgeon snubs May's offer of a post-Brexit indyref2  
Top 100 #FinTech Influencers & Brands!Top 5 #HashTags:1-#Blockchain2-#Bitcoin3-#Startups4-#Payments5-#Brexit6-#RegTech{@Onalytica} 
In shops now - latest issue of #newspaper featuring #GinaMiller (#Brexit) of @scmprivate and @Channel4 #SAS winner @moses_ican 
Labour Remoaner Stephen Kinnock @SKinnock roasted by Newsnight presenter and Tory MP for SUPPORTING Brexit motion  
POPULISM: It's the BBC's new buzzword being used to sneer at the 'uneducated' who voted for Brexit  via @MailOnline 
Finally Brexit to move forward in April - passes parliament! Godspeed to our Brit friends getting their country back 
Ian #Dunt: #Brexit is in effect 'making a new country'. Made by whom? - Fox, Bojo, Davis, May, the Daily Mail, Sunderland, Rupert Murdoch. 
(3) - even though most MPs know #Brexit is badly wrong they have voted against their better judgment & - an unforgivable dereliction. 
(1)The theft of the UK from its own people occurred not on 23 June 2016 but 7 December 2016 when MPs voted to trigger #Brexit in the spring. 
How Friedrich Nietzsche helps to explain Brexit ....  
Faecal coloured leather. So you can't actually tell she's shitting herself about Brexit. pic.twitter.com/0VHabaaYEI 
its like what happened in the UK during brexit. The fact that he doesn't understand this is terrifying 
Can of worms opened on day three of Brexit Supreme Court case  
So you've stopped, delayed, postponed, softened, Brexit then Ian? No? You're just getting to see what you've agreed to nod through? Pathetic  
Surprise Article 50 vote ensures a Brexit by end of March 
The sad decline of the 'Official Opposition' has been as cataclysmic as it has been tragic; frustrating to see Brexit-landing unchallenged.  
Crazy MSM:hve some weed based wishlist-if it doesn't happen scream-not as expected/surprise etc-2014 Modi/Brexit/Trumph/yday RBI rates:) RT 
Yup Ford Europe CEO Jim Farley says he wants same subsidy as Nissan in event of Brexit @sarahgor 
Brexit: French financial regulator wooing London banks  
The #Brexit blockers: 89 MPs vote to defy the will of the people  
We must say thank you to #GinaMiller for her courageous decision to challenge the UK Gov #Brexit #BrexitSupremeCourt 
#UmbertoEco’s "14 features of #fascism"No.4"Disagreement is #treason"- @OpenCulture#Brexitpic.twitter.com/tZCYCAG2l6 
So @IanMurrayMP will you be resigning before or after Christmas now you've backed Brexit against the wishes of your constituents? 
Brexit: Parliament goes AWOL - a dismal Brexit debate ... . 
Government takes the bite out of Tory Brexit rebellion  
Haha - a caveat to your shameful vote today.  Worried you'll get booted out by your 58% leave supporting constituents? #brexit 
Good move, keep goingLondon’s #Fintech Further Expands GlobalReach with HongKong Tie-Up  @CryptoCoinsNews #brexit  
The vote today created the first official parliamentary time frame for triggering A50. Brexit now far more difficult to stop. Thanks Labour. 
Brexit vote: Full list of 89 MPs who voted against triggering Article 50 by March   
The Brexit treatment: Now Donald Trump voters are realizing they made a huge mistake  via @Salon 
LMAO! ‘IT’S NOT FAIR’ Remoaner Tim Farron throws tantrum about DEMOCRACY as he loses Brexit vote  
Labour wave the white flag on brexit, again, they join the Tories in the voting lobby, what a squalid, inept and wasteful group of parasites 
If Theresa May does not give the voters a full English BREXIT, she will be toast at the next election.  
Brexiters. Don't panic. No-one's going to stop Brexit. Oh and don't panic cos people are also going to try to minimise the harm it'll cause. 
A red, white and blue brexit sounds like the very worst thing that could possibly happen in a toilet cubicle 
The Brexit vote was a by-election bloody nose to the establishment that went completely wrong, like a drunk being killed by a single punch. 
I see that snivelling euroserf #KenClarke finishes his political career by being the ONLY Conservative MP to seek to block #Brexit 
Fuck brexit and fuck the Tories and fuck Paul Nuttall and fuck UKIP and all who sail in it. Tweeting old school today. 
The full list of 89 MPs who voted AGAINST Brexit in Article 50 Commons clash. Named & Shamed! Especially Clarke!  
Ken Clarke MP voted against the whip on Labour motion for Govt to produce a Brexit plan. He notes absence of requirement for a White Paper.  
With the advent of #brexit and the coming #DonaldTrump Presidency 2017 will be prove to be more of a rough ride than 2016. 
Good read! Conservative Nationalism has given us Brexit, Trump & a new #ConservativeSpring  
Good to see at least one journalist calling @RuthDavidsonMSP out on her #Brexit defence of the indefensible  
Well done the 89 Brexit rebels. You were bound to lose but as the country gets more and more screwed you can say you did the right thing xxx 
We live in hopes #Brexit  
Is this a joke? Labour holding Tories to account over #Brexit?  
We urgently need an airlift of History books to Brexit HQ.  
.@LindaFabianiSNP concerned re-Lab/Tory votes to stop @ScotParl having say on #Brexit .@LewisMacdMSP: SNP obsessing over "small issues" 
That top secret Brexit plan in full #newsnight 
How Brexit was won: A new study says Leave won by galvanising those who had become disengaged from politics  
Soft #Brexit’ is fake news….much as ‘Populism’ is a creation of the Left used by the #BBC to dismiss voters and results it hates. 
RT There's no shortage of money to waste on court cases by IDS & #Brexit claptrap but govt take money from Disabled #Newsnight #Skypapers 
"I'm horrified tonight that Labour & the Tories voted against Holyrood having a say in Brexit process" says @LindaFabianiSNP #scotland2016 
#Newsnight A #brexit plan is a start, but it must contain costed options  -  see my blog: 
Brexit interesting. Virtually no remainer MPs dare try to campaign their cause because they're terrified of public opinion. That's MPs 
I'm especially looking forward to Will Gompertz revealing Brexit as the next winner of The Turner Prize. 
I don’t believe in equity barometers, but I was told Brexit will lead to catastrophe and markets would never recover from Trump’s election.  
Thursday's i: "Victory for PM: Commons backs May on Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @suttonnick) 
The list of 89 MPs who voted AGAINST Brexit  irks me that SNP have so many MPs with 1.5m votes & UKIP 4m votes & 1MP. 
89 MPs who voted against the will of the British PeopleNext time you vote remember them#Brexit #Article50 #Traitors #BrexitBritain #No2EU 
Stormont assembly's consent required before Brexit, court told  
One Tory MP. Just one. Not two. An isolated backbencher votes against govt's #Brexit timetable and guess who is now on The World Tonight?  
Brexit lies.Public services are under strain because of ideologically imposed austerity not immigration No Tory admitted this BBC silent 
Ken Clarke and dozens of SNP politicians among 89 MPs who voted against Brexit  
So I just read that £3 meal deals could be coming to an end because of Brexit. First Magic Stars, now this. I can't deal. 
The MPs representing Leave-backing constituencies who voted against the Brexit bill have, today, committed electoral suicide. 
Brexit vote: Full list of the 89 MPs who voted against Article 50 being triggered by March  
Seems only 23 #Labour MPs (10%) principled enough to oppose blank #Brexit cheque for Tories- bravo to them but rest of Labour shd be ashamed  
Remember Corbyn supporters calling all other Lab supporters Tories? Who's with the Tories now? Disgusting, shameful Lab, voting Tory-Brexit. 
Britain softens its Brexit stance—just as the EU hardens its own  
Some of the coverage of Brexit is becoming increasingly House Un-American Activities Committee-ish.  
89 courageous & principled MPs who know that for many Brexit is still an extreme concern, whether: hard, soft, red, white, blue or polka dot  
Theresa May won the backing of MPs for her timetable to start Brexit talks  
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
Thursday's Daily Telegraph front page:MPs hand May 'blank cheque' for Brexit#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
If anybody but Corbyn was leader of the Labour party Brexit would not be happening, I will never forgive him for that and he makes it worse! 
Theresa May secures Article 50 victory in the Commons as Parliament passes Brexit amendment by 461 to 89.  
I have no idea why #Labour have just voted for a #Brexit timetable when all we're going to get for it is some bromides/ negotiation slogans. 
Supreme Court Brexit case told Scotland should get say on Brexit. They did, as part of the UK and now we all Leave!   
Thornberry & Starmer reminding us after 16 months what opposition looks like. Embarrassed Govt at #PMQs & forced Govt u-turn on Brexit plan 
MPs back disclosure of Brexit plan and triggering article 50 by end of March | Politics | The Guardian  
Here are the names. Remember when election comes around. Full list of 89 MPs who voted AGAINST Brexit in Article 50  
"Twenty reasons why Brexit will be trickier than we thought"  Good list, although not all of them are news... 
Labour MP Paul Farrelly ought to be ashamed of himself for voting against #Article50 tonight! North Staffordshire voted 70% for #Brexit!! 
Ed Miliband found an old paper by Theresa May which skewers her Brexit strategy  
Thursday's Independent digital front page:EU judges 'to rule on UK cases years after Brexit'#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Tata announce 10year 1billion pound investment.£1000,000,000 reasons to be optimistic in #brexit Britain  
Tomorrow @ScotNational May's 'stitch-up': Sturgeon blasts Tory bid to block indyref2 until AFTER Brexit  
.@timfarron: Labour and the Tories are holding hands towards a hard Brexit. Only the @libdems are the opposition to Conservative Brexit Gov  
#Brexit mascot.  
How did my MP vote in the Parliament motion on Article 50 and Brexit? Find out here:  
MPs vote to trigger Brexit by April - here are the 89 who voted against  
Tim Farron on Brexit: "We want democracy, not a stitch-up". Wake up there, Tim. Democracy just crept up and slapped you in the face. 
A rather late #WednesdayWidsom This is rather topical don't you think? #Brexit #GladstonesWednesdayWisdom 
Here I am on Russia Today talking Brexit UK Supreme Court Brexit case: How or if it happens? — RT Op-Edge  
Brexit will mean relaxing workers and environmental rights to 'be like India'. Surely we should be working to improve rights for everyone.  
On next week's #bbcqt:- A Dementor- Bag of rats- Word 'Brexit' scrawled on an old ransom note- Your most painful memories- Nigel Farage 
I've no idea why Labour has connived with the Right to deliver what will now be a Hard Brexit on the basis of an advisory referendum. 
Brexit isn't racist. Voting for it wasn't racist. But when all the nasty racists voted for it we should ask some serious questions about why 
Brexit, Donald Trump, Honey G, toblerone changing shape and now Kim and Kanye are getting a divorce ....... I cannot deal with 2016 
Conservative MP and former Chancellor Ken Clarke voted against government's amendment to #Brexit timetable vote  
Tell @Anna_Soubry to pop up to Boston where EU migrants have doubled the population and 76% voted leave #stupidbitch #brexit pic.twitter.com/AXBR51O8zM 
Lib Dems claim blocking Brexit as raison d'etre yet only half of them bother to vote in Brexit debate. #SkivingHere 
Enemies of the People: Full list of the 89 MPs who voted against triggering Article 50  #UKIP #Brexit 
Theresa May has promised MPs a vote on the final Brexit “divorce deal”  
Labour & Tories holding hands towards a hard Brexit, refusing to seek the will of the people on the deal. I want democracy not a stitch up. 
Labour's incredible vote on #brexit amendment: even if May's plan is utter shite they've agreed to pass Article 50 by end-March. Genius. 
Bizarre: Remain MPs told us Brexit would mean leaving the Single Market. Now they are asking if the plan is to stay in the single market. 
Just voted against Tory 31st March timetable for #Brexit trigger- rushing risks UK getting worse deal & Ministers obviously have no plan yet 
Sir Kier Starmer maybe right voters have no stomach for hard BREXIT. He's quite wrong in thinking there's no mandate. Referendum unambiguous 
Agree with @IanMurrayMP. SNP are all about rhetoric, Labour is doing its job as Opposition by forcing the gov't to reveal Brexit plans  
"Brexit rebel MPs"? Sorry, you spelled that wrong. It's "MPs with a backbone, sticking up for the future of this country".  
Almost in line with constituency numbers. Happy #Brexit  MPs back triggering Brexit by end of March  
Yet another SNP lie on parliamentary votes. We won huge victory 2 get govt 2 bring Brexit plan to commons. Scrutiny you wouldn't understand.  
51 #SNP,23 #Labour,5 #Lib Dems,3 #SDLP,3 #Plaid,2 Independents,1 #Green, 1 Tory:Ken Clarke voted -effectively-against  #BrexitThank you 
We will remember who voted against Brexit come 2020. The Brexit blockers: 89 MPs vote to defy the will of the people  
The @HouseofCommons has endorsed PM's promise to invoke Article 50 to facilitate the peoples' decision on #Brexit by Mar 2017 by 448 to 75 
Pro-EU voters who failed to vote in the referendum helped to deliver Brexit, study reveals  
#Brexit humiliation? #May must bow to worst HR abusers in the world to sell arms incl #SaudiArabia #C4news @jonsnowC4 
Cowards - The lot of them! MPs vote demanding #Brexit plan and triggering article 50 by majority of 373 -  
MPs have voted in favour of a Labour motion calling on the Government to set out Brexit plans before triggering Article 50 by a 373 majority 
#Breaking MPs have voted by 448 votes to 75 - majority 373 - in favour of a motion requiring the Government to publish its Brexit plan  
#KenClarke - the only Tory to vote against the motion - I salute you! A European to the end! #brexitdebate #Article50 #Brexit  
Iain Duncan Smith calls this a "historic moment" because the "majority of parliamentarians voted to leave the European Union" #Brexit 
Theresa May's amendment to Labour's motion on Brexit has passed a vote in the House of Commons with just 89 MPs voting against it  
Labour & Tory MPs just voted together on Brexit only hours after they didn't turn up to discuss Scotland's place in Europe @CommonsScotAffs 
But govt won overwhelmingly, reminder few MPs would actually try to block brexit progress even tho they want a chance to have a say 
Dear #Brexit fans. For clarity, which of these reasons fits your own personal Leave aims? And why should we all suffer your selfishness?  
MPs back government's Brexit timetable  
Updated: Victory for @Keir_Starmer tonight, 461-89, forcing Theresa May to set out her Brexit plan @IndyVoices 
This shows why neither the Supreme Court case nor the Brexit amendment farago this week amount to a row of beans  
BREAKING: Government amendment re: Article 50 is passed by 461 to 89. #Brexit 
I'm told 22 Lab Mps plus one Tory- Ken Clarke- voted against Govt Brexit amendment 
Tonight Labour MPs voted to give the UK government a blank cheque for a hard #Brexit.  
#BREAKING British lawmakers vote to back Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit timetable 
MPs vote 461 to 89 to approve Government Amdt. (a) to Opp. Motion on Government's plan for #Brexit. Full Motion:  
Well who'd have thought regular exposure to vile right wing racist propaganda put together by millionaires would've influenced #Brexit vote?  
461-89 - Govt wins Brexit vote 
Parliament backs PM's timetable on Brexit - to trigger Article 50 by end of March. 461 - 89. Non-binding, but a sign of mood in Westminster. 
MPs vote by 461 to 89 in favour of the Government publishing a #Brexit plan in the New Year and triggering Article 50 by the end of March 
After 6hrs of debate in #Commons nothing certain emerges from UK Gov.  Only certainty is second Scottish independence referendum. #brexit 
Keir Starmer has shown that Labour are holding the Tories to account over Brexit  
Why Brexit is perhaps causing more anxiety in Ireland than anywhere else  
WATCH: I'm proud to have spoken up in the #Brexit debate urging Gov to stop using EU citizens as bargaining chips  
A #brexit plan is a start, but it must contain costed options  -  see my blog: 
Anna Soubry doing her best  companion cliffhanger face at the Brexit debate.  
I always have been clear and I always will be clear: it is my constituents who will bear the brunt of Brexit. Their voices must be heard.  
.@DavidTCDavies urges W'minster govt to remind AMs that Welsh assembly was set up after referendum with narrower mandate than Brexit vote  
Retweet if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Just spoke in the Brexit debate. I won't be voting to give Govnt blank cheque for Brexit in March. Full speech here:  
@SkipLicker If you're going to go all historical about #Brexit then this is genuinely why I voted Leave. Pitt the Younger #oldskool 
The debate online seems to be dominated by leavers who are terrified #Brexit won't be racist enough. #brexitdebate 
MPs from across the political spectrum are united and clear on this issue: the Govt must produce a plan for #Brexit before triggering A50.  
Parliament Set to Back May’s Brexit Timetable  
Just pressed Gov to allow everyone to have vote on deal Gov secure with EU before Brexit - a deal which could include paying into EU budget 
Ah. Just when you thought Labour was mustering up some proper #Brexit opposition, up steps Andy Burnham.  
There is nothing socialist about a system of free movement that is used by multi-nationals to undermine wages. WATCH my Brexit speech today.  
How long before Theresa May starts branding anyone who asks her about Brexit a 'terrorist sympathiser'? 
So our vote doesn't matter eh #SupremeCourt??Pitchforks and flaming torches it is then. #Brexit  
Well done @kezdugdale in seeking to open up question of where power lies in post-Brexit Britain  
Multinational corporations like @Virgin are funding a campaign to stop Brexit. Sign up to help us stop them:  
It's that special for the EU. After Brexit, the UK will be their biggest export market in the whole world.  Bar none. How special is that?  
Under pressure, PM agrees to publish Brexit plan: But a late vague plan will not wash.   
Scotland’s Lord Advocate has told the Supreme Court that the Holyrood Parliament has no veto over Brexit.  
As @EmilyThornberry said today at #PMQs: The Tories cannot tell us the plan on Brexit – because they do not have a plan. RT if you agree ↓  
Brexit could slash 150,000 EU citizens from annual net immigration to Britain  
My message to the Irish community in Britain on the implications of #Brexit for Ireland & @irishinbritain  
Just watching Jacob Rees-Mogg live in the Commons. The man is an amazing orator & holds the house in awe.#Brexit #LeaveEU #Article50 
If Brexit was a vote against the out of touch establishment why is Rees-Mog, IDS, Gove sat there in a corner with ear-to-ear smiles? 
Jacob Rees MoggThe only contribution UK will make to EU members after #Brexit is via the Foreign Aid Budget for poorer countries. 
Anyone seriously think Tories would not use Brexit as a reason to remove working people's rights?This was in wide circulation pre referendum  
Jacob Rees-Mogg demeaning parliamentary sovereignty after campaigning for Brexit to get more parliamentary sovereignty. #brexitdebate 
May's #brexit plan options:1) Short or vague: annoys everyone2) Have cake and eat it: EU rejects it3) Realistic, clear: Brexiteers go mad 
Victory for @Keir_Starmer over Government's Brexit policy today. Me for @IndyVoices 
How's that "taking back control" going, Leave voters? #brexit  
Wait and see: even after Brexit the UK still won't leave EU alone. Watching on Facebook to see if EU gets fat or starts seeing someone else 
The Supreme Court Brexit case only happened because of crowdfunding - that's how ridiculous our justice system is  
Comment: Scotland doesn't need a new act of union. That's failed and brexit is a prime example of that. Scotland needs independence.  
@bernardjenkin :"Czech and Slovakia took just 6 months to split and they are now better friends than ever before. Brexit can be like that" 
Anna Soubry's Broxtowe seat should be targeted by a Brexiter offering Brexit & more...  
WATCH: Oliver Letwin Explains Brexit Issues Simply [VIDEO]  
Maybe for you but for most  the feeling isn't awesome but terror- like when you see your car is about to collide with a lorry. #brexit  
RT if you agree with Beefy that politicians should stop trying to block Brexit! #RespectTheResult 
TIME TO GO: Sinking Sturgeon faces growing calls to RESIGN over Brexit threats, Transport. NHS and Education FAILS    
Jabu Mabuza,myself & the JSE chiefs had a good meeting with the Chancellor of the Exchequer early today.I hope his views on Brexit & SA work 
Would certainly recommend watching the full 7 minutes of Dominic Grieve's contribution to the Brexit debate.  
Brave, principled and passionate speech by @heidi_mp in Brexit debate 
So arrogant are #brexit supporters, I honestly get the feeling that they think 17.4 million people are more important than 11 judges. 
Oliver Letwin spells out - very clearly - what he thinks Brexit will mean  
Supreme Court: Scot Gov lawyer scales back request & asks if Sturgeon can veto what biscuits are served in future Brexit negotiations 
Hannan wasn't the "Brexit architect". More like the guy walking past the construction site mumbling "they taking so long to build this!"  
Now Labour's Heidi Alexander signals she too will vote against Govt amendment on Brexit and A50 triggers. Backs 2nd #Euref 
Tim Farron says he believes the formal procedure for triggering Brexit can be revoked.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg yet again makes clear decisive intervention into #brexit debate in ParliamentCuts thro crap like hot knife thro butter 
Dominic Grieve is currently giving Brexit, and Iain Duncan Smith in particular, a quite spectacular kicking. 
Happy Birthday @Anna_Soubry, We Baked You a Brexit Cake:  
Leaked documents of the UK's #Brexit plan include a "prosperity zone" with #Canada #Australia & #NewZealand: 
I don't 'fear a deep sense of loss' because of Brexit, @Ed_Miliband. I fear total economic collapse and the break-up of the UK 
I don't want to know the Govt strategic position on #Brexit because I know this will weaken our negotiating position RT if you agree 
Brexit is a burning issue. But poverty is still the big one | Julia Unwin  
British government can't ignore Good Friday Agreement for Brexit - @PaulMaskeyMP 
Tory MPs suggest firms draw up list for bonfire of EU regulations after Brexit Excellent idea. 
Troll level: Lord SumptionAchievement unlocked: wearing TeamGB tie to Brexit appeal hearing to tease tabloid press.ht @gavinjohnadams 
Re: that snotty @thinkprogress tweet: NYT today on why rural voters are supporting Trump, Brexit & rightist populism  
PM follows up description of Brexit as “red, white and blue” with description in gif form.  
"Overwhelming evidence" is that people "don't want a hard Brexit", Sir @Keir_Starmer tells the House of Commons 
Brexit could see net migration from EU fall by 150,000 a yr & give pay boost to low-income workers.About time too 
Donald Trump and Brexit are just two of the traps awaiting investors in 2017  
Basically, Jacob Rees-Mogg is asking: once we leave the EU, we could become really, really evil, right? #Brexit  
.@DouglasCarswell speaking in parliament now: 'the way some MPs are behaving is as if they think the people made a mistake.' #brexit 
Spot on, @DouglasCarswell:“I suspect their [Remain MPs] sudden enthusiasm for parliamentary scrutiny is more to do with frustrating Brexit” 
Brexit is a burning issue. But poverty is still the big one | Julia Unwin  
. @DouglasCarswell tells MPs "I suspect this sudden interest in parliamentary democracy is an attempt to sabotage brexit" 
UK among top five countries best equipped for the post-Brexit era, new study shows  
We need a clear Brexit plan which seeks to bring the country together. My speech:   
.@markreckless: 'Brexit means we can crack down on corporate tax avoidance'   UK will scoop extra £20billion a year. 
"Ken Clarke": “ministers have no idea what their strategy is anyway and they do not actually agree with each other”! #Brexit 
Great to welcome @TimFarron to European Parliament. Discussed need for close relationship EU - UK #Brexit  
Let's agree on this benefit of #Brexit We're all getting a superb education on the legal constitution of the United Kingdom. #SupremeCourt 
Divorce. Vets. Burgers. 20 bizzare reasons why Brexit is even trickier than you thought - @IanDunt for @guardiang2  
Brexit, free trade, and a unique opportunity to strengthen the Anglo-American alliance. My @Heritage lecture.  
At least Brexit arguments are unmasking the true relationship between countries of "UK". Wales, Scotland & N. Ireland, mere English colonies 
With the #Brexit debate under way, will we learn anything new about the government's plan for leaving the EU? @bbcnormans explains 
Saxo Bank's 10 Outrageous Predictions For 2017: Brexit Never Happens, Bitcoin Surges, Fed Folds  
A #brexit-voting pensioner, boasting that he'll be OK, whatever happens. He's comfortable with the young paying for his brexit.  
Lavery is arguing that triggering Brexit will change the constitutional status of Northern Ireland. That requires consent of NI population. 
So why did Leave.EU think 100,000 people would march on Supreme Court? Are they stuck in an elite bubble & out of touch with Brexit Britain? 
"The public were fully informed” about what Brexit meant before voting, says Michael Gove.  
Tory MP asks how much EU countries should be charged to access OUR market after Brexit  Well done Peter Bone!!!! 
Hoping to speak in #Brexit debate to explain why I can't vote today to invoke Article 50 by March when we have no idea of Govt's plans. 
4) Soft Yes folk who may have stuck with Labour will think it unfair they are trying to kill Indy with legislation in the face if Brexit. 
One of these people has a #cunningplan  the other does not have a clue.#Brexit #Article50. God help us.... 
Extremely worrying comments- workers rights and environment protections could be drastically slashed after Brexit  
3) Folk are tired of Labour doing gimmicky stunts instead of being a decent opposition, like scheduled resignations after the Brexit vote. 
In the Brexit debate, Ken Clarke describes the EU referendum result as an 'opinion poll'. That'll go down well. 
.@Ed_Miliband hits back at Downing St who said those asking for transparency on Brexit "aren't backing the UK team"  
Miliband exactly right to highlight how critics of Brexit being branded unpatriotic by No10. Even Tory MPs branded. 
A small band of Remain useful idiots wrongly thinks Brexit won’t happen  
I disagree with Ed Miliband that we will leave the EU whatever happens. If the #Brexit deal is terrible we should stay. 
WATCH: Osborne walks out of Brexit debate as soon as Iain Duncan Smith stands up to speak  
We The People are taking OUR lands back!Celebrate #Brexit #Trump #IoVotoNoNext: #Frexit #Nexit #PVV#AfD #FraukePetry #LePen 
Currently in the Supreme Court in London at the Brexit case. Matters relating to the North just beginning.  
'Removal of rights granted under NIA cannot be done by prerogative power alone' David Scoffield QC @UKSupremeCourt #Brexit  
Hard brexit, soft brexit, grey brexit. All bollocks, we just want FULL brexit. For the first time in 40 odd years, no more fudging & lying.  
Draft transcript from Weds AM - day three of Article 50 #Brexit appeal - now available  
Discussed #brexit with @MichelBarnier. First task is to find a common position among the #EU27. That's up to us, the Member States. 
Hilary Benn on lack of Brexit clarity: "When Moses came down from the mountain it wasn't with tablets giving ten hints" 
@heyyouayeyou Independence transcends Brexit, oil, the economy, car insurance... 
Only 5% of 18-24s want hard Brexit compared with 38% of over 60s. Nearly half of 18-24 year olds would stop Brexit  
Katie Hopkins accepts Ellie Goulding’s charity boxing match challenge after Twitter spat 
Labour's motion effectively backs Tories moves towards Hard #Brexit & the Tory amendment fails to recognise the rights of devolved govts  
Everything David Davis accuses Lab of also applies to Tory Remainers who intended to vote with Lab until concession on sharing Brexit plan.  
Pro-Migration Report Admits British Workers Will Enjoy Higher Wages After Brexit  
'We were only joking' #Brexit  
As a Conservative MP, I want Parliament to get a proper debate on Brexit, says @stroud_neil  
Crikey - the UK continues to slip in these recent rounds relative to the year total. Are we applying less since Brexit? Need to explore...  
The new tory post brexit school curriculum involving work, experience for kids  
Brexiters think they're taking back control. In reality they're giving control to the tax-dodging rich and their pet politicians#Brexit  
David Davis accuses Labour of trying to ‘frustrate and delay the process’ of Brexit by forcing Government to revea…  
Here we go. Commons debate over implementation of Brexit becomes opportunity for ultra Remainers to re run arguments against ref result 
Keir Starmer: 'No mandate for hard Brexit'  
Brexit Sec @DavidDavisMP: Free movement of people from EU can't continue as it is now but it doesn't mean pulling up the drawbridge. 
So wrong it’s amusing. 64% of Labour voters backed Remain, and as Labour is backing the govt on Art 50 it offers *them* nothing. #Brexit  
You can question May’s Brexit strategy. Just don’t ask if she’s up to the job | Anne Perkins  
David Davis says there will be a vote on the final Brexit deal in the House of Commons. 
a red, white and blue brexit could be a british brexit, an american brexit, a dutch brexit, a french brexit, an aquafresh brexit, a .. 
I have spent a long time attacking Mrs May for her apathy over brexit. I'm now beginning to believe I was wrong and we will leave the EU.... 
.@LouiseMensch claims to know what Brexit means remind me of a widower marrying a much younger woman: "It's what she would have wanted." 
Ensuring that there is a green, white and orange view point at Brexit discussions today @ChrisHazzardSF @JohnODowdSF 
What is guaranteed about Brexit is that whatever happens it will not be with the wishes of the majority. Yes/No question deeply flawed. 
David Davis says he doesn't know what hard brexit is - does he know what red, white and blue Brexit is? does anyone? 
Labour out to subvert #Brexit They are enemies of democracy   
Starmer concludes "no mandate for hard Brexit". Davis says "i dont know what hard Brexit means". 
British lord rescued from Nazis makes plea over child refugees after Brexit  
Labour's requirements for the government's Brexit plan: @Keir_Starmer lays out five points on what's needed  
The UK is among the top five countries best equipped for the post-Brexit era, a new study shows 
Better late than never! Another 1 sees light 'I was wrong about Brexit' admits Britain's most influential historian  
'No plan survives engagement with The Enemy'  Tory MP Crispin Blunt on Brexit plan.Starmer: not 'the right word' to 'describe our partners' 
Emily Thornberry and David Lidington faced off over #Brexit negotiations as they stood in for their party leaders at #PMQs 
wonder how many people voted Tory (+ for cuts to essential services) and then voted Brexit because those services are under strain  
Why I'm backing today's Brexit vote. Ministers now need to get on with it   
Bold & ambitious by @kezdugdale today. We need a new Act of Union in a post Brexit Britain to maintain the UK & allow Scotland to flourish. 
David Davis argued in July that the Gov should publish a #brexit white paper pre-negotiations. He needs to keep his promise #LeaveWatch 
Keir Starmer: Difficult to see how Nicola Sturgeon plan for Scotland special Brexit deal could work  
Why house prices haven’t fallen since the Brexit vote  
Labour's Brexit motion today has a hoofing massive loophole in it. (1/?)  
And herein lies the problem. People who think they represent Britishness and think Brexit has given them authority. Can't even write English  
Nigel Farage - "I don’t just want the United Kingdom out of the European Union, I want Europe out of the European Union." #Brexit 
Green MP @CarolineLucas says government amendment to Labour #Brexit motion makes it a "trap"  
.@TIME Also, the real Person of the Year is the populist voter. See Trump, Brexit, Colombian peace agreement, and Italy's government reforms 
.@CarolineLucas intervenes early in #Brexit debate to ask why Labour is willing to commit itself to Govt's Article 50 deadline #yplive 
EU gives UK time to reject a bad Brexit deal. This is little noticed implication of Barnier comment. My @InFactsOrg 
Labour rebel @BenPBradshaw refuses to back 'foolish' Brexit amendment  
While Tories still haven't set out a #Brexit plan, we’ve been working to protect Scotland’s place in Europe.  
Labour can't possibly back Theresa May's Brexit timetable. She only discovered what Brexit was in July & is just learning colours. #PMQs 
In defence of Niall Ferguson - my blog on his Brexit u-turn:   
UK among top five countries best equipped for the post-Brexit era, new study shows  
Thank goodness @UKLabour are not in charge of the #Brexit negotiations!  
#Brexit loveliness: A leaver telling me about his legally binding oath to kill me (us). Cheery chaps, aren't they?  
That awful moment when leave voters realise that voting for Brexit was an enormous mistake.  
At #PMQs @EmilyThornberry asked and asked Tory Government to finally provide basic information on Brexit plan. Again they failed and failed. 
Some spin doctor, somewhere, came up with "Red, White and Blue Brexit" and thought: Yep. Rest of the day off.  
Ex-remainers Tory @DLidington & Labour's @EmilyThornberry's #Brexit row in leaders' absence 
Great job by @EmilyThornberry at #PMQs today exposing Government division and chaos over Brexit plans and calling for greater transparency 
After discussions of all the fancy-coloured Brexit options, we'll prob just settle on the traditional Shotgun-to-Foot Brexit. 
.@EmilyThornberry had right tactic of pressing repeatedly on the bruise of Govt's lack of Brexit clarity. Using all 6 Qs on it worked well 
Personally i want a 'Full English' Brexit. Oh no. That's wrong. Breakfast - I mean breakfast. #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
.@EmilyThornberry quotes the Brexit secretary David Davis about his thoughts on the customs union #PMQs 
I'm at Supreme Court with live coverage on the Brexit legal case, where lawyers are now arguing against government:  
The British people want politicians to get on with the job of leaving the EU. Those MPs trying to frustrate Brexit should #RespectTheResult 
Emily Thornberry highlights the utter chaos in government over Brexit. Does the Minister still even agree with himself? #PMQs 
#Brexit No amount of jingoism is going to replace the vacuum of May`s Brexit Policy  
Sorry, but you've been had. No decision on hard/soft Brexit can be made before discussions with EU begin. The aim must be to NOT trigger A50  
No straight answers from Tories at #PMQs - clearer every day that they've no plan & no answers on Brexit 
Excellent question on Brexit and customs union from @EmilyThornberry standing in for Jeremy today at #PMQs 
. @EmilyThornberry doing a great job in holding the Tories to account on #Brexit at #PMQs 
If you are finding the Supreme Court BREXIT hearing hard going: Read John Crace  It's magic! 
There is a recurring pattern of some Tory MPs & MSPs attempting to silence witnesses in committee who don't support their #Brexit delusions 
Liberal Democrats threaten to vote against Brexit motion in Parliament  
British parliament set to back PM May's Brexit timetable  
 @LiamFoxMP Hard Brexit means hard times and this creature is a menace to our economic stability.  Lock him away. 
Introducing ‘Brexit Means ...’ our new in-depth #Brexit podcast with our European affairs correspondent @JonHenley 
& if no talk on transition for 18 months, most finance firms affected by Brexit will have upped sticks by then. Won’t matter what we do. 
You can like or hate Brexit & still think it's nuts to trigger Article 50 on the eve of two febrile general elections in France & Germany. 
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron admits discussing with EU heavyweight whether Brexit can be stopped  
Whenever I vote, I stop and think "What would Tony Blair do" ... and, you guessed it, I vote the other way.#Brexit #Article50 #LeaveEU 
#Brexit in progress.  
Theresa May's amendment is not enough. She must call a binding vote to trigger Brexit – and watch Remainers squirm  
Brexit means Bhopal.  
There will be a vote on Brexit today cos LibDems are opposing Govt amendment - on grounds that May's 'plan' will not be detailed White Paper 
Minister @CharlieFlanagan in Westminster today with the All Party Parliamentary Group on the Irish in Britain re Brexit & Diaspora  
I won't be falling into this Tory trap by voting for the Labour/Government motion on #brexit today.  
"I was wrong on Brexit"If there's joy in Heaven for even one sinner that repenteth, this one is especially joyous. 
Things we currently know about Brexit, a comprehensive list:1) it means Brexit2) it will be red, white and blue3) everything is on fire 
Brexit Minister Welsh Politician of the Year, Owen Smith Loses Again:  
No clear answer from the MoJ when I sought clarity on UK involvement with the European Criminal Records Information System post #Brexit.  
I Was Wrong on Brexit. My Remain repentance. Europe in the Post-Brexit Age, @MilkenInstitute starting at 07:10. 
I want a rainbow Brexit. To make all our dreams come true. 
Set to join and back @Keir_Starmer on Labour frontbench for Brexit debate today; Gvt forced to agree to publish plan before talks start 
Brexit: Theresa Gets Tough. Eye 1433 is out now!  
Lucas: Govt amendment ‘threatens to throw Britain off the Brexit cliff edge with a vague plan at best, and within a timeframe that 
Lord Neuberger: “The problem with your argument is that as a matter of law the referendum has no legal effect” #Brexit 
Pleading to God & now saying we need a "red, white & blue" brexit?!?!Fuck is she on?! It’s like she’s imitating the worst U.S. presidents  
After #Brexit "we will slash #environment protection"... Tory MP. Sometimes a think people like to swim in filth.#pollution #GlobalWarming 
I have the words "Hard Brexit, Soft Brexit - Red White and Blue Brexit" to the tune of the intro to "Lady Marmalade" going round my head 
Man arrested for 'threatening woman' who led Brexit legal challenge  
#Brexit could see net migration from the EU fall by 150,000 a year and give pay boost to low-income workers. 
1. Brexit2. Brexit Means Brexit3. Hard Brexit4. 3 Brexits Red, White & Blue5. Brexit With A Vengeance6. Brexit: The Last Stand 
Troll Level: LORD SUMPTION!! #TeamGB #SupremeCourt #Brexit #Article50 
Man arrested on suspicion of racially aggravated communications over online threats to businesswoman behind Brexit challenge Gina Miller 
On cue, whilst Supreme Court hears about loss of rights engendered by Brexit (& ex p Rees-Mogg), MP Rees-Mogg says... 
Police have arrested a man on suspicion of racially-aggravated malicious communications relating to Gina Miller, the main Brexit claimant 
Man arrested over threats made online against Gina Miller, the woman behind Brexit legal challenge  
The CSO releases Brexit – Ireland and the UK in numbers today.  
Eurostar gave the bluntest response when asked what the benefits of Brexit are  
Adeptly, Theresa May manoeuvres around Labour's sideshow towards a clean Brexit  
Dozens of anti-Brexit MPs set to vote against Brexit process starting  
EU leaders talk tough on Brexit: "The period for the actual negotiations will be shorter than two years"  
Dear @kezdugdale, here's a simpler idea: why don't you try stopping Brexit?  
For those following the Scottish dimension of the Brexit case, the Lord Advocate is down to speak from 15.15 today  
Here's an IDEA Theresa !Your Christmas gift to Cabinet colleaguesA #Brexit colouring book and a set of crayons !#GladToHaveSortedThat4You 
Brexit and Donald Trump are just two of the traps awaiting investors in 2017  
'There is only Brexit, and we actually have a pretty good idea what it is going to look like'  
READ: 'We ARE leaving the single market' Government's Brexit plans are clear, Oliver Letwin says.  
But what if govt plan, published before A50 is invoked, *does* amount to a hard Brexit? Will you vote against it?  
.@theresa_may is right: we must respect the wishes of the people and trigger A50 by end of March. Let's crack on & make a success of Brexit! 
Ridiculous. Labour forced govt yesterday to reveal Brexit plan before invoking A50. Now, will commit to whatever 'plan'. WHAT WAS THE POINT? 
Standout thing in this analysis of who voted for Brexit is that people voted w their newspaper not political party:  
Why is Labour leadership willing to vote for PM's amendment today to invoke Article 50 by March, without knowing Brexit deal first? 
If you missed it yesterday, you can watch back day 2 of proceedings in Article 50 #Brexit appeal here:  
Good to hear Professor Ferguson, one the most vociferous Remain campaigners, admit he was wrong on #Brexit.  
READ: Adeptly, Theresa May manoeuvres around Labour's sideshow towards a clean Brexit. @Telegraph 
Theresa May should call a binding vote to trigger Brexit - and watch Remainers squirm - says @DouglasCarswell 
The good thing about the Brexit litigation is that it is helping to more easily identify chancers & charlatans; buffoons & the beligerent. 
Hey, people who want Brexit, tell me what you think is going well? Like, genuinely, positively, super on top of it well. Go. 
"Brexit? Pah! Trade is UP £1.7bn!"*cue party music*"Err guys actually it's down £4.3bn. We made a £6bn maths error""SORRY MUSIC TOO LOUD"  
Do you ever get the feeling we’re all in a runaway coal cart and the brakes aren’t working and the tracks end over an abyss? #brexit 
Oh dear. Trade deficit actually at £17 billion (worst since records began). Hey ho. Onwards to Brexit.  
No #Brexit deal can ever be nearly as good as continued membership of the #EU. MPs, have the courage of your convictions. 
"The contempt heaped on Brexit and Trump voters suggests the left is now a movement against the people, not for them" Brendan O'Neill on Sky  
Theresa May announces that Father Christmas, tooth fairy and a unicorn will represent Britain in Brexit negotiations.#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Pound falls to $1.26 after manufacturing output unexpectedly drops, by 0.9%  
The people of Sleaford are set to reaffirm the Brexit vote. No wonder | Phil McDuff  
Louise Trethowen remembers the reaction of Prime Minister Theresa May when asked about #Brexit. Full story in #theneweuropean 
May to explain Brexit with interpretive dance  
The #Brexit door in the new #Europa #Euco building in Brussels 
BREAKING: Britain's manufacturing output falls by most in 8 months as pharmaceuticals slump  
Leavers don't care that Britons will lose the right to live & work in the EU.Hardly patriotic!#Brexit - taking control from Britons 
Red white and Blu Brexit. . Patriotism is being abused. Rather than making us think beyond ourselves it's becoming opium for the masses. 
In 10 Downing Street, Theresa May spins the random word generator. Today will be a "Crunchy Nut Brexit" day. 
It was never meant to be bloody binding...This is from the original briefing note for MPs... #SupremeCourt #article50 #brexit  
Theresa May calls bluff of Europhile MPs over Brexit with Commons vote today. #Brexit 
.@grantshapps: I’ve a new hobby of spotting the Brexit dividends where some commentators can only see doom and gloom  
Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says  
Ready for Brexit in the @UKSupremeCourt day 3  
Basic requirements of #Brexit must be:-Control of own bordersAbility to make trade agreements with worldNo control by Euro Court Justice  
I remind those MPs who seek to frustrate the #EUReferendum result by forcing a soft #Brexit,421 out of 574 seats in Eng+Wales voted #Leave 
Brexit means sound bites. 
A small band of Remain useful idiots wrongly thinks Brexit won’t happen  via @CityAM 
Our Political Editor @faisalislam rounds up what happened on day two of the Brexit legal challenge  
'Three Quid Meal Deal Could Be Over Thanks To Brexit'Please no 
Labour's leading Brexiteer explains why it MUST be a 'hard' Brexit for Britain.  
Huge Brexit debate in the Commons today, and where's Tim Farron going to be? The Remainer who wants a say? In Brussels with EU negotiators 
This is one of the reasons for Brexit, Liz. Working class communities acting to cut the over-supply of labour.  
Yes and after #Brexit more Britons will be living in poverty because the Tories will demolish the welfare state and privatise the NHS  
BREAKING: #MadeWithUnity #Brexit satire Her Majesty's SPIFFING is available to buy now on @steam_games  
Asked about any policing benefits to #Brexit, Ashman paused for 18 seconds and said: “There’s your answer.”  
Will be interesting if Theresa May makes another revelation during today's Supreme Court hearing. Maybe Brexit should be crunchy AND smooth 
How does the Article 50 process work? A @commonslibrary research briefing  #Brexit  
Brexit means snappy slogans that don’t actually mean anything  
What’s next for tech companies in the Brexit debate  #TCDisrupt 
Scone pronunciation vs Brexit. Incredible.  
Column: The Wreckers v Reconcilers - two schools of Brexit.  
And half didn't vote for any Brexit  
Investigation into the pound's flash crash is focusing on Citigroup in Japan, @FT says  
Despite Brexit & Trump, the superyacht market remains as buoyant as ever with a record breaking number commissioned  
Here's who voted for Brexit - and who didn't  
Theresa May looks at her ever-shortening list of Brexit adjectives, as she taps her biro against her teeth."A milk and two sugars Brexit?" 
The real tragedy is that a government focused 100% on Brexit for next decade won't have capacity to deal with this.  
Could journalists please stop interviewees getting away with saying there is an 'overwhelming' mandate for Brexit. There is not. #bbc5live 
7m Britons in poverty despite being from a working family according to @jrf_uk. Will only get worse post-Brexit.  
If gives me no pleasure whatsoever to have predicted this  #Brexit  
India joins Japan in calling for better Brexit communications with nations outside Europe  
ECJ, external tradeAG opinion on EU trade powers (EU/Singapore FTA) due 21 DecRelevant to Brexit, TTIPBackground:  
We've had lost decade of wage growth & 1/8 workers now live in poverty. Tragedy that Brexit dominates our politics rather than these issues 
Here's a useful guide to keep you informed of Brexit progress:  
7m Britons live in poverty. So not only did the Tories introduce the Referendum but they created the foundations for the Brexit vote 
Jacob Rees Mogg suggests post-#Brexit slashing of environment & human health safety standards to levels in eg India.  
Niall Ferguson shows courage over his Brexit misjudgment. If only others would admit their own elite is the problem  
Brexit means lower migration means lower productivity/GDP per capita.  My new paper in FT:  
'Red, white & blue Brexit' is a cynical appeal to what is best described as pratriotism. 
I was a Remainer but now I’m backing Brexit all the way, as hard as you like - @grantshapps writes for us today 
Will Britain opt for a "hard" or a "soft" Brexit? A Brexit barometer #TheWorldIn  
I will not vote today to invoke Article 50 by March when we  still have no idea what sort of #Brexit the Government will pursue. 
Tory backbenchers demand detailed Brexit plans from Theresa May  
Anti-Brexit campaigner Gina Miller accused of having a 'lack of respect' for UK democracy  
Theresa May heads to the Middle East to talk trade, security and Iran  
Let's see the plan before any vote. I suspect it will be a study in vagueness without any substance. #Brexit  
Marine A wins chance to appeal after review finds 'real possibility' of having murder conviction quashed  
Brexit should be red and yellow and green and brown; and scarlet and black and ochre and peach; and ruby and olive and violet and fawn. 
We have been told that foreigners 'steal' the natives' jobs, so let us see now if any natives will wash cars or pick potatoes after #Brexit 
But, but, but “Brexit means Brexit” - I thought leaving the EU to shut up some obsessives was more important than infrastructure projects?  
Brexit is not about Brexit anymore,it is about TM!Her obsessions and her personal messages from God guiding her is destroying this country.  
Brexit, migration & growth: @helenwarrell & @ChrisGiles_ on my new paper: 
Red, White and Blue Brexit?Honestly.It's this where we are now? 
Repeat: #Brexit will happen. Court case not attempt to stop it, it's about making sure govt consult MPs on it. It's about legal protections  
Scottish Labour to call for new federal state to unite UK after Brexit  
Twenty reasons why Brexit will be even trickier than we thought  
U.K. tech leaders propose post-Brexit plan to attract entrepreneurs, workers, and investors  
A world away from Brexit Britain, in 1948, 800 million subjects of the empire had right to live & work in Britain  
The LIBDEMS And Labour Party will pay the price at the Ballot Box for trying to Stop BREXIT 
How did Leave manage to get the buy-in of working-poor Brits, when #Brexit is actually about deregulation and tax cuts for the wealthy?  
Good morning, Britain. Today Theresa May will urge MPs to vote in favour of her plans to trigger Brexit by April:  
'We ARE leaving the single market' Government's Brexit plans are clear, Oliver Letwin says  
Historian admits he was WRONG to back Cameron and reveals he should have voted Brexit  
Should opposition MP's Trust the Tory PM to reveal her detailed plan for Brexit before Triggering article 50 
Brexit Day! Historic moment as MPs to vote on EU exit TODAY after May challenges remoaners  
Brexit: MPs to vote on Article 50 timetable  
First Brexit, then Trump, now Italy faces political shockwave @CNN  @Cernovich @CounterCouncil  Italy votes Brexit! 
After Brexit, Trump, Holland, Renzi's demise; we now have capitulation from Globalism's Queen (2) 
  PM Cam practised delib fraud on the Br. ppl. SHUD BE HELD TO ACCOUNT. @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #Brexit  
A small band of Remain useful idiots wrongly thinks Brexit won’t happen  
The Brexit treatment: Now Donald Trump voters are realizing they made a huge mistake 
The appalling mess of #Brexit can be stopped by #MPs if they put the country before themselves. Courage & principle: do MPs still have them? 
ok ha um, fake populist anger. what just happened in the USA election, brexit, France, Italy, powerful for FAKE 
Placing Italy's referendum into Brexit-Trump context: excellent summary from Luigi Z  
No #Brexit deal will ever be as good as the #EU membership we have. Brexit is self-harm on a huge scale. 
The huge dishonesty endlessly repeated is 'the #ref expressed the will of the UK' for #Brexit. No: 1/4 of the UK population is not 'the UK'. 
#CCOT Churchill was a winner the #UK - the world - could sure use him today. .@realDonaldTrump #MAGA #UKIP #MEGA #Brexit  
UK smells money in right-wing Brazil after Brexit.  
Scottish Labour MSP's silence on Brexit and how it will affect their electorate is deafeningA deafening #DeathKnell 
Shock! BBC says majority who voted for Brexit were ordinary working people. Of course elite want to stop them.  
London tech leaders propose post-Brexit plan to British government  
"40% of U.K. tech founders are from outside UK." How will brexit affect this?  poses hard questions @balderton 
WATCH: Mr. Brexit, Nigel Farage, warns US diplomats to not to make the same mistakes Britain has.Link:  
'We ARE leaving the single market' Government's Brexit plans are clear, Oliver Letwin tells #Newsnight  
London tech leaders propose post-Brexit plan to British government  
Laura Kuenssberg Journalist of the YearJudges said: “In a tumultuous year she rose to the challenge and made the story of Brexit her own.”  
Pannick attack: QC tries to dismantle Govt case in Brexit court battle  
The British economy will not crumble in 2017, but that does not mean Brexit was a good idea  
I see trees of green, red roses too I see Brexit, Red, White and Blue And I think to myself what an ol' fucked up wooorld  
WTF has happened to Brexit? I explain....SHARE:  
It's "Infinite Jest"'s Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
At last the PM has cleared up confusion about what Brexit really means. Brexit no longer means Brexit, it now means "red, white and blue". 
"what is the worst thing to happen this year, harambe, brexit or trump?" 
The government’s contempt for democracy hits a new low with this extraordinary statement about #Brexit  
'Stop INSULTING voters!' Leavers AND Remainers DID say Brexit meant no more single market   
What part of the word "NO" dont you understand Mr @JunckerEU#Italexit #Frexit #Grexit #Eurozone #EUSpring #Brexit #No2EU 
UK tech leaders call on Government to ensure Britain’s post-Brexit tech future  
Mix Red White and Blue together and you get Purple #Brexit. The bad kind.  
#BREXIT BREAKING NEWS: MPs to vote on EU exit *TODAY* after May challenges them to respect the wishes of the People.  
Christmas tree in Liverpool - venue for joint annual meeting of British and Dutch Immunology Socs- up yours Brexit  
Brexit. Stuck in a swanky temple to inertia and self regard.  
Theresa May says she wants a "red, white and blue"  tailor-made Brexit agreement  
'I was wrong about Brexit' admits Britain's most influential historian  via  
There is no legal basis for High Court Brexit case, but us plebs are getting shafted again! Pod 2 with @BrugesGroup 
"Brexit" is definitely the weirdest heckle I've ever heard at a show but Portsmouth you were…  
Historian admits he was WRONG to back Cameron and reveals he should have voted Brexit  
Guardian front page, Wednesday 7 December 2016: May forced to reveal Brexit plan to head off Tory revolt  
Astounding. What Fox is actually doing... Very quietly, Liam Fox admits the Brexit lie  via @politics_co_uk 
So, the #brexit we're after is a 'red, white and blue brexit'; if this doesn't shout out 'I have no idea what I'm doing' nothing will 
I'm told I should be happy that May is now to publish a Brexit plan.  But I'm not going to vote for a pig in a poke. What is the plan ? 
As predicted.......Britain could slash environmental and safety standards after Brexit, Tory MP - The Independent  
@theresa_may Brexit is Brexit, The Will of the People and now The Red, White and Blue. Do get a grip, you're the PM not a caption writer!  
What is being said by those questioning judicial impartiality on Brexit is - I will only agree you're impartial if you agree with me. 
#BrexitIsAPoliticalChoice if you @uklabour supporters don't scream and shout NOW!! #Brexit process begins tomorrow @wwoodyccat @UKLabour 
Can @BBC please do its job and tell us the truth about the disastrous failure of the Tories to prepare any plan whatsoever for #Brexit? 
someone got paid to tell Theresa May to say she wants a red, white and blue Brexit and lots of people probably thought it was a great answer 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is one of many right-wingers who see #Brexit as a chance to slash environmental & safety standards  
No 10 uses the UK’s armed forces as a photo backdrop to announce ‘red, white & blue Brexit’. Nauseating.  
Overheard at gym. "I voted leave 'cos too many foreigners, expected it next day. Taking too long. Shouldn't have bothered." #Brexit #sad 
Is.. is this Brexit? #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
!!! IMPORTANT !!!HIGHLY CONFIDENTIAL NOTES ON BREXIT BY THE PM HERSELF HAVE BEEN LEAKEDSHARE AND RT THIS IS V V V V IMPORTANT  
Brexit is now Ray Winstone outside a chippy singing Vindaloo in the Spice Girls Union Jack dress as Danny Dyer nuts a coach load of Belgiums 
The Brexit bug is helping bring Europe together, uniting peoples who’ve had a gutful of authoritarian elites  
Theresa May accidentally reveals the countries she expects UK to join in 2019 by calling for a "red, white, and blue Brexit"  
Here's 20 reasons why Brexit will be harder than we thought (and most of us already though it was hard)  
Wednesday's FT: "May agrees to lay out Brexit plan as Barnier sets deadline for talks" #bbcpapers (via @suttonnick) 
Wednesday's Telegraph: "May goes into battle for Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @suttonnick) 
Wednesday's i: "PM caves in on plans for Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @suttonnick) 
Proof the government is slowly making its way through their full list of statements on Brexit.#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Clinton's pop vote margin now 2X the number of votes in Leave's margin of victory. Something to keep in mind when comparing Trump & Brexit. 
And now Remain MPs in Leave constituencies will have to represent their electorates or face deselection. #brexit  
#Brexit was always really about giving Britain back to the Billionaires.  #ukip, #nigelfarage 
BREAKING: Theresa May reveals Brexit will be the colour of a smurf. More soon ...#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
I'm only guessing but I reckon Europe will prefer a blue Brexit with yellow stars on it. 
"People are demanding answers on Brexit, Prime Minister. What should we do?""Could I try just naming some colours?"#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
"A red, white and blue Brexit."  
Theresa May calls bluff of Europhile MPs over Brexit with Commons vote  
Voters in Sleaford remember only UKIP is 100% committed to BREXIT, only UKIP gave us a referendum, send Mrs May a message, vote UKIP 
Theresa May found another completely meaningless phrase to replace 'Brexit means Brexit'  
#Brexit is UK's #Trump. Don't our MPs get that? 
If the single market and its 'four freedoms' are indivisible, that's fine, Mr Barnier. No cherrypicking.Just Goodbye.#Brexit 
Big climb-down by PM. Now we can focus on the real issue: Brexit terms. No mandate or consensus for hard Brexit.  
Rees-Mogg says regulations on imported products “good enough for India” could be good enough for the UKTory #Brexit 
A recap of what happened on day two of the Government's #Brexit legal challenge in 90 seconds #brexitappeal 
Wednesday's Telegraph:May goes into battle for Brexit#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Anybody know if "Red, white and blue Brexit" is going to be "difficult, difficult, lemon difficult"? 
The #EU brings death to Europe through the enemy migrants. "Second young woman found dead in Freiburg"#Brexit 
The latest inanity of "red white & blue Brexit" means as little as the last. Apart from anything the French flag is red white & blue too! 
The white noise of the corporate lobby."Wah wah wah Brexit slows down our ability to exploit consumers and workers!"  
This was why we fought so hard against #Brexit  
Steve Bell, in the Guardian, nails May's #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit bollocks in the best way. #Brexit #Article50 
A red white and blue Brexit - what sort of moron will buy into that meaningless simplistic drivel :-) watch this space 
Five Go Mad on Brexit Island: Urgent, sign and share the 'What's the Plan?' petition here: #whatstheplan 
Seriously, a £1m greyhound has been dogknapped and some people are still wanting to talk about a 'red, white & blue Brexit?' Come on, people 
Steve Bell on red, white and blue Brexit – cartoon  
METRO FRONT PAGE: ‘Get set for a sharp Brexit’ #skypapers 
We've had brexit, hard brexit, soft brexit, grey brexit, red, white and blue brexit. Enough of the adjectives - #whatstheplan please sign! 
Ambassador Anderson had a very good meeting with the Friends of Ireland today on Capitol Hill to discuss Ire-US bilateral issues,Brexit & NI  
Jacob Rees-Mogg reckons that health and safety standards that were 'good enough for India' should be good enough for UK.... riiiight #Brexit  
Any #Lexit voters who think #Brexit anything other than right wing coup aimed at benefiting super wealthy are deluded. Coming 4 our rights  
Great stuff from @guardian's Steve Bell. #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit #brexit  
Can't hear 'Red, White & Blue Brexit' & not immediately picture Malcolm Tucker ramming someone's head repeatedly in a car door. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says UK can slash UK safety & chem hazard standards to level of countries like India after Brexit  
Worth remembering.#Brexit  
We the plebs are getting shafted again! Now the Supreme Court is trying to stop Brexit! Pod One with @BrugesGroup 
Steve Bell on red, white and blue Brexit – cartoon  
Theresa May's Brexit 'plan' may not be worth the name, writes @Peston 
My cartoon - where does Britain draw the line with Saudi Arabia & China?#Brexit 
No, Brexit is fine, if thou dost insist.'Tis Brexeunt I won't stand for. 
Incisive work by @IanDunt this is the sort of Brexit detail the government would rather you didn't notice. 
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
"No strategy published pre-A50!"- now to publish strategy"No parliamentary vote on A50!"- now to have voteBrexit going well, then. 
Jacob Rees Mogg MP Speaking on BREXIT Please Share 
Twenty reasons why Brexit will be even trickier than we thought  
Anti-Brexit campaigner Gina Miller accused of having a 'lack of respect' for UK democracy  
I left Labour & have now joined the LibDems over Brexit. 
“Economy to Defy Brexit Fears” #DespiteBrexit  
Barnier’s Brexit Timeline  
UK has to reach #Brexit deal by October 2018, says EU's chief negotiator for Brexit  
Those #brexit colour options in full:1. Red, white & blue2. Red, gold & green3. Red, amber, green4. green eyes, blue eyes, grey eyes 
Whatever the Supreme Court rules, whatever Parliament says, the People have decided to leave the EU. Not 4 freedoms or single market. Brexit 
Hundreds of Brexit-inspired STUDENTS have taken to the streets in Italy demanding to leave the EU.  
Victoria Ayling is the only candidate that will 100% support the BREXIT referendum. #sleafordandnorthhykeham 
'Brexit means Brexit'; we want a 'red, white & blue Brexit'. Can anyone remember when Theresa May last uttered a sentence of substance? 
BREAKING: the speaker is arguing for a "granite hard Brexit". I believe this is a new one. 
Brexit is turning into a game of charades. Now we know what colour it is, can anyone guess its shape? #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
So rude I am surprised she hasn't said it will be a truly wonderful super duper Brexit that every other country in the world will want duh  
Men spoke for over four hours during this week's Supreme Court Brexit case, women for one minute  
As promised, I am happy to publish our plan for Brexit on behalf of Her Majesty's Government.  
The PM and govt don't have a clue. They spend more time planning soundbites than coming up with a Brexit strategy 
Government says it will publish its #Brexit plan before triggering Article 50, the formal process to leave the EU  
That's right David, it's *Nicola Sturgeon* that's lacking a clear brexit plan. Yup.  
The High court case on Brexit is nonsense! We shouldn't need a court case on whether on not to uphold democracy! 
I think that's the point Norway pays and gets benefits but has no say over regulations Brexit offers only terrible economic negatives  
BREXIT PLAN II(Daily Mail version)Brexit is redRemoaners are blueBritain's alt-white nowSo migrants, screw you 
In Brexit negotiations, Merkel's plan matters more than May's.  
The concern is that it'll be:Theresa's Plan:Brexit means BrexitBe ambitiousGet best dealMake it a successRed, White, BlueSigned, TM  
It's swell to hear Theresa May will reveal her Brexit plan before triggering Article 50. Here's what it looks like at the minute:  
Just when you thought there wasn't a more meaningless phrase than Brexit Means Brexit, along comes #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
'You ain't seen nothing yet' Farage delivers warning over attempts to derail Brexit  
Always remember it was Labour under #corbyn that have forced #TheresaMay to reveal her #brexit plans before the Tories invoke #Article50 
Imagine the SNP proposed a 'Blue and White' independence. They'd be (Rightly) ridiculed by every journo in the country. #brexit  
The government’s contempt for democracy hits a new low with extraordinary statement about Brexit  via @thecanarysays 
I thought that we where going to be kept in the dark about brexit but May has cleared up everything #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Theresa May has finally agreed to set out her Brexit plans before triggering the Article 50 exit clause next year  
.@theresa_may will publish plan for Brexit before Article 50 is triggered, the BBC understands  
Roses are RED, violets are BLUE, Red, white & blue Brexit, That's a pile of poo #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit #TheresaMay #embarrassing 
So it's taken 165 days and the only solid thing we know about Brexit is what colour they want it to be? #redwhiteandblueBrexit 
BREXIT PLANBoris has hairdoDavis goes on StrictlySay "Brexit means Brexit" againLiam Fox starts trade talks with NarniaEr, that's it 
Brexit ="No economic opportunityNo cultural opportunityNo opportunities for communityNo opportunities for Peace" 
What's a red, white and blue brexit @Number10gov ? Haven't come across that terminology. Please clarify.....as currently it means FUCK ALL. 
Sneak preview of that Plan 4 Brexit  
'I was wrong about Brexit' admits Britain's most influential historian  
Supreme Court Brexit hearing Day 2: Pannick on the prerogative  via @FT 
Incidentally, "a red white and blue Brexit" is like a parody Gordon Brown line. Which tells us a lot. 
Starmer: Labour will support govt additions to Brexit motion. "Govt have now finally accepted Labour's call and committed to publish a plan" 
Keir Starmer announces that Labour will support Tories' Brexit amendment. Here's how May will use it.  
NEW: Labour is going to support the government amendment on Brexit, saying they never said they'd try to block or hold up plans. 
The tragedy of #Brexit for #Labour is they have lots of leaders who cd make hay with this and really hurt the Cons' polling. 
Standard Chartered is considering Dublin for its EU base after Brexit, sources say  
Stupid press office inspired claptrap like "red, white and blue Brexit" will cost Theresa May a lot of support. Banal and meaningless. 
.@bbc5live why aren't you playing the Bernard Jenkin response to Barnier's comments? Your anti-Brexit, anti-UK bias is beyond a joke. 
I prefer my Brexit to be the colour out of space, roaring incoherenlty out of the void into the void. 
SNP amendment to Labour's #Brexit motion tomorrow. Devolved Govt's must have say. SNP will continue to stand up for our place in Europe.  
Most politicians know #Brexit will be disastrous for UK and its people. Why don't they have the balls to do the right thing? 
Red, white and blue Brexit is actually ok phrase that Leave voters will get. It means a bespoke deal, pursuit of national interests. 
This weeks meaningless twaddle is 'red, white and blue brexit'. Sometimes I honestly think we have a chat bot as a Prime minister 
Barnier:  This is what Brexit will be like.Supreme Court parties: This is how Brexit should be done.May: Red, White and Blue! 
.@IainDale: Red white and blue Brexit? Enough meaningless catchphrases, just get on with it:  
Can anyone tell me the difference between a Hard #Brexit and cutting your legs off and throwing yourself into shark tank? Not obvious to me. 
This Brexit is a #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit, according to Prime Minister @theresa_may 
PM seeks to fend off revolt over Brexit by promising to publish some sort of plan before triggering Article 50. 
Stop comparing Italy’s referendum to Brexit and Trump. Here’s what it’s really about @alemannoEU  
Get the flags out they love the flags! Dog whistle brexit  
What we had. What #TheresaMay thinks we'll get. What we'll end up with. #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit #Brexit #BrexitMeansBrexit 
Just hours after #Brexit result, I asked @AdamPosen about the vote's broad implications. What he said stuck with me.  
Tory MP & former UK Gov minister @Anna_Soubry saying that Scottish Parly is "entitled" to having a consent motion before #Brexit can happen  
The political class is doing everything to sabotage Brexit. Will we let them? . Please RT this video. 
@the48andbeyond RT @MetroUK: Did Liam Fox just admit the entire Brexit trade campaign was a lie?  
Twenty reasons why Brexit will be even trickier than we thought 
May's Brexit strategy amounts to merely  mouthing world-class platitudes and inanities  
MPs who do not commit to voting for Article 50 unconditionally are guilty of delaying and frustrating Brexit  
Theresa May wants a red, white & blue #Brexit, just like the colours of this flagOh, wait.Wake up, #Wales 
Red, White and Blue Brexit: In Pictures.  
Serious, substantive stuff from Brussels; fluffy "red, white and blue Brexit" nonsense from Britain. Words fail.  
We want a proper detailed plan from Theresa May.Brexit is not a poker game.We demand a plan.Sign the petition:  
Brexit vote will lead to a slump in office construction including up to half planned developments in central London   
Ha! Theresa has JUNKED the term *Brexit means Brexit **go to* term is NOW *Brexit means Red White & Blue Brexit*ANY idea ?NO me neither ! 
Brexit trade deal simply cannot be done by end of March, political editor @IanDunt tells @DelaneyMan  
How Theresa May is trying to trap her opponents over Brexit. By @georgeeaton  
On Brexit, we will no longer be bound by EU procurement rules. Govt can pass laws that stipulate preference MUST be given to UK suppliers. 
Right that the government will publish Brexit plan. Country and Parliament won't accept one of the 'dog ate my homework' variety.... 
That Tory 'have cake and eat it' Brexit strategy explained in all its humiliating glory #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
An excellent list of 10 reasons why the #EURef result does not provide a mandate for #Brexit#Reman #YesEU 
#LordPannick went to work and everybody had to keep up.Galaxy-size legal brain. #Brexit will happen, but it's been beaten up#PannickAttack 
PM 'will publish plan for Brexit before Article 50' > would have been good to see this BEFORE THE REFERENDUM  
The Government's bid to keep control of the #Brexit timetable has begun. Here's what happened on day one of the Brexit legal challenge.  
Brexit is not about democracy in action. It's populist ignorance on a grand scale:#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Labour welcomes 'hugely significant climbdown' from government over Brexit -  
Its disgraceful how they mislead us RT Very quietly, Liam Fox admits the #Brexit lie  
17.4 million of us didn't 'fear' Brexit when we voted so enthusiastically for it. We eagerly await it. Photo: AFP pic.twitter.com/Ei8PKP3LUH 
British PM wants a red,white & blue #Brexit !!! Brexit strategy blowing in the wind!! 
If I don't back Brexit then I don't back Britain. I guess that makes me a traitor. What happens now? 
Red White & Blue Brexit. Oh massively fuck off. Talking to me like I'm Eric Bristow on E at Last Night Of The Proms. 
Yes In 18 months we delivered the Brexit vote, helped Trump in his victory. Not bad for someone with no idea .... I've had a hell of a year  
Theresa May WILL show MPs a Brexit plan to avoid revolt  
Senior Tories now targeting NHS for sell-off after Brexit:#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Government concede Labour’s calls to publish a Brexit plan @Keir_Starmer 
EU Brexit negotiator puts time pressure on Britain  
Interesting chat with Karel Bartak, EC head of culture on keeping joint programmes going in Scotland post Brexit  
Brexit fight delayed but it hasn't disappeared ...  
Aha. So May finally admits Brexit all about making it easier for Tories to sell the UK off to their rich US friends: #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Brexit means Brexit.Have your cake and eat it.Red white and blue Brexit. Sounds more like 'Great British Bake Off' than an actual plan.  
So basically #Brexit turns out to be bunting? #GreatBritishBrexitOff 
Twenty reasons why Brexit will be even trickier than we thought: My piece for Guardian  
Trudeau gives citizenship back to convicted terrorist. This globalist has to go. Á la Brexit, Trump, Italy.  
EXCLUSIVE: Theresa May's 'plan' for Brexit. (Spoiler..she sd it last month)I'm told if Gov amendment passes tmrw, expect sthing like this:  
Public pref. for Supreme Court ruling:Must have vote in parliament: 33%Gov. can start Brexit process without vote: 48%(YouGov / 06 Dec) 
No 10 agrees to publish a plan for Brexit before triggering Article 50, ahead of a Labour debate.  
"Richard Corbett MEP is absolutely right. There is no mandate for a #Brexit that pushes us over the…" — Mark Watts   
I'm not upset or offended by '#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit.  It's hilarious. It's meaningless.  It's Brexit means Brexit means utter bollocks. 
The best BREXIT outcome1. Go for EFTA as a transition2. Sit back and watch the EU self immolate3. Enjoy economic & strategic benefits 
Once the government has exhausted all other options, they'll have to at least try Erotic Brexit. Then, I will be interested 
I also remember the 1930s which is what austerity and Brexit will usher back into Britain-equality will never come from #Brexit only poverty  
Theresa May wants a "red, white & blue Brexit"The economy will be in the redIt'll only work for whitesShe'll only care about blue voters 
Remain MPs should not seek to obstruct Brexit. Vote for Government amendment tomorrow and embrace huge opportunities for an independent UK.  
What does Brexit mean?Brexit is bespokeBrexit means BrexitBrexit is red white and blueNow we know Brexit means vacuous Tory fuckwittery 
STPs are like #Brexit Gov hoping to plan in secret with minimal consultation to avoid proper scrutiny/accountability  
Totally exposes Soubry claims to "respect Ref result" as bare-faced lie.Her aim is negate or reverse it by wrecking May Brexit negotiation. 
Corbyn gets another Tory u-turn, his 24th, Tories accept Labour amendment to produce Brexit plan before Art 50 invoked. 
The Times reports that the economy is to defy Brexit fears  
Theresa May wants a red, white and blue Brexit. Personally, I want a paisley pattern Brexit in aubergine. 
What colour Brexit would you prefer?#RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit #PMHT 
During 9 hrs 45 minutes of Brexit Supreme Court case so far:Men have spoken for: 9 hrs 41 mins 55 secsWomen have spoken for: 3 mins 5 secs 
Mrs May would like a red, white & blue Brexit. The UK would like a Prime Minister. 
Anti-Brexit campaigner Gina Miller accused of having a 'lack of respect' for UK democracy  
"The basic fact: healthy nature is vital for our health, wealth and security" @TonyJuniper on Nature and #Brexit  
It's the *Brexuality* of your Brexit makes all the diff 
Rejected slogans before PM May got to #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit - Full English Brexit- Stiff upper Brexit- Things can only get Brexitter 
May accepts Labour's call to publish Brexit plan before triggering article 50 - Politics live  
The #Brexit vote is just one of many political shocks that have occurred across Europe in recent months  
I'm guessing Theresa May hasn't actually read a single page of the Good Friday Agreement; no regard for Irish citizens caught in her #brexit  
The amendment is comprehensive and reassuring. Anyone who can't support can only be acting in a hindering, mischievous capacity #brexit  
Govt amendment now looks like a judo throw - if Lab opposes it will be portrayed as opposing Brexit result  
Theresa May U-turn as she accepts Labour motion to reveal Brexit plan  
The Government has accepted a Labour motion which demands the Brexit plan is published before triggering the formal process to leave the EU 
May publishing Brexit plan a victory for Labour & Tory rebels threatening to defeat her tomorrow. Might as well scrap Supreme Court hearing 
Twenty reasons why Brexit will be even trickier than we thought  
So many of our services depend on international staff. Brexit secrecy means they live in total uncertainty. They need to know, #WhatsThePlan 
Brexit leaders have made it seem like international care workers are only tolerated 'for now'. They deserve to know, #WhatsThePlan 
The Government has agreed to publish its plan for Brexit before it triggers Article 50, the formal process of leaving the EU. 
Delighted that @AshfordCouncil are leading the way for #Brexit by taking down the #EU Flag from the main flagpole outside the civic centre. 
Dramatic developments outside Ct as Govt now saying it will publish #Brexit plan, but trying to hang on to March 2017 #Art50 trigger date. 
Wow Jeremy Corbyn's Labour just defeated the govt in the commons and have pushed May into sharing her brexit plan. 
CORRUPT GOVERNMENT, WANTS PEOPLE TO IMITATE Theresa May wants a 'red, white and blue Brexit' 
The public needs to know the Brexit plan directly from the Govnt not through leaked memos. Agree? Sign the petition  
Stop comparing Italy’s referendum to Brexit and Trump. Here’s what it’s really about  - My take on #italyreferendum  
You know the Supreme Court Brexit case has captured the public imagination when Tesco starts selling a range of Baroness Hale toys  
Breaking: Govt will agree to Labour's motion tomorrow to publish a Brexit 'plan', but also challenge MPs to agree PM's Article 50 timetable. 
#DavidPannick-his interpretation of British Constitution.#Brexit will happen But not by #plebiscite#BillofRights 
The constitutional status of the 1972 is the reason why David Davis wants to trigger Brexit says Pannick. But it’s also he needs legislation 
BREAKING: Theresa May finally reveals her cards on #Brexit strategy#ToryBrexit #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Everyone agrees to quietly forget Brexit thing ever happened  
The four Labour Brexit camps: The leadership, the department, the reformers and the abolitionists  
Tim Farron: PM's red, white and blue Brexit pledge 'jingoistic claptrap' 
Brexit is redBrexit is blueBrexit is BrexitBrexit Brexit BrexitA wee poem to help this great country beat those EU eggheads! 
Compare and contrast the rigourous arguments of Lord Pannick with Theresa May’s ‘red white and blue’ Brexit. 
Theresa May gives a definitive explanation of Brexit.  
"If you're anti-Brexit, you're anti-UK""OK. What's the plan?""Brexit means Brexit""Any details?""Red, White & Blue Brexit""..""BREXIT" 
Government can call it whatever colours they like – the fact is, their plan for Brexit is blank @JennyChapman 
"It's about a red, white and blue #Brexit that is the right deal for Britain," Prime Minister @theresa_may has said 
If you're finding the Supreme Court Brexit case a little too much, here's some light relief from The @Telegraph's cartoonist Christian Adams 
Today we learned that we are having a Golgafrinchan B-Ark Brexit.  
Tories: Let's have a more respectful #Brexit debateLess than 24 hours later...No.10: If you don't back UK Gov you're not backing UK team!  
Actually, I think one of the greatest symbols of oppression in Britain is the #DailyMail masthead. #Ukip #brexit  
Lord Pannick: There is clear case law that ministers can't use prerogative (executive) power to 'take away the rights of citizens" #brexit 
May still has no idea what Brexit will entail, but now knows what colour scheme she's picked for it... Seriously? It's not a new kitchen.. 
French? A French Brexit?  
Difficult to overstate how amazing and important it is that we can watch the Supreme Court Brexit hearing online. Real open justice. 
Lord Pannick, leader of team challenging government's Article 50 case, speaks at Supreme Court #Brexit hearing  
She's lost the plot. Who elected her? Oh yea.. no one.Theresa May: We want a red, white and blue Brexit.  
Dear Kipper, your government lied to you. It never had the right to impliment Brexit on its own. That's the law. If you don't like it, leave  
"A red, white and blue Brexit."  Oh my God. The Prime Minister of this country actually said that. 
I am afraid this is what we will see over the coming years. #Brexit #trade  
Court is not concerned with the justification for Brexit, says Pannick. Question for the court is whether the minister has prerogative power 
May calling for a #redwhiteandbluebrexit reinforces divisive rhetoric and old-fashioned patriotism, when what we need is policy #brexit 
#TheresaMay says she wants Brexit to be red, white and blue but most of us just want to know whether it will be hard or soft. 
Theresa May announces the colour of #Brexit as "red, white & blue"A bit like that French or Dutch flag then...  
Some say it means Russian Brexit, others say French Brexit...But can anyone really doubt #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit means North Korean Brexit?  
.@NeilUKIP speaking earlier says @WelshGovernment are trying to frustrate the will of the people by intervening in Brexit Supreme Court case 
What is taking place in the Supreme Court is a mockery of justice and a blatant attempt to bury #Brexit by abuse of legal procedure. 
Red White & Blue #Brexit :Red = our future financesWhite = our future raceBlue = our future government 
A red white and blue Brexit is absolutely fair. Mr Putin worked very hard for it after all.  
 @Keir_Starmer says the Labour party wants more clarity on Brexit plans "before Article 50 is invoked"  
'Jingoistic Claptrap' Tim Farron blasts Theresa May over calls for a 'Red, White & Blue Brexit' #BrexitShambles  
The judges debating brexit are quite pissed off having had to stop 7 times today to receive instruction from Junkers 
We don't want to cherry pick anything, with the exception of the #Remainers - the majority just want a clean brexit and quickly  
SDLP leader @columeastwood asking who NI Attorney General John Larkin QC is representing given Executive's divide over Brexit 
Theresa May is about 5 minutes from telling us all to drape ourselves in Union Jacks and start praying for #brexit. She's off her trolley. 
Bernard Jenkin tells @BBCRadio4 re #Brexit that UK should look at how easy & quick independence was for the colonies #HistoryFail #India etc 
Theresa May just said she wants a "Red, White & Blue Brexit" - ah... now it all becomes clear.#NorthKorea#Brexit#WhatsThePlan 
Theresa May's adorning a union jack fig leaf doesn't cover up the sheer emptiness of her strategy on #Brexit #LetsRemain 
Mark Carney spends his time bringing anti #brexit poverty doom and gloom wherever he goes! Why does #TheresaMay keep him in situ? 
Those who lost the #Brexit referendum are engaged in a twofold strategy. 1. Delay and dilute it. 2. Do everything possible to wreck the deal 
NI govt argues that this bit of the Good Friday Agreement, on the British-Irish council, isn't redundant after Brexit if Ireland stays in  
Merkel unambiguous on Brexit at CDU conference: "We will not allow any cherry picking".  
Mauve BrexitAquamarine BrexitChartreuse BrexitAzure BrexitHot Pink BrexitTeal BrexitSienna BrexitAmaranth BrexitCerulean Brexit  
BREXIT: We capitalise WORSE to help ease the shock of those honestly expecting it to be BETTER.  
Mayhem calls for red white & blue Brexit More utter nonsense nobody has slightest clue what that means=not up to it 
#MPs with #constituencies who voted leave should be not try to delay or frustrate #Brexit!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #EU #UK 
#MPs who do not commit to voting for #Article50 unconditionally are guilty of delaying and frustrating #Brexit  #BBC 
She gave us "Brexit means Brexit" and now @theresa_may has come up with "red, white and blue #Brexit"  
#Brexit recap: the government HAS A PLAN. Or maybe not. And they're not saying what it is. But if you don't support it, YOU ARE A TRAITOR. 
"Brexit will be red, white and blue"...  
Brexit/Trump effect. But it's too late for her now.  
Just heard the "red, white and blue Brexit line" and actually laughed out loud. Who says the Government has no plan? 
I think Theresa, when the country wanted you to expand on 'Brexit means Brexit' they didn't mean 'what fucking colour is it'. 
In 5 months Theresa May has gone from Brexit means Brexit to #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit. By March it'll be 'Brexit is like a box of chocolates 
EU’s Brexit negotiator: U.K. should leave bloc by March 2019  
May: Brexit means... May: *shakes Magic 8 Ball*May: ...ask again later 
After Theresa May's call for a red, white and blue Brexit is announced, the new negotiating team is revealed  
EU negotiator eyes October 2018 for Brexit deal  
Woman burns EU flag at Supreme Court, saying "that's what you can do with 4th Reich". VIDEO here: #brexit  
.@Open_Britain joins @CommonGroundUK1 @Scientists4EU @euromove and others to call on Govt to publish its Brexit plan 
FFS -  what next? A White Cliffs Brexit? A Pint of Fucking Bitter Brexit? Give me fucking strength... pic.twitter.com/rjBzt52Gjh 
Where can you beat the Brexit effect on holiday?  
UK tech leaders call on Government to ensure Britain's post-Brexit tech future  by @mikebutcher 
Roses are red,#Brexit is red, white and blue. No, I don't know what that means eitherNot one fucking clue. 
European Parliament lead Brexit negotiator @GuyVerhofstadt supports Scotland remaining in the European Union:  
The European Union's chief Brexit negotiator has warned Britain it may only have 18 months to strike an exit deal  
The 'will of the people' is a perfect democratic sounding device for authoritarians aiming to delegitimize political opposition.#Brexit 
The 'will of the people' is a notion absolutely toxic to parliamentary democracy, turning opponents into enemies of the people.#Brexit 
Me: What does Brexit meanGovt: BrexitM: Yes, what does it meanG: Red, white & blueM: Those are colours, you don't know do youG: Brexit 
So, we know Brexit means Brexit. And it is Red, White and Blue. Any other clues? Anyone? #redwhiteandbluebrexit 
Big news. @EU_Commission lead Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier open to talks with Scottish Government. 
Red, white and blue Brexit. I'm actually kind of in awe of anyone who can produce this level of gibberish with a straight face.  
If you've been looking for a clear, unbiased update on #Brexit, don't miss this interview.  
Brexit is not grey. It's red, white and blue! says @theresa_may. 
UK Government admits in court, to defend Brexit, that devolution is a con. They've been lying over & over & over.  
Sewell Convention having been included into legal framework of Scotland Act 2015, now UK govt saying it doesn't matter- cake&eat it? #brexit 
Brexit judges at Supreme Court warned not to cross 'over the line' against Government  
While EU will negotiate #Brexit with UK govt, I'm told @michelbarnier will be happy to discuss with all interested parties incl @scotgov 
As everybody knew, the SNP can't stop Brexit.Their time would be better spent sorting out the latest education disaster in Scotland.  
What colour do you want your Brexit? #redwhiteandbluebrexit 
Imagine Merkel calling for "black, red & gold" solution to anything. Our politics is so fatuous "red, white & blue Brexit" passes as insight 
"Brexit means Brexit" "I have no idea what that means""It means a red, white and blue Brexit""Thanks, I'm so much clearer now" 
Unsurprised liberal dupes out being snooty about 'Red White and Blue Brexit'. That helps her. Push on what means, don't slag patriotic image 
So… Fox going for carbon copy of EU’s WTO schedules.Remind me again: what is the point of Brexit? 
Of course when Theresa May says 'red, white and blue' #Brexit, she really means a purple and yellow Brexit. 
Theresa May on Brexit: "We want a red, white & blue Brexit".Absurd. We're bored of this BS #WhatsThePlan, Theresa? 
Current Brexit strategy:  
Another day, Another #Brexit legal hearing to try and break the will of the British people and water down a democratic mandate. 
What kind of Brexit do YOU want? 
I am hoping for a hard and soft boiled Brexit. One of each it means what it means. 
This was my favourite red white and blue brexit  
POLITICS: Lead negotiators for Theresa May's latest version of Brexit unveiled.  
"Red, White & Blue Brexit"? Really?More British nationalist imagery?I'm Welsh!I'm not even represeted on that flag...So... fuck you May! 
EU nationals paying £14.7bn a year in income tax & national insurance were denied a vote in #EURefTaxation without representation!#Brexit 
Let's be honest, Theresa - you want a red and white Brexit.  The blue is supposed to just lump it.  #indyref2 
PM hints at "Norway style deal" in Brexit negotiations #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
A red, white and blue #Brexit - cheers Theresa. #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
Stop saying colours. We are trying to understand Brexit. Not accessorize it. 
There's your Tory Westminster Scottish law officer saying Scotland shouldn't have a say on Brexit. Know your place, Scotland. #SupremeCourt 
Theresa May vows to secure 'red, white and blue Brexit' #premium  
Here's that clip of ridiculousness. We've gone from "Brexit means Brexit" to: "This will be a red, white and blue Brexit"  
"WE NEED A RED WHITE AND BLUE BREXIT""Mrs May that makes no sense""BREXIT IS BREXIT""Mrs May you're just saying words now""BREXTICLES" 
I photographed this man outside the 2015 Tory conference. It now seems he embodies the entire Brexit strategy. #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
In months into her job Theresa May has gone from 'Brexit means Brexit" to wanting "A red, white and blue Brexit". She's on LSD or just crap 
#Brexit means Brexit?We've had #Smexit, Hard, Soft, Black, White, Grey - Now Red, White & Blue Brexit#ToryBrexit = 
When Theresa May says she wants a 'Red White & Blue' Brexit, did she mean a French Brexit? A Norwegian one? Dutch? Czech?  
"Red, white and blue Brexit": instead of setting out her stall for negotiations, Theresa May's concealing it under a Union Jack tea towel. 
We're gonna have the best Brexit. HUGE Brexit. We're gonna have so much Brexit folks, I'm telling you, we're gonna make Brexit great again.  
The polls did NOT get BREXIT wrong: Only 41% had REMAIN leads. 59% didn’t  
Not sure why people say the Tories don't have a Brexit plan. They do have plan! Its not a very good plan but its still a plan!  
In a clear pitch to Kieślowski fans Theresa May says she wants a red, white and blue #Brexit. Very long, pretentious and directed by a Pole? 
Good to hear Theresa May wants a 'red, white and blue brexit' - for a minute I was worried we were getting bogged down in empty rhetoric... 
Leaked email says @Virgin boss is helping to fund Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
NEWS! You must unconditionally support the Brexit plan we’re not going to tell you about, insists Government  
-What does Brexit mean? -Brexit -Oh. What colour is it? -Red, white, blue. -Cool. What's...it's favourite food? -Jam. -This is fun. 
Lord Keen, the UK government's adviser on Scots law, basically reiterating today that Holyrood has no Brexit veto.  
I wish I knew what Brexit was for. I might then get why we destroy all - the Union, economy, trust in Govt, social cohesion - to achieve it. 
Latest: Nigel Farage is shortlisted for Person of the Year. That year being 1938. 
Frankly, we'd have been happy with October this year!So what are we waiting for? Let's get on with it! #Brexit  
Anna Soubury is backing Labour's amendment to try and thwart Brexit. Let's just remember how her constituents voted...  
When people talk about getting the best brexit deal it sounds like when people say "she had a good death" 
Dance like nobody's watchingLove like you've never been hurtBrexit like you don't have a clue and can't even pretend for the cameras 
Red, white and blue #Brexit  
What's the Plan? Petition urges ministers to reveal Brexit strategy  
Denying she hadn't a clueHow Britain can leave the EUMay said it's all right,It's not black and white,For Brexit is red, white and blue. 
Fingers crossed for a 'Live; Laugh; Love Brexit'  
There was me thinking "Brexit means Brexit" was the silliest and least meaningful thing they could say about it.  
Brexit is a harsh and truthful mirror in which Britain's lingering imperial pretensions will finally be shattered  
.@TimFarron: Theresa May's call for a "Red, White and Blue Brexit" is jingoistic claptrap  
"Gonna build a Brexit, such a beautiful Brexit - and what's more, they're gonna pay for it"  
This am:Barnier: lays out calm, tight timetable for BrexitMerkel: no UK cherry pickingMay: says she “wants red, white & blue” #Brexit 
Oh so THAT's what Brexit means...   
Join us our call for a #Brexit plan before #Article50 is triggered to prevent a leap into the dark #WhatsThePlan  
We are now firmly in The Thick of It territory with the cringe inducing fact-free descriptions of Brexit #redwhiteandbluebrexit 
Mrs May with your  red  white and  blue Brexit you are not really helping us understand WTF you actually want! 
Why when I read Theresa May wants a "Red, White and Blue Brexit" do I immediately think "bleeding, terrified and frozen to death"? 
Who would have thought that 'Brexit means Brexit' would actually be the high water mark of May's rhetorical accomplishments. 
UK's stance incompatible with smooth Brexit: Eurogroup head  
WATCH: "Red, white and blue Brexit".New soundbite. Same old sh*t. Time to deliver and confirm we're leaving the Single Market. pic.twitter.com/8rkCQLIdP3 
Nearly Christmas. Shouldn't we have a silver, sparkley, twinkling brexit that smells slightly of cloves and cinnamon? #RedWhiteAndBlueBrexit 
A North Korean Brexit? A Samoan Brexit? A Cuban Brexit? #RedWhiteandBlueBrexit 
Last year we envisaged President Trump and Brexit.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
If Steve Bannon hadn't had the foresight to start Breitbart UK, it's hard to see how Brexit would have happened. 
Shame he didn't ensure the legislation was water tight to back it up. Gave the Brexit saboteurs their chance to thwart our leaving.Shameful  
It's going to be a tiny flags on sandwiches BrexitA fish & chips BrexitA Cream Tea BrexitA Del Boy Falling Through The Bar Brexit 
Theresa May's red, white and blue rubbish is still a more substantive Brexit position than Labour's Brexit position. 
Angela Merkel cheered as she declares Britain can't 'cherry pick' over Brexit  
Theresa May has found her new "Brexit means Brexit" - she's now calling it a "red, white and blue Brexit"  
So...A French Brexit? Or maybe a US Brexit? An Australian one, perhaps? A Chilean one? A Norwegian Brexit?  
No, the Roman empire was not destroyed by immigration: why history is a useful discipline  #Brexit @ExeterCIGH 
Aldona turned my hard Brexit into a soft Brexit. 
Our PM says: "We should be looking for a red white & blue Brexit. That's the right deal for the UK". Has public debate really sunk this low? 
May saying it's going to be a "red, white and blue Brexit" in late contender for 2016's most meaningless political statement (a bumper year) 
Access to EU #SingleMarket requires free movement of people, Minister @harlemdesir reiterates ahead of #Brexit talks  
Eurostar gave the bluntest response when asked what the benefits of Brexit are  
Theresa May is wrong. We don't want a "red, white and blue" Brexit. We want a black Brexit. Black like the dark night that awaits us all. 
I call for a green and yellow striped Brexit with red polka dots and a blue furry hat on top.  
Maybe it'll be a pinky-purple Brexit, with yellow spots. A Mr Blobby Brexit. Or a 70s-style lava lamp Brexit. 
I think that can be arranged. RT @guardiannews: Theresa May calls for 'red, white and blue Brexit'  
Leave voter on #BBCQT: 'Throughout the whole referendum...we were told that leaving the EU means leaving the single market.' #Brexit  
Before you ask, I don't know what a 'Red White and Blue' Brexit means either. Whether it's closer to Grey, or Black Brexit, No10 won't say 
Brussels talks, 2017'We want deep fried Brexit''Que?''Self-raising Brexit''That's not...''Brexit on toast' 
The UK #riggedmedia is brimming with anti #Brexit garbage. #TheresaMay carries culpability by not being DECISIVE on the issue. Out means out 
Brexit is bad for our NHS  see our referenced factsheet here --> and please RT, because everyone should know this 
PM turns her back on EU allies, courts countries with human rights abuses & calls for "red, white and blue" Brexit. Tories not fit for govt. 
.@theresa_may: "It's about a red, white and blue Brexit that is the right Brexit, the right deal for Britain"  
Thank you for the clarification, PM. To recap, our Brexit facts so far:-It means Brexit-It will be successful-It's red, white & blue 
The EU's Brexit negotiator has just called for an  'orderly withdrawal' for the UK from the bloc  
Brexit: EU negotiator says 'time's short' for reaching deal. I'd make it much shorter and call his bluff.   
.@BorisJohnson: 'I would like to ask Keir Starmer why he is seeking to frustrate the will of the people?' #Brexit  
This thread by @Greg_Callus should be read by anyone questioning the performance of James Eadie Q.C. in the #Brexit #SupremeCourt case: 
Supreme Court is working on assumption that Article 50 is "irrevocable," its president says  
Failing on EducationFailing on the NHSFailing on Social CareThere is a reason why SNP want to focus on Indy & Brexit. Distraction. 
pro-#EU campaigners brand 17.4 million #Brexit voters FASCISTS....Yet not a single relevant FACT pro EU was used. 
Those in #Richmond may have to work a little harder but #Brexit brings a sea of opportunity for Britain’s fishermen! 
Not exactly what we asked for but a good start !#EU migrants will be FORCED to carry ID cards in post-#Brexit UK. 
Discussing the #article50 court case with @juliaHB1 and @talkRADIO listeners. The people have already spoken on #Brexit  
Most shocking thing about this Brexit judicial review challenge is that a meal deal at the Supreme Court is £7 
Lord Mance asks about EU directives, which will survive Brexit, and regulations, which won’t unless implemented by parliament. 
Brexit can be "smooth" but British government's attitude must change, Dutch minister says  
Angela Merkel just slapped down Tory Brexit plans to a cheering audience  
Another way of looking at some of the Court's q's this morning is: What will Brexit actually mean, at least for our system of laws & rights? 
Theresa May has said that having to set out negotiating position in advance would hamper Brexit. Any Tory Mps voting with Lab know this. 
Dedicated to those "Italy vote=Brexit".In Italy huge turnout, in Brexit no.In Italy it was young who voted No and brought down PM,not old 
EU's Brexit negotiator suggests UK has only 18 months to make deal  
"Brexit means Brexit" = Primitive Thinking is Fashionable. Truth has been beheaded. The stench is overpowering. This is more than folly x N 
Prime Minister Theresa May's spokesman says Government is clear it does not want to extend Brexit negotiations beyond the two-year timetable 
 Tory MPs planning to join forces with Lab tomorrow to hijack Brexit. What a disgrace. 
If Humanity is a rough neighbourhood then "Brexit" is a slum. A torrent of hatred and ignorance is gushing through its makeshift sewers. x N 
The name of one of the people dealing with the Brexit negotiations at the Supreme Court is Lord Pannick *stifles childish giggle* 
Fortunately, Brexit vote showed I wasn't so influential. Should have stuck to this  & this . 
What are the 4 principles that will guide the negotiation with the UK  ?   @MichelBarnier, Chief negotiator #Brexit  
October 2018. Deadline for independence in Europe or life in Tory Brexit Britain? Make our minds up time?  
Any MPs who vote against the people or push for a 2nd referendum will have @ukip breathing down their neck. We will never give up on #Brexit  
The Supreme Court Brexit case only happened because of crowdfunding - and you won't have heard of those who did it  
Merkel echoes Barnier, telling CDU congress: "We will not allow any cherry picking" on Brexit 
UK poised to be crowned fastest growing G7 nation after services sector defies Brexit warnings  
Anti-Brexit MPs are trying to gum-up the works in the Commons in order to delay Brexit, and, they hope, eventually stop us leaving us at all 
People still talking about hoax Brexit? 
Key red line for Michel Barnier is that there will be no Brexit transitional deal without knowing where the UK is going. 
Underlying message Barnier wanted to send is that EU is prepared for Brexit, while UK gov is in a mess. 
"Time will be short. The period for actual negotiations will be shorter than 2 years." @MichelBarnier #Brexit  
Very quietly, Liam Fox admits the Brexit lie  
British Supreme Court judges grill government lawyer on Brexit plans.  
UK will have to reach #Brexit deal with EU by October 2018 - EU chief negotiator Michel Barnier 
The gerrymandering of the electoral franchise & the lack of a threshold wouldn't matter if #EURef were correctly treated as advisory#Brexit 
No-one should be surprised that Barnier is talking tough - he's the EU's chief negotiatior and these are the opening salvos #brexit 
#Merkel held a presser simultaneously with @MichelBarnier and used the same popular #EU phrase about #Brexit deal for UK: no cherry picking 
BREAKING: European Union's chief negotiator for Brexit says UK could only have eighteen months, till October of 2018, to negotiate exit 
"There will less than 18 months" to negotiate #Brexit with EU, says @MichelBarnier 
European Commission's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says he hopes agreement on UK leaving the EU could be reached in October 2018 
In which @MichelBarnier explains that Brexit means Brexit.  
A vote for #UKIP in #Sleaford is a vote for corruption and elitism, lying #VictoriaAyling can't be trusted! #Brexit  
Tory MPs accused of Brexit Hijack by UKIP's Brexit Spokesman @GerardBattenMEP  
EU failures: 1 Monetary union 2 Foreign policy (MENA, Ukraine) 3 Migration policy 4 Radical Islam policy. EU deserved Brexit. 1/  
Pretty solid statement by #EU's #Brexit negotiator Barnier. UK cannot move goal posts according to Brexiteers' fallacies. 
Barnier 4 points on #brexit #Article50 1. EU27 united2. UK gets less rights as 3rd country3. NO pre-negs4. 4 Freedoms indivisible 
EU Brexit negotiator Barnier. "Single market & its four freedoms are indivisible cherry picking is not an option". Deal required by Oct 2018 
Remainers are entitled to every bit as much of a say over Brexit terms as Leavers were over terms of the Lisbon Treaty. @JuliaHB1 @talkRADIO 
BREAK: Brexit agreement will reached by October 2018 says EU negotiator @MichelBarnier at press conference. 
Deal with UK on Brexit shd be reached by October 2018 - Michel Barnier 
Brexit will be "legally complex..politically sensitive" says EU chief negotiator Michel Barnier 
Day 2 of the Great Brexit Bore Off kicks off over at the Supreme Court - Ruling next year 
Now live: press conference with @MichelBarnier, #Brexit chief negotiator   
OK, cool, just tell me what your Brexit plan actually is and I'll let you know whether I'm anti-Britain or not.  
Expect some more ludicrous hyperbole on Brexit from @theSNP today to deflect attention away from shameful education stats. 
Yet more unravelling of the great #Brexit deception  
#Brexit Supreme Court case: Follow our coverage online:  
EU is preparing to issue Theresa May with a stark Brexit ultimatum, sources say  
Italy’s Boot Was Made for Walkin’ … Away from the EU  #Italy #Brexit  
UK activists rally outside Parliament urging speedup of Brexit  #Brexit  
Before the odious Blair tries to stop Brexit, I'd like him to focus on explaining what happened to poor Dr David Kelly  
The Irish & nationals of the 51 Commonwealth countries were given a voteNationals of 24 EU states were excluded#EURef #Remain #Brexit 
How does the Article 50 process work? A @commonslibrary research briefing  #Brexit  
"Economy to Defy Brexit Fears" #DespiteBrexit  
Millions of EU citizens living in Britain will have to carry around ID cards after Brexit  
“This is a crisis that strikes at the absolute core of the European Union in a way even ‘Brexit’ does not” -analyst  
Brexit: article 50 supreme court hearing day two - live updates  
The only problem with Barnier is that he takes Brexit seriously.  
"You can't change the law by leaflet"Audience member Smita challenges Monmouth MP David Davies about #Brexit  
‘Odious extremists!’ Fury as pro-EU campaigners brand 17.4 million Brexit voters FASCISTS  
Dan Jarvis MP: I couldn't "look [my constituents] in the eye" if I didn't respect their #Brexit vote   
NEWS! Nigel Farage wins Turner Prize for his controversial work ‘Brexit Britain’  
Up to 40 Tory MPs are reportedly planning to back a Labour motion demanding details of Theresa May's Brexit plan.  
Email your MP right now to tell them you voted for #Brexit and you want it delivered!  
'You ain't seen nothing yet' Farage delivers warning over attempts to derail Brexit  
Very quietly, Liam Fox admits the Brexit lie  
BREAKING: Answering "boring" claims, Supreme Court announces replacement Justices for Brexit hearing  
What divisive Govt nonsense: Downing Street suggests anyone who doesn't back their Brexit is not 'backing the UK'  
Don't forget when it comes to Brexit votes, DUP strongly backs Tories. So altho technical working majority is 13, it is in fact much larger. 
"I admit that I was wrong" about #Brexit, says @nfergus.  Now it is a divorce and we're negotiating how much #UK will have to pay #MIGlobal 
My new play: ASTRONAUTS OF HARTLEPOOL. Northern Brexit Sci-fi. @VAULTFestival, 8-12 Feb. Boom.  
I have tried to work out what the hell Labour's Brexit policy is so you don't have to  
Thank-you Nigel! Bring on 2017 invoke #Article50 now! #Brexit  
I don't believe that any #Brexit deal will be as good as remaining in EU, if government is confident it will be why oppose a 2nd referendum? 
At least 40 Tories to take a stand against Brexit madness. Good! #brexitshambles 
Here’s how a group of “ordinary citizens” turned the government’s Brexit plan on its head 
Revolting MPsIf you don't like the Brexit plan are you going to vote against it AND against the will of the majority of your constituents?  
Did Europe’s backlash against #Brexit help defeat #Hofer? Quite possibly. My thoughts on the #EUfightback 
Brexit. Trump. And now WSB R2. The lunatics have taken over the asylum. 
Realism in the Irish Times: Sturgeon's confused dabbling indicates no clear #SNP plan for Brexit  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
The rest of the EU isn't bluffing. It's hard Brexit or no Brexit: @JananGanesh, right again  
Senior British minister seeks to calm China concerns on Brexit  
.@theresa_may is visiting #Bahrain to try to strengthen trade ties with the region before #Brexit  
Call for abstracts for edited collection on anti-racism post-2016 (Trump/Brexit) edited by @azeezatj @beswk & I 
Thanks for the kind words about my punditry on the Brexit appeal yesterday. More of the same today on @SkyNews and here on Twitter. 
The campaign to leave the EU has accused Boris Johnson of not being fully committed to Brexit  
Watching Philip #Hammond on tv this morning trying to make the best of the #Brexit rubbish, I think: oh come on, stop this, just stop Brexit 
Let's see if @BBCNews and @SkyNews can report this without using the words 'despite Brexit' 
Nigel Farage nominated for Time Magazine’s Person of the Year award WELL DESERVED 
Everything about this terrible Brexit is toxic - lies, secrecy, racism, nationalism, debt, tribalism, division, misinformation, deception  
EU have just done Canadian trade dealDid the REMOANER MPs debate and vote on that before it happened?NOREOANERS just want to stop #Brexit 
Grey Brexit: 'Paying for access to favourable trading conditions and allowing free movement of people'. But this time no decision-making...  
Me on the war of attrition on #Brexit #SupremeCourt  
Ukip's Paul Nuttall issues direct 'electoral' threat to ANY MP who attempts to stop Brexit. Like Anna Soubry!  
It's a v sad day when asking Govt to publish Brexit plan is defying "will of people" ....  
May in Manama to cut deals with dictators. "The Shabby Face of Brexit." 
Theresa May agrees to implement Sharia law in exchange for a post #Brexit trade deal  
Whatever the subject, Labour’s shadow Brexit secretary has a knack for constructing an impenetrable wall of argument  
#Brexit, #EURO2016, #PokemonGO.. 2016 was huge on Twitter. #ThisHappened relives the biggest moments of the year: 
There's no mandate for a Brexit that doesn't work says @RCorbettMEP 
Michael Gove's on a massive post-Brexit comedown.  
What kind of government wastes public money going to the Supreme Court to prevent our Parliamentary representatives debating #Brexit? 
EU migrants will be FORCED to carry ID cards in post-Brexit Britain, Amber Rudd confirms  
Just been gathering my thoughts for this event. Have rarely felt so strongly about any 'academic' theme - v close to home....#Brexit  
"Ambitious" brexit: another meaningless platitude from #TheresaMay : 
#sleafordandnorthhykeham DO YOU WANT A FULL TIME MP?DO YOU WANT FULL BREXIT?Vote on Thursday for Victoria Ayling, no one else comes close 
Britain's financial sector paid record 71.4 billion pounds in taxes last year before Brexit, and took out £1.5tn in Bailouts #jailbankers 
Last year we envisaged Brexit and President Trump.Now here's a pessimist's guide to 2017:  
The PM faces a Tory revolt as 40 MPs back a Labour motion to disclose her Brexit plan. Do you believe the government has a plan for Brexit?  
On the second day of Brexit, my true love gave to me:Two mince pies. (Actually one, but I'm going to have it and eat it.)  
.@theresa_may is facing a #Tory rebellion on #Brexit as Labour demands to know the plan for leaving the #EU 
OK rebels, you asked for the Brexit plan. Well here it is.#r4today 
We Will be far better OF out of the EU And Single market All those MPs Need to Listen to the people or Resign 
.@theresa_may is in #Bahrain to "turbo-charge" the UK’s trade relationship with the Gulf region as #Brexit looms  
Austria just held a vote on the EU – Italy did no such thing | Guy Verhofstadt  #Brexit 
This leading Brexit campaigner mansplained the fall of the Roman Empire to classicist Mary Beard  
Has Norman Smith ever considered that reason May is reluctant to reveal her Brexit negotiating hand is cos there's nowt to reveal? #r4today 
Nigel Farage: By-election is our chance to say 'get on with Brexit'  
Brexit in a nutshell: leading brexiteer thinks what he claims to have once read in a schoolbook qualifies him to argue down a World expert.  
The best of Enid Blyton's Famous Five, including Five go on a strategy away day and Brexit Island. Golly!  
Theresa May has finally revealed her #Brexit strategy: She would look to negotiate "the best possible terms", brilliant! 
If you're not backing Brexit plan you are not backing Britain say ToriesIf you're not wrecking Britain your not tories says me.#Fucktories 
Supreme Court #brexit Wishing luck today as Lord Pannick commences the fight back to sanity! @campbellclaret #stopthismadness 
"then Jesus said to the multitude that anyone, ANYONE who mentioned Brexit over Christmas should be stoned to death and everyone rejoiced.." 
Fully expect extremist Brexit fanatics to go off on a HISSY FIT as @MichelBarnier provokes them in his 1st statement here in Brussels today 
EU's chief divorce negotiator to make first Brexit statement  
The Book of Brexit?  
We must protect the independence of the judiciary RT Royal prerogative takes centre stage as #SupremeCourt #Brexit… 
Fascinating read especially in light of Brexit and Trump //Google, democracy and the truth about internet search  
EU migrants will be FORCED to carry ID cards in post-Brexit Britain, Amber Rudd confirms  
So mkt rallied on #Brexit #Trump and now #Renzi against all logic.Clearly storing up all the bad shit for one big dump when everyone's long. 
Ewww weee... Paul Joseph Watson was on fire tonite!! @PrisonPlanet #BRexit  
What next if the government loses its Brexit appeal? A good read this by @DArcyTiP @BBCPolitics @BBCNews: 
R.E.S.P.E.C.T. "It took the markets 3 days to digest Brexit, 3 hours for Trump, 3 minutes for Italy" … 
Britain 'to end the year as FASTEST GROWING economy in the G7' & DEFY Brexit doom-mongers  
NO SOFT BREXIT: UK 'will scoop extra £20billion a year' when it quits EU single market  
The Brexit treatment: Now Donald Trump voters are realizing they made a huge mistake  via @Salon 
The same people who voted for Trump and Brexit allowed Cats to run for 18 goddamn years 
Four European nations could vote in 2017, facing the populist wave that began with Brexit  
What was Renzi thinking anyway? "My referendum is in trouble... get me the guy who blew the Brexit Remain campaign!" 
Brexit legal challenge: Theresa May appeals Article 50 ruling in Supreme Court  
#Brexit is not racism. It is about sovereignty, national security, and controlling spending. @LeaveEUOfficial @ConHome @guardian 
Fears and questions over Brexit’s impact on talent  #TCDisrupt 
How can 40+ MPs demand details of the Brexit deal before Article 50 is invoked, when we can't start the negotiations till afterwards? 
Nigel Farage shortlisted for Time magazine Person of the Year award 'for being the face of Brexit victory'  
starting to get nervous about this brexit vote 
I just published “BREXIT & TRUMP: HOW THE MEDIA AND ESTABLISHMENT USE ‘THE WHITE WORKING CLASS’”  
“This is a crisis that strikes at the absolute core of the European Union in a way even ‘Brexit’ does not” -analyst  
Who cares if there's no plan for Brexit and the UK is the most unequal country in Europe, here's a pic of Ruth with a fish. #HaveAMincePie 
Four European nations could vote in 2017, facing the populist wave that began with Brexit  
Brexit: Theresa May 'ambitious' over deal with EU  
Tory Brexit rebellion could force PM to reveal EU exit plans  
European VCs say Brexit is already impacting where new founders base their startups  #TCDisrupt 
#NigelFarage: If you thought 2016 was a year of revolution, just wait for 2020 and angry #Britain's #Brexit backlash  
Brexit >> Trump >> Collins? 
If they ask you why you are a European. Show them this picture and say:"This is what happens when fascism triumphs."#Brexit #indyref2 
Not exactly what we asked for but a good start !#EU migrants will be FORCED to carry ID cards in post-#Brexit UK. 
Maybe Brexit was just Gove's attempt to fill the void. News, panic, bullshit, fear; anything to avoid the tragic emptiness of the now. 
With Italy's vote & #Brexit, is the #EU imploding? #NigelFarage debating #Italy's referendum results with #KenClarke 
Ignorant Remoaners outside the #SupremeCourt today, one of whom believes that if you defend #Brexit, you're a racist  
Europe, 2016:- Brexit- Cameron resigns- Italy referendum fails- Renzi resigns- Hollande approval: 4%- Merkel approval hit 5 year low 
How Friedrich Nietzsche helps to explain Brexit. Enjoyed this interview with @HDrochon 
WowRuth Davidson blew them away tonight with her #Brexit speech in London.  
No, Italy's referendum is not the same as Brexit or Trump  
Austria, France, Italy, Brexit, Trump - media has it ALL wrong. We're watching the death of neoliberalism/ThirdWayism/"Bush-NWO-globalism" 
Challenges facing us in not too distant future require international cooperation.I'm so appalled by McDonnell's short term pro Brexit stance 
It's abundantly clear this govt are totally out of their depth. The Tories, not Brexit itself, is what'll damage Britain #DestructiveBrexit 
Also, the case that a "no" vote was correct seems quite strong, even on terms that would oppose Brexit/Trump.   
Papers @SkyNews me @Kevin_Maguire on EU lovers  saying Italy vote  is nothing to do with them but say Richmond by-election was abt Brexit 
WTF happened to Brexit? I explain....FULL VIDEO:  
I won't assist, defend or otherwise campaign for any Tory MP who votes against Brexit. In fact, I'll work against.I'd guess I'm not alone. 
@SleafordLibDems Make sure you're aware of Brexit impact on the NHS. Here's the @HealthierIn referenced factsheet: 
THE i FRONT PAGE:"Tories mount Brexit revolt" #skypapers 
Would be interesting if she was more respectful to her constituents & the country she represents who voted overwhelmingly to Remain #brexit  
To those "40 or so Conservative MPs" who intend to vote against the govt over #Brexit. Say goodbye to Parliament in 2020, you are toast. 
tRuthLess Davidson got a brass neck talking about pulling together re Brexit She has been the most divisive person in Scotland this year!  
Check out this #Brexit supporter view on immigration..   
Tonight: "I still hope we will ultimately change our mind about that," @tonyblairoffice tells @JudyWoodruff of the UK's #Brexit decision  
Uncomfortably accurate pre-#brexit economic forecast @remoansoftheday PM warns against 'self-destruct' vote to leave 
When I heard about Dick Smith and One Nation, Hutchy and Footy Show, Trump winning, Brexit, Shandling dying... in fact, this is me all year.  
Awful barlucks from Downing Street: if you are not backing gov's Brexit plan,you are not backing Britain, apparently  
Irish #brexit reporting: UK will have to renegotiate 56 trade deals after deciding to isolate itself  
Very few brain cells on display here. Very encouraging to see this is what Remoaners have been reduced to. #Brexit  
Vote #RossPepper! Swing to LibDems - Witney 19.3%; Richmond Park 21.75%; make Sleaford and North Hykeham even better and shut down #Brexit!  
Papers @SkyNews 1030/1130 me @Kevin_Maguire on the side of the unelected judges in the battle over Brexit. I'm with the people 
This is really very good; Supreme Court Brexit hearing Day 1: The government case  via @FT 
3yrs today since Nelson Mandela died, his big heart & generosity to real oppressors is an example in Brexit Trump world of mean mindedness 
NB Entire 9 mins of @BBCNews coverage of Brexit Supreme Court case fails to mention Scottish & Welsh Govts' perspective in opposing UK Govt. 
Brexit campaigner Arron Banks argues with classicist Mary Beard about fall of Rome and it's quite something  
The only homogeneity Britain will see after #brexit will be at the universality of  poverty for the 99%. #ukip, 
Amber Rudd has told MPs EU citizens living in the UK will need to have some form of ID documents following Brexit  
Tuesday's i: "Tories mount Brexit revolt"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @hendopolis) 
Supreme court Brexit case: whose prerogative is it anyway?  
Google news just crisply portrayed the absolute Labour shambles on Brexit & article 50  
Recipe for successful and rapid #Brexit. 1. Repeal fixed term Parliament act. 2. Hold General Election. 3. Destroy Labour. 4. Leave! 
Ruth Davidson calls for Britain's Brexit divide to be bridged  
Just finished @IanDunt's Brexit: What the Hell Happens Now? Bleaker than an Eastenders xmas special but brilliant guide to the mess we're in 
Britain was hardly a benevolent state before #brexit but after Brexit-it is going to be truly authoritarian. 
tells politicians to grow up. #indyref2 #brexit  
Theresa May could be forced to reveal her Brexit plans by parliament  
British Supreme Court starts hearing on whether UK gov't can begin #Brexit process without parliament approval  
Teresa Mays stance on Brexit has all the hallmarks of religious fundamentalism, manic belief over facts and experts. She will not change. 
Interesting @RuthDavidsonMSP calling for politicians on both sides to 'grow up' and have more respectful Brexit debate 
Home Sec says that following Brexit EU nationals will require "papers" !!#brexit  
Numpties!! U know full well its still going to the EU until we #BrexitStop trying to deceive people from the truth  
"With Italy's vote and Brexit, is the EU imploding?"WATCH: Nigel Farage debating Italy's referendum results with Ken Clarke.  
Its a little known fact that if the #SupremeCourt ties 5-5 on Brexit it goes to a penalty shootout against a panel of Daily Mail editors 
IF THE ESTABLISHMENT CAN'T DELIVER BREXIT  
.@Anna_Soubry: Government should voluntarily agree to putting #Brexit plan before Parliament  
Dominic Grieve: @RuthDavidsonMSP is right; the Government must pursue an inclusive and moderate #Brexit  
Ken Clarke attacks Farage for infamous poster in heated exchange about Brexit  
AMAZING! Italy just voted that The Daily Mail is the most truthful paper in the world, Brussels is evil AND Brexit is smart! #ExplainTheVote 
Spotted on the Strand earlier today - heading to #SupremeCourt & supporting #GinaMiller's campaign for #Brexit democracy #NoLiesOnThisBus 
IF YOU thought you could trust what they sayYou Will have to think again 
Brexit is blamed for the disintegration of Europe. But will Brexit even happen?  
European voters "now realise the destructiveness of the currency union to which they have been shackled" #brexit  
The leader of the Scottish Conservatives calls on the UK to avoid a "divisive Brexit" and to heal the divisions...  
Farage's 100000 anti #Brexit march #SupremeCourt  Eccentric IrishmanMan not holding placard upMan holding placard wrong way round 
-Brexit Britain - Paying More for Less! 
My new post: Don’t Read Too Much Into It:  What Brexit and U.S. Election Surprises Can Teach Us about PISA  
Enjoyed watching some of the Brexit appeal...as for the demo outside...  
Well. Turns out, after a quick 'Brexit &Bible' search on google, there's a decent-sized subculture of Brexiters who say The Lord ordained it  
Amber Rudd says EU nationals in post #Brexit UK will need “some form of documentation” #ToryBrexit #Brexit #Fascism 
With Brexit in the balance, U.K. Supreme Court begins hearing arguments  
Two faced Carney. CRISIS POINT: Bank of England says liberal elite is FINISHED if inequality isn't tackled. #Brexit  
I'll be on @VictoriaLIVE at 9:45 tomorrow morning discussing the big constitutional issues at play in Miller #brexit case (@unibirmingham) 
EU immigration has Britain at BREAKING POINT and Brexit must put a stop to it, blasts Lord  
Downing Street says: if you don't back my brexit plan, my lunatic fringe will throw me out - so please, please, please do back my plan 
Yep - that's it in a nutshell#Brexit  
The Article 50 challenge is about sabotaging Brexit. Nothing more, nothing less.  
Brexit is about 'taking back control' +'sovereignty', so why have anunelected Queen giving power to an unelected PM to decide our fate?! 
ThisIs WhyIFightBrexit  
EU citizens living in Britain will need ID after Brexit, Rudd saysPerfectly sensible. Nothing to (Project) fear.  
Listening to experts argue about Brexit you would agree there is always more than one answer ..  
RT if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
First Brexit, then Trump, then this: 2016 is mental.  
What Nigel Farage expected to happen vs what actually happened. #Brexit  
.@RuthDavidsonMSP  warns against 'divisive Brexit'  
Don't confuse Italy with Brexit or Trump  via @BV 
Full house at @KingsCollegeLon for the panel discussion with #Visegrad Group ambassadors on #V4 and post #Brexit Europe.  
Liam Fox accused of driving Britain to 'economically disastrous' hard Brexit  
@Keir_Starmer in Dunfermline  UK post Brexit with @Alex_RowleyMSP and Gordon Brown @FireStnCreative 
Here we go ... and clear as mud, as usual. "Amber Rudd says EU nationals in post-Brexit UK will need 'form of ID'"  
Something many #Brexit supporters have trouble understanding - Democracy includes the right to campaign against any vote, majority or govt. 
We The People are taking OUR lands back!Celebrate #Brexit #Trump #IoVotoNoNext: #Frexit #Nexit #PVV #AfD #FN 
The #Brexit appeal being heard at the Supreme Court explained: What's at stake??  
A very good essay by @paulmasonnews on the impermanence of all political structures.  #brexit, #DonaldTrump 
The Government's strategy on #Brexit is to 'have our cake & eat it'. Without any proper plans, how can MPs vote to trigger #Article50? 
Mr Brexit @Nigel_Farage speaks from Sleaford while anti-democratic Ken Clarke hides out in the Westminster bubble. 
If you missed it earlier, you can watch back today's proceedings in Article 50 #Brexit appeal via links at foot of  
After #Brexit #Italeave and Coming #NEXIT #FREXIT How Much More Can The EU Take?: 
The @DailyMailUK haven't always supported the tories they supported the Nazi's in the 1930s. #c4news #brexit  
I won't back Brexit at all, but I will back Britain, just not their arrogant, intolerant, backward version of Britain.  
Today's full Article 50 #Brexit appeal transcript now online:  
Why did so many more Austrians vote against the far right? Because they saw how disastrous Brexit and Trump were  
Dear @AmberRudd_MP I already have an ID card, but thank you for your concern! #brexit @cliodiaspora @Scientists4EU 
How will #Brexit case in Britain's Supreme Court work?  
Home Secretary Amber Rudd says there will be “some sort of documentation” for the three million EU citizens living in the UK post-Brexit.  
Exclusive: Bank of England Governor Mark Carney talks to @JMUJournalism about Brexit, being an Everton fan & more  
RT if you agree with Beefy that politicians should stop trying to block Brexit! #RespectTheResult 
I oppose Brexit because I'm a patriot & all the evidence is that Brexit will ruin Britain economically & politically. 
Tory MP's may back Labour call for disclosure of Brexit plan. National interest more important than party politics.  
Ruthless D warns against a "divisive Brexit" and of course there won't be one as long as everyone agrees with her. 
.@DavidJonesMP just met with @A_delpacifico to discuss the opportunities #Brexit presents to the rest of the world  
It's clear that Scottish Conservatives would back, & promote, a Brexit deal that was bad for Scotland as long as it was good for the UK. 
Tory MP who quit over Brexit row says Conservatives now ‘Ukip-lite’ under Theresa May  
Ukip's Paul Nuttall issues direct 'electoral' threat to ANY MP who attempts to stop Brexit  
Support for Trump & #Brexit is not based on economic concerns but on authoritarianism & dislike of immigration 
Tomorrow, 1st press conference with @MichelBarnier, chief negotiator for #Brexit - Live from 11.30CET here:  
Ruth Davidson speech in London tonight; warning against "divisive Brexit" & urging "path of openness and engagement"  
Brexit challenge is incredibly condescending to ordinary Brits, UKIP Deputy Leader @prwhittle tells @delaneyman 
Downing Street says if you are not backing its non-existent #Brexit plan, you are not supporting the emperor's new clothes.  
Amber Rudd says EU nationals in post-Brexit UK will need 'form of ID'  
Foreign Secretary @BorisJohnson: Control of borders, money, laws and being free to make trade deals will be foremost in #Brexit negotiations  
More Conservatives need to listen to Ruth Davidson & fight against a divisive, hard Brexit #LeaveWatch  
Ruth Davidson: Nigel Farage risks harming UK's Brexit deal by 'rubbing Europe's noses' in referendum result  
Charade continues. They have nothing to reveal & there is no 'deal' from EU except Hard Brexit or No Brexit  
My thoughts on Brexit? New video up now. Submit your demand w/ @weareundivided  #WeDemand #ad 
Comparison of how constituencies voted and where their MP's stood on #Brexit  
Whatever the result of the Supreme Court judegment, politicians should not block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
NEW VIDEO: The Brexit Betrayal -  #BrexitAppeal 
Alarming that when UK government doesn't have a clue over #Brexit the official Opposition doesn't have a policy. Thank God for the @LibDems 
Great to hear from @astonmartin today about the positive impact of Brexit on their business & commitment to producing cars in Warwickshire! 
Meanwhile outside the #SupremeCourt a pro Brexit leprechaun has been dancing an Irish jig and insisting Nigel Farage was sent by God  
Our President @TonyJuniper guest blogs for us "#Brexit and nature: where next?"  
-"People who backed Brexit were plainly influenced by simplistic claims which have all been proved to be fallacies" 
Put your questions to @BBCDomC about the #Brexit #SupremeCourt case now - live on @facebook  
This thread about today's Supreme Court sitting on brexit is very funny.  
The rest of the EU isn't bluffing. It's hard Brexit or no Brexit: @JananGanesh, right again  
Tory MPs may back Labour call for disclosure of Brexit plan  
#Leave to go where after #Brexit? Nobody yet knows. We need to have a say on where. Please share our guest article:  
Can anyone update me on what happened in Article 1 to 49 and is it available on Netflix? #SupremeCourt #brexit #Parliament 
Merkel Dream of a Globalist 'Utopia' Imperiled by Recent BREXIT-Like Votes. Hopefully She'll be Next Globalist to Fall by The Wayside #tcot 
'@NATO is the last thing they have': UK dreams up Russian threat after the #Brexit trauma  
Sir Nigel, if the UK doesn't follow through on #Brexit, the elites will face Trump and surely fail. We're with you! @CNN #MAGA #TrumpTrain 
As #brexit Britain retreats into isolationism, African Union launches common passport to facilitate free movement 
Politicians need to get on with Brexit!  
This wasn't brought up at Supreme Court today, but Brexit case could end up in EU court in Luxembourg  
Labour is pro- any Brexit, however bad for its own supporters and the country as a whole. Utterly incompetent as an opposition.  
Why I'm not buying the Italy (non) dip: no market-positive Narrative emerging from the NO vote wreckage, in contrast to Brexit & Trump. 
Carney points out that the pound has lost 16% of its value thanks to #brexit, meaning higher inflation #LeaveWatch  
So if we don't give our unconditional backing to a Brexit plan THAT HAS NOT YET BEEN REVEALED, we're not British?  
Despite Brexit ....  
U.K. Supreme Court hears Brexit case  
.@JohnODowdSF MLA - this weeks Brexit challenge in the supreme court has constitutional, political & legal implications for the British govt  
I was never backing Britain. Also...Brexit plan?   
The reason's for #Brexit , #Immigration , #War , #Currencycollapse , #HumanRightsAbuses and destructive foreign policy, all in one picture. 
What kind of government wastes public money going to the Supreme Court to prevent our Parliamentary representatives debating #Brexit? 
Chuka, there is no mandate for #Brexit. Do the arithmetic, and act in what is really the best interests of the UK: staying in the #EU. 
Farage: another irresponsible pillock who didn't bother to read or understand the leave option on the ballot paper.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
@theresa_may #Brexit "is the will of the British people".Actually, it's the will of only 26.7% of the British people.#SupremeCourt 
A state splash on science could bring fortune to Brexit Britain  
200 business leaders have signed a letter to be hand delivered to @theresa_may today, urging her to speed up #Brexit + get us out EU fast.  
200 company bosses tell Theresa May to 'get on with Brexit'  
.@theresa_may silk Eadie tells judges they mustn't thwart Brexit will of people - not sure that went down well with them #SupremeCourt 
Yes & remind them how many of us they're taking on if they procrastinate any more on #article50 #brexit  
How dare they!!! It's precisely because I care so passionately about my country & compatriots that I oppose brexit!  
Nigel Farage predicts a "major realignment" in British politics if "Brexit doesn't mean Brexit"  
No intelligible response from the Secretary of State for Exiting the European Union to my question on Brexit.  
"milk-snorting-out-nose laughing" or How @BarackObama fixed the US economy.... #DoddFrank @ACA #Syria #Brexit  
LISTEN: @MkBlyth talks to @Wharton on Trump's win, Brexit, & impending #Itexit 
At least 20 Tory MPs ready to apply pressure  on #May to reveal govt's #Brexit plan 
Norway will wait for Brexit clarity before agreeing a trade deal, foreign minister says  
Out campaigning in Sleaford asking people to send the Government a message and get on with Brexit.  
My story on how a dev saw their game find relevance in the age of Brexit, Trump, and rising authoritarianism. The twist? Made in Russia.  
If you want Brexit to mean Brexit then vote UKIP  
4 hours into the Supreme Court Brexit case:- Men have spoken for 3 hours, 59 minutes, 11 seconds- Women have spoken for 49 seconds 
Is the whole Article 50 Brexit case at #SupremeCourt based on a huge red herring?  
Government memo demanding end to Brexit leaks is leaked. For more information please reread.  #AccidentalScarfolk 
Good to meet financial services sector with @PHammondMP to discuss Brexit. Determined UK remains great place to invest and do business  
Telegraph would say that. Fact is, after millions spent on court cases, Brexit is an enormous, reckless & unnecessary risk w no benefits  
Do Brexit ministers even understand the constitution of the UK?  Jo Maugham doesn't think so.  
Theresa May faces a Tory rebellion over demands to see her Brexit plan  
Norway will wait for clarity on Brexit before making a deal on U.K. trade  
How dare the hypocrites that are the Lib Dems  pretend to be liberals when they're trying to block the will of the British  people #brexit 
England isn't British anymore. #Brexit is your last chance to take your country back, or it's gone, forever. @Nigel_Farage 
Home Sec. says 3 mn EU citzns will need documenting post-Brexit, but no Min has clue how many extra civil servants needed to process claims. 
Totally in keeping with UK Gov Brexit plans   
"Brexit was a big disappointment for us - one could even call it tragic": German writer and lawyer Bernhard Schlink, author of The Reader  
It's not the judgement of the #SupremeCourt that the Government should fear but rather that of 17.4m Brits who want TOTAL #BREXIT now. 
New video on #Brexit coming soon. 
If the government should lose this appeal then it should resign so we can elect MPs that will represent the people and not the EU #brexit 
UKIP Deputy Leader @prwhittle: voters not 'too stupid' the 'people knew what they were voting for' #Brexit  
The Establishment think #Brexit voters are stupid. We know what we voted for and only #UKIP are listening 
this is the #LibDems who believe in #democracy when it suits them#Article50 #Brexit #SupremeCourt #OpenBritain #BrexitBritain #No2EU 
Man the barricades! Or perhaps not, as Farage army of 100k Brexit protesters turns out to be smallest demo ever  
Meet the Supremes: These are the judges who'll rule on Article 50 and the Brexit process  
Here's the carefully worded Labour opposition day motion on Brexit. Is this why Anna Soubry backing it?  
Watch the full #Brexit legal challenge live from the Supreme Court on Facebook or YouTube:   
These Brexiteers clearly have never tried to get out of a gym membership.#SupremeCourt #Brexit 
I’m not backing your Brexit plan, @Number10gov - send me to The Tower if you want. I don’t care. 
3 hours into the Supreme Court Brexit case:- Men have spoken for 2 hours, 59 minutes, 14 seconds- Women have spoken for 46 seconds 
#TheresaMay was warned by her own side not to appeal. Just pass a new Bill. She didn't.Her Silk  is being eaten alive.#SupremeCourt#Brexit 
Enjoyed speaking to 2,500 sixth formers today about Trump, Brexit & more - it's wrong that young pple are being ignored in the Brexit debate  
Bang goes Economists for Brexit's unilateral free trade.  
"The markets took 3 days to shake off Brexit, 3 hours to shake off Trump, and 3 minutes to shake off Italy" 
From @DanielJHannan: Why Brexit should work out for everyone  
Construction activity reaches eight-month high as delayed projects resume after Brexit vote via @Telegraph  #Brexit 
The best way to understand what's happening in Supreme Court Brexit case is to forget the referendum ever happened  
Judges holing government's case that parliament not needed for Brexit,by saying entry to EU was joint effort between executive & parliament 
"People have a right to be angry about their vote for Brexit being undermined by wealthy and political people" @Tom_Slater_ #skydebate 
Conservative MP @Anna_Soubry may vote with Labour if government doesn't give greater transparency about Brexit #wato  
"Any criticism at all of the millionaires undermining Brexit is treated as mob violence" - @Tom_Slater_ on Brexit case #skydebate 
"These people didn't give a damn about parliamentary sovereignty when the EU was diluting it" @Tom_Slater_ on Brexit court case #skydebate 
This claim is more credible than what was written on the side of the red Brexit bus. #supremecourt 
Is #EU going to fall apart before #Brexit?Hope not.I want to take time and enjoy the downfall country by county!  
Sumption proving to be rather awkward in questioning for Government - some Brexit MPs feel he might have been most naturally sympathetic 
"This is a political case, very rich people are trying to thwart Brexit. It's undemocratic" - @Tom_Slater_ #skydebate 
WATCH: @syedkamall answers three crucial questions on Brexit and our negotiations with the EU  
Interesting: Labour have tabled Opposition Day motion calling for PM's plan for Brexit to be published by Govt before Article 50 invoked  
#SupremeCourtAn unelected PM asking for the powers of a dictator to push through suicidal #Brexit 
Get the feeling if you miss episode 1 of Supreme Court it’s pretty hard to catch up with the rest of the season. #Brexit #SupremeCourt 
#Brexit reversal: 3 days.#Elections2016 reversal: 3 hours.#italyreferendum reversal: 3 minutes.(H/T whoever posted this earlier today) 
Good by Peter Kellner on post-#Brexit vote UK. Most Brexit voters saw no cost whatsoever to their choice.  
Brexit discussions at #SupremeCourt. Measured, detailed, considered, intelligent, unemotional, factual. Quintessentially #British.#proud 
“After Brexit, it took three days for markets to shake it off, with Trump it took three hours, with Italy it took three minutes”  
"And in the beginning, God said 'Let there be Brexit'. First things first, I'll get round to the other stuff later."  
.... what Brexit plan? 
Downing Street says if you are not backing its Brexit plan, you are not backing Britain  
If you're a 'remainer' then there's a simple answer to the brexit conundrum.Time.  
me when I have to prove I should be allowed to stay in the UK post-Brexit  
Correct Bonnie :-)Was never intended to *stop * #BrexitIt's about the rights of Parliament to debate UK's future !  
Whatever happens in #SupremeCourt-it won't stop #Brexit.IF HM Gov loses- has  to go back and do it right.Because: #ParliamentIsSovereign 
Business leaders write to downing street urging the PM & judges to get on with Brexit to avoid economic uncertainty:  
Twitter is bursting with #Brexit supporting constitutional experts putting their home economics and woodwork qualifications to good use. 
Here is Labour's motion on #Brexit that will be debated on Wednesday. It calls on govt to publish its plans before triggering #Article50 
I do hope when #GinaMiller loses at the #SupremeCourt she has to pay ALL the costs....... #Brexit 
PM orders investigation into leak of memo about Brexit leaks crackdown  
Andrew Lilico: taly's political quagmire shows the EU must accept Brexit or crumble. The clock is ticking #premium 
Chairman of BNP Paribas expects big changes to London after Brexit  
Looks like Govt cd be in trouble over Wed EU vote - with up to 40 Cons poised to vote with Labour for a Brexit plan 
pretty amazing the govt thinks whatever form of brexit they deliver is what the UK people voted for low IQs maybe? 
.#Remainers have no rights. They don't speak for the 17,410,742 people who voted for #brexit.  
The £3 meal deal might be over and it’s all Brexit’s fault  
16m voted to #Remain, but a total of 48m did NOT vote to #Leave. That is the number that decides whether there is a mandate for #Brexit.  
FFS! Both sides get a grip! #SupremeCourt isn't #brexit #nobrexit it's about whether OUR law says Parliament has to ratify b4 Gov proceeds! 
Fears and questions over Brexit's impact on talent  by @riptari 
Michael Howard on #wato tripping out canard "majority of British people voted for Brexit". It was 26% of the British ppl, 37% electorate 
Eurostar's blunt reply when asked about the 'benefits' of Brexit.  This article has a link to their full response.   
Court Decision: Anger as someone leaks Nicola Sturgeon's statement re Brexit  
Still unclear whether the "don’t leak the don’t leak" memo has been sent after memo leaked  #SATIRE #Brexit 
With Eurosceptics on the rise, 'Quitaly' may only be a matter of time after Brexit - @asabenn #premium 
Listen to @ProfTomkins admitting that Scottish Tories are not interested in securing the best #Brexit deal for Scotland.   
Brexit has started the disintegration of the EU, Italy's Europe minister says  
Risks of looking for Brexit parallels everywhere: interesting nuanced read on Italy by Luigi Scazzieri @CER_London 
Scenes outside the Supreme Court: there's a chap dancing a Brexit jig  
Peter Cruddas: Tony Blair and Nick Clegg risk damaging British business by seeking to block Brexit  
No matter what the Supreme Court decides on Brexit,  Article 50 will not be stopped  
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
2006: Children of Men2016: Brexit 
If you thought 2016 was a year of revolution, just wait for 2020 and angry Britain's Brexit backlash  
Tomkins said "Brexit means taking back control over national finances" - but David Davis said *last week* they might pay for market access 
But Tomkins went further than even the UK government has. The Scottish Tories are now on the record as being for a hard Brexit. 
Read your history because when the #DailyMail targets #SupremeCourt judges it's not journalism it's Nazism. #brexit 
Supreme Court: Nicola Sturgeon desperately awaits court ruling on Brexit so, whatever the decision, she can say it justifies independence 
Gone for a lunchtime walk to the supreme court. This is the best protest bus of the day. #Brexit #DoItLikeNigel 
EU sells us £89bn worth of goods more than we sell them every year.EU should pay UK for access to UK market after #Brexit  
The #Brexit appeal being heard at the Supreme Court explained: What's at stake??  
The UK is a Top Three goods export market for Germany, Netherlands, Poland and Ireland. None of them will want post-Brexit trade tariffs. 
The Government's appeal of the High Court Brexit decision is under way at the Supreme Court.  
The referendum determined that we will leave the EU -which I accept- but there's no mandate at all for a Hard Brexit  
Brexit bullies sneering at Lord Neuberger's name, i.e. he must be German. His parents were refugees from the Nazis. Disgusting xenophobia 
Taking control over who comes through its borders is the mark of a sovereign state. Only #Brexit delivers that and we want it NOW! 
Which would be a powerful point if Number 10 knew what "the will of British people" was. But all it knows is that Brexit means Brexit.  
Meeting @USverdrup at @nupinytt this morning in Oslo. #Brexit  
#Brexit is a terrible mistake – a ruinous, lunatic mistake, says @acgrayling >> 
Italy Brexit poll updateMost (62%) saying Quitaly is the correct term21% prefer Pasta La Vista11% back ItalexitAnd 6% say Italeave 
Tomorrow, Tuesday 6 Dec 11.30CET - Press briefing w/@MichelBarnier, chief negotiator with the UK under article 50 of the Treaty. #Brexit  
For the 74%. Let's get & keep the true proportion of things right: this really matters. Only 26% of the UK population voted for #Brexit.  
Brexit means Sex Elf.  
Watch the #Brexit legal challenge live from the Supreme court in full here:  or  
Brexit ministers meet Norwegian government following admission UK could keep funding EU budget  
European VCs say Brexit is already impacting where new founders base their startups  by @cookie 
A once in a generation decision they said... #SupremeCourt #Brexit  
The UK's Digital Director on the Brexit decision #TCDisrupt 
Not a fan of hard Brexit, myself. I'm more into that deeper, funky Brexit. 
The Brexit Brain Drain Is Real (full panel) #TCDisrupt 
Brexit Liars and Bullies - and their "Trigger" happy offshore Gutter Press - should lower their voices and strengthen their arguments. x N 
Will the UK attract talent from Silicon Valley post Brexit? #TCDisrupt 
MPs who do not commit to voting for Article 50 unconditionally are guilty of delaying and frustrating Brexit  
European VCs on Life In the Time of Brexit (full panel) #TCDisrupt 
In the first hour of the Supreme Court appeal on Brexit:Men have spoken for 59 mins 25 secondsWomen have spoken for 35 seconds 
Message to Scottish Remainers: Move to Dublin. You cant block Brexit, it was a UK wide vote & Scotland is in the UK. LEAVE. Go be EU cucks. 
There's a "clear and compelling case" for overturning Article 50 ruling, Supreme Court hears  
Immigrants should integrate when moving into Brexit voting areas, which are of course an oasis of enlightenment, self awareness & tolerance. 
Brexit: UK will be ‘screwed into the floor’ in EU withdrawal talks, warns Ryanair boss | The Independent  
LISTEN @juliaHB1 baffled by Remain MP Barry Gardiner's claims during #Brexit Supreme Court discussion  
MPs with constituencies who voted leave should be not try to delay or frustrate Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Some confusion on my TL... Re. #SupremeCourt circus/#Brexit - I spoiled my ballot. The whole thing was a set up. 
I voted remain but the UK voted brexit so I wish they'd hurry it up and get us out before the whole thing crashes down..... 
Brexit Britain in one tweet:  
Follow our live page for updates on the Supreme Court #Brexit case   
UK supreme court hearing over #Brexit constitutional claim has been explained  
WRONG!The disintegration of the #EU is caused because it FAILED!Brexit, Frexit or EUexit are the RESULT not CAUSE! 
James Wise of Balderton Capital on the #Brexit challenge for startups and investors #TCDisrupt 
The second Battle of Britain has commenced in the Supreme Court today...#brexit 
Watching the BBC trying to understand #Brexit legal stuff  
Watching the supreme court on #Brexit, I'm reminded of a truism...Q: What do lawyers use for a contraceptive?A: Their personality. 
What we need in the UK is more judges, billionaires and celebrities to tell us how to think about the EU and Brexit #sarcasm #supremecourt 
Supreme Court judge who could overturn Brexit starts case with warning  
Another terrible interview for Remainers... #Brexit 
Those deranged snowflakes outside the Supreme Court with their "Stop Brexit, Fight Racism" are probably off duty BBC employees! #Deranged 
Various parties in Supreme Court Brexit hearing granted anonymity following 'threats of serious violence and unpleasant abuse'. 
Personally, I find this so very depressing when we were clearly told that our decision would be implemented. #Brexit #EURef #SupremeCourt 
The Battle of Britain starts as judges begin hearing Brexit legal showdown  
Scottish voice 'must be heard' on Brexit 
. @Nigel_Farage predicts ‘dramatic’ 2020 election as anger at 'soft Brexit' reaches ‘boiling point’  
#Brexit 'Supreme' battle beginsHow far can the political & legal systems of our country abuse our democratic voice. 
Why did so many more Austrians vote against the far right? Because they saw how disastrous Brexit and Trump were  
They ignored the warnings. #Brexit has started the disintegration of the EU, Italy's Europe minister says  
Italy’s referendum result is not another Brexit or Trump | Luigi Scazzieri  
Article 50 #Brexit case has now begun. Watch live via the UKSC website here:  
UK investors explain the startup climate after #Brexit at #TCDisrupt 
How will Brexit affect the startup scene and technology workforce? #TCDisrupt 
Here I set out what Theresa May needs to do in the New Year. With strong leadership, we can get on with a swift, clean Brexit.  
Attorney's case for not needing MPs vote on Brexit seems circular,that PM's foreign affairs prerogative is important because it's important 
Experts suggest Italian referendum does have clear parallels with Brexit vote in that no-one knows what that means either. 
Negotiations with Özil & Alexis are complicated by:1- Fluctuation of (£) after #Brexit2- Uncertainty of AW's future(via: @JamesOlley) 
Doh! Courts not deciding to "delay" Brexit. Ruling on the law and whether it says Parliament triggers Brexit or PM may alone. Get it right  
#Brexit Supreme Court case: Follow our coverage online:  
There have been threats of violence in Article 50 case, Lord David Neuberger says  
Perfectly proper for the @UKSupremeCourt to decide the Brexit case, says @attorneygeneral 
Of the Supreme Court judges hearing the Brexit legal challenge today:91% are male82% are privately educated82% are Oxbridge graduates 
Judges ban publication of identities of claimants in Brexit case, because they've received "serious threats of violence" #SupremeCourt 
Supreme court spoiler: a bunch of Scots lawyers told me unanimously last month that Holyrood cannot veto Brexit.   
If you believe in democracy, read and share this. #Brexit #Article50 #SupremeCourt 
If BREXIT Blocked I am convinced there will be landslide of UKIP MPs sitting in Westminster as well as AMs Welsh Assembly and MSPs Holyrood 
WATCH: Labour's @GiselaStuart calls on MPs who say "I accept the result" to trigger Art50, without amendments and let us get on with Brexit.  
.@ChukaUmunna is right: the only question on the ballot paper was to leave the EU, not to leave the Single Market after #Brexit  
Europe crisis will only increase!The sooner we detach ourselves, the better our finance and currency become.Brexit  
So why are we being told that people who voted #Brexit didn't know this involved leaving the single market?  
Italy’s referendum result is not another Brexit or Trump | Luigi Scazzieri  
#Article50 appeal @LeanneWood AM: "We're not prepared to give the Tories a blank cheque"#Brexit  
It has been 163 days since the referendum. Labour still has no discernible position on Brexit. 
This is where the Supreme Court justices will be sitting to hear the Brexit legal challenge, which is due to start in 25 minutes  
Friends! Hard Brexit would result in Britain being excluded from contributing to the Italian banks bailout!Is this what Leavers voted for? 
#Article50 appeal: "It's only right and proper that the Scottish Parliament has a say" #Brexit #SNP 
#Brexit = catastrofe economica. No... aspetta... UK car sales enjoy best November sales in more than decade  via @FT 
Boris Johnson has conceded Britain could keep paying into the EU budget after #brexit. Will he apologise for his £350m promise? #LeaveWatch 
Podcast: Whatever the Supreme Court decision is, Brexit is a hugely complex legal issue as @JoshuaRozenberg reveals 
Lib Dems' new MP dragged off-air after Brexit roasting in car crash radio interview  #Brexit 
UK Supreme Court to hear historic Brexit case  
Norway tells Britain: no Brexit 'silver bullet' over single market access  
It is a DISGRACE that these 11 UNELECTED Supreme Court justices can BLOCK the will of the people #Brexit  
The Attorney General's stance on the rule of law is far closer to that of the Nazis than that of Margaret Thatcher#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
Our new report analyses the impact of #Brexit on #defence of #Estonia, #Baltic Sea region and #Europe more widely  
Extraordinary that Irish politicians openly backed Sturgeon's #Brexit opt out plea & Indy goal in defiance of UK  
News:Alex Salmond states that current Brexit issue is the biggest constitutional crisis since the ones he raised last week or week before 
Get on with Brexit: 200 top business bosses urge Theresa May to trigger Article 50  
Must be a nightmare down by the Supreme Court today with Farage's 100,000 protesters... hmm . Where did everybody go? #Brexit 
The Attorney General is expected to tell the judges not to defy the will of the electorate - The Nazis said much the same in 1933#Brexit  
Brexit: article 50 supreme court hearing - live updates  
On my @talkRADIO show from 10am: Italian referendum, Supreme Court Brexit case, Muslim integration, Trump & China, plus pushy Southern mums 
.@Nigel_Farage: If you thought 2016 was a year of revolution, just wait for 2020 and angry Britain's Brexit backlash  
Stronger than expected. Points towards robust growth in the final quarter of the year. Still no sign of that Brexit recession!  
Brexit has started the disintegration of the EU, Italy's Europe minister says 
Pro EU protest outside UK Supreme Court backing the independence of judiciary from tabloid attacks @HueschH #brexit  
200k Welsh jobs are linked to our membership of the single market - we will fight to protect that, @LeanneWood tells #VictoriaLIVE. #Brexit 
Remember this is the multi-millionaire who bankrolled the Brexit campaign and UKIP. He plans to create a new political movement in the UK.  
Beautiful day here in Aberdeen for my Brexit talks with oil & gas industries; then on to fisheries. 
"They're doing everything to overthrow #Brexit" say protesters ahead of Supreme Court hearing govt appeal to trigger Article 50  
Markets have learned their lessons from Brexit and Trump and are keeping it cool  
Very telling. Chief Constable unable to think of any policing advantage as a result of Brexit only increased risk. 
"There are great dangers for Wales. We are not prepared to give the Tories a blank cheque on #Brexit" @LeanneWood tells @VictoriaLIVE. 
The Supreme Court will start hearing the Government's Brexit appeal from today  
I explained, yesterday, why this case was not about blocking Brexit at 24.30 here  
80% of Italy's political establishment opposed Renzi referendum. This was not Turmp/Brexit but an elite victory @iainmartin1 @sandrogozi 
ITA referendum was going to be worse than Trump was going to be worse than Brexit. Thank you for playing. Insert coin to continue. 
"Judges are not fair game," says Shadow Attorney General Shami Chakrabarti  #Brexit #r4today 
Wife of president of #SupremeCourt calls Brexit referendum 'mad and bad'. And we're trusting the ruling to be impartial? #Article50 
Brexit could draw more criminals to the UK, says police chief  
One thing you can say for Brexit - it's made how we understand our past a matter of pressing & urgent relevance  
Brexit campaigners created dangerously toxic EU debate where 'facts didn't matter', inquiry hears | The Independent  
Who's who in the Article 50 appeal case @PatrickGower is outside the court for us: 
If Brexit is stopped by a gaggle of politicians & media, we'll just have to accept democracy is dead. We voted to LEAVE EU & Single Market.  
Europe, 2016:- Brexit- Cameron resigns- Italy referendum fails- Renzi resigns- Hollande approval: 4%- Merkel approval hit 5 year low 
The British people expect Brexit to be delivered. That includes leaving the single market. 
This #Brexit 'taking back control' stuff is brilliant.... 
Racist sexist treatment of Gina Miller is appalling. Lots of nasty violent people out there who all support #brexit Good reason not to!  
Your Monday morning headlines: Italy #referendum, #Austrianelection, #Brexit legal challenge, #NorthDakotaPipeline 
Me on today's #brexit #Art50 hearing. Given 300,000 people imtend to watch it this may help distill the arguments. 
"The Hearing" by Jamie Foster @1jamiefoster #brexit #csm #supremecourt #hearing  
The alt shite are gunning for Gina Miller again today with their lame pretence that the Supreme Court action is about stopping Brexit  
It's was made very clear to us what we were voting forWe voted to leave the EU And the single market Anything else will be a betrayal 
Incredible admission from Adam Tomkins on #bbcgms - he doesn't want best Brexit deal for Scotland. Rightly called out by @StephenGethins 
All you need to know about the #Brexit Case. It really is this simple. Now end the hyperbole on both sides. #enemiesofthepeople #Article50 
Brexit is back in the dock Here's a guide to what to expect during the Article 50 appeal: 
The #Brexit court case is no threat to the referendum decision - it's our constitution at work:  
There's a lot of confusion as to what the Brexit case is about - this is a good explanation of it.  
Reminder that the High Court Miller judgment being appealed to the Supreme Court wasn't about "blocking Brexit" - in the court's own words  
"This is about process not about outcomes," says Shami Chakrabarti on Brexit Supreme Court case #r4today 
Whatever the Supreme Court decide, the case for Brexit is strong. Theresa May should make it stronger#TelegraphView 
It's not that it could cost the Tories the next election that worries me, it's what #brexit would cost the country! 
Hoping to take the hard work out of reading the competing arguments for you - here's my thread on the #Art50 Supreme Ct case ahead. #Brexit  
Brexit could draw more criminals to the UK, says police chief  
The Supreme Court will start hearing the Government's Brexit appeal from today  
#Brexit panic over trade deals means more eagerness to trade with major #HumanRights abusers like the #Gulf states and - worst - #Saudi. 
It's not ignorant, our Press, when it undermines the judiciary and represents the litigation as being about blocking Brexit. It's mendacious 
Conflict, confusion and betrayal: How the UK's decision to leave the #EU ended up at the Supreme Court #Brexit  
The Supreme Court Brexit appeal starts today. Here's everything you need to know  (image credit: @UKSupremeCourt) 
Let's be clear: Italy has voted against the EU. Soon, there may no longer be an EU from which to Brexit. 
Time for the UK liberal majority to push back. There must be no #Brexit. 
Senior judges prepare to hear Brexit supreme court appeal  
Important new report: How Brexit could affect our human rights  
The future is by definition unpredictable – but that's no excuse not to get on with Brexit, writes @JamesCleverly  
Having burnt the crops of Government, the Brexit press are now salting the earth of the Judiciary. And they don't even know what for. 
Early queue forming four hours before the start of Supreme Court Brexit hearing #brexit  
Theresa May demands end to Brexit leaks in memo, the memo gets leaked  
Gina Miller I salute you! #Brexit #SupremeCourt @D_Blanchflower 
Brexit, Trump, now Renzi2016 was the year the liberal left diedThere's a global uprising that can't be stopped  
Who has the power to trigger #Brexit? 11 Supreme Court judges will decide whether government or Parliament has the final say...  
I shall be working with @SkyNews on their coverage of the Brexit appeal at the @UKSupremeCourt over the 4 days. Live commentary and more! 
Brexit could draw more criminals to the UK, says police chief  
Marine Le Pen on her plans for France and the lessons of Brexit.  
What trouble will the famous five create on #brexit Davies Fox Johnson Gove Farage  
Meet the Supremes: These are the judges who'll rule on the Article 50 appeal  
Ireland’s economic fallout from Brexit likely more bad than good, report says 
Wrong, the judges must defend our Parliamentary Democracy against executive diktat and 'the will of the people' demagoguery. #Brexit  
The EU Is Not The Single Market  via @wordpressdotcom #Brexit 
As it reckons with Trump and Brexit, architecture faces an identity crisis  
My latest preview of the government’s Brexit appeal to the @UKSupremeCourt, which opens at 1100 today. 
Snubbing friends in Europe, Brexit-bound Britain desperate to further cement ties with human rights abusers in Gulf  
The Supreme Court will start hearing the Government's Brexit appeal from today  
UK government's Brexit plans in hands of Supreme Court.  
A Global Uncuckening:#maga#brexit#italyreferendum :BBC News - PM Matteo Renzi resigns after clear defeat  
German MSM tried to cover up the story of the brutal rape and murder in rural Freiburg by #Merkel migrant.#Brexit 
Italy Just Had Their Own Brexit — Prime Minister Resigns:  
Woman leading Brexit court fight says she has received death threats and racial and sexual abuse  
#TrumpTrain #Immigration #Brexit #TrumpIsSoWise #MAGA#Italy Rejects #Globalism 
Cameron resigned #BrexitObama, gone in 2 monthsMerkel?Hollande, French Pres, no longer seeking re-electionRenzi, Italy PM, just resigned  
#Italy votes NO!#Brexit #Trump #populism grows.With #EuropeanUnion in turmoilIs a #MarineLePen #Frexit next?#italianreferendum#Renxit 
The court of appeal and all its pro-european judges today start with the government's appeal in regard to brexit. A great way to waste money 
Trump wins, Cubs win, Brexit, HARAMBE, and Americans winning tournaments WTF IS THIS WORLD COMING TO  
First, Brexit. Then, Trump. Now, Italy. In 2017, we need France, Germany, & the Netherlands.#ItalyReferendum #Austria #VanDerBellen #NZ 
2016- Trump win- Brexit- Italy referendum fail- Syria- Turkey coup attempt- N Korea nuclear tests- ISIS attacks- Brazil impeachment 
Deglobalization forces are three for three - Brexit, Trump & now the Italian NO vote. More shoes will drop; we live in interesting times. 
Just like #Brexit and the U.S. election of @realDonaldTrump, Italy has now voted resoundingly to take their country back! #ItalyReferendum 
Boris Johnson dismisses paying EU large sums of money in return for market accessHard/Soft Brexit, now Value Brexit 
Im going to keep ReTweeting this post I made on July 5th after #Brexit until people get it. The EU is in a much worse position than UK #EURO 
While You Were Distracted by BREXIT and TRUMP, Monsanto’s Senate Puppets Push Through Bill to OUTLAW GMO Labelling  
Cameron: “Brexit referendum was the stupidest thing any PM could ever do”. Renzi: “Hold my beer”   
the #EU love affair is over, #Britain files for divorce ,who will be next?#Italexit #Frexit #Grexit #Eurozone #EUSpring #Brexit #No2EU 
How Nigel Farage—“Mr. Brexit”—became the first foreign politician to have a face-to-face with the President-elect.  
New video coming out tomorrow: The Brexit Betrayal. 
All over the world, people are waking up:BrexitPresident Trump#ItalyReferendumNext ==> #AFD for Germany & #LePen2017 for France. 
Brexit a 'significant risk' to income of universities   
Woman leading Brexit court fight says she has received death threats and racial and sexual abuse  
UK’s leading tech #startup role at risk from #Brexit  via @telebusiness 
Why do all these very rich men hate the EU so much? the only thing it's doing that affects them is clamping down on tax evasion. #brexit 
"I understand that the New Zealand Prime Minister's job has unexpectedly become vacant..." #Brexit  
Brexit, Cameron resigns, Trump wins, 'No' vote in Italy, Renzi resigns, Hollande decides not to re-stand after 4% ratings. 2016, folks. 
This shows Italian referendum is very different from Brexit & Trumpism  
Is #Italy's referendum the new #Brexit?  
Post Renzirendum: € at 1.5 year low versus $ - 1% down, 4-5% down on month (orange). Not yet a patch on post brexit referendum £ slide -blue  
The Government's Supreme Court Brexit appeal: What you need to know  
Beware of lumping Renziferendum defeat with Brexit and Trump as display of "populism". Renzi's constitutional change was deeply flawed 
John Key saw Brexit, then Trump and was like "Fuck it, I'm out" #Deuces 
1. Trump Primary Win2. Brexit3. AfD’s Rise in Germany4. Trump Election5. Italy Referendum No6. Le Pen’s Threat 
. @JoshuaRozenberg on what to look out for in this week's #Brexit showdown  
Italians followed the #Brexit path and rejected the establishment. Europeans everywhere are increasingly sick of the EU dictatorship. #Renzi 
First Brexit, then Trump, now the #ItalyReferendum. Great things are on the horizon. 
The people of Italy Reject the EUROPEAN Project! In favour of nation state democracy, well done! On the road to #Italexit #brexit #Democracy 
I grew up in UK, went to school, passed exams, served, worked, paid taxed, raised a family, voted #brexit and now I'm 'Far Right' WTF? 
Europe, 2016:- Brexit- Cameron resigns- Italy referendum fails- Renzi resigns- Hollande approval: 4%- Merkel approval hit 5 year low 
So Italian PM Renzi calls for referendum, loses, & reportedly resigns.  Like Brexit, a self-imposed setback for the center and for Europe. 
EU resignations, 2016:- David Cameron, following Brexit defeat.- Matteo Renzi, following Italy referendum defeat. 
With BREXIT, TRUMP & now ITALY - European Union in DISARRAY - EURO could collapse - GLOBALISTS - SOROS - NWO crowd FACE MASSIVE DEFEATS  
Well done Italy well done!#Italexit #Brexit@GuyVerhofstadt @MartinSchulz @JunckerEU are you watching! 
Brexit, Trump-quake, and now ITALY  !!!  
Renzi out. At this rate there'll be no EU for Britain to Brexit from by 2019 
ITALY - Renzi BIG DEFEAT in REFERENDUM - EU in turmoil, Euro survival in doubt  BREXIT, TRUMP, now ITALY - NWO DEFEAT 
Theresa May Brexit & the Supreme Court by Political Cartoonist of the Year Morten Morland - political cartoon gallery  
'Brexit is on a SLIPPERY SLOPE!' Nuttall attacks Government for giving in to Remainers  
“Ever since Brexit, we have viewed a potential political crisis in Italy as the top event risk in Europe for 2017."  
Matteo Renzi loses Italian referendum: exit polls –  Brexit, Trump, now Italy. Globalism is on the run!  
Brexit, Italy, Trump. Ok, we lost Austria, but 3 out of four ain't bad. 
Biggest loser from Renzi defeat: Merkel. Losing major allies in Rome & Paris at key time for #Brexit talks. Time to shift to listening mode? 
Italy: #Referendum might trigger snap poll. This might bring absolute majority for UKIP ally M5S in decisive 2nd round. #Brexit #ExitPoll 
Too simple to treat Italy, Austria, Trump & Brexit as part of same elite vs people battle & draw conclusions accordingly. They all differ. 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
It's a mistake to see Italy vote just through the Brexit prism. Lots of pro-EU (and even pro-Renzi) Italians voted No.  
Italy may be raw meat to news channels, but mkts had most of it priced in. If you want a bounce time, 4.30am GMT worked for Trump and Brexit 
Monday's Independent digital front:Senior Brexit campaigners denies offering six-figure 'bribe' to MPs#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
I really wouldn't see Italy's No vote as a Trump-Brexit thing. If it must have a UK analogue, it's like if Clegg'd made AV a confidence vote 
1st #BrexitThen #TRUMPNow #IoVotoNoTomorrow #Frexit #NexitAnd then we will prosecute the traitor EuroRats. 
First polls from @BBCNews show Renzi has lost Italian referendum on constitutional changes. He may now resign. Brexit 3? 
Polls: Italy voted 'NO'. First #Brexit, then #Trump, now EU in crisis. #ItalyReferendum 
To all my followers who have joined the Lib Dems: One day you could be helping Tories stay in Government. #brexit 
Political shockwave:#ItalyReferendum polls: Italy voted NO. PM Renzi will resign. Euro down.Brexit,Trump, Italy 
People worldwide are not voting to support a new movement/leader. They are voting against an old corrupt system #Brexit #Trump #EUro 
Right then. See you on @BBCBreakfast in the morning for brexit in the Supreme Court, Andy Woodward, Steve Coogan, Phil Daniels & @mattgoss 
there's only one party who put the #British people firsta vote for @VAylingUKIP is a vote #Britain#Sleaford #byelection #Brexit #UKIP 
Thanks for doing this. Deserves as wide a dissemination as possible.This is our Foreign Secretary and Cabinet Minister with key Brexit role.  
All Remoaner MPs if you refuse to act on the will of the people We will contest those seatsWe Will hold you to account 
Brexit Mean Is Brexit.  
The tabloids are preparing for the #SupremeCourt's #Brexit decision – this is what they've dug up about the judges  
Isn't it funny that a finnish woman might win the UK #XFactor on the first edition after Brexit? #XFactorLiveShows 
Abbott calls migrant targets 'foolish' as she reveals Labour's SHOCKING post-Brexit policy  
Italy’s Brexit moment? 
Sturgeon’s SNP facing Brexit BACKLASH as voters turn away from Independence  
'You don't understand Brexit!' Andrew Neil DESTROYS Nick Clegg in car-crash interview   
Multinational corporations like @Virgin are funding a campaign to stop Brexit. Sign up to help us stop them:  
Eurostar gave the bluntest response when asked what the benefits of Brexit are  
BREXITTRUMPMake everything ok again by voting @joeldommett TONIGHT! On the app Or phoneLandline: 0902 04424 03Mobile: 64424 03 
Abbott calls migrant targets 'foolish' as she reveals Labour's SHOCKING post-Brexit policy. Car crash interview!  
Sturgeon’s SNP facing Brexit BACKLASH as voters turn away from Independence  
At last some good possible news to come out of Brexit  
Gina Miller: a brave woman. Like #JoCox, a true patriot standing up for democracy & rule of law in #Britain. #Brexit  
Im not sure this is really the story. We're in danger of talking them up. The #Brexit 'revolution' extends thus far only to England & Wales.  
It was absolutely clear what Leave meant during the referendum. Join our campaign for a swift, clean Brexit today:  
Gina Miller speaks out ahead of court decision tomorrow: 'Supreme court judges on #Brexit case are being vilified' 
When and how to watch the Supreme Court Brexit case live  
The Lib Dems: neither liberal nor democratic  via @spikedonline#brexit 
Saara winning The X Factor in Brexit Britain would be deliciously perfect. 
4) From Haiti, @Brexit, America to Gambia: The world has turned against THE ESTABLISHMENT and VOTED for CREDIBLE INDEPENDENT candidates. 
I grow tired of people who say stress on public services is caused by immigration rather than corp tax cuts & avoidance measures. #brexit 
Salmond: Brexit constitutional crisis 'good for Scotland' So if it's good for Scotland, presumably he voted for it? 
As UK PM Theresa May pursues trade deal with Gulf, she shouldn't make post-Brexit mean post-concern w/ human rights.  
How many people have to be raped, killed, assaulted before lefties see what islam IS?#IoVotoNo #Brexit #FPÖ #Hofer #AfD #PVV #Trump 
It's not immigration that is negatively effecting the living standards in Britain but austerity & corporate tax avoidance. #brexit, #Ukip 
For the records, as things stand:Etymology uncertainbut apparently Brexit means "Brexit"Synonyms:disingenuousflaweddisaster  
If Labour were to abandon free movement what's next on the list to make them "electable" being tough on benefits receipients? #brexit 
Brexiteers are trying to rush through #brexit purely because longer it takes, the more people will realise it's a total shambles. 
Good piece by @MazzucatoM and @michaelujacobs: 'The Brexit-Trump Syndrome: it’s the economics, stupid'  
If you thought 2016 was a year of revolution, wait for 2020 and angry Britain's Brexit backlash  via @telegraphnews 
Leaked email says @Virgin boss is helping to fund Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
So the LibDems want to target Brexit MPs in seats that backed Remain. Sheffield, Norfolk, Sutton voted Leave...  
Gina Miller: supreme court judges on Brexit case are being vilified  
#brexit Ok lets leave the EU, however lets pay to have access to the single market The Tories are so THICK  
Brexit will be the end of Elsie's independence dream. 
Labour: No idea on devo and no idea how to get thereTories: No idea on Brexit and no idea how to get thereLet's just go for independence 
Sturgeon’s SNP facing Brexit BACKLASH as voters turn away from Independence  #SNP 
Economist has made a fool of itself again and again lecturing others. Even in its backyard it got Brexit wrong. Should shove its smugness  
Trump means Trump and BREXIT means..um..er? See my Snowblog  as to how BREXIT could end up being a trifle expensive   
Not sure the pro-Leave media does itself good to compare Austrian fascism with Brexit. via @b_judah 
Kiselev: West thinks Russia's behind Fillon, Trump, Brexit, Wikileaks, hacking: "You'd think Putin's the only one working on the planet"  
Without relevant knowledge there is merely thrashing blindly around in the dark. That is not freedom.#Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
AUSTRIA: Don't listen to the polls. They said #Brexit could never happen. It did. They said President Trump couldn't happen. It did.  
Backlash (to Brexit & Trump) time? Far-right Austrian candidate defeated by healthy margin/ 
'You don't understand Brexit!' Andrew Neil DESTROYS Nick Clegg in car-crash interview   
The @UKSupremeCourt gearing up for Brexit case: 11 judges; 50 lawyers; 25 media; 25 public in court 1; others watching from adjoining courts  
Brexit Crackdown: Theresa May has threatened to sack ministers and officials caught leaking 'sensitive information'.  
Boris Johnson has outlined his four-point blueprint for Brexit. Which of Boris' four points is most important to you? #CliveOnLBC 
Best short-summary of Brexit (and the perils of prediction) I've read - from @JeremyCliffe in this week's @TheEconomist 
Same people now claiming Remainers adequately warned public of Brexit fallout, spent a year shouting DON'T LISTEN TO THEIR LIES. What nerve!  
Um. He was 'deputy chief' when you were 6 years old. If you can change Brexit stance on space of mere week, what does 32 years mean.  
An 89 year old.. beautiful. Thks- @JeremyCliffeWe #Boomers, too, need to think more about those BEHIND us!#Brexit 
Oh dear. This is tricky. The main problem for #Brexit is the Leave side, not Remainers. @mrjamesob nails it. 
Rerun of the Austrian presidential election is surely a model for a second #Brexit ref. Always give a population time to come to its senses 
You Brexit, you pays for it, as we say in Yorkshire. 
Forget hard, soft & grey. Anything other than FULL Brexit will cost the Tories the next election.  17.4m voted LEAVE  
Theresa May and leaked Brexit memo by Christian Adams - political cartoon gallery  
Nick Clegg gets ripped to shreds by Andrew Neil on the Liberal Democrats' hypocrytical position on Brexit.  
Trump/Brexit nationalist populism isn't an inevitable trend: former Green leader beats far-right candidate in Austrian presidential election  
We mustn't get drawn into the hard/soft #Brexit business - no Brexit is our stance. 
The Brexit effect?  
Far Right defeat in Austria a firebreak for Holland, France & Germany after Brexit-Trump? Waiting for Italian result  
It's scares me that our world is goose stepping towards horror. Stopping #Brexit must the first battle in a world war between right & wrong. 
I work in govt HR and keep appointing @hrtbps to important civil service positions in an attempt to prevent Brexit 
Hard Brexit wobbles, Merkel up in polls, Hollande folds, Richmond Park, Austria. Not much, but still: a rare OK week for European moderates. 
NEOS (Liberal) Klubobmann says he thinks the UK Brexit issue played in #bpw16 campaign, against Hofer. 
.@OwenSmith_MP will vote to BLOCK Brexit. RT if you believe he should #RespectTheResult 
Because in Channel 4 News view the being far right in Austria is the same as backing Brexit. More crap punditry  
After Trump and Brexit a much needed sign from #Austria, that there is still hope! Thank you, Austria #VanDerBellen #bpw16 #bpw 
And yet another #Brexit supporter striving valiantly to confirm the view that they are all abusive morons. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Opportunities for all! Brexit cld lead to cheaper food says OBR official  via @telebusiness 
'You don't understand Brexit!' Andrew Neil DESTROYS Nick Clegg in car-crash interview   
Govt memo demanding end to Brexit leaks is leaked  yet DWP is pretty water tight, they all believe in that abuse 
Fight against Brexit. Not hard or soft Brexit. Brexit. 
Trump scared more people than he inspired? Brexit not going well?  
The greatest politician for a generation @Nigel_Farage will be in Sleaford with @VAylingUKIP tomorrow -Brexit needs a win here, please help! 
Brexit: the Richmond Park mouse roars – cartoon#brexit is a White Elephant we'll all pay for, for decades to come  
.@TheStalwart Brexit (and to a lesser extent Trump) reminded people that there's no such thing as a consequence free rage vote 
When an interviewer is determined to not let the politician answer his question & fails  @nick_clegg #brexit  
I'm 1 of 2 Boris press officers. I have a full time job making Brexit statements the other has to retract, deny or contradict. BUSY! 
I'm supporting @WeAreUndivided Please check them out and let the youth have their say about Brexit #WeAreUndivided #RT 
True. Well put. However, do we dribble our objections/will down the drain of Brexit negotiations? Or do we start to make the #indy2 case? 
Despite Brexit  
Brexit will affect us young'uns the longest. We HAVE to make our voices heard. Share what matters to you. #WeDemand @weareundivided #ad 
A tour-de-force. Hard #brexit is hitting the buffers. Which probably means soft brexit is, too.  
If brexit means brexit then surely you can't blame civil servants for deciding that leaks mean leaks  
'Brexit is on a SLIPPERY SLOPE!' Nuttall attacks Government for giving in to Remainers  
There is no mandate for #Brexit, and #Brexit is madness. Unless we are post-logic as well as post-truth, the conclusion is - no #Brexit. 
Two types of people in UK & USA now: those still wailing & teeth-gnashing re Brexit/Trump & those now seeing both as exciting opportunity. 
There's NO point asking Theresa May for VISION #BrexitShe's a typical pedestrian MACHINE politician !That type DON'T do VISION 
Voters are hungry for a full English BREXIT. We dont want a soft BREXIT. We dont want a grey BREXIT. #Sleafordandnorthhykeham 
A greedy fat pie guzzler offers his views on #Brexit.   #SNPGTF 
Brexit be like:Q. What's your favourite colour?A1. Blue.A2. Not blue.52% vote "Not blue".Government tells us they all preferred red. 
.@Keir_Starmer on #Marr says Tories, UKIP & Lib Dems playing to different sides of Brexit debate, only Labour can bring the country together 
Totally farcical. Maybe the Govnt will smell the coffee and work out they need to be clear on their Brexit plans   
DAVID DAVIS: “Anyone still moaning about EU citizenship should just marry a European. It worked for me and really eases the Brexit stress.” 
BREXIT vote + TRUMP WIN, now VOTES IN EU about to DESTROY EURO, crush Brussels  Massive blows to EU NWO globalism 
Why Italians are so angry ahead of Europe's most important vote since Brexit  
'You don't understand Brexit!' Andrew Neil DESTROYS Nick Clegg in car-crash interview   
Europe is still my home after Brexit. Check out the campaign by @weareundivided and share your demand!#WeDemand #WeAreUndivided 
Lies brought #Brexit, lies sustain it & only lies shall maintain it.UK's Democracy is designed not to allow this, but where is Parliament?  
Beware workers b/c #borisjohnson has said  #brexit will make Britain the leading advocate of free trade & that means wages fall & don't rise 
Andrew Neil rips Nick Clegg's plans for Brexit apart during shocking BBC interview  
Will the Supreme Court or CJEU block Brexit? Do I want to block it? Listen here to me on the World This Weekend.  
It's my view that #TheresaMay never REALLY wanted us to #Brexit and this explains the procrastination and absolute lack of vision we all see 
Why Britain voted for #Brexit: a look back 200 years  
We should pay nothing to the EU. We don't pay Tesco so we can buy from them why would we pay Brussels? It's #Brexit time.  
Britain's Brexit debate is becoming poisonous. Theresa May needs to show some real leadership, soon #premium 
The week the #IPBill received Royal Assent. But, surely, the best way to avoid these leaks is for the Tories to tell us their Brexit plan.  
Ukip to push for instant Brexit without triggering article 50  
Brexit Means Witch-Hunt  
'You don't understand Brexit!' Andrew Neil DESTROYS Nick Clegg in car-crash interview.   
From today: how #TheresaMay could be walking into a trap on #Brexit, one that could end her premiership -  
TRAITOR CLEGG On BBC Politics this morning They still Don't get it We want OUT of the single market OUT of the EU 
Zac's defeat in Richmond Park followed BREXIT & Trump where the long-term odds-on betting favourite failed  
Government memo demanding end to Brexit leaks is leaked  
Perfect analogy for failed Brexit strategy. Low info Brits are clueless.  
First there was Brexit, then Donald Trump. Will Italy deliver the next shock to the political establishment?  
The media betrays the public and democracy if it serves up material which panders to popular prejudice rather than truth. #Remain #Brexit 
Brexit Boom: UK Companies Growing After Brexit Vote  
Brexit debate is playing out like a post-match interview | Larry Elliott  
Burke's conception of the responsibility of an MP is all the more important when the public are as misinformed as this:#Remain #Brexit  
.@natalieben @jon_bartley @TheGreenParty Please do let Sarah Stock (Sleaford) know the damage Brexit is causing NHS:  
Splendidly splenetic, but grievously accurate:Brexit arrogance exposes ineptitude of Tory elite | Kevin McKenna  
There is only so much the #EU can take. #Brexit is part of ongoing uprising against this monstrous institution. Other countries waking up!  
EJKs, Marcos burial, Trump victory, Brexit--2016: But wait, there's more!!! 
The underlying problem with this and the Mail rant is that the Miller case isn't about "overturning Brexit" anyway  
Boris Johnson exposes fresh divisions in the Cabinet over whether to pay for EU access  #marr 
"Grey Brexit" = no Brexit. Theresa May prepares to sell us short,   
I'll be discussing with @BBCMarkMardell whether the Supreme Court or CJEU really will block Brexit. Starts 1pm.  
The EU's single market is a rip-off. Britain should keep as far away from it as possible  #brexit 
And 160 countries pay NOTHING to access the EU Single Market.So why would UK pay for access after Brexit?It makes no sense.  
Top Tories: hard Brexit stance could lose us next election. These traitors want us mired inside the failing EU!   
There are a lot of UK MPs at odds with their constituents over Brexit. Watch the snivelling wretched ones tone change come nearer G Election 
Brexit: most people are 'moderate, centrists' who simply want best for the UK, let Parliament do its job now: debate, determine & scrutinise 
It's time, Mrs May @theresa_may, to stop this nonsense. Be tough on Brexit, tough on the causes of Brexit.  
RT if you agree with Beefy that politicians should stop trying to block Brexit! #RespectTheResult 
Mrs May, what is the point in negotiating with an organisation which is going to be broke before the negotiations can be completed? Brexit. 
Over 70% in Richmond voted remain, yet only 49% voted for the anti-Brexit candidate. Is support for remaining in the EU falling in Richmond? 
RT if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Four-point Brexit blueprint revealed by Boris Johnson  
On a day when populists could upend politics in Austria/Italy Britain’s left still links Brexit to narrow economic claims.Look around guys 
Britain may continue with some EU cooperation post-Brexit: Johnson  
SHOW this video to anyone in the remain campaign now arguing to stay in the single market #Brexit  
Now that we’ve finally established what a Brexit is, here is a handy guide to spotting them in the wild. #brexit  
On 5 December the Supreme Court meets to decide who can launch Brexit. Read our guide to the case  
We voted for Brexit. Not half-Brexit, two-thirds of a Brexit, or Brexit-with-chains-attached. Remainiacs must cop on! We're leaving the EU. 
When people say, "let's have a soft Brexit" they actually mean, "lets have a pretend Brexit that's exactly the same as no Brexit". 
Faces of Brexit (an occasional series).  
'There aren't any' - Eurostar gave the bluntest response when asked what the benefits of Brexit are  
Nick Clegg. The man who's going to save UK from #Brexit. Same man who took LibDems from 57 MPs to dizzy heights of 8 MPs.I'll sleep easy. 
After Brexit and Trump, is Italy next? A video explainer  
#Clegg stumbling over single market, 2nd referendum and even trying to bend the meaning of his OWN words! Unbelievable! #Brexit #bbcsp 
Andrew Neil: So soft brexit would mean uncontrolled immigration and the European Court being supreme?Clegg: Well, er...#bbcsp 
#Euref: Cam's ploy to grab #UKIP voters & shut-up obsessive Tory Right. He NEVER thought he'd lose this. Total disrespect of voters.#Brexit 
Ha ha, @nick_clegg trying to nit pick on language, when it was clear from ALL sides that #Brexit meant leave EVERYTHING from #EU. #bbcsp 
Today is the most dangerous moment for Europe since Brexit  
#marr#Boris & #TheresaMay seem 2have no idea of scale&complexity of negotiating ANYkind of #BrexitSee my article: 
Seems not all of our european "partners" are being honest during negotiations. Is undermining key Brexit ministers part of their strategy?  
Whereas 'soft' Brexit will definitely cost you the next election Theresa. Can't you shut these f*ckers up?  
Shadow Chancellor John McDonnell on UKIP, the Richmond by-election & Brexit  via @YouTube thank you! @johnmcdonnellMP 
'Tories ready to betray 17.4 million who voted for Brexit'  #Brexit  
Brexit Trump ¿Italia? 
Read 'Brexit Bromance' in @TheSTMagazine@Arron_banks @Nigel_Farage @ShippersUnbound#SundayBrunch 
All very well for @theresa_may to say there is too much leaking going on re Brexit. But it is inevitable when there is no clear strategy 
Boris Johnson plays down prospect of EU payments after Brexit  
RT if you agree with @BorisJohnson that Brexit = taking back control of our borders, laws, money & trade  
#Labour no longer speak for working class #Britain#BrexitBritain #bbcsp #DianeAbbott #UKIP #Brexit #OpenBritain #NickClegg 
.@edballs says @jeremycorbyn is right to hold "chaotic" government to account on #Brexit but "catastrophic" to seek free movement.  
Basic requirements of #Brexit must be:Control of own bordersAbility to make trade agreements with worldNo control by Euro Court Justice  
All this talk about grey/black/white/hard/soft/eggshell Brexit makes it sound like Britain is choosing a tone of Dulux paint. 
Brexit news  Citigroup move to Germany likely; UBS to Frankfurt; UK banks eye Ireland. House builders predict slump. 
Foreign Secretary sees 'no reason why payments to EU should be large' after #Brexit #Marr 
Unacceptable hate now becoming commonplace in politics. I condemn & encourage us all to support @Anna_Soubry #Brexit  
Suggesting someone is trying to sabotage Boris Johnson's Brexit plan is a bit like saying someone is trying to murder your invisible friend. 
Right wing politicians arguing about hard/soft Brexit/Remain are really arguing about which one best for cutting wages and public services. 
Boris body language on #marrshow says : "Please stop these horrible questions about Brexit. I have no idea and want to go play cricket. "  
Dear Brits,Know an MP or business leader looking to subvert Brexit?Vote them out & boycott them.Punish them.They hate democracy.#Brexit 
Boris: "Let's take back control and make parliament sovereign. But not about Brexit even though it's the biggest decision since WW2" #marr 
Starmer to Boris: "what's your [Brexit] position?"Boris to Starmer: "what's your position?"Really doesn't bode well does it #Marr 
Keir Starmer: Labour will fight against hard Brexit and bring country together  
Gordon and I have been looking at how we can REALLY take back control after Brexit.  #marr 
Autumn Statement reveals devastating £58.7bn Brexit black hole as national debt is set to soar beyond 90% #Marr  
all those telling lies about about how jobs etc will be lost if UK leaves the #SingleMarket are just bad losers#Brexit #OpenBritain #No2EU 
"People voted for a clean Brexit" @paulnuttallukip says UK needs to leave the single market #marr 
We hold all the cards on #Brexit as we have £67bn trade deficit with EU! Do Labour know what 'Hard Brexit' is? Let's get on with it #Marr 
.@Keir_Starmer tells #Marr #Brexit opportunity for Labour to bring people together 
Brexit arrogance exposes ineptitude of Tory elite: my column in The Observer  
Why does  #Labour's #Brexit stance sound like a  debating society point instead of a political stance? Blurry.#Marr 
We’ll fight against 'hard' Brexit, says @Keir_Starmer #marr 
Sir Kier Starmer: "Ukip is the party that said we should crash out of Brexit without even negotiating the best position." #Marr 
Keir Starmer on #Marr proving Lab running with Tory #Brexit agenda -Lab implicitly accepts Scotland out of EU. So diff from 2014 #indyref 
This is why i voted to #LeaveEUJust look at their miserable faces#BrexitBritain #No2EU #Brexit #Frexit #EUspring #Nexit #Auxit #Italexit 
The world has had to contend with the risk of Grexit, Brexit & Italexit. At this rate, we will need a new term: Geralone, for Germany alone. 
Someone tell Keir Starmer, there is NO 'soft brexit' available! How many times does Donald Tusk et al have to say it? #marr 
Labour have confirmed that they WILL try to delay and frustrate Brexit in Parliament. Also refuse to rule out 2nd #EURef #Marr @Keir_Starmer 
#marr We DO have a running commentary on #brexit - via leaked memos,notes caught on camera & off-guard comments by #Boris.But no plan! 
Of course those who voted #Brexit were solely focused on the single marketAbsolutely nothing to do with #immigration#Marr In reality 
British students will have to pay to go to German universities after Brexit  
The Brexit appeal starts tomorrow in the Supreme Court. Here's a plain English explanation of the case  
. @RuthDavidsonMSP says @theSNP “in denial” about #Brexit result but it’s Tories who won’t accept  reality - Scotland voted 62/38 to remain 
Eurostar gave the bluntest response when asked what the benefits of Brexit are  
The opposite is true. However #Brexit doesn't come in 'hard or soft' versions, it's just LEAVE - Lock, stock & barrel. 
Wise words I support "Top Tories: hard Brexit stance could lose us next election"  
If the next election were to mirror Brexit, Leave would win 400 seats, Remain would win 200 seats. 
'Just GET ON with Brexit' Labour MP brands Tony Blair 'MISGUIDED' for disrupting democracy  
The Observer view on the risks to Britain of a hard Brexit | Observer editorial  
Brexit chaos could change the political map of Britain  
Top Tories: hard Brexit stance could lose us next election  
Academics offered counselling to cope with Brexit. No wonder some students want safe spaces....  
Theresa May 'promises to SACK unruly ministers who leak Brexit secrets to press'  
The stuff's full of chemicals, says the Brexit Mail. That will teach those Italians to mess with Brexit Boris !  
Ministers pressing for low-skilled migration to continue after Brexit. Not what we voted for!  
Is a New 'Brexit' Bubbling in Italy?  
I am pro Brexit but also Parliament man. Talk of 'will of the people' leads  to majoritarian tyranny. Read Rousseau and then read Popper. 
Brexit fades from hard to soft to grey. Get on with Brexit, DelayMay! Losing confidence, GE soon needed! 
First Brexit, next Austria, Italy & France. EU is doomed.  
It's time to face reality. In the post-Brexit era Labour is no longer fit for purpose  >  Mail On Sunday  >   
What does Brexit mean? Well, it may not mean Brexit but an unholy Leave Remain alliance of sort of Brexit  
It's fun to laugh but in all honesty Brexit is a way bigger disaster than Trump 
Britain could stay in customs union after Brexit, trade minister says  
Brexit arrogance exposes ineptitude of Tory elite, their privilege & sense of entitlement 
British students will have to pay to go to German universities after Brexit  
How to stop being wrong about the single market#Brexit #Flexcit 
After shock Lib Dem victory in the Richmond Park byelection, Tories warn May of "hard #Brexit" political fallout  
"EU Just Voted to Create Its Own Army, Britain May Be Forced to Pay for It — In Spite of Brexit " 
2nd important libertarian essay Trump era: @willwilkinson REVITALIZING LIBERALISM IN THE AGE OF BREXIT AND TRUMP  
Conservatives hope #LePen Presidency will speed up #Brexit  
.@ShankkarAiyar's column | Brexit, Trump, Europe: Surge of populism and rise of ‘notionalism’  
Trump, Brexit and the rise of Europe's far-right stoke fear in Brussels  
Woman leading Brexit court fight says she has received death threats and racial and sexual abuse  
“Ever since Brexit, we have viewed a potential political crisis in Italy as the top event risk in Europe for 2017."  
One in 10 people who voted FOR Brexit regret their vote. Those who voted to Leave followed advice of ordinary people instead of experts.  
This is what Top Gear used to do with car crashes.  They would be big, epic and terminal. Brexit is a car crash without an airbag.  
Brexit, no bloody Brexit. It is that simple and that binary. Any form of Brexit is going to irrevocably damage our country.  
'The #EU is DYING before your very eyes' #NigelFarage says #Renzi will LOSE crucial vote #Brexit  
UK companies still growing steadily despite Brexit fears - CBI  
U.K. private-sector growth continues to hold firm after the Brexit vote  
France set to follow in the footsteps of Brexit, Trump with shift to the right  
Sturgeon accuses Sturgeon thinks R. Davidson sold out Sturgeon announces IndyRef; Sturgeon warns Brexit con: Nicola Sturgeon SHUT THE ****UP 
Prime Minister May will visit Bahrain this week to forge new ties for the U.K. after Brexit  
Nationalism also blinds you to the fact that your solution - independence - would do more damage to working people than Brexit. 
With top Tories warning a 'hard Brexit' could cost them the next election, is it just too risky an option for the Government and the nation?  
Brexit leader: I'll do 'whatever I can' to make US, UK closer under Trump  
Brexit: the wages of incompetence - in there a competent in the house? ...  #Brexit.  
He has nothing to say that 17+ million people wish to hear. All these MPs trying to derail Brexit walk a very fine line - to obscurity  
Non-elite multi-millionaire Arron Banks showing how he would behave were he a judge. Fortunately he isn't one. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Brexit arrogance exposes ineptitude of Tory elite | Kevin McKenna  
Nicola Sturgeon says Tories want to silence Scotland's voice over Brexit  
In nationalist/racist politics lies are like fouls in football - if they help your side win they are good.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Big question whether low educated old whites who voted for Trump will lose more than low educated elderly whites who voted Brexit 
Ministers preparing a 16-word Bill to prevent pro-EU politicians thwarting Brexit #brexit 
Useless Mayhem govt won't reveal their Brexit plan as they don't have one a strategy will change depending on counter offers so laughable 
#Brexit, #Trump, & beyond. A peaceful world of free & sovereign nations is beginning to bloom in the ashes of our scorched globalist world. 
Yes we have.. treaty by treaty political control of the UK has been given away to an expansionist imperial EU!It stops now... #Brexit  
#Hawking: Trump’s victory & Brexit come at ‘the most dangerous time in the history of the human race’ 
I am amazed, I am as angry today about Brexit as ever. Teresa May does not govern for me, she is a religious head case. 
Great stuff @RossCameron4 the "Oracle of Outsiders" predicting a Trumpish wave to hit Austria & Italy with Brexit+ replicated thereafter 
Labour must spell out its vision for Brexit. And Gordon and I have an idea.   
Update: The story that Mrs May has threatened to sack any Minister who leaks stories over Brexit came from a 'leaked memo' 
Indyref2 more likely after Tory Brexit snub to ScotlandFull story in tomorrow's paper 
Really am fed up with Know Nothing reporters on #SkyPapers telling us how Brexit shld go no Hard or Soft Just F**king OUT of the cursed EU 
Observer front page, Sunday 4 December 2016: Hard Brexit stance could lose us power, say top Tories  
Support the UK fishermen as the whole industry was destroyed by EU. Support #Brexit & lets take back control for them.  @thefishmish 
Brexit will lead to cheaper food if right policies adopted, says OBR official.   
How many people have to be raped, killed, assaulted before lefties see what islam IS? #IoVotoNo #Brexit #FPÖ #Hofer #AfD #PVV 
Top Tories: hard Brexit stance could lose us next election  
Very interesting Brexit story from @ShippersUnbound & @STJamesl 
Sunday Telegraph tomorrow: Furious row over plot to smear Boris and undermine Brexit.  
They want to sack people for leaking Brexit info. How about actually telling the country what you're up to... 
. @cammcgillivray yes, we know Labour now backs brexit. We believe people must get vote on deal, not giving gov a blank cheque like Corbyn.  
#2016WillBeRememberedFor Leo's OscarBrexitBrangelinaSurgical StrikesDonald TrumpDemonetisationColdplay In IndiaFree JioRaGa Hacked 
Corbyn showed no leadership in referendum & hasn't on anything else. His failure to oppose this conservative brexit government is shameful  
Mail on Sunday front page:Panic in No10 over Cabinet Brexit leaks#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Farmers breed 10-foot Brexit turkeys. Only in tomorrow's @thesundaysport 
Labour's poor result was because they no clear message & awful leadership.The Lib Dems having a plan on Brexit is leadership not opportunism  
If we'd known about Saara Aalto in June, maybe #Brexit wouldn't have happened? #xfactor 
Brexitannia is responsible for some of the world's greatest works of fiction including Hamlet, Pride and Prejudice and the Brexit manifesto. 
Observer front page:Hard Brexit stance could lose us power, say top Tories#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Cameron and the other TRAITORS Told us exactly what we were voting for So get on with BREXIT  
U.K. businesses have delayed or cancelled business investments worth more than £64 billion since #EURef #Brexit 
REMAIN'S contempt for BREXIT is excessive. I hope they & economists have proof. If not they've driven the economy into a vortex of despair 
Tony Blair’s back! And he wants to block Brexit:  
#Brexit, #Trump, #LePen?The barbarians are well past the gates.#GuardTheLibraries 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage says he's willing to help Trump "formally" or "informally"  
The Brexit fightback? We don't need a General Election. We do need Theresa 2 stand up & lead us out of this malaise.  
The Brexit debate – flailing around in a pool of shit  @JonWorth's pungent week on Twitter. 
'50 Shades of Brexit' tells the story of a man's relationship with himself. "It's a narcissistic shambles," say reviews.  
#sleafordandnorthhykeham  Only  #Libdems want to stop madness of #Brexit It MATTERS to Lincolnshire folk. Agriculture matters! Trade !  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage: I'll do "whatever I can" to help Trump improve US-UK relationship  
This game was our punishment to West Ham fans for voting Brexit 
Corbyn says Labour will seek an amendment to the Brexit bill which experts think could delay the whole process.  
Thanks to the lying right-wing press the British public are utterly misinformed on a number of major issues.#Brexit #StopFundingHate 
Brexit campaign poster.  
So this poster in Labour HQ in Sleaford says their candidate will vote for Article 50 and fight for Brexit. Opposition... What opposition?  
One odd feature of this debate: Banks cited Britain's world renowned laws & legal system as key UK competitive advantage in his Brexit book  
Leaving the EU’s single market will give us stronger powers over prisoner deportation:  #Brexit 
Of course those who voted #Brexit were solely focused on the single market....Absolutely nothing to do with #immigrationIn reality.... 
She should be apologising for collaborating with Farage to get us into the mess of Brexit  
Leave voter on #BBCQT: 'Throughout the whole referendum...we were told that leaving the EU means leaving the single market.' #Brexit  
JUST WANTED TO SAY THAT YOU #BREXITEERS ARE ABSOLUTELY THE BEST.WE STOOD UP TOGETHER AND I NEVER THOUGHT I'D SEE THE DAY !#Brexit #EUref 
★ ★ ★ #poll ★ ★ ★ First #Dutch referendum, then #Brexit, then #Trump, now #Italy and #Austria are facing their political shockwave. 
Could Labour's Brexit bill amendments delay Article 50?  
Some common sense on democracy. Didn't just happen on a single day in June. The view of the majority changes. Like governments. #brexit  
A lot of folk moan about how we're going about Brexit. One person did something about it. Gina Miller deserves a gong in New Year's honours. 
-Really? Well, THAT is useless & pointlessWe don't want you to amend Brexit BillWe want you to BLOCK Brexit Bill 
Brexit Twitter is a late middle aged man, living in France, head veins bulging, fist raised shouting "Debate with meeeeee" for all eternity. 
Multinational corporations like @Virgin are funding a campaign to stop Brexit. Sign up to help us stop them:  
Keep the facts before your face: the #referendum was advisory. 37% of the electorate voted for it. That's 26% of the population. No #Brexit. 
#Leavers are banking on the pusillanimity & timidity of MPs to support the madness of #Brexit in a parliamentary vote. Are they right, MPs?  
Forget Brexit MPs! Time now for pro-EU MPs to capture the moment. The UK urgently needs you to join together to create a new EU alliance.  
'@paulnuttallukip in Sleaford today - only UKIP will give you the clean Brexit North Kesteven voted for  
Hard Brexit? Try a hard Xmas by Matt - political cartoon gallery  
If @LibDems stay on message - opposing A50, require Ref on terms of Brexit, w option to Remain, party can form maj Gov w 2/3 of Remain vote  
Gina Miller On Justice, Brexit And Being "Hated"  
Gina Miller vs Theresa May: The Making of an Anti-Brexit Star  
Pleased @DanielJHannan has broken for greater control by Parliament and less by the Executive. "Never" presumably includes over Brexit?  
Remain won't win. They just lost. Nothing in the entire world that they do will change that fact. So, let's unite in progress: FULL #Brexit. pic.twitter.com/keFhMONPiP 
Church of England jumped on 'middle-class Brexit bandwagon', bishop says  
The rise of Trump and Britain’s Brexit vote come at “the most dangerous time in the history of the human race,”  
Brexit has made young Britons more interested in the economy  
Hey @timfarron - more people voted to leave the EU than voted for your political party. Stop trying to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
If #Article50 isn't triggered by the 31st March 2017 would you support a series of Brexit Strikes? 
MPs who do not commit to voting for Article 50 unconditionally are guilty of delaying and frustrating Brexit  
Anti-Brexit Parties would win 150 fewer seats than Leave parties at a general election. Mr Farron needs a new plan! 
But when we had battle with far right populism in the Brexit Vote,  he was useless, wasn't speaking to the converted  
As matter of principle & commitment to maintain UNITED Kingdom, MPs shld recognise insufficient mandate for Brexit  
Brexit leader: I'll do "whatever I can" to make the US and UK closer under Trump  
So far, everything suggests that the UK Government will simply disregard the interests of #Scotland in their approach to #Brexit  
Recent visit convinced me that Berlin will offer no flexibility on Brexit. Priority is to hold 27 together. 
Surely, Eddie Jones has to take over Brexit negotiations now. 
Letters: All Brexit MPs in Remain seats should follow Zac Goldsmith's example  
Good Q: After Richmond by-election, shouldn't all Brexit MPs in Remain constituencies resign? @Independent Letters  
#Hawking: Trump’s victory & Brexit come at ‘the most dangerous time in the history of the human race’ 
READ: @Nigel_Farage says the EU hasn't learned its lesson from Brexit and because of that it's doomed to fail. 
So what percentage of exports from Scotland to England then head to Europe or beyond and are counted as UK exports? #indyref2 #brexit  
17m out of 65m isn’t 'the will of the people' and deciding against Brexit isn’t 'defying' anything. It’s just exercising common sense. 
WATCH: Gisela Stuart appeals to Blair and other remoaners to stop sabotaging Brexit and instead work with us to get the best deal we can.  
BREXIT ELECTION: There is a huge appetite in the country to remove all the quisling Remoaniac MPs, Labour, LD & Tory Elite, Bring it on.  
Are you angry at the Mail's latest attack on judges over Brexit? Then it's worth watching @MaajidNawaz's view.  
Ex @sainsburys boss Justin King dubs #Brexit 'a car crash of epic proportions' (£)  
The pain of #Brexit is the key to stopping it. Read more at:  
Maybe there's a guy named Brexit Mean and they're talking about his Brexit.  
This week in #Brexit...  
On route to Sleaford to help @VAylingUKIP win the up coming by-election. Only #UKIP will ensure that #Brexit means exit. Never trust a Tory! 
Yet another unjustifiable attack on the independent UK judiciary by the vitriolic Daily Mail #Brexit  
Theresa May's government seems to have little idea of the scale and complexity of negotiating any kind of Brexit.  
For the EU, tomorrow is more important than Brexit  
happy to work with those who oppose the extremist Brexit madness from both right and left 
We're looking at a hard Brexit that'll take more than 2 years, IMF's Christine Lagarde says  
David Davis has emerged as the most impressive of the Brexit ministers: my Sunday article @IndyVoices 
#bbcaq My rant on Brexit @BBCAnyQuestions @sarahjolney1 @LibDems MPs have every right to vote against A50 I would say Remain MPs have a duty 
The Tories insult:Scotland over BrexitPoland over hate crimesIreland over welcoming SturgeonIndia over visasItaly over Prosecco 
Found the ultimate christmas present for a brexit voter in homesense  
On #marr tomorrow: New @UKIP leader @paulnuttallukip, Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer & Foreign Secretary @BorisJohnson 9am BBC1 
Whilst I respect Theresa May's belief in god, in seeking help from god in resolving Brexit she might find that god is a bit more global. 
The Daily Mail trying to create a climate in which government power is unconstrained by the law. That is fascism.#Remain #Brexit  
Alright Labour. You wanna try and block Brexit in Parliament? Go ahead - May will call an election and you will have to answer to the people 
Oh, fair enough, Steve. An online poll of 9,000 people *definitely* overrules the actual EU referendum. Brexit  plans are now off, folks.  
Against the background of Brexit & many domestic challenges Santa says Government is firmly on the right track.  
The remain forces who want to stop Brexit will not give up or rest, so we can't either. Stay vigilant! 
'Brexit effects North, South, East and West!! It will effect Kerry as much as it will effect Derry!' @M_AndersonSF #SFwomen 
Hi @UKIP. Why does your manifesto pledge that "5% of the electorate can demand a referendum on any issue" exclude the issue of Brexit terms? 
Grinding out some serious issues at  @StrangersCoffee.Brexit already hurting the coffee import/export trade.But bustling 2day #SmallBizSatUK 
Brexit is pointless if Britain stays in the Single Market, says top economist Professor Patrick Minford.  
Make no mistake wages fall in direct proportion to how weak trade unionism is not by the amount of newly arrived immigrants. #trump, #brexit 
Labour cannot enforce an A50 Bill amendment without contemplating blocking Brexit. It is that simple and that binary  
Labour to table official amendment to derail hard Brexit  
Following Brexit & Trump, tomorrow Italy votes in referendum & Austria votes for a left-wing or far-right president. High stakes for Europe. 
It's like an advent calendar for constitutional law nerds #brexit #Art50 
British students will have to pay to go to German universities after Brexit  
Britain's Attorney General prepares to head to the Supreme Court in the latest round of the Brexit battle  
Number of casualties is not *statistical* data/estimates? Explains Brexit: Brussels IYIs shd limit activities to driving Uber c (carefully).  
Let me give meaning to "Brexit" if I can?Etymology uncertain but apparently Brexit means "Brexit"Synonyms:disingenuousflaweddisaster  
With @wL4eu in Ealing Broadway where lots of people Christmas shopping concerned at hard Brexit and buoyed by Zac defeat in Richmond  
Was the Richmond Park byelection the start of the Brexit fightback? | Ian Jack  
NEWSFLASH smug remainers and EU elites #Richmond by-election was a vote against Goldsmith not Brexit. Back to your drawing boards fools. 
Three Dominos: #Brexit, @realDonaldTrump & #Italy this Sunday..... 
Watch @Ella_M_Whelan defend #Brexit and rubbish claims of 'misled' #Leave voters on @Channel4News last night.  
Andrew Neil slams governments plan to keep funding EU even after Brexit.  
Push for hard Brexit led to Richmond Park win, says new Lib Dem MP. There is no such thing as hard Brexit.   
The 'Brexit dividend' DOES exist: Britain to benefit from extra £32BILLION when it leaves the EU:   
U failed to predict 2008 Global meltdown;U got #Brexit wrong;U again got #Trumped,after rooting for Clinton;U think u have credibility left? 
Owners of Daily Mail issue warning that Brexit may adversely affect their profits. Something sweet about that.... 
Discussing working together to get best for UK & EU from Brexit negotiations with Czech Foreign Minister @ZaoralekL 
#Brexit'ers: Turkeys who voted for Christmas. And now that Christmas will be 14% more expensive. Ho! Ho! Ho!  
I voted leave based on my studying what was then called EEC law in my degree. But im just a brexit thicko obvs 
Let's severe our ties with the EU. Let's Take Back Control!#Brexit#UKIP#Article50 
Mail Supreme Court Assault BUSTED: brazen attempt to bully judges into submission on #Brexit  
The Brexit case hits the Supreme Court on Monday. Here's everything you need to know in plain English  
Indebted to Mail for exposing fact that Supreme Court judge is director of Royal Academy whose guest conductor is anti Brexit. Shocking. 
Nope, I knew Leave meant LEAVE. And I voted #Brexit.  
A soft Brexit for the UK as a whole is a better deal for Scots than a bespoke Scottish deal that creates a hard border at the Tweed. 
Anti-Brexit Bob Geldof: I Led the Booing of Mike Pence at Hamilton  
Brexit is like being sold a quick and permanent weight loss solution, then opening the box to find only a rusty saw to cut off your own legs 
The Great Wages Depression (Brexit can seriously damage your wealth)  
EU Censors: Anti-Brussels protests are a CRIME - fears at Eurocrat crackdown on 'dissent'  #Brexit  
Anti-Brexit surge:* YouGov   *This is in backward-sloping ironic typeface 
I used to think the whole "BBC weather map controversy" was an accident, but I'm now seriously beginning to wonder. #indyref2 #brexit  
#Brexit is a race to the bottomTheresa May: Britain to have lowest corporation tax rate in G20 via @PoliticsHome 
I will give Austria an EU referendum: Nobert Hofer to allow Austrian people to LEAVE EU  #Brexit 
Construction in Brexit recovery as industry grows at fastest rate for eight months.  
From Richmond to Brexit to Trump, mainstream politicians have treated the voters like idiots, writes @alexmassie  
Dear Jeremy75% of your/my constituency voted against #Brexit. You may think your seat is safe, but #RichmondPark shows it isn't.Wake up. 
Flawed mathematics is a Brexit-shortcoming; another, significantly, is the failure to recognise huge importance of our place within the EU.  
Unelected judges interpreting the law = BadUnelected newspaper editors judging the judges = GoodOr not? #brexit 
Of all Brexit straw-clutching, the idea that ACKTCHUALLY Olney should have won #RichmondPark with a larger than 21% swing, is the funniest. 
This is a fascinating graph showing the Conservative seats vulnerable to an anti-Brexit campaign.  
'Just GET ON with Brexit' Labour MP brands Tony Blair 'MISGUIDED' for disrupting democracy  
These very simple concepts are very easy to understand. This is why judges are not #enemiesofthepeople #brexit  
We're not the only ones who think David Davis has gone soft on Brexit. Andrew Neil appears to agree.  
Leading QC @JolyonMaugham warns #brexit will break the Union if Scots are ignored 
Nigel Farage to make his 33rd appearance on Question Time next week & we wonder why we are in such a Brexit mess BBC have lot to answer for 
So Richard Branson demands the UK stays in the EU and the government must ignore the will of the people over #Brexit. Why?  
It's probably impossible for Britain to leave EU within 2-year time frame, Ireland's PM says  
Can you imagine what Spitting Image would have made of all this Brexit chaos?How I miss that show !!! 
Brexit, Trump, Le Pen and the rise of the right: the anger goes global  
Can it get any madder: Neat insight into Richmond by-election anti-Brexit campaign: Revealing quote from Theresa May  
When the British people rise up as one to win the Brexit vote.Only for some bloody shitehawk to challenge our glorious victory. pic.twitter.com/EKkWMxOMK5 
The 11 unaccountable individuals who could thwart the will of the majority on Brexit  
My cartoon - cross-party study warns hard #Brexit will damage ‘almost every sector’ of UK economy#r4Today  
Why Theresa May is going to court to avoid a Brexit vote in Parliament  
Attorney General says judges who ruled against Gov on Brexit should not "relegate the outcome of the referendum"  
Big decisions to be made in #Italy and #Austria tomorrow.  'No' vote in #Italy could lead it out of Europe. #Brexit  
Audience member on BBCQT tells Tim Farron: 'We have to leave the single market to leave the European Union.' #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Stop #Brexit.  
I am becoming to think that there are good moral, political, economic and democratic reasons for there to be a second #Brexit referendum 
So the best approach post Brexit aka Armageddon would be to join the European Union? Well that's sensible isn't  it?  
"Four reasons Zac Goldsmith's defeat in Richmond could hobble Theresa May's Brexit plans"  
Anne Applebaum in the WashPost: Teresa May is Kerensky to the Brexit Revolution  
The one afternoon BREXIT negotiation.Commission do you want to opt for tariff free trade with the UK ?Do we go the WTO route?Choose now. 
Could come in handy for the Brexit negotiations -   
Death threats and abuse for woman leading Brexit court fight  
The gvmt's dismissive approach to Scotland on Brexit is the same as to Remain; without scrutiny and debate, we risk so much.Superb analysis  
Why Theresa May is going to court to avoid a Brexit vote in Parliament  
Sturgeon visit offers glimpse into Brexit diplomacy game  
This viral newspaper comment nails Britain after Brexit perfectly   
4. The Mail, like so much in the world of Brexit, seeks to have its cake and eat it: lawyers must follow the result but cannot challenge it. 
Video: Andreas Antonopoulos on London Real  via @YouTube #bitcoin #centralbank #fiat #brexit #currency 
David Cameron told us that Brexit meant leaving the single market.@Conservatives should honour this pledge. It's what we voted for. 
What if Trump, Brexit, & right-wing ascendancy globally are all signs of the end stage of Western capitalism (rooted in racism/colonialism)? 
Impressive stuff from an #OpenJustice perspective from @UKSupremeCourt in advance of the #Article50 #Brexit hearing.Great public engagement.  
How this Brexit story has to end - me in today's The Times (please read). (). 
LIVE | Former British Prime Minister @David_Cameron reflects on #Brexit and the western world in crisis at #HTLS  
#Brexit is not a dead end for Britain. The British people have made their choice and now it's our turn to deliver it: @David_Cameron 
.@David_Cameron in 1st speech outside Europe post-Brexit, strikes note of optimism: not the end of globalization.  
Seduced and Betrayed by Donald Trump .  Ditto Brexit and Boris/Farage.    Classic Neo-fascist approach 
Nearly half of Germans want to hold a Brexit-style referendum  via @MailOnline 
UK's Supreme Court set for highly-charged Brexit case  
Attorney General prepares for Supreme Court Brexit battle  
after Brexit, we might also be witnessing Frexit, with france exiting the EU, thus reducing it's strength to 26.12/× 
@Nigel_Farage #Brexit shown us in America we could take our country back as well. GOD bless you and the people of GREAT BRITAIN. 
speaking from the Post Brexit hellhole that is the UK, Trump was a double blow in a truly awful year 
How the internet gave birth to "troll politics," Brexit and president-elect Trump  
What next after landmark UK Brexit court case?  
I CALLED #BREXIT PASSINGCALLED #TRUMP WINNING IF 330 RTWILL CALL THE #italyreferendum#NUMEROLOGY#ASTROLOGY 
Really interesting #socialmedia analysis of #brexit vote and #sociallistening 
Elitist church can't understand Brexit voters, says bishop  via @MailOnline 
Umm....Young people didn't vote for Brexit or Trump......  
_"More serious diplomatic manoeuvring underlay Sturgeon’s entire trip– her 1st to Dublin since becoming FM"#Brexit 
Brexit Figure Nigel Farage Calls for New US-UK Trade Deal  
'Stop INSULTING voters!' Leavers AND Remainers DID say Brexit meant no more single market   
Brexit EU customs union deal possible - trade minister. The betrayal of #brexit is fully underway   
If sticking to facts and common sense would apply from day one, 99% would vote for #Brexit.This is not the case. 
I hate Brexit with all my heart. I hate everything about it. I hate the word Brexit & all its meaningless meanings. I really hate Brexit. 
>Brexit WILL break the Union if Scots are ignored#ReverseTheReferendum 
British Construction activity reaches eight-month high as delayed projects resume after Brexit vote  
If there are any black American women suffering in the wake of Brexit I'm here if you need to talk  
Brexit: all you need to know (not) - media errors galore ...  #Brexit.  
12. The gamble of Trump & Brexit is that as free agents USA & UK can get better deals than as part of international order. A big gamble. 
I don't know why Brexit made me crack up but it did.  
11. Trump is right in seeing Brexit as a parallel -- that was the UK becoming free agent. 
Martin Schulz one of the EU presidents tells us like it is. #Brexit  
Hate the Brexit?  
Paying for access to the single market is not Brexit. #sillyboy 
What Richmond tells us is this: it is Farron and the Lib Dems who are leading the Opposition to May and Brexit, not Corbyn's Labour. 
Another headache for Juncker and Co. It looks like Austria and Italy will put their own cultures & citizens 1st. Are they following Brexit? 
The European Parliament's lead Brexit negotiator is openly mocking the Conservatives   
If you voted #Brexit, you should be made to queue for four hours at passport control next time you visit your timeshare on Costa de Scumbag. 
The LidDems' Brexit champion doesn't know anything about Brexit and refuses to answer questions.  @GuidoFawkes 
the media ran with this same dumb meme after brexit too, despite polls showing only 4% of people regretted voting for it. 
A protest vote against Brexit instead of against Heathrow  
But pro-Corbyn people keep marching the party gallantly towards the #Brexit precipice. Onward to defeat, comrades! @thetimes front page 
That's it in a nutshell. There is no #Brexit without lies & without liars.  
Brexit was tragic, says Bernard Schlink #Newsnight 
Imagine if 2016 started at the end and worked backwards.Trump out. Obama inNo BrexitThe great losses are aliveWhat lovely thoughts. 
'Mr. Brexit' defends #Trump’s Goldman Sachs pick  - @Nigel_Farage on #TheLead 
“The #Brexit debate- flailing around in a pool of shit” - my blog on the last 7 days of Britain’s big political mess  pic.twitter.com/sQEcmWlfCV 
The Liberal Democrats are neither liberal nor demcratic. They are neo-Fascists trying to block Brexit. They will fail to block Brexit. #FAIL 
The UK is full of really decent people, Brexit and the xenophobic aftermath do not speak for the majority, far from it. 
Alastair Campbell is right for once - Theresa May doesn't know what Brexit is & has no idea how to get the best deal for UK. #Newsnight 
With Brexit leading to a decline in the value of the pound, why not spend your vacation in Margate?  
So Newsnight has two remainers in the studio and one leaver down the line. Part of a pattern. That programme is biased against Brexit IMO. 
Britain could continue to trade freely in Europe through the bloc's customs union despite the Brexit vote  
Brexit and everything since proves that Governments should govern not take the easy option and ask unqualified people to govern for them. 
On #HIGNFY tonight UKIP's Suzanne Evans said UK will get everything it wants from Brexit because EU 27 are "totally" reliant on  for trade 
Churchill was an ardent advocate of a US of Europe, and by 1961 he wanted Britain to join the EEC #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Height of gullibility 1st for people to think EU migrants suppress their wages & 2 that a Tory #UKIP #Brexit will make their wages rise. 
Brexitannia has a thriving film industry. Here's a scene from its remake of The Wizard of Oz. 
Olney says push towards hard Brexit led remain Tories to back her. Says MPs shd oppose art 50 if in interest of ppl  
Brexit is the most important issue facing the country. More people think we are wrong than right to Leave.  
Off to do @BBCNewsnight discussion re Richmond and Brexit 
Lib Dems' new MP dragged off-air after Brexit roasting in car crash radio interview  
Starting to think that there are compelling moral, political, economic and democratic reasons for there to be a second #Brexit referendum. 
.@stephensonrich1 none of us did (as  tautology 'brexit means brexit' makes clear). no insult, we were all in dark. disgrace to democracy 
The revolution that gave us Brexit and Trump could be about to hit France |  
Please vote below! Indyref views then (2014) and now? Lets share far and wide to show ispsos yougov survation etc. #brexit indyref2 
i judge success of our campaign on weekly basis. Is #brexit less likely than it was a week ago? Every week the answer is yes. #wewillremain 
How the internet gave birth to "troll politics," Brexit and president-elect Trump  
Anyone who claims to know how Brexit will turn out is wrong. Keir Starmer’s greatest virtue is in understanding this  
The best political blog out there right now. The place to go to survive Tories, Brexit and Trump. @all_thats_left_ 
All these Trump Regrets do illustrate a strong parallel between our election and Brexit....  
Brexit slap down as Jacob Rees-Mogg brands Lib Dems and Tim Farron @timfarron 'impotent' 
Brexit involved somewhere. 100%. 
Lib Dems' new MP dragged off-air after Brexit roasting in car crash radio interview  
Davis Davis: Brexit can open up new and exciting opportunities. Even the @EU_Commission says market growth is going to come from outside EU. 
Today's @YouGov poll is first to report more saying #Brexit decision wrong than right - albeit only by 1 point.  
When it comes to #brexit wishful thinking from #TheresaMay's Gov't isn't a plan but a recipe for disaster. 
Some of our members with @Keir_Starmer  today. Interesting discussion on the direction of #BREXIT #DYL 
"Irony may be Brexit saves us being in bed with far right fascist gov'ts in Europe. Fascists in Britain are a miniscule force" @talkRADIO 
VIDEO: James pinpoints the real obstacle to Brexit - and it's not remain supporters  
#Brexit was fantastic and final. No by-election in a posh borough will change that. Neither will an anti democratic libdem. 
The Italian equivalent to Brexit could bring the Eu crashing down! Pod Two#FreeSpeech 
London votes Remain in EU ReferendumKingston votes Remain in EU ReferendumKingston votes for Remain MPLib Dems claim it defies Brexit?! 
One of the reasons why people voted Leave was to unshackle the UK from the stagnating EU economy #Brexit #ChangeBritain 
Liam Fox met WTO Director Roberto Azevêdo to discuss our future WTO membership. Azevêdo offered his "full support" in the Brexit transition.  
#TacklingSanctions, UK government's Brexit strategy shambles and Chilcot: The SNP's Week In Westminster  
There are known knowns,There're known unknowns,There're unknown unknowns,& there's Con Govt's Brexit Plan. 
watch out brexit MP's, remainers have proved to #NotZac that being a brexit supporter will lose you YOUR seat. The people are speaking. #EU 
#RichmondPark is a triumph for LibDems. But that doesn't mean they're up to the task of defeating #Brexit alone  
If #RichmondPark was really about #Brexit, the Leave vote went UP from 27.7% to 45.2%. Devastating for Remainers.  
Can someone tell me how a by-election in an area that voted 70% Remain represents a reversal in national #Brexit sentiment? #RichmondPark 
#RichmondPark: We believe voters will increasingly consider that #Brexit is the wrong choice for #Britain. More at:  
Maybe its not really happening? Like Trump and Brexit? @MBrundleF1 #F1 
Nigel Farage was not at the European Parliament this week to vote on the budget or to lobby MEPs who must ratify any Brexit deal.  
"Remain means Remain" is uncontroversial. Unlike its #Brexit counterpart it does what it says on the tin uncontroversially  
Corbyn-voting friends telling me they're thinking of joining the Lib Dems today because of our clear stance against Brexit #LibDemFightback 
Pro-Brexit Daily Mail now worried Brexit may affect its profits  
Seems very unfair given that it's #Conservatives that caused #Brexit, but I think #Labour the party most likely to be torn apart by it. 
The Lib-Dems have overturned a 23,000 majority in Richmond in a by-election driven by Brexit #SkyNewsTonight 
An important argument: Revitalizing Liberalism in the Age of Brexit and Trump  via @NiskanenCenter 
Great to be welcomed by @SlavekSobotka to #PESinPrague where I will discuss Brexit & beating the populist far right.  
You know what? I think we should sack all these useless MPs & get some decent business minds in to run GB & Brexit!  
You must listen to this: James Pinpoints Real Brexit Obstacle, And It’s Not Remain Supporters @LBC  #brexitshambles 
Over 70% in Richmond voted remain, yet less than 5% voted for the anti-Brexit candidate. Is support for the EU falling in Richmond? 
Brexit is bigger than any single party – Richmond Park has taught us that | Polly Toynbee  
Banks warn Britain they could leave UK unless Brexit staggered over several years: Reuters. Says can't adjust within 2-year EU exit rule. 
Within hours of Richmond victory took @LibDems Brexit Deal Referendum proposal to @GuyVerhofstadt @MalmstromEU #ALDECongress #Remain #prouk 
Shockingly bad interview of new Lib-Dem MP Sarah Olney, who crumbled when challenged over #Brexit, by Julia H-Brewer  
Warning over Brexit  
Leave campaign's prime message was xenophobic rather than economic-from that you can draw your own conclusions on voter motivation. #brexit 
Exclusive: Stagger Brexit over years or we could leave - Banks to Britain  
Lib-Dem Sarah Olney is certainly letting winning a by-election go to her deluded head. Your part in Brexit will be a miniscule one. 
It was therefore perfectly fair to question her claim to have a stronger mandate from voters to block Brexit than EU ref gave for Brexit 3/3 
1/3rd of Tory leave voters backed an open Remain candidate. Brexit's weak mandate crumbles further.  
Every time we say ‘when’ instead of ‘if’, we normalise it. MPs haven’t decided & debated Brexit. So even now it’s WHETHER to do it – not how  
Tory Brexit Minister Backs ‘Soft Brexit’  
Well, the (rich) people (of #RichmondPark) have spoken. So, I guess it's only right & proper to cancel #Brexit and airport expansion now. 
Well its been quite a year. Brexit, Trump, and now @nico_rosberg calls it a day. Frankly, I'm stunned. But I know the toll of this game. #F1 
If you voted Leave you probably think these animals will return to the UK along with King Arthur, Excalibur and Mary Poppins. #Brexit   
Very struck this wk how much UK reputation for good government is being eroded. Brussels folk surprised by ongoing Brexit shambles. 
Sarah Olney gets skewered by radio host on #Brexit hypocrisy, walks out, replaced by spin doctor.  
“Zac Goldsmith, a satisfactory comeuppance for this entitled, insignificant, Brexit trustafarian”  via @PollyToynbee 
Brilliant @UKSupremeCourt page hosting all the key court papers for the Brexit Article 50 case next week:  
An unacceptable #Brexit according to MEP @SkaKeller: The freedom of movement for capital, services & goods but not for people. #EGP25 
Straightforward & good by @JolyonMaugham on Labour, #RichmondPark & Brexit  
BREXIT x_________x  
Bernhard Schlink, author of 'The Reader' talks literature, Brexit and the rise of nationalism. Watch the interview tonight 10:30 BBC Two  
The revolution that gave us Brexit and Trump could be about to hit France | via @AdamShawNY 
The more Tories dismiss a Scotland-Brexit deal, the more it makes #indyref2 the only way to protect Scotland's democratic+economic interests 
When you read the Brexit plan.  
From by-elections to gaffes on #brexit: terrible time for #TheresaMay (via RachaelAFranklin and @InFactsOrg) 
On the #EUReferendum: "The #Brexit campaign highlighted our divisions instead of bringing us together" says @Amelia_Womack at #EGP25 
Confidence in #Brexit GROWS daily as project fear evaporates!"The vast majority of SMEs are untroubled by #Brexit" 
#Italia #Österreich We The People of the World support your fight for freedom: #IoVotoNo   #FPÖ.The tide is turning. Keep fighting.#Brexit  
The #EU's single market is a rip-off. #Britain should keep as far away from it as possible #Brexit ASAP! 
Can we stop wasting everyone's time?This #Richmond was NOT a #Brexit vote! 
Stephen Hawking has delivered a terrifying warning on Brexit  
The priority is clear - moderate voters need to forget party divisions, unite & simply vote for the candidate who represents Remain. #brexit  
Much talk about 'Soft Brexit' - as tho we can simply/freely choose it. But a complete fallacy. As Tusk says: 'it's Hard Brexit or No Brexit' 
"Brexit means breakfast." #hidethesausage @ThePoke 
We will continue to work on a cross-party basis to fight a hard #Brexit - inc keeping Britain in the Single Market  
.@NicolaSturgeon speaks out against arrogant dismissal of Scotland's view re Brexit. Says it's not acceptable. #EGP25 
Next week, I will be providing regular analysis of the @UKSupremeCourt Brexit case at the @FT site. 
Gail Lewis talking on being black and a woman in Brexit Britain at @assoc4psychosoc #QofP (photo by @ltorning) 
Apparently there are harder and softer alternatives to Hard & Soft Brexit. The best alternative is no bloody Brexit. 
From Richmond to Brexit to Trump, mainstream politicians have treated the voters like idiots  
"Marginal Brexit vote interpreted in the most radical possible manner " @IanDunt on the weakness of Mrs May 
Richmond by-election result was 'rejection of Hard Brexit', Sadiq Khan says  
Political shocks such as Brexit have led to new interest in the problem posed by regional inequality  
Chef Jamie Oliver condemns #Brexit: ‘It will affect everyone in the food industry’  via @peoplefood 
.@NicolaSturgeon says she and Greens believe Brexit is a democratic outrage. Warns against xenophobia. #EGP25 
Richmond is a wake-up call for Labour's Brexit strategy  
David Davis is going limp on Brexit. We cannot afford to go into these negotiations half-cocked! pic.twitter.com/6YgqS6aP20 
Brexit Briefing: The 48% start fighting back  via @FT 
I think I had more of a handle on Cameron's "Big Society" than I do the Tory plan for Brexit. 
Note to @LibDems . The wealthy suburb of Richmond doesn't speak 4the rest of the country on Brexit. The London bubble doesn't blow up north 
As the Brexit vote was coming through Dimbleby's face went ashen grey & all I kept thinking was 'you legitimised Farage'. 15 times on QT!  
Starting to think that there are compelling moral, political, economic and democratic reasons for there to be a second #Brexit referendum 
All these Leave idiots trying to be clever about a 2nd vote in Richmond Park. You *get* a 2nd vote in 3 years, with Brexit we *never* do. 
Sarah Olney defeats Zac Goldsmith in a contest that was widely seen to reflect public concerns about Brexit  
Brexit vote dents British demand for Spanish property  
IT’S DECEMBER: Time for Mail readers to freak out about baby name trends again. New addition this year; Brexit.  
'Brexit would not isolate Britain' — Sir David Tang, businessman and entrepreneur, Hong Kong. pic.twitter.com/xN2SkofLLv 
Italy isn't quite on the verge of its own Brexit. But its Sunday referendum still matters a lot for Europe.  
. @NicolaSturgeon arriving at the @europeangreens council for her speech on EU, Brexit and cooperation among progressives  
Irish PM Enda Kenny says he wouldn't want Britain to "cherrypick" during Brexit talks  
Brexit is bigger than any single party – Richmond Park has taught us that - as @pollytoynbee socks it to them all!  
Growing up I was told that 'Biscuit means biscuit' - but I find it only does about half the time. Which doesn't bode well for your #Brexit  
Tellls people to respect democracy, labels people Remoaners who disagree with her on Brexit. Proceeds to moan about a by-election result   
Already reading so many #trumpgrets. This really is our #brexit moment, isn't it? 
Panel discussion between Ambassadors of the Visegrad Group #V4 on post-#Brexit Europe. 5 Dec at @KingsCollegeLon.  
Brexit vote dents British demand for Spanish property  
Watch: "Leave supporters are shutting down debate because they can't agree what Brexit actually means!"  
#LibDems vow to fight against a "hard #Brexit" after their win in the #RichmondPark by-election 
Genuine Q: Is there a single Brexit politician we can respect? Why on earth wd we be convinced by this bunch of shoot-from-the-hip zealots?  
Lib Dems' new MP Sarah Olney dragged off-air after #Brexit roasting in car crash radio interview.   
Correct. We were in the UK the week of Brexit. Ppl were begging me, 'Don't elect Trump!' I assured them we wouldn't. 
The 25th Council of the @europeangreens is taking place in Glasgow this weekend. #brexit is top of the agenda #egp25 
First came Brexit, then came Trump. Now, Italy faces its own political shockwave  
Sir Keir Starmer visits Steam Machine microbrewery in Aycliffe to talk brexit  
Brexit is there too?   
#RichmondPark shows that Labour is on a road to irrelevance under pro Brexit Corbyn & McDonnell. Labour will lose London under these two. 
Here is how UK Tory chancellor is viewed in Scotland. In contrast the Scottish government is working to protect our place in Europe #Brexit  
The Richmond by-election is not a mandate to reverse Brexit - @TheScepticIsle -  pic.twitter.com/HHHJRtnH7B 
According to the Lib Dems, 20,000 votes in Richmond is a mandate against Brexit, but 17.4 million in favour of it isn't. 
Shock news as it emerges faceless eurocrats can speak English, use emojis & have a working knowledge of sarcasm. Brexit in crisis. 
Daily, Brexit complexity emerges. UK fd sector admits it needs 1m foreign workers  Will brexiters pick UK fruit&veg ? 
Whether it’s Brexit or Trump, populists are such sore winners | Nesrine Malik  
I see the Brexit negotiations are proceeding amicably...  
IDS, like many Brexit MPs, doesn't deal in reality or facts, Mr Vehofstadt. Keep calling these idiots out. 
NEWS! Infinite monkeys with infinite typewriters struggling to come up with Brexit plan  
BEIS Civil Servants Forced to Embrace Brexit:  
"Tories ready to betray 17.4m people who voted for #Brexit" says UKIP MEP Tim Aker on govt considering paying for single market access  
Guy Verhofstadt " I finally have something to talk about with brexit negotiator David Davis" 
Lib Dems' new MP dragged off-air after Brexit roasting in car crash radio interview.  
EU immigration has Britain at BREAKING POINT and Brexit must put a stop to it, blasts Lord  
The Richmond Park by-election result may show that support for Brexit is growing, says Ross Clark   
Richmond victory helps mend the Brexit heartbreak  
Exactly the position of the Scottish Tories in every #Brexit debate in @ScotParl 
Thanks to #Brexit social media has given the most stupid people a voice and influence rarely found in history....it's scary... 
Brexit killed me out here  
It usually comes quite fast. Was the next day for Brexit.Also, I have no sympathy for someone who just didn't listen. 
Lib Dems' new MP dragged off-air after Brexit roasting in car crash radio interview  
If @LibDems thinks that the wealthy borough of Richmond speaks for the rest of the country they are seriously deluded & certifiable #Brexit 
A clear, sensible & logical #Brexit strategy for Labour by @JolyonMaugham for the New Statesman - FAO @Keir_Starmer 
Slowly but steadily, the whole nation is turning its back on #Brexit. Time to call it off. #FightToRemain 
All you have done @JuliaHB1 with your clever "interview" is strengthened my resolve to fight Brexit. Nice one! 
Woah. If this poll is to be believed - there's a big shift in the North East back to valuing EU & away from Brexit 
The stunning @LibDems by-election victory in #RichmondPark underlines that there is no majority for a hard #Brexit  
The media cheering leafy, super-wealthy Richmond for possibly saving us from Those People who voted Brexit - so far beyond out of touch now. 
Enjoyed speaking about complexities and pitfalls of #brexit process to Hull University today  
For remainers celebrating the #RichmondParkByelection. Now lets do the other 649 constituencies.. #Brexit   
Whether it’s Brexit or Trump, populists are such sore winners | Nesrine Malik  
To be clear if the 48% want to stop #brexit they are going to have to end austerity first b/c that is what is feeding it. #Richmond #labour 
The celebration of the Richmond vote exposes the ugly class side to the EU debate: wealthy Richmond people seen as better than Brexit mob. 
So 20,000 votes for an anti-Brexit Lib Dem is the dawn of a new politics while 17,000,000 votes against the EU is just a mistake? #Richmond 
Brexit is bigger than any single party – Richmond Park has taught us that | Polly Toynbee  
Will the @LibDems demand 2nd vote in Richmond? They only got 40 odd percent of the vote with a 53% turnout.Remind me of Brexit stats again! 
Bank of England could now move rates in either direction, its chief economist says  
Our railway system is the most efficient in Europe, following the closure of services to remote rural spots like Manchester and Birmingham. 
LeicesterPortugalClevelandCubsBrexitRosbergTrumpGambia/Jammeh Out. etc2016 is not just another year. This has been THE YEAR! 
My @RetailWeek interview on @SmallBizSatUK and Brexit - a Hard Brexit, which I oppose, will hammer small firms!  
North East now wants to STAY in the European Union according to our Brexit poll   
Millions have watched him call out the government and the media over Brexit: James O'Brien made radio go viral 
a perfect summation of exactly where the Labour Party is going wrong on Brexit and immigration from @stephenkb  
Lib Dems vow to fight 'hard Brexit' after Richmond by-election win  
For this month's @ProgressOnline: reflections on Trump, Brexit and my very real concerns about "very real concerns":  
Sitting @ airport, traveling Lisbon -> Zurich. Love hearing all the languages spoken *&* reading abt Brexit'eer heads exploding re Richmond. 
How #Muslim and #Jewish communities need to come together especially post #Brexit. @RabbiWittenberg & Imam Mamadou speak 
Just a hunch but I don't think person sitting close to me on the train is quite over the referendum vote #brexit  
>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>"Brexit is now Britain’s ONLY political issue"#Remain 
Lib Dem's new MP dragged off-air after Brexit roasting in car crash radio interview  
UK government admits it may have to keep paying money to the European Union even after Brexit  
I'm not a Tory but you have been a revelation on Brexit. You have wide supp across the political spectrum on Brexit. 
"I would propose for breakfast - bacon and eggs" @afneil "...let's get back to #Brexit" #bbcdp 
I wrote something with @sarahjkeenan on the dangers of political purity in the face of #fascism  #Brexit #Trump 
One of the biggest banks in the world just dealt a huge blow to Brexit Britain 
Not enough | The rise of Brexit and Trump means Labour must deal with ‘very real concerns’, writes @stephenkb  
You keep going on and on about Hard Brexit, what is a Hard Brexit? @afneil asks @timfarron #bbcdp 
Politicians need to get on with Brexit!  
"Broadly speaking, it was about Brexit" says @timfarron #richmondparkbyelection who adds party polling was "spot on" 
"Overseas companies have cut their investment in  UK for first time in 8 years" @Bloombergtv#Uncertainity#Brexit 
Theresa May says now that Brexit means Bremaining in the Single Market.What's the point of getting out in the first place, then? pic.twitter.com/wwLyK9L9YD 
Richmond Park shows that a progressive alliance against Brexit is possible - if Labour gets on board  
Jammeh loses #GambiaDecides, ending 22yr rule. And we thought Brexit & Trump were the big electoral shocks of 2016.  
Archbishop: In Brexit, Well-being Matters More Than The Economy  
The best political blog out there right now. The place to go to survive Tories, Brexit and Trump. @all_thats_left_ 
Great to see the so-called 'mandate' for blocking Brexit taken to pieces by @JuliaHB1 
Hilarious how @LibDems are getting over excited on #RichmondPark result, forgetting Tories did not stand! Real issue was Heathrow not Brexit 
Richmond is a wake-up call for Labour's Brexit strategy, says @JolyonMaugham  
Richmond By-Election - "For the first time, the principle of BLOCKING Brexit has been endorsed at the ballot box." 
World economy in 2030 will be shaped by China, US and EU. UK influence will be much diminished as a result of #Brexit  
Tim Farron said, earlier on Sky, that a 'soft' Brexit was the only way to keep peace. Peace? What was he instituting ... or threatening? 
Richmond Park marks the start of a new, cross-party rejection of Brexit | Hugo Dixon  
UK parliamentary byelection delivers shock result after Brexit becomes the main issue  
Remain voters feel "airbrushed out of the equation" after #Brexit vote, @nick_clegg says  
There's massive frustration amongst the millions who voted #Brexit because we have a dithering Govt that at heart does not want #Brexit 
READ: Labour's leading Leave figure explains why we need a 'Hard' Brexit to stop Remoaners sabotaging the process.  
"The current debate in this country is a harmful mixture of dishonesty and delusion" - my speech on Brexit yesterday  
Day 19 of our cross-Parliament #Brexit campaign. A question a day, in both Parliaments, until we have clarity.  
Sick of being told I'm undemocratic in fighting #Brexit.Fighting Brexit IS my democratic right and I'll exercise it thank you very much!! 
Danish People's Party signals support for leaving EU  #Denmark #EU #Brexit  
Looking forward to a day meeting local businesses in the North East to discuss Brexit with @PhilWilsonMP & @JennyChapman 
Surge in EU nationals seeking British residency after Brexit vote. And the government isn't sure how many!!  
We're delighted to announce that we have officially launched the APPG on a better Brexit for Young People. Follow: @appg_brexit   
The media is telling Brits 20,000 posh twats in Richmond represent the country better than 17.4 million Brexit voters. #RichmondPark 
Funny how people in Richmond voted against "anti-immigrant Brexit hysteria," while choosing to live in the whitest part of London. 
Richmond Park marks the start of a new, cross-party rejection of Brexit | Hugo Dixon  
As his job title might suggest "Leave Means Leave" chairman Richard Tice has the most Brexit haircut on earth.  
Pro remain Tory MPs on slim majorities who've "fallen into line" behind May Brexit - it's time to wake up & step up#RichmondPark 
Farron: Richmond Win is Rejection of Trump, Brexit and 2015 Election   
That's why they're floundering now & being pro Brexit. Immigration is inevitable in modern world Social cohesion needs courage of conviction 
A 'shockwave against Brexit' in one of the most pro-remain seats in the country?  
Because Brexit was a calm rational knowledge led campaign and in no way a tantrum whatsoever.  
My piece on Richmond for @IBTimesUK - people more worried about Brexit disaster than Heathrow. May subtlety needed  
Zac Goldsmith's #RichmondPark defeat means victory for a campaign that wants to stop Brexit  
Fears are rising that Italy may be stumbling into its own Brexit moment  
David, 17m people voted for #Brexit. The UK population is 65m. There is neither majority nor mandate in that advisory referendum for Brexit.  
Our #Rights & #Citizenship in post-#Brexit Britain debate starts at 11am! Follow the hashtag #SakharovUK & speakers:  
Four reasons Zac Goldsmith's defeat in Richmond could hobble Theresa May's Brexit plans  
No mention - of course - that most inward migration is from OUTSIDE EU. Doesn't fit the narrative,tho it would save this country from Brexit  
Dear God-Please fast track 2016.Hlaudi, Abrahams,Concourt, Guptas, Eskom, Shebeens,Trump, Brexit, Hawks,state capture. Doom. Tired already 
Another #brexit message (of equal veracity) on side of a bus in London #350million 
"Brexit appears to have cleansed the Lib Dems of the sins of coalition" Worth reading @stephenkb on Richmond 
Some info on preps for next wk’s Article 50 #Brexit case, and a reminder of how youcan keep in touch w proceedings  
Richmond Park result really could make the Tories think twice about 'Hard Brexit'  
Lib Dem winner Sarah Olney confirms she will vote against Brexit. Says she has a "personal mandate" from voters in Richmond. 
Tim Farron says Lib Dem by-election victory is a rejection of 'Brexit, Trump and the last general election'. 
Zac Goldsmith, a prominent Brexit advocate, lost a parliamentary by-election in London  
In a post-Brexit world, #UKvalues based on fear would lead us down a dangerous path. 
Violent crime is high. These men have just mugged some old ladies and are flagrantly showing off their stolen goods. 
CONFIRMED: WE WILL BUILD A BRIDGE TO THE UK AND MAKE THEM PAY FOR IT. EXIT THE BREXIT. UK'S COMING HOME. SCHULZ IRRESISTABLE TO THE BRITS.  
A HUGE defeat for Tories with tactical voting from cross Party anti- #Brexit voters.Difficult not to be pleased! 
How quickly Brexit Tories switched from "remoaners should just shut up" to "people who voted remain rightly feel disgruntled". #RichmondPark 
A brilliant result in Richmond Park for @sarahjolney1. A strong message to @TheresaMay_MP that we demand a say on Brexit and will have it! 
Tories/UKIP biggest mistake is to underestimating the numbers and extent of Remainers anger about Brexit, racism, intolerance.#RichmondPark 
Richmond: Time to end Remain self-censorship? 'No Hard Brexit' = 'better to Remain'. @IanDunt @campbellclaret @RCorbettMEP @InFactsOrg 
It's right to resist Brexit. If a jury was fed lies which were then exposed, you'd hold the trial again not cling to verdict. #RichmondPark 
Aren't the #Brexit'ers angry litttle snowflakes this morning? Poor things. X#LibDems #RichmondPark #richmondparkbyelection 
Todays twitter poll: The lib dem leader says more people now want soft brexit (ie still in single market etc) than hard - what do you want? 
Labour's London stronghold is under threat from the LibDems because of Corbyn & McDonnells pro 'hard Brexit' stance #RichmondPark 
#richmondparkbyelection is the first clear proof that #Brexit will drive away many Tory voters. Tory MPs take heed!#Remain #YesEU 
FULL TEXT of Professor John Finnis' Lincoln's Inn lecture: 'Brexit and the Balance of Our Constitution' -  
This viral newspaper comment nails Britain after Brexit perfectly  
We have some in a Brexit cabinet who advocate FOM another who wishes to give UK money to an unaudited EU budget & a PM who campaigned remain 
The UK is refusing to release the letter that encouraged Nissan to stay in the country despite Brexit  
READ: We could see the EU collapse long before the Brexit process is complete according to Stephen Pollard  
Boris Johnson denies taking one position on immigration in private and another in public  
Tim Farron nails it: “We are carrying the torch for all of those who want a real opposition to this Conservative Brexit government.” 
Brexit, Migrant Workers & the Law—@graciemaybe on how state power creates a paradigm of juridified dispossession 
By alienating most of the young, educated and professional the Tories are writing a medium term political suicide note.#Remain #Brexit 
Next week's Brexit by-election is in #Sleaford. Slightly different from #RichmondPark 
Us Remain Tory Parliamentarians should see this sad Tory loss as a strong signal to UK government there's no popular mandate for hard Brexit  
The Tories should grasp that their blinkered pursuit of #Brexit will lose them millions of young, professional, educated voters.#Remain 
Pro-Brexit Daily Mail now worried Brexit may affect its profits  
Government admits Brexit may not mean Brexit after all: They may pay for access to single market: So Brexit may mean Norway or Switzerland? 
No, their nightmare would be an electable opposition tearing them to pieces over their incompetent and obviously doomed Brexit policy.  
Thomas Poole: Losing our Religion? Public Law and Brexit  
This is good by @IanDunt on May's strategic mistake on Brexit  
Revealed - Theresa May's Brexit strategy. Leader in the new @spectator: 
Worth noting that if Richmond Park was simply a mini-referendum on Brexit, as the Lib Dems wanted, there was actually a big swing to Leave. 
The Libs victory in Richmond has made the Tories clueless Brexit even more uncertain. A new more vocal 'remain' south of England? 
Brexit will not undermine security. We have the best security services in the world. Europe needs us not the other way round! 
No. Moral of Richmond Park is Brexit is toxic once lies are confronted, NHS bus breaks down, real cost is revealed & British values return.  
Pro-Brexit Daily Mail now worried Brexit may affect its profits  
European Parliament's chief #Brexit negotiator cheering the #libdems on. Sure that will go down well with No 10 and Tory benches 
Sturgeon: Westminster must be blocked from any ‘post-Brexit power grab’ Because that's what nationalists do. 
Richmond Park certainly seems to have demonstrated the genius of UK Labour's post-Brexit stance, alienating both the 48% and the 52%. 
LIVE: Watch 'Beyond #Brexit' speech from Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson @ChathamHouse. #CHevents  
The EU's #Brexit negotiator now trolling the government.  
2016 will be known as the year when Brexit happened, Trump was elected, and Estonia voluntarily destroyed its own economy with the beer tax. 
The future of European economy is crucial question in post-Brexit era. Today we discuss it at #ALDECongress with @CiudadanosCs @lugaricano 
"Hard Brexit! Tory incompetence and callousness! Xenophobic mayoral campaigns! UKIP-Tory pacts! You took a helluva beating!" #RichmondPark 
Richmond result shows Brexit debate not over. We are now a Divided Kingdom. Much water to flow under this bridge yet including rapids 
Tim Farron has shown the leadership on Brexit that Jeremy Corbyn has failed to grasp.#RichmondPark 
Richmond result should relieve remorseless hard Brexit pressure on May and a kick in teeth for lightweight Labour  
We're delighted to see the back of pro Brexit Zac Goldsmith who also ran that disgracefully racist mayoral campaign. Well done all. 
Britain could stay in customs union after Brexit, trade minister says  
Let's challenge the #RichmondPark vote in the High Court. Allthough they voted #Lib/Dem, no-one told them what that really meant. #Brexit 
One of the most popular shops in Brexitannia is Poundland, where for just one pound you can purchase three combs or a fifth of a euro. 
Lessons from Richmond: the views of 16m people matter & there is real concern about Brexit. In a democracy their voice must be heard. #the48 
The result in pro-Remain Richmond changes nothing: the UK voted for Brexit & it won't be derailed, says @mometfisher 
Remain candidate in massive Remain area, with great ground game, beats Brexit candidate associated with racism, with no ground game. 
Possible trade solution, shock in #RichmondPark and the rest of Friday's Brexit headlines  
#Brexit must be stopped.#Brexit can be stopped. 
Feckless Zac Goldsmith's defeat in Richmond Park won't stop Brexit, but it kills any chance of an early election  
Richmond is a bubble of privilege & wealth. Another world from the rest of the UK. Thankfully one area won't deflect the uk from Brexit  
Anyone who didn't see the Richmond result coming hasn't picked up how angry Londoners are about Brexit. Which isn't going to go away. 
If half a dozen pro-Remain Tories threaten to cross the floor, #Brexit is over. @LibDems must start courting them #BrexitMustBeStopped 
Hello?We voted Cameron in to cut immigration.We voted Brexit to cut immigration.So why ain't any sod doing anything about it, FFS?  
Those quibbling that the Richmond result is somehow not an anti-Brexit one will soon get over it. 
Another, topical, outing for this on why Labour's Brexit positioning is wrong and how it makes it right.  
Labour should be alert to nightmare scenario of three-way squeeze between Tories, Lib Dems and Ukip. Risk of irrelevancy on Brexit. 
Lib Dem leader @timfarron explains the Party's Brexit strategy in the Richmond Park by-election won by @sarahjolney1 
Brexit backlash! Zac Goldsmith crashes out of politics as he is beaten by Lib-Dem Sarah Olney in #richmondpark  
EU could collapse BEFORE Brexit: Merkel and Tusk 'will destroy bloc as underdogs rise up'  
Caroline Lucas: Lib Dem Richmond victory a "hammer blow" to hard Brexit  
Liberal Democrats celebrate after surprise win over Zac Goldsmith in 'Brexit byelection' - live reaction  
Remain? Brexit? Single Market? What they're working out is the best way to cut wages and public services. 
Public opinion has changed since June. The wheels of democracy are starting to turn. The fight back against Brexit just got real.  
In a Brexit tantrum Richmond has replaced its inspired MP with an utterly dreary Lib Dem (even by Lib Dem standards). Big big shame. Hey ho. 
Note we are not party political, but we are pleased that an anti-Brexit /anti-hard Brexit candidate won in #RichmondPark 
Thank you #RichmondPark - every day is a day closer to the defeat of #Brexit. You have said loud & clear - they shall not pass!  
I claim a full house in Brexit cliche bingo.  
Last night's Lib Dem win shows that in heavily Remain seats where they are 2nd to Brexit Tories there is a quick route back for Lib Dens 
We do not want a ‘hard Brexit’; we do not want to be pulled out of the Single Market; and we will not let intolerance, division and fear win  
Less than 50% of the vote in one constituency of west London does not affect Brexit in any meaningful way.  
Drip, drip, drip as 'Brexit means #Brexit' begins to dissolve: Richmond Park by-election is a Tory disaster  
UK government admits it may have to keep paying money to the European Union even after Brexit  
So in one of most Remain parts of UK in their Brexit by election Lib Dems polled 26.6% of electorate. Hardly storming the Bastille is it? 
The UK is in consitutional crisis! We the people voted to leave the EU & 161 days later, still no Brexit. 
Zac Goldsmith's defeat by Lib Dems in #RichmondPark is a Brexit blow for Theresa May  
The Brexit case hits the Supreme Court on Monday. Here's everything you need to know in plain English  
Congratulations to all LibDems & the sensible voters of Richmond. I can hear career MP's re-juggling their Brexit positions from here.... 
Why Richmond by election matters 1/ First time since Brexit the nationalist Right has lost 
Oh, look, another poll! Now after Brexit and Clinton the polls say that Le Pen is losing in France.  
Richmond by election shows  McDonnell & Corbyn's attempt 2 win favour by being pro Brexit is patronising,cowardly,dangerous & doomed to fail 
According to Spotify, 3,749 dark-humored Brits streamed "It's the End of the World as We Know It" the day after the Brexit vote. 
Conservatives suffer massive blow as public reject their Brexit mandate...  
Both Conservatives & Labour need to look up & listen. The 48% & concerned Brexit voters actually matter. #RichmondPark 
Anna Anna Anna you do realise that over 400 seats are Brexit seats right ? including yours ! 
Before Remainers start claiming anti-Brexit mandate, LDs got fewer votes in absolute and percentage than Remain did in referendum 1/2 
The fantastic result in #RichmondPark is a massive rejection of intolerance & the shambles of #Brexit. #LibDemFightback 
Brussels and Europe Lib Dems congratulate @sarahjolney1 on winning Richmond! Tremendous night for @Britonabroad @Brexpats fighting #Brexit! 
Labour could lose a hell of a lot of seats in London if it goes all out for 'hard' #Brexit.   #richmondparkbyelection 
Delighted Zac Goldsmith lost his seat in #richmondparkbyelection. Just desserts for racist dog whistle London mayoral campaign and Brexit. 
Sensational LibDem win in Richmond Park as voters overturn Zac's 23k majority to reject Tory hard Brexit plans 
Can we cancel Brexit now? 
Brexit & Trump Arrive in France as Hollande Exits.  Europe Struggles with  Moslem Immigration. Mal...  via @audioBoom 
I'm quite happy to tot up this Leave /Remain thing on a constituency by constituency basis if that's what Remainers want. #Richmond #brexit  
Brexit Secretary may relax immigration controls  
The beginning of the fight back against brexit ! Lib. Dems overturn Cons. majority of 20 000 in sensational win ! 
The only choice is between No #Brexit and Hard Brexit. The facts are in: the latter is Wrecks It. Why is the farce is still running? 
Psst! England? If you DON'T Brexit, there's A LOT of upside to being an English-speaking nation Americans can expatriate to now. Just sayin.  
Trump and Brexit can pretty much be summed up in this one sentence tweet from Angela:  
Stephen Hawking: Election of Trump and Brexit vote part of 'most dangerous time' for humanity  
As Brexit Strategy Remains Unclear, a Prominent Advocate Loses Election  
Common sense is winning #Richmond by-election Davis backs soft Brexit in blow to hardliners  
#MPs: could it be that #Remain is the majority sentiment in the country? Most of you are anti-#Brexit: here you have your true mandate. 
May rebuked over Brexit in UK by-election loss  
Curious part of Twitter is salons of pundits who got Brexit & Trump wrong telling the masses to prepare for more disruption & joblessness 
Brexit means… an electoral pummelling. 23,000 Tory majority in Richmond now 1,900 majority for pro-EU Lib Dems.  
Our #RichmondPark victory has sent a clear message to our sleazy hard-Brexit government! We are not taking your nonsense anymore! 
A 20 point swing. Sarah will vote against brexit. Remember @Vote4EU @_Britain4Europe and others who campaigned 4 her 
"We started the campaign talking about Heathrow - We realised for most people Brexit is a much bigger issue"  
#richmondparkbyelection is a great victory not just for Lib Dems but for the 48 per cent. A true blow for Theresa May and for Brexit 
The baton of Cheering Soggy Centrists Up A Bit After Brexit now passing officially from Ed Balls on Strictly to Sarah Olney. 
Truly stunning result for @LibDems @sarahjolney1 with a 21.7% swing. A strong message about Brexit for Govt to consider. Great suff!  
Well done #LibDems will done in #RichmondPark Your win is a victory for everyone fighting for sanity when it comes to #brexit. 
Stunning victory for Sarah Olney and the LibDems in Richmond Park. Many congrats! A clear no to hard Brexit!!!! 
By rejecting Zac the voters have rejected brexit and his nasty divisive mayoral campaign 
#RichmondPark was in part a  #Brexit backlash. #Remain Tories- and even #Labour Remain - came together to say no. #Tory maj now down to 11. 
"Result shows We dont want hard Brexit, to be pulled out of single market or want intolerance to win" @sarahjolney1 
.@LibDems win the #RichmondPark by-election, by 1,872 votes. #Brexit supporter Zac Goldsmith defeated.  
EU citizens in Britain post Brexit vote: ‘I feel betrayed, not at home, sad’  
Do you know what this election won't change - Heathrow expansion or Brexit 
Ok but why is 'Brexit' one of the balls what is going on?   
Both Libdem & Labour sources telling me @sarahjolney1 incredibly overturns @ZacGoldsmith 23000 majority from 18 mo ago in Brexit by election 
Boom! Looks like an anti #Brexit landslide. #RichmondPark 
If we have indeed won, that is a huge victory for @sarahjolney1, for @LibDems, for liberalism & for anti-#Brexit campaign. #fb #richmondpark 
Seems like #RichmondPark voters understand Lib Dem position on Brexit despite the usual attempts to  misrepresent it. #skynews 
The UK is refusing to release the letter that encouraged Nissan to stay in the country despite Brexit  
Brexit?  
Your love of Brexit is Torying this family apart. 
America's #Brexit… RELEGATE Congress, Supreme Court, Fed Judges 2 advisory role ONLY! -gf #dtmag 
Never has a British political party been so deceitfully mis-named as the “Liberal” “Democrats”.Contemptible.#Brexit#RichmondPark#bbctw 
 ? It's predicted the Lib Dems have won this by election by 2000 votes. If true its a huge anti 'hard Brexit' vote... 
Laurie Penny wants 'compassionate' country back after Brexit vote #BBCQT  
Lib Dems on course to win #RichmondPark . Large political upset and could very well influence the nature of Brexit for the better 
Andrew Neil doesn't hide his #Brexit sympathies, does he? BBC's anchor this evening *absolutely* doesn't bother about balance! #RichmondPark 
Theresa May honeymoon has ended in #RichmondPark. Tory #Brexit divisions are going to go crazy. Shame UK doesn't have a proper opposition. 
Brexit is a total basket case. Now 'The people have decided' in Richmond, to remain in the EU. Let Parliament decide, it's why it exists. 
Brexit: reality takes a seat - we will be paying to the EU, post-Brexit ...    #Brexit.  
#isitok that on #bbcqt this primary school teacher from #Wakefield  was empowered enough by #brexit to be openly racist on live TV?  
In 2016 I have woken up to Brexit and President Trump. This time, please let me wake up to @sarahjolney1 MP. #richmondparkbyelection 
We're in a constitutional crisis! 160 days after we voted to LEAVE, and still no Brexit!? 
If Zac loses will be because of Brexit. Have spoken to lots of folk in seat & mayoral campaign hardly featured. Heathrow did & he's popular. 
Grim and divisive debate on #bbcqt tonight. Uncomfortable viewing. #Brexit 
Europeans have tried nationalism on numerous occasions, it has nearly always ended in wars & massive suffering. #Remain #Brexit 
#Brexit.  It's like Shiny Dave shat on his own doorstep, stepped neatly over it and let everyone else tread it down the hall. 
all across #Europe ordinary people are saying #LoveEuropeLeaveEU#EUcrisis #No2EU #Frexit #Italexit #Irexit #Dexit #Brexit #EUspring 
UKIP and Brexit - it's extraordinary. There's so much to discuss - ambulance service, social care etc but no, we get none of that #bbcqt 
SO, @bbcquestiontime. The impartial audience questions tonight:►Brexit.►Brexit.►UKIP.Do you think we're all stupid?#bbcqt 
There seems to be a conspiracy - by #bbcqt - to force brexit down our throats every week. Give us a break ffs! 
IDS, another Brexiter terrified of a vote on a real #Brexit scheme instead of an empty slogan & a bunch of fantasies and lies#Remain #YesEU 
'I really get offended when people say that people who voted for Brexit are stupid. I'm a really clever racist.' 
Too sensitive for 'Government interest' rather. And everyone else who wants to be bribed to stay in a post#Brexit UK.  
Wow that was a new one - 'it was a landslide' Really? Brexit was a landslide? So basic arithmetic is now post-truth too now? #bbcqt 
I don't know what's worse - Brexit, Trump or these two bellends?  
The next question focuses on the reasons people had for voting for Brexit #bbcqt 
The former prime minister of Ireland, John Bruton said that the UK should rethink Brexit #bbcqt  
BEST YEAR EVER:BrexitPresident TrumpFidel Castro DeadTrump saves 1,000 jobsStarbucks CEO resigns#Carrier #Mattis #HowardSchultz 
Someone needs to tell Laurie Penny #bbcqt that controlling immigration is NOT inhumane #brexit 
Brexit: 1m EU citizens in Britain 'could be at risk of deportation'. And????  
WATCH: @TiceRichard answers the question every Leave voter is asking "Why is Brexit taking so long?"  
Immigration figures, Brexit backsliding and a weak Labour Party. Plenty for UKIP to go at in British politics for the foreseeable future. 
@RuthDavidsonMSP complaining about @jeremycorbyn changing his mind over Brexit. Hmm Ruth  just a wee touch of irony there @bbcquestiontime 
Nobody who voted for #Brexit had a united view of what Brexit really meant. It was a rag-tag bunch of racists and the pissed off. #BBCQT 
Loving Richard Tice #bbcqt. Says there's a conspiracy among Metropolitan elite to stop #Brexit.Dead right! 
The Daily Mail is now worried Brexit may affect its profits  
This audience member says that Leave voters knew that Brexit meant leaving the single market #bbcqt 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP on #Brexit "A decision was taken as a country and I'm a democrat and I'll respect that." #bbcqt 
Apparently democracy is so unimportant whether it be Heathrow or Brexit that turnout in #RichmondPark bi-election is below 50%. 
Schedule for next week's Supreme Court Brexit case. Blockbuster!  
#BBCQT Why is free movement of people still being debated in relation to #eu membership? The public were asked and voted #brexit. End of. 
Pro-Brexit Daily Mail now worried Brexit may affect its profits   
Main reason to leave EU. #Brexit ers voted to leave to control borders but migrants pour into UK. 300,000 this year alone & record intake.  
Farming industry demands access to EU single market post-Brexit"A vital priority, where 75% of our food exports go" 
i've seen brexiti've seen trumpi know how this is going to end 
It was put best by Remainer Vernon Bogdanor after vote. Nothing more likely to cause explosion of voter anger than a plot to stop Brexit. 
Nissan Brexit letter deemed too sensitive to make public, govt refuse to release as it considers "public interest".  
Calls for a 2nd referendum on #Brexit a recount in the #USelection, if there was ever a year for bad losers, 2016 is the one 
Friday's Times front page:"Davis backs soft Brexit in blow to hardliners"#tomorrowspaperstoday (via @suttonnick) 
"Let's call the whole thing off?"Brexit: Ulster Farmers Union letter to PM calls for single market access  
Farming industry demands access to single market post-Brexit  
Nearly half of Germans want to follow the UK and hold a Brexit-style referendum on their EU membership   #Brexit 
David Davis gives another Brexit hint, says govt will guard against labour shortages - biz need for EU migrants will trump #euref promises 
I FRONT PAGE: 'Pound jumps after hint on Brexit deal' #skypapers 
I was upset about Brexit, annoyed with Trump, but voting off Larry Lamb instead of Martin on #imaceleb is the biggest voting farce of 2016 
Lookit! Did yizz vote for dat dere Brexit? Well, do you know you are voting to keep Martin IN? Not OUT, like? #Thickarses 
Wee Krankie thinks she has come up with a great idea, but we already have that. Its called UK....... #SNPGTF #Brexit #SturgeonMustGo 
If only UK government would own up and say: "Look, the Brexit thing is a bad idea. We'll give you each a £ rebate if you agree to cancel... 
In the absence of a #brexit plan, perhaps we should start calling it Neglexit.? 
The resolute @HenryCPorter has put together a rich resource mapping economic effects of Brexit by sector and region.  
Hot off the presses it's Part 3 with @jowilliams293 on parallels between Trump and Brexit:  @LearnLiberty 
if you want to trump brexit and combine a wonderful talent pool, great life style, startup culture and much more...  
Considering that #borisjohnson is a pathological liar-I'd say, he's lying even when denying  #brexit 
The UK is refusing to release the letter that encouraged Nissan to stay in the country despite Brexit  
.@JolyonMaugham Big unknown is what soft CON remainers are doing.Are they sticking with Zac or is sending message on Brexit more important? 
Brexit the Board Game announced. Features include; 28 playersNo instructionsA pointless waste of time and money for you and your family.  
Shifty @willie_rennie wants a second referendum before Brexit happens,but not for Indy he thinks it was settled in 2014Double standards!  
It won’t be easy to stop Brexit. But here are four ways to do it | Martin Kettle  
LATEST: David Davis tells CBI tonight he doesn't want "key sectors" to face labour shortages post Brexit ... big hint  
If you're under 30, you should go on this site and say what you want from Brexit  
Britain has no idea what to do next, and that’s dangerous #brexit  
Labour MP Calls for More Legal Aid to Help Migrants Claim Asylum LABOUR KEEP UP THE GOOD WORK DESTROYING YOURSELF 
Syriza slump in polls is warning to populists across Europe who promise what they can't deliver and damage economy in process #brexit  
Theresa May has already won the hardest battle: making Brexit inevitable.  
Better Together #Brexit Britain is a corrupt cess pit where the Brit Est. get richer & look after their own!  
It won’t be easy to stop Brexit. But here are four ways to do it | Martin Kettle  
The US and UK’s vision of democracy defined postwar world. Post-Trump and Brexit, now what?  
It's been 160 days since we voted to leave the EU, but we're no closer to Brexit! It's time the Queen stepped in! 
We send £350mpw to the EU according to @DavidDavisMP. After #brexit we still will. vote leave lets lose all control  
The UK's chancellor says Scotland won't see special treatment in any Brexit deal with the EU  
The only person in the whole of the EU who thinks a special Scotland Brexit is possible is Nicola Sturgeon...  
#Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP wants to get what we’ve already got – best trading access to the EU. Please share:  
Izzard convinced loads of people to vote Brexit so this is the best value for money ever for spending public money  
#Brexit negotiation reality hits @DavidDavisMP "Please, EU, can we have access to the Single Market?" 
#DavidDavisLogic Argues for years for a strong Tory line on Europe.Gets appointed as Brexit minister.Is inept and talks drivel 
Politicians need to get on with Brexit!  
ALL I WANT FOR CHRISTMAS 
Just voted lib dem for the first time. Quite an anti-Brexit statement if a 22k Tory majority is overturned #richmondparkbyelection 
Before there was Brexit or Donald Trump, there was Italy’s 5Star Movement  
Ofcom boss warns of Brexit impact on UK communications sector  
I would have thought you would be more interested in the appalling immigration figures and the move to soft Brexit today..  
So. Brexit means staying in the EU but pretending we have left. I can live with that! #DavidDavisLogic #borisjohnson 
And the Tory party have failed on every possible level to control immigration & now they are making a complete mess of Brexit !  
Article 50 #Brexit case 'hub page' now updated with outline timetable for next week’s hearing  
Pro-Brexit Daily Mail now worried Brexit may affect its profits  
Campbell: We’re heading towards a cliff edge with Brexit so parliament has a job to “slow us down"  
"I'm @nick_clegg & I think an EU army is 'necessary'. I called it a 'dangerous fantasy' earlier this year. I'm an opportunist" #Brexit  
So I have to ask. If this is the case why are we bothering with Brexit? @campbellclaret @Kevin_Maguire 
Alastair Campbell warns Michael Gove: ‘That £350m NHS promise on the side of the Brexit bus won’t go away!'  
'#Ireland should #LEAVEEU before it's TOO LATE' Anger as Dublin faces HUGE membership bill #Irexit #No2EU #Brexit 
The "best possible" access is the one currently in place.Anything less will thereby not be the "best possible". #Brexit.A costly madhouse  
Result will make no difference to Article 50 or Brexit or Heathrow or (possibly) anything else.   
Q: What "significant powers" will be devolved to Scotland as a result of Brexit -as stated by @DavidMundellDCT on @Sun_Pol_Scot A: No idea 
First Brexit, then Trump. Can Italy avoid a populist uprising?  
What produced #Brexit & #Trump is an old story. 'People take few pains in seeking truth, preferring the first story they hear' - Thucydides. 
Brexit: 1m EU citizens in Britain 'could be at risk of deportation'  
Apparently, in FarronWorld, a vote for the LibDems in one seat = change, but a vote for Brexit across the nation needs to be cancelled  
How 'Progressives' Elected Trump and Won Brexit  #Trump #Brexit  
Taoiseach @EndaKennyTD and @Apple CEO meeting at Apple HQ in Silicon Valley. Tax, Brexit & Irish operations on the agenda. @rtenews 
#Brexit means: Pound downImmigration upMight pay EU fees for access to single marketMight allow free movement of peopleGoing well 
Davis' own advisor says Brexit is a dead weight with a permanent GDP cost. And he's pro-Brexit with no clear reason.  
Again, a good report from Ponsonby on STV, re Brexit,& highlighting how Hammond and his team carefully avoided any questioning by Scots MSM 
A little tip for you @DavidDavisMP on how to negotiate a free trade deal with #EU countries#BrexitBritain #No2EU #FreeTrade #Brexit  
Whoops ! It's not just so called Remoaners who try to duck Brexit mandate, is it? Mr Opportunist is wriggling too !  
If you don't believe #brexit vote wasn't a result of lousy education this should change your mind  
We can now add France to the list of countries that have rejected Elsie's Brexit overtures. 
Chancellor Philip Hammond wouldn't speak to the Holyrood media today, but that didn't stop @Ross_Greer trying to get answers on #Brexit  
The madness of government policy over international students echoes the Brexit debate  
Brexit : Sturgeon insists there will be a separate Scottish Brexit deal. Just one very, very similar to the UK one... 
Forget Brexit and the US election, if you really want to open a can of worms on Twitter then tweet about the correct pronunciation of scone. 
How will Brexit affect UK communications? Our chief executive, Sharon White’s thoughts:  #ifgbrexit 
Richmond by-election: win or lose tonight ( he'll win),Zac Goldsmith's self indulgent ballot says little about Brexit, Heathrow, Mrs May etc 
"UK, stop thinking you can rely on Canada for a Brexit trade deal. We're not that keen on doing business with you." 
Watering down of #Brexit, while an EU holds firm on migrant rights, a UK publicly announces it's willing to carry on contributing when left? 
Pound jumps after David Davis #Brexit hints 
One will be back for the month of December in a one off "Christmas Brexit Special." There won't be any special guests, or tinsel .... 
The government appears divided between those with the wrong idea about what Brexit entails and those with no idea what Brexit entails. 
Just got my Brexit advent calendar. All the windows are boarded up. 
One of the reasons why people voted Leave was to unshackle the UK from the stagnating EU economy #Brexit #ChangeBritain 
There's hard Brexit, soft Brexit and then there's David Davis Brexit where we stand outside of the house but pay for the heating anyway. 
. @Law_and_policy so it seems we are not getting a running commentary on #brexit but a random commentary. 
Why is IDS the go to man for Brexit comment? Oh I forgot, the media haven't noticed he's a deluded liar and a failure.@BBCNews 
Current Brexit bargaining position  
Philip Hammond kills off Sturgeons plan for Brexit deal. His lack of NHS funding will also kill off many sick people  
Mario Draghi and Mark Carney both think Brexit will hurt banks - but they disagree on how  
MP asks spending watchdog to investigate Nissan Brexit deal  
The incompetent @theresa_may promises Brexit means Brexit. She also said she'd reduce immigration to tens of thousands. A sick joke!  
Delighted to join the @EgmontInstitute as director for European affairs today: new focus on #Brexit & future of European integration. 
FM @PaoloGentiloni meets #UK's FM @BorisJohnson at #MED2016. On the agenda #Brexit, #Libya, #Syria and #transatlantic relations 
Philip Hammond kills off Nicola Sturgeon's plan for special Scotland Brexit deal  
Pro-Brexit Daily Mail now worried Brexit may affect its profits  
Blogged: on the UK government's A50 Brexit reply: "A quintessential matter of political judgment for Westminster..." 
Brexit is going to cost Ford $600m by 2017, and it wants the same deal as Nissan.  Getting expensive.  via @latribune 
.@patmcfaddenmp is right: #Brexit should not be driven by ideology, it should be driven by the best deal for the UK economy  
Surge in EU nationals seeking British residency after Brexit vote  
Ford Europe says Brexit will cost $600mn in 2017. CEO Jim Farley demands same compensation as Nissan  @patrickwintour 
Philip Hammond slaps down Sturgeon, insisting that a special Brexit deal for Scotland is "not a realistic prospect".  
Six hours left to create a political earthquake in the #richmondparkbyelection. Vote @LibDems @sarahjolney1 and stop hard #Brexit! 
Are the Chancellor and the Brexit secretary getting fed up of 'no running commentary'? 
Perhaps Jay is being brought in to consult on Brexit PR strategy. 
Or the reason #Brexit seems marooned and looking weaker by the day could be because it's a stupid, expensive and impractical idea.  
When it comes to birth control, 52% of the population favour the withdrawal method while 48% are happy to stay in and see what happens. 
Think how it would surge if they gave up on this #Brexit drivel.  
Brexit threatens to bust our NHS.Here's a referenced summary of how Brexit threatens our NHS and healthcare: 
Pound surges on prospect of 'soft Brexit'  
Brussels unveils latest approach to the Brexit crisis (these new statues right next to European Parliament!?)  
Brexit means we take control of the £350million a week we give to the EU - and we can spend it on.. the EU. This is a shambolic Tory Brexit.  
Can the UK adopt the 'Norway model' as its Brexit solution?  
Boris wants freedom of movement and David Davis is happy to pay for access to Single Market.What does Brexit mean again? 
EU negotiators outrank UK ministers in Brexit 'power list'  
If you supported #Brexit, you'll find how the BBC's World News covers it shameful:  via @commentcentral1 
European free trade area could be UK's best Brexit option, says judge  
The @spectator podcast, in which I discuss Brexit with Timothy Endicott, Professor of Legal Philosophy at Oxford  
Brexit, Donald Trump and the rise of the European far-right means our country needs real leadership  
David Davis is about as coherent as Eric Bristow. There is no way this nincompoop should negotiate Brexit. We'll end up with magic beans 
Tony Blair announces plan to create new organisation to combat #populism and positively influence the #Brexit debate  
BREAKING: Catalan MEP and Scottish independence supporter Josep Maria Terricabras joins European Parliament's Brexit negotiating team 
New IRR report published today: ‘Racial violence and the Brexit state’  
By telling Scotland that there will be no 'separate #Brexit deal' Tories are giving up any pretence that this is an equal partnership. 
No of EU citizens migrating to UK hit highest level ever in run up to #Brexit vote - ONS figures  
So Hyslop, Russell and Sturgeon have all lied about Brexit meetings.Fills one with confidence. 
'Lion' producers on working with Weinstein, how Brexit and President Trump will impact filmmaking  
Brexit damaging the Daily Mail is a powerful reason to support Brexitbut however tempting that is I'm still fighting to remain  
Philip Hammond: Separate Brexit deal for Scotland "unrealistic". Suggests SNP are "clutching at straws" 
LISTEN! Speccie  says my talk  attacked "smallminded nationalism" of Brexit. Not point at all! 
Chancellor Philip Hammond has said there will be "no deal" for Scotland over Brexit ahead of his meeting with Nicola Sturgeon 
US delivers massive vote of confidence in the post-Brexit not so desolate wastelands of Britain  
The Government's plan for Brexit has been revealed...  
Met with Farming Minister George Eustice MP - share common interest in sustaining free trade post #brexit  
What a joke!Mr. populism Tony 'WMD' #Blair, returns to battle the #Brexit 'populism'.Bremoaners must be desperate! 
SR 1371 – Europe Filled With Populist Breakouts Following Brexit and Trump  via @YouTube 
David Davis once threatened to cancel his Sky TV and got half price movies for 6 months. We can be sure he'll hammer out a tough Brexit deal 
The TechCrunch Disrupt London Brexit Sentiment Survey — Uncertainty sucks!  by @mikebutcher 
The Brexit vote has drawn a record number of EU immigrants into the UK, while they still can. Just think about that, xenophobes 
"Brexit-backing Daily Mail publisher warns the vote to leave the EU represents a risk to its business" ¯\_(ツ)_/¯  
EU immigration has Britain at BREAKING POINT and Brexit must put a stop to it, blasts Lord  
.@BorisJohnson denies saying he 'supports freedom of movement' despite the Government's hard stance on Brexit  
The reason #Brexit seems marooned and looking weaker by the day is simple. Most elected politicians WANT us to Remain. We are in a battle .. 
any payment to EU after brexit would be sheer blackmail - we need a new PM & strong govt kick these pinko tories out  
Hey #Brexit'ers!There goes that pound again! Don't you love the way it jumps when we lean away from your nonsense? #ProjectFact 
Brexit secretary David Davis says the UK would consider paying the EU for single market access.  
I'M SICK OF IT !WEASEL POLITICIANSEXPLOITATIVE BANKS & BUSINESSESBLOOD SUCKING EUI'M SICK OF IT ALL ...#Brexit #Article50 #LeaveEU pic.twitter.com/Se7UIEfCT4 
"We send £350m a week to the EU. Why not leave and then give it to the EU anyway?"#brexit  
Another Whitehall Brexit Blooper: Press Release Talks of "If the UK Leaves the EU"  
Pound climbs by most in almost 2 weeks against dollar after comments on single market  
After #FMQs I'm sure 400k independence supporting #Brexit voters will be pretty angry at being called hard right Tory Brexiteers by the FM 
With Gina Miller, who brought the #Brexit case. Impressive and interesting and happy to take calls @bbcradio2 
Brexit Project Fear - SNP MSP Ivan McKee gets caught linking 2010 SNP/Tory cuts to Brexit.  
The 'Brexit dividend' DOES exist: Britain to benefit from extra £32BILLION when it leaves the EU:   
This morning I explained to the @colegcambria students that this year has been tough for career politicians. People want honesty! #Brexit  
This David Davis Brexit plan is like cancelling your sky subscription to then pay your mate for his sky go ID to watch it on your phone 
Where Brexit arrogance gets you: You don't understand your negotiating partner, so you fail to get what you want  
There's your Scottish Brexit scenarios. No. 3, please.  
Six myths about immigration in the era of Brexit debunked  
Brexit may negatively affect our newspaper profits, Daily Mail & General Trust warn  
Well, the good news is the doctor says the big bruise on my forehead I've had for 5 months is just from all the #Brexit face palming. 
EU postgraduates arriving in 2017-18 will remain eligible for UK government financial support, even after #Brexit  
'How can that be what people wanted?' Economist clarifies why 'soft' Brexit wd be "a betrayal of the British people"  
Called a "relief  rally." No better answer to what currency markets etc.really feel about #Brexitvia-@graemewearden 
Pound jumps after Brexit secretary suggests UK could pay to access the single market  
FM: 'We won't let Westminster use Brexit as a power grab" #FMQs 
So, we are leaving only to sign up and pay for something we will have no control of. OMG, were we lied to?! #brexit  
Schroedingers Brexit, pay to leave and stay at the same time  
Brexit breaking our NHS. Falling £ raises equip costs. £225m/week Brexit borrowing = no '£100m/week' for NHS.In #Richmond? Vote pro-EU. 
Vince Cable: There's only one option to beat the hard Brexit backers in #RichmondPark, and that's @sarahjolney1 
Key Q for Govt today: how can it be trusted to control EU migration post-Brexit when non-EU (under full control for years) still utter mess?  
Let's stop pretending the Leave campaigns' statement have any bearing on the form of Brexit we take. From NHS pledge to EU citizens in UK 
What an absurd tweet. Refugees welcomed in Germany nothing to do with BRITISH decision to put rights of EU migrants in jeopardy with Brexit.  
UK Brexit minister says would consider paying into EU for market access  
MPs who do not commit to voting for Article 50 unconditionally are guilty of delaying and frustrating Brexit  
Hey @timfarron - more people voted to leave the EU than voted for your political party. Stop trying to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
No, that's not someone describing the rise of the far-right in Europe & the U.S, that's Simon Jenkins blaming minorities for Brexit & Trump.  
Pound jumps after David Davis suggests how Britain could retain single market access  
Brexit. pic.twitter.com/p8mC49bIbB 
Dramatic rise in EU citizens trying to keep their place in UK.Guess not only us 52% believe in #UK post #Brexit ! 
"We’ll pay for this bumbling approach to Brexit"Excellent, spot-on article by @jennirsl : 
What TheChuffing NoraAreWeLeaving ForThen?StayAndFixTheCausesOfBrexitNo bloody Brexit!  
So 42% of Germans want a referendum.No wonder Brussels wants to make #Brexit difficult.Terrified of the domino effect 
Bloomberg: "mounting evidence the U.K. economy is weathering the fallout from Brexit better than analysts expected"  
David Davis confirms what PM has refused to.. we might keep paying into EU budget after Brexit for access to markets or other deals 
If the Tories haven't delivered a FULL AND CLEAN BREXIT process by the end of March 2017, May's 'honeymoon period' is definitely over. 
David Davis reveals that Brexit means Brexit, which means paying to leave and stay at the same time. #SchroedingersBrexit 
I wonder what is taking these people so long to spot the bleeding obvious.....#Brexit : Where common sense goes to die.  
.@timfarron : 'The Government are in an absolute mess over Brexit'  
Thanks to Brexit, dozens of coal mines have been reopened, providing affordable housing for thousands. 
Outstanding thread on Brexit.  
Brexit means less and less Brexit every day. Johnson wants freedom of movement, Davis will pay for single market  
7 years of interest lost in 2 months: UK Gilts#Brexit  
Brexit secretary suggests UK would consider paying for single market access  
Oh my god more horrid news how much more can we be expected to take!?! Dam you Brexit dam you and your uncertainty.  
So we can pay to keep freedom of movement and stay in the single market.   Intrigued to know exactly what part of Brexit means Brexit ... 
How many days before Article 50 is invoked will the UK Gov narrow down its range of #Brexit policies to one and tell us what it is.  
Citigroup considers moving some London-based traders to Frankfurt after Brexit, sources say  
The UK may pay to get the "best possible" single market access, Brexit Secretary David Davis says.  
Euro volatility is at its highest since the Brexit vote  
I'm deeply disappointed with Brexit Minister David Davis, toeing the establishment lie that we need to pay for access to the single market. 
Boris Johnson wants free movement of people. David Davis wants to pay to stay in single market. Maybe just, I dunno… STAY IN THE EU? #Brexit 
"No one has begun to address the basic problem: voters promised much more than Brexit can ever deliver" @jennirsl  
UK #smallbiz are focused on their businesses, not Brexit. And this is why we back them 100%. @SKellyCEO #SageResults 
Government admits it will 'consider' STILL paying into EU budget after Brexit for access to Single Market  
OPINION: The revolution that gave us Brexit and Trump could be about to hit France  
2016 is the year of anti-establishment movements across the world. First Brexit, then Trump in US, & now, very likely Le Pen in France.  
For the first time in my life, today I will be voting Lib Dem. A mandate to oppose brexit way more important than Heathrow. #RichmondPark 
Free movement from Boris, and now budget contributions from DD. Brexit's beginning to feel a lot like EU; 
‘Insane’ Boris Johnson still wants to ‘give illegal immigrants amnesty after Brexit’  #Brexit  
Most people will soon realise that the best 'deal the UK could get in Brexit negotiations is to be a full member of the EU. 
#Brexit questions in House of Commons this morning - no answers, no plan, no process 
After months of May hard #brexit spin, today Davis saying UK could pay to stay in Single Market, and yesterday Boris OK with freedom of mvmt 
Brexit minister tells parliament it's impossible for Scotland to stay in the Single Market and in the UK. He can't see a solution. I can. 
EU migration still running at a record high. Theresa May needs to get a move on delivering Brexit.  
Derek McKay"Scotland did not vote for #Brexit"CorrectScotland did not vote Remain either Del boyScotland never voted at all, the UK did 
Britain could end up paying the EU for single market access after Brexit  
So looks like #Brexit deal we'll get will be , as predicted by Remain campaign , all pay and no say - well done :-) 
Brexit is getting softer by the day. Reality is dawning on even the likes of David Davis  
Overheard on Jubilee line: "You know, he's like Brexit, he wants to have cake and eat it". Whole carriage laughed. 
Voting @LibDems in #RichmondPark sends a strong message to the govt determined to pursue a hard Brexit. Best of luck to @sarahjolney1 today 
The big lesson from leaks on BoJo's actual views on EU free movement?The EU won't make Brexit easy for us  
It is no accident that Trump, the #Brexit press and far right activists are all whipping up fear of Muslims.Fear fuels authoritarianism. 
#BlackMirror creator @charltonbrooker on predicting Trump, Brexit, and how the internet is making us crazy  
Industry warns of Brexit uncertainty for thousands of medicines. If we leave EU team, UK is smaller, slower market.  
I'm off to vote out Zac Goldsmith in the Richmond Brexit referendum, sorry 'by-election'. If you live in Richmond go vote for @sarahjolney1 
Our President, Sir Venki Ramakrishnan, on Brexit, the global nature of science & investing in UK research  
Oh come on, Brexit Britain is bad but not Syria-bad. Stop talking down Britain, Dan.  
If EU capitals deserve real news about #brexit, why not us, Mrs May? Why not give "weekly briefings" to UK? via @FT 
UKIP lie: Brexit creates fishing apprenticeshipsReality: the apprenticeships have existed for years - and are partly *funded by* the EU!  
#Number10 won't be giving a running commentary on #Brexit to citizens but will give weekly briefing to foreign media  
Can you tell that to the UK Government please Linda ?  They are trying in various devious methods to reverse Brexit - 20mill pple v angry.  
The Supreme Court Brexit hearing features 1 appellant, 2 applicants, 5 respondents, 5 interveners, 2 interested parties, and 1 notice party. 
Britain's manufacturing growth hits 4-month low and inflationary pressures keep building  
Background to Brexit  
Nearly half of Germans want to follow the UK and hold a Brexit-style referendum on their EU membership  #Brexit  
This is nuts. John Redwood still thinks there'll be money from cancelling EU membership. Brexit prolongs austerity.  
I got a Brexit Advent Calendar. You open a flap and a note says 'The reason there's no chocolate is you keep talking this calendar down' 
The Remainers aim to beat Brexit by playing a long game  
Pls RT today's @talk2meradiouk poll: 160 days since June 23 but still no Brexit. Should the Queen intervene in this constitutional crisis? 
Very useful resource page from @UKSupremeCourt with links to written arguments etc in Brexit case  
When you've got your feet up with a cuppa after a long hard year of voting Brexit and need something new to fight for.  
Citigroup in talks to move London banking jobs to Germany after Brexit 
Links to parties’ written arguments, case summaries and more - all now available on our Article 50 #Brexit hub page  
Downing Street blames the media about Brexit.  This cannot end well.  
It's time to start using your #AdventCalendar #Article50 #Brexit #Mattcartoons 
We’ll pay for this bumbling approach to Brexit  > Excellent, scary piece by @jennirsl @thetimes, free to read version 
If you live in Richmond Park and oppose Brexit, make sure you vote for Sarah today.  
This man is incapable of telling the truth. Do not believe a word he says. Check your pockets if he has been anywhere near you....#Brexit  
New London is home to the first safe female-only park. Women of all ages can spend a relaxing afternoon exploring Theresa May's Lady Garden. 
Will the government’s Brexit appeal to the @UKSupremeCourt turn or law or politics? My @spectator cover story:  
There's a psychopathic quality to Brexit ideologues such as Gisela Stuart, who says Brexit-poverty is 'worth it'  
We now know #Brexit will the most catastrophic event of our generation and the next. Tell your MP to vote against Article 50. Simples..  
Ashamed of this ungenerous country. We should have shown moral leadership & guaranteed the rights of #EU citizens presently in UK. #Brexit 
The Sun, an aggressive political campaigner for Brexit says we need "grown-up debate" on how to fund NHS. What about £350m a week promised?  
Brexit a 'significant risk' to income of universities  
"Brexit or no Brexit hateful speech must be publicly and forecebly condemned by us all, and I, a LD will do just that" my speech in the #EP 
Here's a new website that is monitoring all the malign effects of #brexit uncertainty  
It's time to put our own first Not LAST 
Britain and EU agree the Brexit deadline is tight - plus the rest of Thursday's headlines  
Labour isn't working for you 
If May introduces a short #article50 triggering Bill, it will be an attempt to bypass proper Parliamentary scrutiny. More #Brexit trickery. 
Bye-bye, EU? Idea of #Brexit-style referendums gains popularity in 3 EU states after UK vote  
The UK farm and food industries want tariff-free access to the single market after #Brexit  
Whatever outcome tonight Richmond Park could herald a political period where BREXIT's more important than parties -  
Those telling us we voted the wrong way in June would do well now to help make Brexit work, writes @AndrewRTDavies  
Downing St to brief foreign media on Brexit @FT. Personally think they should tell the public and Parliament first.  
There is a plan: Brexit means good riddance to austerity | John Redwood  
The Article 50 case isn't Gina Miller's first fight - and she's not afraid of making enemies  
Luxembourg PM tells Britain: either you're in the #EU or you're not #Brexit 
"Downing Street to brief foreign media on Brexit" - at least someone won't be in dark about No 10 plans.  via @FT 
Silicon valley take a punt on Brexit-bound Britain  
It's time to start using your advent calendars #Article50 #Brexit #Mattcartoons 
EXCLUSIVE: French Government confirm no Scottish Brexit deal negotiations - The Courier  
EU immigration has Britain at BREAKING POINT and Brexit must put a stop to it, blasts Lord  
Brexit Foreign Secretary supports free movement, he tells Ambassadors  Will May tell him to zip it? 
Brexit and the City - my take for the Economist's World in 2017  
Before there was Brexit or Donald Trump, there was Italy’s 5Star Movement  
New Zealand earthquake linked to Brexit vote. Increased sunspot activity linked to Brexit vote.And obviously...... 
The UK farm and food industries want tariff-free access to the single market after #Brexit  
50 Football Manager 2017 wonderkids to sign in a post-Brexit world  
Is a Brexit strategy finally beginning to emerge from the fog?  
A Powerful line up says Brexit needs careful planning not to damage a sector that is vital to our very well being.   
We've had Brexit and Trump. Now it's Italy's turn to keep traders awake  
Draghi warns Britain's economy would be the first to suffer from a hard Brexit  
The revolution that gave us Brexit and Trump could be about to hit France  
'Hard Brexit' could put UK food supplies at risk, supermarkets warn  
An honour to have @UKTradeMinister Lord Price address the @BritishChamber on #Brexit and future #FTA today in #Sydney @HSBC_AUS 
Viewing the world by population, the US & UK are "a tiny scrap of rock on the outer edge of the planet."  #brexit  
Looks just like UK's post-referendum regret about Brexit when voters realized Johnson, Gove, Farage lied to them. *smh*  
London may seek separate Brexit deal, mayor warns. What a crock! It can't and won't. One Nation, Muslim mayor   
Check out this corel of Boris Johnson, the UK Secretary of Foreign Affairs. #BREXIT #SouthPark 
The British public should not have to divine government policy from leaked notes. Our leader on Brexit transparency  
UKIP Brexit spokesperson @GerardBattenMEP says supporting @UKIP  is our best hope for leaving the EU & I'm with him 
Farming industry demands access to single market post-Brexit  
SR 1371 – Europe Filled With Populist Breakouts Following Brexit and Trump  
& Michael Gove is supporting Gina Miller... Apart from IDS, is there a single Brexiteer who really supports Brexit?  
Revitalizing Liberalism in the Age of Brexit and Trump - Niskanen Center  
The Brits are getting plain shitty about Muslims in Britain since BREXIT they're just saying Get Out! @JustKate038 @greeneyes0084 #US #USA pic.twitter.com/OOyplQ8GM9 
Tory MP bids to legally force Government to trigger Brexit by April amid judges’ block  
How Nigel Farage—“Mr. Brexit”—became the first foreign politician to have a face-to-face with the President-elect.  
Farage: Brexit ‘Directly Led To’ Trump Win and Rise of Populists in Europe  
Study finds hate crimes rose in UK after June 23 Brexit referendum  
Quiz Time: Turd or Tory?It's difficult. I only got 2 out of 12. #Tory #Brexit #Turds 
.@GerardBattenMEP, new Brexit spokesperson for @UKIP  talks frankly about how he would take us out of the EU today 
Today the voters of Richmond Park & North Kingston have a great opportunity. It can be another Orpington, but this time against hard #Brexit 
.@JuliaHB1 As EU citizens Britons are entitled to live in Germany. It's Brexit fanatics that want to end this. That's what you need to know 
Be a #globalneighbor & make #expats in your city feel welcome! "#London’s allure post- #Brexit"  via @FT 
Cut to the chase: Brexit is bad for our nation.  
Boris should quit and lead an Anti Brexit campaign. He now knows how stupid and complex Brexit is. At present he is skating on shaky ground. pic.twitter.com/xEScU3ZGas 
A rapt crowd tonight for our panel discussion on Canada's relations with EU & UK. #cflse #Brexit #trade #investment 
@EUflagmafia "Brexit mean's Brexit" means: They are mean, not so lean, destroying machines #TheresaMay says mustn't sneer Ignorant #Ukip 
just like Brexit. Too late I'm afraid and it's the poorest who will suffer 
Had a great time tweeting #CarlsenKarjakin but it's *so* intense.Glad to get back to easier subjects like Trump, Brexit and climate change. 
Huge numbers have changed their minds,the vote was advisory so the reduced support for brexit MUST be respected 
Remember 2016 was only when people voted for Brexit and Trump.2017 will be when those votes take effect. 
The revolution that gave us Brexit and Trump could be about to hit France | Fox News  
Could Brexit supporters be...I dunno...really fucking stupid?  
 Then he's NOT the man for the job! We want an effectual person to carry through with #brexit 
Don't give them too much credit. They voted for Brexit, after all. 
#Nuffield16 #Nuffieldag Brexit creates opportunity on world stage, so now more than ever we need to learn from Dutch  
Will Heathrow or Brexit triumph in Richmond by-election?Poppycock Sky News, by-election is about HeathrowFull Stop  
@theresa_may Replace Boris Johnson with Nigel Farage and let's get the GB show on the road! Brexit row.  
Brexit a 'significant risk' to income of universities  
Well then can my house have a separate Brexit deal? 
Boris Johnson 'supports freedom of movement' as Brexit talks loomDoes anyone know what BoJo is playing at? A Plan!  
